 <strong>Unedited</strong>  In the wild and empty dark earth, a black-robed man was holding a slender boy in his arms and walking by slowly. Wherever he went, the purple flames appeared, and scarlet flowers of flame also bloomed. Until the flirtatious purple and extremely red colours mixed into one colour, the man stopped his footsteps, his black robe barely discernible in the darkness, the man’s facial features appeared indistinct, only revealing his thin lips that slightly lifted, bringing an endless tenderness to his expression. He gently placed the boy on the ground, his naked white skin lay among scarlet petals, like a delicious dessert on a sacrifice of blood tempting demons to come and taste. At this time, the youth’s face appeared perfect, his incomparable beauty was capable of causing the downfall of a country. His pair of moist and glossy, watery eyes infatuatedly gazed at the black clothes man looking down at him, his soft red lips were slightly parted, his expression like he wanted to say some words but was hesitating touched the innermost feelings of the heart, and would cause most people to shudder. The man’s expression was still hidden under the black robe. He bent over slightly and whispered with a sweet-sounding voice, The boy’s cheeks slightly reddened, and the shy look added even more beauty...; The youth nodded lightly, veiling the fact that he was looking forward to everything that would be coming soon. Then...; With a “piu”, a dialogue box popped up. “OH!” The real protagonist of the game, Suo Fei, who was staring, completely concentrated on the screen roared in anger and almost smashed the mouse. What lousy dialogue box is appearing at the crucial moment! He was watching so excitedly! However, in the next moment, after he saw the contents of the dialogue box more clearly, and he once again stared at the screen. [Please select: A: Enter from the front; B: Enter from the back; C: Ride on top.] Turns out it was letting him choose the method of doing XXOO~ Suo Fei quickly gripped the mouse and went back and forth between the three options. From time to time, he would look at and size up the pale and tender youth on the screen. Suddenly, he had some hesitation. Let’s choose A, he always felt that he was a little pitiful. One should know, Suo Fei had played for three days and three nights before finally being able to pluck this high flower on a mountaintop of the Sky clan. How could just simply doing it from the front satisfy him! Then enter from the back...; Suo Fei glanced at the youth’s elegant and pale back suffused in light, and those soft wings of his that had not yet unfurled, immediately his head felt a little hot. Finally, he looked at the ride on top option again, and thought of the soft waist of the youth on top of him, taking the initiative to move and sway. Aiya...; too exciting! The scene was frozen for a full five minutes, Suo Fei weighed considered option 3 again, then finally pointed his mouse on the last option...; With a wretched heart, he pressed down on the left mouse button. Then the dialogue box disappeared, the position of the man and the youth was reversed...; And then...;...; A bang. The screen went dark...; After five seconds. “Fuck fuck fuck fuck!!!” Suo Fei suddenly began shouting like a T. Rex in the darkness! At the last moment, there was unexpectedly a fucking power outage! Suo Fei exploded, and in this way, he withered. Now he definitely had to go carry a bag of dynamite bag to blow up the power company and level it flat. You couldn’t do such a thing, ah, you couldn’t play with a person like this ah! Throw...; even throwing down a titanium plate wouldn’t be able to express the grief and indignation he felt right now! With this, don’t bring such a person to play! It’s okay to drop the titanium alloy plate and express his grief and anger! Suo Fei shook the disappointing, lousy little computer. After failing to generate electricity manually, and deciding to apply for reimbursement for this lousy little computer, he finally completely gave up. It seemed that there was no way to continue playing tonight. For three whole days and nights, he slept for less than five hours to play the game. But now, at the crucial moment of the final choice selection, the electricity system had to mess it up for him. Sighing in despair, Suo Fei, who turned back to look once and then twice at the dark screen reluctantly parted with it and could only climb onto the bed, ready to make up for lost sleep, and then fight again tomorrow. Lying on the bed, he felt extremely tired. He fell asleep before long. Yet it was because of this, that he didn’t find out, it was only eight o’clock. The whole community was full of shining lights, but only his small single room was pitch-black. Yet the CD-ROM with the word “Yalance” that he had thrown in a corner, flashed with an incomparably brilliant light. Suo Fei was sleeping soundly. He had a dream that he fulfilled his wishes and had conquered the last little shou from the Sky clan. The ultimate gong role he had assigned himself he had finally achieved, and he took over Yalance, with all nine of the little shous from the nine great clans, each with a different flavour all appropriated to himself. And...; and, the game also rewarded him with a special extra story. On the throne of the peak in the demon domain, as the role of the ultimate gong, a charming, black-bellied and domineering demon, he played with all the little shous from the nine great clans all at the same. ...;...; The legendary 10P feast. Ai...; even when dreaming he could drool about it. <strong>Notes</strong>: Just something I found in my messy translations folder that I thought I’d fix up and release in the hopes that it’ll be picked up ^-^ Suo Fei who was on top of the quilt rolled and rolled until there was no more space for retreat, only stopping when he was stuck to the ice-cold wall. He felt that he was only wearing a small piece of underwear. When he opened his eyes, he was shocked to see a great beauty at his bedside. His mind went blank. Who can tell him what on earth happened?! <i>Come on, don’t shirk your responsibility — yes, he must have woken up the wrong way, oh dear, this can’t fool him.</i>  He’s a pure 24k , unchangeable, ultimate gong; a bona fide gay. Even if he was offered a beautiful lady with an earthshaking beauty, he will not have even a teeny bit of interest. <i>Why is it not a pretty little shou ah ...; okay, that’s not the point. The point is, beauty, go back to where you came from, all right? I just woke up and I can’t afford another shock.</i>  He had a belly full of complaints, it’s a pity that an out-and-out otaku like Suo Fei is a bona fide gay with a max-level social phobia. Hence, he could only hold the quilt and stare at the great beauty in dismay. Fortunately, the great beauty was able to talk and communicate. “Phil, yesterday, mother was too much.” The great beauty sounded as elegant as herself...; but what did she mean by that? <i>Mother?</i> Suo Fei earnestly looked at the beauty who seemed to be only eighteen years old; snow-white skin, big eyes, small and cute chin. She didn’t look like a mother from any angle. It’s a pity that the great beauty firmly identified herself as a mother and continued to say: “Don’t be angry with your mother, alright?” Suo Fei was petrified...; He tried to analyse using his mushy brain. The beauty must be talking to him and judging from her words, she thinks she’s his mom? <i>Come on!</i>  Although he’s an orphan and he had never seen his mother, from a scientific point of view, he’s already twenty-seven years old. Even if his mother gave birth when she was twenty, she should already be forty-seven years old, close to turning fifty. <i>Not only does this fifty-year-old mother look like an eighteen-year-old, but she’s also unscientifically beautiful?!</i>  <i>Wait a minute. Even if it all made sense, his mother is a</i><i>Tianshan Tonglao</i>. Who can tell him why is it that his mother has dazzling, silvery long hair and silver eyes? <i>Alright, he gets it, he’s definitely dreaming the wrong way. Currently, going back to sleep is of the utmost importance.</i>  Unfortunately, God didn’t give him this opportunity. Another sentence from the beauty completely sobered him up. “Get up early and tidy up. Manzy His Highness has returned to Valinor.” Scanning keywords: Manzy, Valinor Piupiu...;.Suo Fei’s brain ran at high capacity and the corresponding information came out. It’s not that his memory was good, it was just that he’s an idiot that played hard for the past three days and three nights, so he’s very sensitive to these keywords. Valinor — the Holy Land of Elves, the City of Stars. Manzy — Full Name: Manzy Argoux. The Young Patriarch of the Elves, noble, elegant, beautiful and extraordinary. The key point is...;. Valinor is in the world of “Yalance”! Manzy was the sixth shou that the ultimate gong Suo Fei daren conquered — he has facial paralysis, cold on the surface, but is enchanting and coquettishly wild inside. <i>What’s wrong with this world, I just went to sleep...;</i>  The beauty had left, so Suo Fei who was rolled up in a quilt climbed out of bed, walking towards the closest mirror. Despite being mentally prepared, seeing a strange but familiar person in the mirror still shocked him. He had silvery-white short, fluffy and curly hair, snow-white skin, and brows that resembled Suo Fei’s except it was too exquisite that it looked like it got photoshopped. When Suo Fei moved his ears, the pointy and droopy ears of the man in the mirror also moved...; He had been a human for more than twenty years, yet he unexpectedly turned into a legendary elf just after he played a game for three days straights and slept. The great beauty seemed to call him Phil. Suo Fei racked his brains thinking about the characters who appeared in Yalance but he didn’t seem to recall a young Elven boy named Phil. Could it be that he was an insignificant passerby? Considering the huge worldview of “Yalance”, it’s already impossible to count the number of important figures having powerful connections and background, it can be assumed that there will be even more nameless passersby. Suo Fei was somewhat regretful. Why is he not lucky enough to become a legendary gong, the gong of all gongs, the ultimate gong daren, ne! <i>Well, being an elf is not bad either, anyhow, first I’ll have a look at the peerless beauty, Manzy</i><i>baobei</i>. He was impressed by Manzy, not to mention the time and effort he put in to conquer him, just his beauty alone made his heart beat faster. Elves were born magnificent, their temperament was even more outstanding, and Manzy was one of the best. He has silver hair that reaches the floor that seemed as if it was being enshrouded by a halo of light, pointed ears and soft skin that cannot compare to lanolin. <i>Also...;. Under his ice-cold front is a fervent beating heart. He especially likes to be on top during a moment of passion.</i>  <i>Ai...;.. I’m going to have a nosebleed!</i>  Suo Fei quickly stopped playing the little theater in his head, he’s really itching to see the real version of Manzy. With a wretched heart, Suo Fei suppressed his urge to drool. Unexpectedly, the quick and agile elves wore cumbersome clothing. The door was pushed open, illuminating the whole room. From the sun came forth holy light, bathing Valinor with boundless light and all the buildings were enshrouded with a light halo. The reason why Valinor was called the City of Stars was not only because of the beautiful starry night in the early morning, it’s more because of the sunlight enveloping the place during the day. All the stars in the sky will fall into the world, like colorful fireflies, fluttering through the whole space; within reach, but unable to touch. The top visual effects designed by the “Yalance” production team already shocked Suo Fei when he saw it on his computer screen but now that he’s really here, personally seeing the beautiful scenery was a direct assault on his heart. The young Elven boy Phil’s family looked well-off. Through the corridor, a maid was leading Suo Fei towards the main hall. After walking across a long courtyard, he arrived at the main hall where Vixanne Evans was already waiting. Suo Fei simply saluted and, overcoming his psychological barriers, he whispered: “Mother.” Vixanne nodded and greeted Suo Fei with a faint smile. She tidied his collar first before softly saying: “Your father went to the temple early in the morning. I only realized after he went out that Manzy His Highness is back from travelling. Wait for your father to come back and we’ll go see him together.” Suo Fei nodded in understanding but in his mind, he was already thinking that it’s a good night, a wonderful night. It’s a great night to see his Manzy baobei. Vixanne asked Suo Fei to have breakfast. Elves have a light diet but it all tasted good, especially the wine, but the wine here was very different from the Dwarves. Dwarves are heavy drinkers, whereas the Elves are more graceful. The variety of beautiful colorful drinks were just like their race, resplendent and exquisite. Suo Fei ate contentedly, while Vixanne didn’t eat much as she took care of Suo Fei. Seeing how satisfied he was, she couldn’t help but smile: “Yesterday, it was mother who was too tough.” Listening to her bring it up again, Suo Fei looked up at her. Although they haven’t been in contact for a long time, Vixanne was not only beautiful but she was also gentle and considerate. This kind of thoughtfulness made Suo Fei, this parentless child, feel warm. Because of this, Suo Fei looked at Vixanne and could’nt help but feel guilty. He had no idea where Phil went and he couldn’t explain it clearly. However, his fear of the unfamiliar surrounding alleviated due to Vixanne’s care. To be honest, he wanted to get closer to Vixanne even though he only knew her for a day. Therefore, Suo Fei wanted to reassure her over what happened yesterday, so he stumbled and said: “Mother, it’s fine, it’s alright.” Vixanne was clearly surprised, then she smiled and her silver eyes turned softer as she said: “Mother doesn’t want to confine you forever, I just hope that you don’t leave Valinor for a month after you reach adulthood, just one month.” Hearing this, Suo Fei understood the so-called dispute between the mother and son. Elves have a tradition. When a teenager reaches adulthood, they will ask permission to go out and travel which could last anywhere from a year to many decades. The chances are Vixanne loved her son dearly, therefore she wanted him to stay for a while. Hence, Suo Fei didn’t think too much about it. The day passed by faster than it seemed. The holy light converged on the horizon and the stars rose covering the sky. Vixanne’s husband, Phil’s father, came back. Unsurprisingly, Phil’s father was a brilliant and dashing elf. Standing beside Vixanne, they truly looked like a perfect match. He believed that there was no better match than Phil’s parents. Vixanne called him Grantlyn. When Suo Fei heard the name, something flashed in his head, however, the memory was a bit vague when he tried to recall it. Grantlyn...;. He probably heard the name but it was definitely not on the main plot, otherwise, he won’t forget about it. He didn’t mull over it for long. Even though Suo Fei didn’t continue to delve into it, but because of this distraction, he didn’t notice Grantlyn looking at him with a concern that could not be hidden and a feeling of deep irresolvable sorrow. <strong>Edited by: </strong>Shwifty An evening homecoming party was held for Manzy at the Temple. The Elven race were small in numbers, even in Valinor, and only a handful of them could be considered as nobles. Therefore, not many people could attend the party. The Elves especially like tranquility, each and every one of them brimming with elegance. As such a big temple, they were naturally even more reserved and polite, completely showing their elegance and beauty. For Suo Fei, this party released a high-class atmosphere, a party for the tall, rich and handsome guys and the fair, rich and pretty ladies. He himself looked like a rich second generation, but in reality he was just a socially-awkward, short, poor and ugly guy. If it weren’t for his expectations for Manzy baobei, he would never have come to such a place. Fortunately for him, Phil had not reached adulthood yet, and Vixanne was a sociable person, so it wasn’t necessary for him to speak. All he had to do was smile and nod his way through it all. After briefly conversing with some familiar Elves, the star of the party finally arrived. Suo Fei was found in a wonderful position; to his left were a variety of colorful drinks, to his right was the beautiful Vixanne and as soon as he looked up, he could see the elf entering the Temple. The Temple was brightly lit, and one could see the stars faintly outside. The elf entered from the darkness into the bright hall, dragging a long silhouette behind him. The sudden brightness made him appear extremely dazzling. Suo Fei directed his gaze towards the real-life version of the Elven prince, Manzy Argoux. His sixth shou! He stared at his small, indifferent eyes, his pale lips, and his stern little face, whose beauty could overthrow state and cities with just a smile. Maybe because he was looking too intensely, Manzy paused slightly when he passed by Suo Fei, glancing sideways at him with a look of apathy in his beautiful silver eyes. The air of indifference made Suo Fei, who was burning with excitement, thoroughly regain his composure. Suo Fei blinked. Manzy stood right next to him, his powerful and oppressive aura making him feel anxious. Vixanne immediately approached with a curtsey, helping him out: “Welcome back, Your Highness.” Manzy withdrew his gaze from Suo Fei and nodded towards Vixanne, before turning around and walking away. When Manzy walked away, Suo Fei realised a very serious problem...; His shou, his Manzy baobei...; why is he so tall...; so tall he had to look up to see him?! In his memory, Young Master Manzy was thin, delicate and had a slender waist! ...; Why is it that he looks different from what I remember? While he was distracted, Manzy was immediately surrounded by other Elves. Suo Fei looked at them. He must admit that Manzy’s beauty was exactly how he pictured it, but his body and temperament were way too different. Although the Elves were not as tall as Demons, they were still slightly taller than humans. However, when Manzy mingled with the crowd of Elves, his tall stature stood out. Is this the difference between real-life and a computer screen? Did the big screen cause the image to distort? As Suo Fei was pondering, Vixanne whispered to him: “You have worshipped Manzy, His Royal Highness from a young age, hoping to be an outstanding Elven warrior like him.” Suo Fei snapped out of his reverie, he knew that Vixanne was talking about his fellow Phil’s past. Even though he was crazily mocking in his heart, he didn’t show it. He didn’t worship Manzy at all. All he wanted to do was to take off the clothes of this little shou and confirm whether or not his thin waist was the same as the one on the big screen...; Unfortunately ...; he was not a dashing gong, but merely a bitter passerby. Don’t even mention conquering the beauty in front of him; in this world that felt even more real than reality, saying hello was already proving to be difficult for a sociophobic trash like him. Sighing deeply, Suo Fei finally withdrew his passionate gaze from Manzy. The party reached its climax with Manzy’s appearance. Elves loved the shining stars across the night sky, therefore their nightlight was quite rich with events, and parties were considered as a common pastime activity. In such events, the star of the party’s first dance is naturally thrilling. The harp is an instrument bestowed to the Elves by God. They can use the gentle bowstring of the harp to produce enchanting and soothing music. Manzy’s partner was a beautiful female Elf, who wore a long blue dress that swayed as she danced along to the music, highlighting the natural curves of her body. Her beautiful eyes were full of admiration towards Manzy and her red cheeks revealed her excited and nervous mood. She was a beautiful lady, but Manzy, who was dancing with her, caught everyone’s attention. He danced gracefully and elegantly, carrying the aura of nobility that the Elves were born with. It made people overlook his appearance and be captivated by his temperament. The song ended. <i>This beauty...;</i> The Elves were captivated and they couldn’t help but to clap gently in amazement. Suo Fei stood rooted to his spot, not blinking. His family’s shou looks so beautiful, this gong feels so proud! —— Thinking too much is a disease. When the first dance was over, the Elves stepped onto the dance floor one after another, enjoying the music. Vixanne and Grantlyn also joined the crowd together, leaving Suo Fei to his lonesome. Phil may be able to dance, but Suo Fei...; you can force an otaku to walk, but you can’t force an otaku to dance. It is definitely several times more harder than convincing an otaku to leave the 2D world and return to the 3D world. Fortunately, Suo Fei was a man. He didn’t invite anyone for a dance and naturally, no girls would invite him, so he gladly idled away. As he made his way to the corner of the room, he crouched silently. He wanted to continue to peep at his family’s shou but he suddenly couldn’t see him anymore. It seemed that the star of the night left the party right after the dance was over. Suo Fei was somewhat disappointed, but he understood. Manzy’s character setting was that doesn’t like noise, hence it’s absolutely reasonable for him to leave early. Since the star of the night was gone, Suo Fei felt bored by himself and wanted to go back. He looked at the sticky pair, Vixanne and Grantlyn, dancing sweetly, song after song. He deeply felt that interrupting them would be a great crime. Thus, he silently endured and shifted his gaze to the colorful drinks. All right then, let me verify whether the wine-making technique of the Elves was as good as the rumours! The results of his action appeared after an hour had passed. Vixanne and Grantlyn were still on the dancefloor and Suo Fei had already drank multiple different flavoured drinks. Even if it was an Elf’s body, it would still have three urgencies. Hence, he needed to urinate badly. He hurried out of the hall and saw the starry sky. Suo Fei realized a problem, who’s gonna tell him where the toilet was? Should he go back and ask Vixanne? Even if she’s the mother of this body, in front of Vixanne’s eighteen-year-old beautiful appearance, he dared not to ask. Ask someone? Can sociophobia be eaten, dear? Suo Fei wanted to cry but the tears would not come. Overestimating the physique of an Elf, why did he drink so much?! Right now, he is a dignified Elf. He was speechless; why couldn’t he just choke to death? Dying this way is too shameful. Vixanne was so nice to him, so he couldn’t do her wrong. Even while he was entertaining foolish ideas, Suo Fei didn’t stop walking. Since he couldn’t ask people, he should just find the toilet on his own. Valinor is a sparsely populated place and the Temple is the Elves’ central hub, the grand scale of the place is enough to make people want to break their leg. Suo Fei moved forward with difficulty, unable to distinguish which building was the toilet. However, he couldn’t take it anymore so he might as well go the whole hog. As he went further away, Suo Fei himself didn’t know how far he has traveled until there was a gasp of ecstasy dead ahead which stopped him completely. This...;. he wouldn’t come across a hidden task, right? He quietly peeked and the scene behind the huge stone pillar became clear at a glance. Then...;.his chin almost kissed the ground. Under the dazzling moon and shining stars, there were actually two Elves making out in public! Suo Fei smiled creepily. Sure enough, Yalance is indeed a highly explicit and erotic BL masterpiece. Look at this little shou who was being pressed down, panting heavily, what a real pity. The next moment, what Suo Fei saw wiped the smile off his face. The other lead actor in this live-version gay film...; That exquisite face incurring hate from everyone and even those cold and indifferent silver eyes ploughing silently through others. Isn’t that his Manzy baobei? The author has something to say: Dears, see you tomorrow =3= <strong>Edited by:</strong> Shwifty When good things turn bad, a white lotus would only display an expression of anger due to shame. However, as far as Suo Fei’s memory was concerned, not even a hint of relation could be seen between a white lotus and his Manzy baobei. His face turned cold and even his small heart became tens of degrees below zero. Manzy could get rid of a witness without being burdened mentally. But considering that he was now a powerless passerby, Suo Fei felt pressure heavier than a mountain. No matter how beautiful the scenery was, he still had to take care of his life. Suo Fei hurriedly turned and tried to retreat as quietly as possible. It was a nice idea, but unfortunately, reality was cruel. The Elves in Yalance were known for having a keen sense. It was impossible for Manzy not to be noticed by him unless he was dead. Therefore, Suo Fei who had just taken a step back stood in shock. Manzy moved too quickly and he didn’t even know when he arrived. It seemed as if the person showed up in front of him in a blink of an eye. Because of the earlier situation, Manzy was only wearing a thin robe and a large area of his chest can be seen, which was even more eye-catching than starlight. Suo Fei finally got his wish and caught a glimpse of the waist of his family’s Manzy. Although it was not the soft and slender waist from his memory, it still gave off a unique feeling. He was fascinated and caught unaware. He looked up, fixing his gaze on the elf, who was indifferently looking at him from top to bottom. The two of them stared at each other, when a sudden realisation snapped him out of his daze: <i>This is bad.</i>  Not only did he see Manzy making out in public, but he also drooled over his body just now. With Manzy’s temper, even if he didn’t die, he would at least be crippled. It was a matter of life and death. Suo Fei really wanted to fawningly smile and swear that he didn’t see anything and that he wouldn’t say anything. Unfortunately, his social anxiety reared its ugly head in full force at this crucial moment. Let alone acting like a lackey, he couldn’t even open his mouth. His mouth was set in a grim line, looking as if he would rather die heroically than surrender. Wouldn’t this look like a provocation in Manzy’s eyes?! Suo Fei silently shed tears in his heart. He was obviously timid and afraid of death, ”Wangbut this cursed speechlessness was forcing him to be a righteous and valiant Liu Hulan. What a beautiful misunderstanding! <i>I’m doomed, I’m doomed.</i> Big “I’m doomed” texts appeared in his mind on loop. However, destiny liked to play tricks on him, there was a sudden reversal just as he was getting disheartened and despaired. Manzy suddenly let go. The initially cold silver eyes turned slightly warm and his cold face appeared less desolate. He looked at Suo Fei and asked in a low voice: “Were you looking for me?” Suo Fei’s eyes widened, unable to come up with a response. This...;.. What does this mean? He’s bound to make a mistake if he talked more. Thus, Suo Fei pursed his lips even tighter, appearing more and more like Liu Hulan. Unexpectedly, it was to his family’s Manzy baobei’s preference. His expression softened further: “Don’t run around, I will wait for you at Star Temple tomorrow.” Suo Fei was stunned, he didn’t know what was going on, but his survival instincts were telling him that he should nod in agreement. Manzy patted his hair and asked: “Should I send you back?” Suo Fei quickly shook his head and finally spoke: “No, no need.” Manzy also didn’t force him. “Then you go back first.” He nodded then left. The whole scene felt like a dream, but it was a mess. Suo Fei was confused. According to his attitude, Manzy seemed to know him well? He was so familiar to the point that he wouldn’t get angry even when he came across such private matters. It seemed like this Phil was not the passerby that he imagined him to be? Suo Fei’s face changed. He bent over and clutched his stomach. H-he...; he went out to find the toilet! The situation was so urgent that he forgot about it, but now that it was over, he couldn’t take it anymore! He wanted to cry but had no tears. He was in no mood to think about what was happening between Manzy and Phil. He just wanted to find the toilet quickly. Looking around, there didn’t seem to be any toilet nearby. Suo Fei was bitter. Could it be that he had to relieve his business, right here, in this dark and windless night? Should it be this shameful? Even if he was only a passerby, he still transmigrated into an elf. Must he urinate in a random place on the first day he crossed over? <i>...;..It’s too shameful</i>. If he knew who the Transmigrator God was, he’d want to kill him. Suo Fei had enough. However, he had no choice but to turn around and hurry back. Although Vixanne looked like a beautiful eighteen-year-old girl, she’s also this body’s real mother. If he were to lose face regardless, he might as well lose face in front of his mother. In just a few steps, he actually immediately ran into Vixanne. When Vixanne saw him she looked somewhat anxious as she said, “Phil, don’t run around.” Suo Fei nodded madly to express his understanding, he hummed and hawed before saying, “Mother, just now, I drank too much...;..” Vixanne was temporarily at a loss for words. But immediately realizing what he meant, she couldn’t help but smile and say, “Follow me.” When he finally found the Elves’ toilet, Suo Fei cried with joy. Before he went in, Vixanne told him, “I’ll wait for you in the Temple, don’t run around this time.” Suo Fei nodded as if he was pounding garlic, before quickly dashing to the toilet. After resolving his business, Suo Fei felt as if he was reborn. Vixanne already left, so he decided to walk towards the temple. He hadn’t gone far before he encountered a former acquaintance. Not long after he crossed over, Suo Fei only knew a handful of people and this one didn’t really count as an acquaintance. It was just that he had seen him naked, brimming with desire, nothing more. There’s no doubt that the guy in front of him was exactly the other lead actor in the outdoor ‘war’ just now, he was the good-looking Elven boy who was lying down earlier. He was now dressed neatly. His eyes were devoid of cordiality, as he looked at Suo Fei with unconcealed disgust. Suo Fei didn’t speak, he merely stared at him. The Elven boy raised his chin. His voice sounded clear and melodic, but his words weren’t pleasant to the ear. “What made you so proud? If His Royal Highness Manzy really did love you, why is it that he came to me first when he came back? Don’t take yourself too seriously. If your surname wasn’t Evans, do you think His Highness would even look at you?” What is this “proud” nonsense? Sourly spouting a bunch of rubbish, is he a sissy eating vinegar and striving for favour? Laozi is a gong! All along, it was other people going after him and never the other way around. Little elf, if you were cute, I could have still accepted you, but Laozi wouldn’t accept this kind of virtue. Of course, Suo Fei didn’t say these words out loud. The expression on his face didn’t change in the slightest, nothing at all, so much so that he straight away left without sparing him another look. Being disregarded thoroughly, the Elven boy was pissed off. His voice rose as he shouted at Suo Fei’s receding figure, “This won’t end well, Sofey Evans!” Suo Fei disdained him in his heart, this low-levelled kind of yelling doesn’t even deserve to be called a scolding. When compared to the people from China, this Elven boy’s scolding level is enough to make him, who is socially incompetent, lose his will to fight. Suo Fei suddenly stopped. He turned around and asked: “What did you call me?” The silver pupil looked indifferent due to his lack of expression. Suddenly being locked on by those pair of eyes, Romy’s body trembled in an uncontrollable manner. He was severely stunned by the sudden chill that rose from the bottom of his heart. The next moment he calmed dow. He knew better than anyone how timid Sofey Evans was. It must have been an illusion. Silver hair and silver eyes were unique characteristics of the direct descendants of Elves in Valinor, representing the purest of bloodline. This inheritance gave glory to the noble descendants for thousands of years. Although Sofey Evans inherited this noble hair and eye colour, he inherited not even a little bit of power that was unique to the Elves. Even his constitution was weaker than ordinary elves. Thinking of this, Romy dismissed the strangeness in his heart. He looked up and haughtily said, “What? Could it be that you still want me to call you Sofey Your Excellency? Are you worthy? Incompetent Sofey, cowardly Sofey, you’re the shame of the Evans family!” Suo Fei stood still. Romy saw him acting like that and felt joyful. That’s the real Sofey Evans, a coward that doesn’t resist and doesn’t retort, resigning himself to everything. After he dealt his blow, Romy was left in a good mood. What about his innate bloodline? With such a temperament and incompetence, what future prospects can he have? He’s really a disgusting good-for-nothing. The author has something to say: The new pit has just been dug with great enthusiasm, I really want (to dig) ten more in a day~~~~【Shut up!】 <strong>T/N: </strong>The reason I first translated Sofey Evans’ name to Phil is that Suo Fei thought “Fei Er”, which is the Chinese transliteration of Phil, was Sofey’s full name. Just think of it as an Alyssa being called a Melissa, Zayden as Aiden, Fey as Phil, you get the gist. From here on, we’ll be sticking to Fey and Sofey~ (Using Phil at first would also give a good reason to why it didn’t dawn on him that the body he transmigrated into was Sofey Evans) <strong>Edited by</strong>: Shwifty Valinor has mild weather all year round. The nights are breezy and warm, like spring, so it’s unlikely for someone to freeze to death. That was why, when Suo Fei stood outside like a rock for a long time, he was still fine, except for the fact that his back and legs ached. If Vixanne was here, he naturally wouldn’t be so pathetic. Until the party ended, Vixanne and Grantlyn wanted to bring him home, but he wouldn’t return at all. In fact, the stimulation he received was too great. It turned out that Fey was just a nickname and his full name was Sofey Evans. When the keywords were only Evans and Grantlyn, he just felt that it was familiar and couldn’t remember anything. However, when the keyword Sofey was added, everything clicked into place. Sofey Evans was a well-known character. He has a very special existence in Yalance. He was a hidden character with equal importance as the main gong. It is known that hidden characters could only be activated after clearing all the routes and going through all the HE and BE. Suo Fei always regarded himself as a gong. Therefore, when he was playing Yalance, his main focus was on completing the gong route and activating the hidden ultimate gong. The reason that he was so familiar with Sofey Evans is exactly because of his fucking first name. Although it was a transliterated name, such a coincidence was still enough to make him unable to act straight. For this exact reason, Suo Fei deliberately paid attention to the character settings of Sofey Evans. After searching the character’s introduction, even with his max-level mocking skills, Suo Fei somehow didn’t know how to mock it. Just what is this “super M among all super M’s”? Just what is this “shou of all shou”, and this “ultimate shou” character setting? Sofey Evans had a very good background. The Evans family is one of the three remaining Pureblood families among all the Elves. Grantlyn is the current family head and his only son was named as the next family head as soon as he was born. With such a background, he had a bright future. Sofey Evans’ childhood and teenage years were indeed very good. He had doting parents and a harmonious family. Although a bit of trouble was still unavoidable, it’s just a minor digression from his warm life. Everything changed when he reached adulthood. The Elves’ coming of age happens when they turn sixty and the rite of passage is especially important. Sofey Evans, being a Pureblood elf, naturally took the rite of passage very seriously. His coming-of-age ceremony was held at the Star Temple, which was an honour that only Pureblood elves could have. However, on the day of his coming of age, the City of Stars fell into an unprecedented crisis. In addition to being known for its peerless stars in Yalance, Valinor also had two Holy Trees bestowed by God. These Holy Trees brought light into the Land of Valinor, it was a God-given glory, the soul of the Elves. This glory was met with utter destruction. The current family head, Grantlyn Evans, who inherited the supernatural abilities of the Pureblood elves, was known in Valinor as an excellent warrior. During the rite of passage of his only son, his name resounded in the whole of Yalance. He single-handedly cut one of the Holy Trees, falling from God’s glory to hell. Half of the dazzling Valinor, the City of Stars, fell into darkness forever, abandoned by God. Grantlyn Evans —— the Renegade of Elves. In the face of the crusade against him, he disappeared without a trace. Because of this, the Elves exerted all their wrath on his family. The Evans family that was famous for thousands of years was plunged into a bloodbath overnight. Sofey Evans went through such a misfortune that completely overturned his life. His cowardly nature revealed itself even more when only he survived. Suo Fei didn’t know how he survived. The character setting only explained the major events and some details were directly omitted. Furthermore, Suo Fei had never played this character so he only had a superficial understanding of him. With no family to rely on, Sofey fled from Valinor and flitted through the territory of all races. Afterward, the plot was filled with dog blood that left a bad taste in his mouth. To sum up, wherever Sofey went, a super possessive gong character will appear, attacking his frame of mind. He relied on the golden finger bestowed by the game god to prevent him from dying or going crazy. He would always somewhat resist at first, and then would meekly submit, eventually enjoying it thoroughly. Later on, unsurprisingly all of the gongs from each of the nine great races were obsessed, whether it be his *** or otherwise. Suo Fei wasn’t clear how this route ended, but he was already speechless just from looking at the introduction. Will someone really play this kind of extreme dog blood plot? Compared to Sofey Evans, the background of the ultimate gong character that he was playing was simply too clear. Although he conquered the nine little shous from the nine great races, all of the little shous he had slept with were all in their human form unlike Sofey Evans who only had few opportunities to sleep with a gong who’s in a human form. As he flitted through the territory of the nine races, he was abused by humans, beasts, beastkin and all kinds of strange non-human and non-beast creatures. OMG, it’s too hardcore! Suo Fei thought that he himself was too naive and innocent. And yet, he who was naive and innocent actually crossed over into this hardcore person! W-what should I do? It was impossible to change his surname, he’s now Sofey Evans. The plot had yet to start; it was still a time of peace, but what should he do once the story starts to unfold? He’s a dignified and tough gong, how could he be reduced to such a super m? All that hardcore sex, the Humans and Celestials were still gentle, but it’s better to die than to encounter the Demons and Sylphs. Then, there’s also the Dwarves, Beastkins and Trolls. <i>Oh no, it’s really not my kind of aesthetic.</i>  At this very moment, Suo Fei earnestly considered stabbing himself to death, but being unable to cross over to his original world was still a problem. It’s a real pity that he couldn’t do it. Although the situation was dire, it’s still a life no matter what. Not only that but he also roughly knew his own future. After all, the root cause of all this was his handsome father——Grantlyn Evans. In other families, it was the son who digs a pit for his father, but in his family, it was the father who dug the pit for his son. Was it a perfect day to cut down one of the Holy Trees? He cut the tree and fled away without his wife and son. This dad...; Suo Fei and Grantlyn had only met a few times; they weren’t familiar with each other, but he felt that Grantlyn and Vixanne were the perfect example of love between a husband and wife. What could’ve happened that made Grantlyn do this? He betrayed his own race, discarded his faith and abandoned his wife and son, which led to the extinction of his entire family. This is definitely not something an average person can easily accomplish. Suo Fei pondered all night long and finally made up his mind to accept the reality. He had no way back so he would strive to live here, he had to live a good life. The fate of Sofey Evans cannot be avoided. Now that there’s still time, he was set on changing his fate by cutting the root of the problem. He will use the body of this ultimate shou to walk the path of becoming the ultimate gong! Wait...; Suo Fei who was dressing in front of the mirror suddenly thought of a problem. A trickle of cold sweat run down his back Suo Fei quickly put on his clothes and ran out to find Vixanne. Vixanne frowningly said, “What’s wrong?” Suo Fei who was gasping for breath stared at Vixanne and asked, “Mother, how old am I?” This question was too idiotic to warrant an answer. Vixanne looked at him doubtfully before saying, “What’s going on, for you to be so anxious?” “Tell me!” Vixanne was startled and slowly replied: “Fifty-nine years old.” One more year! Suo Fei heaved a deep sigh of relief. Fortunately, there were many things that he could do in a year. There was enough time for him to prepare well in order to prevent the tragedy of the Evans family. Just when he was relieved, Vixanne’s next words were just like a deepwater torpedo. “You’ll turn sixty after today, you shouldn’t be so childish.” Suo Fei felt faint. “What?” Vixanne looked at him and said softly, “Today is your rite of passage. Since you already came, just dress up here.” Rite! Of! Passage! Suo Fei was petrified. He didn’t expect it to be today out of all days. He only crossed over and found out that his body was Sofey Evans yesterday and yet today was the prologue of the hardcore plot of this ultimate shou. Plot lord, run slowly. Be careful not to break your waist! Now was not the time to complain. Suo Fei may have many shortcomings but one thing that’s worth praising is that he would never give up. This could be seen when he didn’t move from his spot for three days and three nights in order to take over “Yalance”. He quickly calmed down and asked Vixanne, “Mother, where’s father? Why don’t I see him?” First, he should determine where Grantlyn was. If he couldn’t make him stay, he should tie him up with a rope. Everything would be fine as long as he doesn’t brainlessly hack down the Holy Tree. Vixanne was surprised by the peculiarity of Suo Fei’s behaviour, but she thought it had to do with him being nervous for today’s rite of passage. Therefore, she appeased him by replying, “Your father has already gone to the Star Hall in order to prepare for your rite of passage.” Star Hall? <i>Fuck, who can give me a map of Valinor!</i>  “Mother, I want to see father. I want to see him right now.” “Don’t make trouble. Today is such an important day; you can’t be willful.” Vixanne evidently didn’t take him seriously and said without asking, “You should just dress here since you’re already here. I already asked them to immediately bring the ceremonial dress over.” Suo Fei was so anxious that he was about to catch fire. He wanted to tell Vixanne that her husband, his dad, the great and mighty Grantlyn, would abandon them soon. What rite of passage? Who cares about it! The entire Evans family was about to be exterminated, who would care whether he’s an adult or not? However, he couldn’t tell Vixanne. Even if he did, he reckoned that Vixanne would only think that he went crazy! No, he must immediately find Grantlyn. “I’m going to the Star Hall.” If Vixanne wouldn’t tell him where the Star Palace was, then he just had to find somebody who would. Vixanne was obviously fed up with his restlessness. “Fey, your father has been in the Star Temple since yesterday just to prepare for your coming of age. Don’t cause any trouble.” Her voice was as gentle as before, but it was an octave lower than usual. Suo Fei wanted to cry, but he had no tears. His father was gone since yesterday? He didn’t dare believe that he was preparing for the rite of passage. He was merely planning to chop down the Holy Tree! If being soft was no use, then he just had to do it the hard way. Suo Fei did not bother with superfluous words; he immediately ran out. However, his collar was grabbed before he even took a step. He turned around with a face full of grievance. Vixanne glared at him: “Don’t go anywhere, be good.” Hence, Suo Fei could only stay there quietly. His mother was an Archmage that couldn’t be provoked. He couldn’t move even one bit with just a simple spell. The author has something to say: Ten more and something big will happen QAQ <strong>Edited by:</strong> Shwifty Suo Fei froze, unable to speak nor move. He could only sit down and let the beautiful Elves do their work. The ceremonial dress was the real deal. All these layers of clothes definitely couldn’t be handled by one person. As a result, he was surrounded by a great number of beautiful women. He wasn’t shaken by the golden opportunity of seeing a naked body. His tears were already overflowing in his heart. This kind of feeling couldn’t be described simply as “waiting for death to come”. This is the kind of feeling where he helplessly watch himself take the step into the pit of hell, one step at a time. And the people around him were still throwing out chafing remarks: “Except for a hundred years ago when His Highness Manzy came of age at the Star Temple, no one else had the honour.” “With that being said, our Young Master is the future successor of the Evans family. Naturally, his rite of passage would be held at the Star Temple.” “Also, it is His Highness Manzy who will put on the cloak for Young Master.” “This matter is of extreme importance. The family head will crown him and his bosom friend will cloak him. It represents how much importance the Elven King has placed on our Evans family.” Nothing was able to cheer up Suo Fei. In the face of life and death, even Manzy baobei couldn’t cheer him up. He was gnashing his teeth in anger. He hated himself for not playing the main route of ‘Sofey Evans’ even once so that he could know more about what’s going to happen next. Right now, he could only remember that Grantlyn cut the Holy Tree during Sofey’s rite of passage, but he wasn’t sure whether it was before or after the ceremony. “Of course it’s important. It’s not just His Highness Manzy. I heard that all the Three Great Families’ direct descendants in the city will attend the ceremony at Star Temple today...;” When Suo Fei heard this sentence, he had a sudden moment of realisation. <i>‘Oh, so that’s when he did it,’</i> he thought. It wasn’t before or after the ceremony. Grantlyn must have cut the Holy Tree at the same time as the rite of passage! Grantlyn must have been planning for a long time. Sofey Evans is the Young Master of the Evans family, thus his coming-of-age ceremony must be grand. Just like what the female elf said a moment ago, the Elven Prince will cloak him and all the direct descendants of the Three Great Families will attend the ceremony. What does this mean? This meant that all of the elites of the Elven Race in Valinor will be gathered together hence there would be no Elves who could threaten him! With his status, he could easily get close to the Holy Tree. Suo Fei looked out of the window. The whole of Valinor was enshrouded by the brilliant light of the Holy Tree. Suo Fei realised that it was unnecessary to rush to the Star Temple as it was certain that Grantlyn wouldn’t be there. He must be lying in wait around the Holy Tree, waiting for the opportune moment to act. With that in mind, Suo Fei finally calmed down. At this moment, the girls finally stopped fiddling with him like a doll. The tedious ceremonial dress was finally worn. He looked at the man in the mirror, somewhat in a trance. Sofey Evans’ appearance was not exceptional among the Elves. Compared with Manzy’s earth-shattering looks, he’s just the appetizer, not even close. If it was such an ordinary face, why was it that it attracted everyone’s attention in the plot? Was it really because of the divine protagonist halo? Suo Fei sighed. Compared to the conscientious game developers, he really lost. Perhaps the game designers drew too many beautiful lil’ gongs and lil’ shous. It is up to the player to decide the introduced character’s importance, therefore they weren’t allowed to do any shoddy work. As Vixanne removed her spell from Suo Fei, he could finally move. However, he was genuinely well-behaved at the moment. He looked straight at the mirror with his mouth clamped shut. He looked more like a doll than someone who was casted a spell on. Seeing him like this, Vixanne heaved a sigh of relief and continued to prepare what was needed. After five to six minutes of silence, Suo Fei saw that Vixanne finally slackened her vigilance. He spoke in a whisper: “Mother, I’m a little nervous.” Vixanne helplessly smiled and appeasingly sat beside him: “It’s all right, relax. Your father will personally crown you and Manzy His Highness will cloak you. With the blessing of God, you will certainly be an outstanding warrior that brings glory to Valinor!” Suo Fei hung his head low, appearing very adorable. Vixanne patted his soft, short hair and gave him a doting smile. “Mother...;.” “Hm? Is there anything else?” Suo Fei hesitated before finally saying: “I...;. I want to relieve myself.” Vixanne was stunned but immediately understood: “You child, go quickly. We’re leaving for the Star Hall in a while.” Suo Fei nodded with some embarrassment, got up and walked out of the door. The ceremonial dress was too cumbersome. He was tightly wrapped with layer after layer, severely restricting his movements. Nevertheless, it may not necessarily be a bad thing as slowing down would not expose that his mind was tense with a great sense of urgency. Walking steadily towards the toilet, Suo Fei on one hand scolded himself for being inseparable from the WC but on the other hand began going crazy because of the bits and pieces on his body. If he were to unbutton the clothes normally, the Holy Tree would have already been cut off a long time ago. If he didn’t modify this ceremonial dress, his movements would be just like an unmarried young woman and he didn’t know when he would get there. After a fit of rage, the once gorgeous and body-hugging ceremonial dress became a beggar’s clothing. Suo Fei moved his legs and felt pretty great. Time waits for no one. He definitely wouldn’t be able to go out of the main entrance, therefore, he deftly climbed over the wall. He managed to escape from the Evans’ family at last. Suo Fei ran madly, looking only forward. He didn’t know where the Star Temple was, but he could easily locate the Holy Tree. The Holy Tree is the light source of Valinor. Hence, where it was the brightest was the place to go; running towards the light definitely wouldn’t go wrong. The Elves are extremely agile and run much faster than other races. However, Sofey Evans’ body was by no means remarkable and he was panting for the most part of his run. Nevertheless, he could already see the Holy Tree from afar. Suo Fei dragged his weak legs, not minding that his chest was bursting with the need for air. As a matter of fact, the Holy Tree was a very special existence. During the day, it would unfold rays of light that could rouse the whole of Valinor but when you get close to it, you’d find that it was by no means harsh to look at. If anything, it could only be described as gentle. The closer you are, the more light would disappear. Instead, the tree would reveal its brown branches and verdant leaves. There was a sense of joy in Suo Fei’s heart. I’m close, the Holy Tree is intact.He arrived just in time! He was a weakling so he wouldn’t be able to stop Grantlyn by force, but Suo Fei had other means. The reason Grantlyn chose to hack off the Holy Tree today was only because the elites of the Elves were all at the Star Temple; he used this gap to obtain success by surprise. Suo Fei’s aim was to disturb this tranquility to render them unable to launch a sneak attack, this would at least act as a buffer. With all his energy, Suo Fei made the final sprint. A tremendous crash was heard through the horizon! Suo Fei’s entire body had stopped — just like freeze-frame in a movie scene. The sound of a huge object falling on the ground was followed by screams, one louder than the other. It was utter chaos. Suo Fei halted his footsteps and his complexion turned ghastly pale. The land enshrouded in light seemed to have been cut in half by a giant sword, then with a loud rumble, the other half fell into darkness and began to collapse. The Holy Tree...; fell from the sky. The other half of Valinor was forsaken by God and sank into darkness. Grantlyn succeeded. Suo Fei arrived, but he made a mistake. There were two Holy Trees, one in the east and the other in the west. Now, only the Holy Tree in the west remained. Suo Fei was only stunned for a moment before he turned around and ran towards the Holy Tree in the east. The Elves around him were caught in a panic. Terror and disbelief could be seen on everyone’s faces. For the Elves, the fall of the Holy Tree was tantamount to the sky falling. Suo Fei could only stop at the edge of the light. He was unable to take a step into the land that has already fallen into darkness. Standing on the edge, he finally caught sight of this body’s father. Grantlyn held a pitch-black sword in one hand. His long silver hair fluttered in the wind, stained with Elven blood, showing an enchanting hue. Behind him was a frenzied massacre. Seven people who were completely covered in black held dazzling weapons and rampantly killed the Elves who were guarding the Holy Tree. The difference in strength was too great and the Elves had no power to fight back. It was an inhumane massacre. Blood and corpses were all over the place. Suo Fei looked with a pale complexion and his stomach kept rolling. Finally he couldn’t bear it anymore, nausea defeated him and he bent over and vomited. At that moment, a strange laugh sounded, followed by a bantering voice: “Look, who’s this?” As soon as he said this, one of the black-robed men came towards Suo Fei but before he walked out of the darkness, Grantlyn suddenly blocked him with a wave of his sword. The black-robed man was slightly taken aback, seemingly afraid of Grantlyn. He snorted coldly and halted his footsteps, but his pair of red eyes remained fixed on Suo Fei. He was like a hungry beast who had found its long-lost prey. Grantlyn stood on the edge of the darkness, looked down at Suo Fei with a cold and indifferent look in his silver eyes. The pungent smell of blood made Suo Fei dizzy but he still raised his head up, looked at Grantlyn in the eye and asked, “Why?” <i>Why did you betray the Elves, why did you wreck your own family, why did you forsake Vixanne?</i>  His response was a swift, fierce slash of the sword followed by pain from the tearing of his flesh. Grantlyn put away his sword and watched Suo Fei bleeding from shoulder to waist. He slightly raised the corners of his mouth as he softly sighed in a mocking tone. “My incompetent son...;” Suo Fei half-knelt on the ground. The pain in his chest almost made him unconscious, but he hung desperately onto his last sense of reason and kept telling himself that he can’t fall into a coma, absolutely not. Grantlyn had already succeeded therefore the Elves would take their revenge on the Evans family. He had to run, quickly run, or else he wouldn’t be able to keep his small life here. <i>Wait a minute...; Vixanne...; there’s still Vixanne!</i> <strong>Edited by: </strong>Shwifty Vixanne...; Suo Fei froze. He immediately turned around and ran towards the Evans’ mansion in a frenzy. He couldn’t be so heartless. Her husband would disappear. What would happen if her son also ran away? What would happen to Vixanne? With one hand he pressed on his bloody chest, he scolded his father, the slag Grantlyn. How could there be a father like him? Before leaving, he actually gave a sword-cut to his own son. Did he feel that he wouldn’t die fast enough? Suo Fei’s lips drew back into a painful snarl. He silently placed Grantlyn as his number one on his revenge list. When a nobleman takes revenge, ten years is not too late. When I become successful, you better not fall into my hands, ‘Father’. The change happened too abruptly. The Elves were so shocked that they couldn’t even react. Suo Fei had to train his legs to be fleet-footed in one day, hence his running wasn’t exactly fast. He soon arrived at the Evans’ mansion. It was already in a state of panic due to the collapse of the Holy Tree. Not knowing that it was caused by the head of their own family. He went straight to the main hall. As he came through the door, Vixanne’s eyes were full of shock. Suo Fei appeared revolting. The ceremonial dress was in tatters, the wound from his left shoulder to his right waist was bloodcurdling, his short silver hair was a mess and his face was ghastly white, drained of its colour. Vixanne hurried forward and carefully supporting him, her tears wouldn’t stop falling, “What’s the matter? Who did this? Does it hurt?” As soon as she spoke, her palm emitted a ray of light that quickly merged into Suo Fei’s wound. This was her best healing spell, which was only able to prevent the wound from worsening. It was simply wishful thinking for it to heal immediately just like in the game. Nevertheless, the pain relief effect of the spell was not bad. Suo Fei finally regained some of his vitality, anxiously saying, “Mother, let’s go...;, let’s get out of here.” “What happened? You’re severely injured, we can’t...;” “No, we must hurry...;” As he spoke, the wound tore open, but Suo Fei held on and continued to say, “Mother, the Holy Tree collapsed because of father...; it was father who did it.” This sentence was like a heavy bomb, causing Vixanne to turn pale. The Holy Tree was the soul of the Elves while Grantlyn was her pillar of support. “No way, that’s impossible...;” Suo Fei grasped Vixanne’s hands tightly, looked into her eyes and said, “Mother, I saw it with my own eyes. We should get out of here. When the Elven King finds out father’s doings, we won’t be able to escape...;” The sound of doors bursting open made Suo Fei cease his words. ...;...;They couldn’t leave anymore. Standing outside the door were the Elven race’s bravest warriors, the Elven Royal Guards. Against the light stood Manzy Argoux, with a sword gripped in his hands, he looked at Suo Fei, his voice as cold as his entire person. “Where are you going, Sofey Evans?” To see his Manzy baobei in this kind of critical moment, Suo Fei’s mood was exactly — Damn it, he’s dead! Manzy was the lil’ shou of the Elven clan. For him to conquer this haughty little thing, he even memorized his preferences by heart. One of the most important things is his deep love for the Elven race. He regarded his race with the highest glory. In contrast, he hated betrayal, absolutely abhorred it! If Suo Fei remembered it correctly, one of the most important tasks he received when he first conquered Manzy was to help him kill an Elven traitor. For the sake of making this beauty happy, he even used extreme means of torture, the traitor was abused until he was almost unrecognisable. Fuck! Even playing a game can cause retribution? Manzy pressed his sword against Suo Fei’s forehead and asked, “Where is Grantlyn Evans?” Laozi would have already hacked him to death if I knew where he was, but who would believe him if he said that? If he said that he didn’t know at this moment, wouldn’t it be perceived as self-righteously covering up for his father? But he really didn’t know, who can tell him how to answer? Sociophobia, you go to hell alright! At this moment, Vixanne stood in front of Suo Fei and claimed, “He doesn’t know anything.” Suo Fei was stunned and suddenly looked at Vixanne. The look of fear and bewilderment on her face was long gone, but was instead replaced by total composure and absolute calmness. However, Suo Fei knew that this was just a facade of strength, his fists damp with cold sweat. Manzy turned his eyes to Vixanne and she stared unflinchingly back at him. Her voice was steady and she retained her grace throughout, “Give me some time and I will tell you what you want to know.” She appeared so confident that even Suo Fei thought she knew something. Manzy looked at her with some hesitation. Vixanne smiled and assured him, “I won’t leave this room, I just hope that you can wait outside for a moment.” “And if I don’t agree?” Vixanne smiled gently but said, in a firm tone, “Forgive me, but you wouldn’t know anything, even if you kill Fey in front of me.” Manzy narrowed his eyes before putting away his sword. “Alright, I promise you.” He turned away and left, but before he reached the door, he turned back and gave Suo Fei a profound look. Once the door was closed and everyone has left the room, Vixanne feet gave from anxiousness and she leaned against the wall. Time was running short so she forced herself to stand up. She took out a light pink pouch from her bosom then packed everything she could. Suo Fei was stupefied. There were many magical items in Yalance. An interspatial bag wasn’t rare, however, it was very rare to find one like Vixanne’s which had such a large capacity that it could fit all kinds of things from the entire room, whether it be big and small. After bustling about, Vixanne passed the interspatial bag to Suo Fei and said, “Keep it close to you.” Suo Fei was confused but he accepted it. At the moment, his life was not guaranteed. What could he do with all these worldly possessions? Everything was placed into the interspatial bag, the whole room became empty in an instant. She looked around the room for a while before she bit her finger, drawing blood Qi which she used to draw a magic array on the ground. Suo Fei wanted to ask but was immediately stopped by Vixanne. When the magic array was formed, Suo Fei was astonished to find that it was a transmission array. A teleportation magic that allows them to leave in an instant! It should be known that in the whole of Yalance, teleportation magic was very rare. Not to mention teleportation portals, just this kind of teleportation magic that could be performed anywhere at any time was just simply scarce. Archmages could master this teleportation magic but it definitely couldn’t be done by just one person. Just like Grantlyn’s group who left using teleportation magic after cutting the Holy Tree. It was clearly due to the combined strength of the eight individuals that they were able to perform it successfully. Manzy dared to leave Vixanne alone because he didn’t expect that she could cast the teleportation magic by herself. Suo Fei was pleasantly surprised. He knew that Vixanne specialised in magic and the magic affinity of Elves was high. Although she’s a Pureblood elf that can achieve twice the results with half the effort when practicing magic, he didn’t expect her to be a genius. So freaking amazing! Enough to amaze the whole of Yalance! In an instant, Suo Fei wanted to prostrate himself before the goddess. With the teleportation array, Vixanne and him could silently leave. Yalance was so big; as long as they keep a low profile, even if Manzy and his group searched for them until their legs fell off, they would be unlikely to find them. The array was completed and light blue rays of light now glimmered on the ground, which gradually rose, signifying that the spell has been activated. Vixanne had yet to call him but Suo Fei had already rushed over and admiringly said, “Mother, you’re amazing.” Vixanne’s usually bright and spotless face was a bit lackluster, most likely due to the excessive mana consumption. She patted Suo Fei’s hair and dotingly said, “Silly child.” Suo Fei smilingly laughed, his heart filled with joy that he could get away from here and survive this disaster. Vixanne motioned Suo Fei to stand in the center of the teleportation array and softly instructed, “Take the interspatial bag.” Suo Fei nodded slightly and took the interspatial bag into his arms, then hurriedly said, “Mother, come over quickly. We don’t have much time.” After activation, the teleportation array has a time limit before it launches, the moment the light is at its brightest is exactly the time of teleportation. Vixanne took a step forward but stopped. The light blue light turned to dark blue. Suo Fei became anxious and hurriedly tried to grab Vixanne but was pushed away instead. The dark blue turned to azure blue, the light was so dazzling that he couldn’t open his eyes. But, Vixanne stood still. Suddenly, an ominous premonition rose in his heart. Suo Fei turned pale with fright, he looked at Vixanne in shock. Vixanne smiled at him, her voice soft and pleasant. “Sofey, live well.” Suo Fei’s eyes widened and all the joy disappeared in an instant. “Vixanne! Vixanne, come here!” he angrily shouted. However, it was too late. The teleportation array started and an overwhelming sense of vertigo came over him. Suo Fei could only see the final scene of Vixanne standing from afar, her long, straight and beautiful hair streaming behind her. She opened her lips lightly and mouthed out words that Suo Fei couldn’t hear, but he knew what she said. “Sofey, mother loves you.” <strong>Edited by: </strong>Swhifty When Suo Fei found out that he transmigrated into the body of Sofey Evans, he wondered how could such a weakling survive the extermination of the Evans Family, which was a widespread massacre. It turned out that his mother saved him at the expense of her own life. He laid on the ground completely exhausted, even more than when he had first crossed over. Thinking back, he was truly too heedless. He already knew how rare transportation magic was, yet he still naively thought that Vixanne could activate one by herself. As soon as Vixanne used her own blood to draw the array, it should have already occurred to him that this was a forbidden technique that could only be activated with blood as the conduit and blood Qi as the sacrifice. Moreover, Vixanne gave him the interspatial bag. If she could leave together with him, why didn’t she keep it herself? As he thought of this, Suo Fei felt so remorseful that his intestines turned green. If only he was a little more attentive, if only he assessed the situation clearly. So many what-ifs...; He was struck with a strong sense of powerlessness. Suo Fei realised that even if he knew, what difference would it make? What could he do about it? Would he be able to bring Vixanne away? They may end up being trapped together instead. Vixanne could have left by herself, but she didn’t, she gave up her own chance of escape for him. Suo Fei was an orphan. When he was three years old, his parents died in an accident, therefore his grandmother brought him up. Although it could be said that their family situation was great, only the youngest of the elders remained, and it wasn’t easy for the two of them. Hence, Suo Fei became alone. Therefore, when he crossed over and met Vixanne for the first time, he had a deep sense of unreality. He was under the impression that his mother shouldn’t be so young and beautiful. However, after living together for a few days, he knew that a mother is a mother regardless of appearance, bringing warmth to their beloved son’s heart. He didn’t know where the original Sofey Evans went, but he already transmigrated into Sofey Evans’ body. Vixanne treated him like her own son, thus it was his obligation to protect her. Suo Fei laughed at himself. All along, he thought that he knew what was going to happen. He had solemnly vowed in his mind that he will prevent everything that was about to happen and change the fate of others, but in reality, he wasn’t able to do anything. He was so powerless that it was laughable. Suo Fei felt more powerless as he was flooded with negative emotions. He remained perfectly still on the ground, not even having the mood to take a look at where he was. ‘Yeah, what’s the point?’ ‘You have always been alone. Everyone around you will leave.’ ‘No matter who you are, no matter where you are, in the end, you will always be alone.’ ‘What’s the point of living?’ ‘What’s the point of living if you’re alone?’ ‘You might as well...;. give it to me...;.’ Suo Fei was lying on his back, his silver pupils gradually becoming a soulless void, muttered to himself, “Yeah, I might as well...;.” A roar boomed like muffled thunder, blasting into his ear, his voided eyes instantly cleared and was bright once again. Suo Fe quickly jumped up and looked around alertly. WTF, I almost got baited. How can I be worthy of Vixanne’s sacrifice if I fail like this? Near his leg was a young cub that looked like a tiger and a leopard, baring his teeth at him. The roar that woke him up just now, came from this little thing. As his mind cleared up, he could see traces in the dark. A cloud of black mist billowed. He couldn’t see the appearance clearly but it was emanating a strong sense of despair. Suo Fei squinted his eyes and quickly searched his head. If he remembered correctly, this should be a Nightmare Fiend. It had no body but it could eat anything. It would take advantage of any situation to enter a body. It couldn’t enter a person’s mind but it could influence someone to have negative thoughts. It would let the negative emotions gain control, so that it could take over the body to eat it. This demonic beast wasn’t powerful, but was extremely disgusting. A simple carelessness could lead to one’s demise, no matter how capable the person was. As it had no physical body, ordinary attacks had no effect on it. Furthermore, even though it could only influence someone’s thoughts, Suo Fei at his current state had no ability to annihilate it. If it was unable to take over, it would then always linger around you, and unless you are able to maintain positive emotions at all times, once you slack for even a little bit, it would attack once again. This constant torment would make you completely exhausted. Therefore, it was a super disgusting creature. Suo Fei’s heart was beating like a drum. A creature like this was really the worst. “Roar...;.” The sound made Suo Fei wake up from his daze. He turned his gaze towards the little cub at his side. It was the size of a domestic cat, but it looked as round as a ball. It had strong, powerful limbs and shiny fur; its body was arched as it roared at the demonic beast. Although Suo Fei knew a lot of creatures in Yalance, he had never seen the little thing before him. Yalance is so big. Furthermore, he’s not a biologist. How could he recognise all of them? However, this little thing seemed to be very interested in the Nightmare Fiend as it kept on stretching out its paws to scratch it. Looking at the Nightmare Fiend it seemed to be somewhat...;afraid of the little cub? Well, it was slightly difficult to distinguish whether the cloud of black mist was shivering because of fear or because of the wind. However, it was clear to Suo Fei that it was unable to even fend for itself. This is great. It would be great if this little cub killed this disgusting creature. Therefore, Suo Fei was ready to give it a helping hand. What was it afraid of? Very simple. It’s afraid of laughter, afraid of positivity from the bottom of one’s heart, afraid of optimism, afraid of the desire to live...; These are things that Suo Fei never lacked. His parents passed away early in life, so he and his grandmother had to depend on each other to live. He’s a man and a man should have an indomitable spirit. Could it be that just because he had a rough life, he had to cry in his grandmother’s arms? Vixanne’s sacrifice extremely shocked him, and he was frustrated because of his own powerlessness. However, these were not reasons for him to be gloomy. Currently, it is still uncertain whether Vixanne was dead or alive, still waiting for him to save her. It’s useless to stay depressed and do nothing! Suo Fei went around the demonic beast. His social phobia was only directed towards humans. He was not in the least affected when facing this kind of monster so he stood by, waiting for the right time to deal the finishing blow. First, he laughed, “Hey, little Nightmare.” Nightmare-kun trembled and shuddered. He laughed again, “Stop trembling, lil’ Blackie.” Blackie-kun was perturbed. Then, he cackled, “Let’s play, lil’ Mistie.” Mistie-kun sobbed and whimpered. Then came the death-dealing blow. Suo Fei laughed like a fool and his bro Nightmare completely withered. At that moment, the little cub, who had been waiting for the opportunity, jumped on it with a whine of delight, and then swallowed the black mist. When the Nightmare Fiend was annihilated, Suo Fei’s mouth was filled with laughter. Looking at the little cub’s face full of satisfaction, a sudden sense of camaraderie rose spontaneously. The little cub was rather cute, and its fur was soft and shiny. Even Suo Fei who was a man felt like touching it, therefore, he went over to pat its fur. Who would have thought that the little cub was very conceited? As soon as Suo Fei went near, it turned and bared its teeth at Suo Fei. Obviously, it didn’t regard this big idiot as a fellow comrade at all. Suo Fei tried to portray himself as a friendly person by smiling. Who would have known that the brighter his smile was, the more alert the little cub became. In the end, it simply raised its head up high. Assuming an air of superiority and unexpectedly ignoring Suo Fei. Suo Fei was somewhat speechless looking at the haughty little thing, but he was a magnanimous adult, even more so with a little cub. The wound on his body was no longer painful. The huge cut from his left shoulder to his right waist appeared menacing, but in fact, it was only a superficial wound. Combined with Vixanne’s healing spell, it already stopped bleeding and was slowly recovering. ‘Grr...;’ Suo Fei clutched his stomach. After tossing about for a long time, he found himself extremely hungry. Looking around, Suo Fei found that he was unable to determine where he was. It looked like he was in some forest. There were plenty of trees and shrubs, but there was also a lot of huge, open space like where he currently was. It looked like a normal place. If not tens of thousands, there must be at least thousands of places like this in Yalance. For a brief period of time, he couldn’t figure out the right direction, but he also couldn’t ignore his stomach rumbling. Suo Fei saw the pink interspatial bag on his chest. He was dazed at first before he sighed and finally opened it. The interspatial bag was bigger than he imagined, but it was also very messy, probably because Vixanne was in a hurry and threw everything that was in the room into the bag. It was not arranged properly so naturally, it would be unorganised. Suo Fei moved a few huge items aside and saw that some were already arranged neatly inside the bag. These should be things that Vixanne had prepared a long time ago. Suo Fei took a rough glance and found that there were several big chests stacked together. Next to it was a shelf full of books and some trivial things were scattered around it. Suo Fei didn’t bother taking a closer look as he already felt dizzy from hunger. When he saw the snacks scattered in the corner, he quickly picked them up. It was the breakfast that he didn’t get to eat in the morning. All these exquisite desserts were thrown by Vixanne into the interspatial bag together with the table. It’s such a pity that all the drinks have been spilled and not a drop was left. Suo Fei wolfed down the food until he was full. Fortunately, there were some desserts. Although it was not as satisfying as a lavish meal, it could at least temporarily relieve the hunger caused by low sugar levels. As he ate, the little cub who was acting superior, with his head held high and chest puffed out with pride, somewhat couldn’t endure it. As Suo Fei already relieved his hunger, he was in the mood to tease it again. Holding a piece of shortbread, he stared at the little cub with a look that was harbouring evil thoughts. Who let you ignore this Laozi! Little cub, if you have the ability, endure it. You absolutely cannot lower down your arrogant little head! <strong>Edited by: </strong>Shwifty Suo Fei ate loudly. How could he eat so greedily? The naive little cub’s mouth watered and it swallowed hard. However, even though it was enticed, the little cub still kept its head held high with firm pride and a valiant stance, showing that it wouldn’t sacrifice its ideals just to have a meal. It was just that its big eyes were already sparkling, revealing its inner struggle. Suo Fei felt like laughing. There was a smile on his face as he took out a piece of shortcake and placed it on the palm of his hand. He then said to the little cub, “Let me pet you and this will be yours.” The little cub howled. I’d rather die than sell myself for just a piece of cake. Suo Fei took out another shortcake and placed it on his palm, “Two pieces.” The little cub gave a hesitant howl. Now you want to bribe me with two cakes? I...;...;I’m not moved alright! Suo Fei mischievously smiled. His smile was similar to the madam of Yihong Brothel, as he further increased what was at stake. He placed a whole cake onto his palm, which was twice the size of the little cub. The little cub’s big, sparkling eyes stared straight. Although its mouth was still howling, its body had already moved slightly forward. Suo Fei tentatively reached out his hand, but as soon as he was about to touch the little cub, it immediately bared its teeth to him. Suo Fei quickly put his hands away and said, “Eat first, I will pet you once you’re done eating.” The little cub was completely moved. With a gleeful whimper, it buried its head into the food and ate like a piglet. After the cake was finished, Suo Fei finally got what he wanted. In the world-renowned Knuhl Forest, Suo Fei satisfyingly petted the little cub’s soft smooth fur, but in his mind, he envisioned, “When this little cub grows up, its fur will definitely sell for a good price.” In the Knuhl Forest that was famous throughout the whole of Yalance, the little cub who had eaten to its satisfaction lazily stretched its limbs, but in its mind, it imagined, “When this divine beast grows up, this creepy elf will surely be the first thing to enter my mouth.” ——This is the legendary love-hate relationship. With this, one elf and one divine beast silently reached some kind of agreement. The elf was utterly pleased with this ticket to becoming rich, whereas the divine beast also reluctantly accepted this food reserve. On the surface, Suo Fei believed that he had bribed the cute little pet with just a bunch of cakes, cookies, and snacks. Whereas the divine beast believed that this stupid elf was enraptured by its powerful and domineering temperament that he willingly became its servant. ——Thinking too much is a disease. You both should see a doctor. As Suo Fei had eaten his fill and had enough rest, he was in much better spirits. He stood up and tried to figure out a way through the forest. He didn’t know how Vixanne was faring. Although using forbidden techniques directly consume vitality, it didn’t necessarily lead to death. However, it was guaranteed that the caster’s life will be shortened. With her special status, it was unlikely that the Elves of Valinor would let her die. Thinking about it now, Vixanne was extremely intelligent. Even when she had suffered from a big shock, she could still quickly and accurately figure out what to do during a moment of crisis. She paid close attention to what she said to Manzy. First, she asked Manzy to give her time in order to save Suo Fei. Then, she stated that she knew the truth in order to prepare herself. That was why Suo Fei was confident that she wouldn’t die. The Elves would surely do everything possible to keep her alive because she knew the ‘truth’. Suo Fei sighed. He knew that he must hurry and think of a way to save Vixanne. However, he had to determine his location first. Where the hell is this? The trees were tall enough to reach the sky. Not only did it block out the sun, all he could see were leaves. In Yalance, observing the sky was a skill. By observing the differences in the sky, one was able to determine which race the territory belong to. In the Elves’ territory, Valinor, the Holy Tree’s brilliance enveloped the place during the day while stars filled the whole sky at night. There was no night in the territory of the Celestials, whereas there was no day in the territory of their nemesis, the Demons. The territories of Humans and Dwarves were the same. There was a clear distinction between day and night: the sky is light blue during the day and deep blue at night. The setting of the Trolls and Beastkin territories were similar, no matter whether it was day or night, the sky was always filled with a yellow glow, as if it was covered by gusting sand. However, the territory of the Sylphs was rather unique. They were situated up in the sky, in the middle of the Celestial and Human territory. It had a special protective barrier. As the Sylphs were skilled in flying, they didn’t have a territory on land. As for the Dragons, Suo Fei mused that this race was filled with mystery. Even his ultimate gong character who nearly conquered the whole Yalance failed to step into their territory. At the moment, Suo Fei couldn’t see the sky so it was difficult to determine his location. Therefore, he dropped the matter and planned to walk and have a look around. Even if he couldn’t get out of the forest, he could at least determine where he was if he managed to meet a creature that could communicate. After walking for two hours, Suo Fei’s legs were sore, but the scenery around him remained unchanged. The little cub began to whine and Suo Fei felt tired. So, the two of them stopped to have a rest, took out two pieces of cake and gnawed on it. The cake had not been finished yet when the little cub suddenly hunched down, feeling a sense of danger. Then there was a loud noise, as a huge body crashed to the ground. Suo Fei was startled. He hurriedly stood up and turned around. The scene behind him shocked him. W-what a huge mouth! Its teeth were as big as Suo Fei and his body couldn’t even fill the gap between its teeth! Suo Fe was left astounded. It was only when the little cub bit him that he collected his wits and finally found the ability to speak again. F**k, f**k, f**k. When is the best time to run, if not now? Suo Fei really wished he had ten legs. It would be great if he could cover a long distance in an instant. He sprinted madly, running until he couldn’t lift his legs anymore. He peered back with his hands on his trembling knees, gasping for breath. He ran for so long and yet the big head was still visible. It was too huge, too gigantic that it seemed unscientific. However, from a distance, he realized that the big head didn’t move at all. He recalled the loud noise he heard earlier and an idea popped into his mind. Could it be that the monster was dead? Thinking about it, his heart that was initially thumping hard immediately calmed down, and he was now more interested than scared of the monster. Apart from the big head, its light blue fur was shiny and glittering. On top of the light blue were nine tufts of flaming red fur, like a fire burning on ice, it was extremely dazzling. Seeing this, Suo Fei’s eyes were filled with greed. This is a well-known ferocious beast —— the Frostflame Beast! It’s a seventh-grade ferocious beast, a dead seventh-grade Frostflame Beast! “What does this mean? This means...; I’m going back!” he thought as he guffawed in his mind. Suo Fei wanted to shout to the sky. God had not abandoned him! God still cared about his well-being! Such a huge blessing poured down upon him, it caught him off guard. Suo Fei laughed with his teeth wide open until his eyes almost disappeared. He immediately recovered from his exhaustion and sprinted back. People say that men would sacrifice their lives in the pursuit of wealth. This saying applied to Suo Fei perfectly. As he rushed towards the ferocious beast, he suddenly realised a serious question. It’s a seventh-grade ferocious beast. Even a party of mage, archer, and warrior wouldn’t be able to kill this OP boss. How could it die quietly right before his eyes? He feared for the worst, so he ran for the third time. There must be an even more savage and cruel boss behind the death of the Frostflame Beast, something that a passerby like him could not deal with. Although a seventh-grade ferocious beast was something that he could only encounter by chance, keeping his life was more important. Just as he was about to run, he noticed a vague figure up ahead. He examined closely and found that it seemed to be human. He dismissively thought, a human killed a seventh-grade ferocious beast? Quit it, can an ant kill an elephant? When he paused, the ‘human’ had also found him and then, step by step, walked towards him. When the man was three metres away, Suo Fei could clearly see that he didn’t have sharp ears, therefore he wasn’t an Elf. He didn’t have wings so he wasn’t a Celestial or Sylph either. Also, he was less than five metres tall so he couldn’t be a Troll. His tall and slender body was definitely not a characteristic of a Dwarf. Those purple eyes, however...; What the——! It’s a demon! Suo Fei felt like crying. Meeting a demon was by no means scary, but what was scary was meeting a demon who could single-handedly kill a seventh-grade ferocious beast. From his understanding, the mortal enemy of the Demons were the Celestials and the Elves. Therefore, when a demon meets an elf, he wouldn’t fight to the death, but would let one be caught between a rock and a hard place, beating them up so badly until they were unrecognizable. Was it too late to run? In Yalance, the Sylphs were bewitching and charming, the Elves were graceful and elegant, while the Celestials were noble and lofty. These three races were famous for their looks. Humans and Dwarves were mediocre, while Beastkin and Trolls were on a whole another level of aesthetic. The Demons were the most extreme. They can either be exceptionally beautiful or exceptionally ugly. Originally, Demons of primeval lineage were of unparalleled beauty, even surpassing the Celestial and the Elves. However, they only valued power. To pursue strength, they even copulated with the Beastkins, which resulted in the creation of a new race, the Trolls. Suo Fei watched with caution as the demon got closer and closer to him. Gaping at the demon whose looks could rival even his Manzy baobei, he suddenly forgot to kneel down. Long ink-black hair, purple eyes, and this outstanding face, he is definitely a primeval demon. There was a saying in Yalance: Don’t ever mention height in front of the Dwarves and don’t ever mention the three fundamental values in front of the Demons. Even more so for the outstanding primeval demons of the Demon race. Their three views had long crumbled into nothing, turning into waste that had gone up with the wind. This time, it would not be easy for Suo Fei to stay alive. He was truly courting death...; Suo Fei was frightened out of his mind and the demon was merely inches away. The demon looked at the elf in front of him, his lips curled up slightly and his purple eyes were filled with an evil aura. He held Suo Fei’s chin, leaned over and kissed him. Suo Fei was gay. He had long recognised that fact early on, back when he was still a muddle-headed teenager. While his mates were interested in all kinds of girls, he was interested in some ‘action time’ with his buddies. Even then, his sociophobia always got the better of him so he only dared to give in to his sexual fantasies while he was in a game, all by himself. He’s a loser who had not the least bit of real ‘action’. Although Suo Fei was hardcore in the game that he even wanted a 10P feast, in reality, he was a pure and innocent virgin who hadn’t even gotten his first kiss yet. Therefore...;.. Suo Fei: （╯‵□′）╯︵┴─┴ That was Laozi’s first kiss! His first kiss was gone, just like that, for no clear reason. Suo Fei was mad, so mad that he could barely think straight. Regardless of what it was, be it a demon or dog, Laozi will fight! He pushed hard with all his might, not at all expecting that the demon who had single-handedly killed a seventh-grade ferocious monster would easily fall to the ground. Suo Fei got dazed for a while before he went over, hunched down and scrutinized the person lying on the ground. Then, something even stranger happened. Before his eyes...;. the person actually became smaller. The demon who was initially an adult became a teenager in the blink of an eye. The body shrank, his long hair shortened. At first glance, it was evident that the evil aura surrounding the body had disappeared. He only felt that the youth before him, who had his eyes closed, had fair and beautiful skin. His eyelashes were long and light, like butterfly wings. Not only was Suo Fei undoubtedly a face-con, he was also a shou-con. The young demon’s looks immediately made him drool. He was the cause of death of the seventh-grade ferocious beast, what of it? Primeval demons lack values and principles and were the embodiment of evil, what of it? Those were nothing in front of his appearance! Suo Fei gulped before he reached out his hand and poked his fair-skinned cheeks. Aiyoh, such a soft, smooth and supple skin. Suo Fei poked a few times, but the youth remained motionless. Thus, his audacity increased and he relentlessly poked even more. T-this feeling! His hand couldn’t help but be drawn into it. The youth was as still as before, therefore Suo Fei felt that poking his face was not fun anymore. Instead, he placed both his hands onto the handsome face and started rubbing and kneading. Seeing the fair and tender skin turn red, a comfortable and refreshing feeling arose. He laughed creepily, until he met a pair of purple eyes. ...;...;He woke up! At such an embarrassing moment! Suo Fei’s hands were still on that face, reflexively rubbing and kneading as before. His eyes stared at those purple eyes. Then, he realised that this was a demon, a primeval demon who would beat people to death! Suddenly, he wilted. He didn’t dare to move. In fact, Suo Fei wanted to kneel down and plead for mercy and forgiveness, but unfortunately, at such a critical situation, his sociophobia came out and foiled his plans. Suo Fei helplessly withdrew his hands. His thin lips were pressed tightly together into a straight line. His Elven appearance made him look more indifferent, with his noble and lofty silver hair and silver eyes. Even though he had just finished harassing the person’s face, he still had a look of arrogance, as if what he had done was for the other’s sake. Suo Fei: This was a misunderstanding! Surprisingly, the situation took a turn for the better. The demon actually closed his eyes again. A sense of realisation dawned upon Suo Fei. The demon may not be as strong as he imagined. Although he killed the Frostflame Beast by himself, he may be seriously injured. He may even be on the brink of death. What happened just now may have been a final flash of lucidity before his death. Whew...; Such good luck. Suo Fei, who had just escaped a disaster, felt that he couldn’t stay any longer, he must quickly run away. Who would have thought that his cute, little pet cub didn’t want to leave yet, staring at the seventh-grade ferocious beast lying on the ground with a wicked smile. This reminded Suo Fei that it would be very regretful to leave it behind. After all, the Frostflame Beast could only be encountered by chance. It would not be an exaggeration to say that its body was full of treasures. Its light blue fur could be used to make clothes that were not only beautiful but could also keep a person warm during winter and cold during summer. Most importantly, it had sky-high DEF stats. Although it wasn’t as impenetrable and weatherproof as a Nine Nether Rat’s fur, it still gives a considerably large amount of protection. The fur of a ten-million-year old Nine Nether Rat was only the size of a palm. The ferocious beast before him however, was as big as a hill. If he made clothes using all its fur and sold them, he would be counting money until his hands cramped. The meat of Frostflame Beast was of premium quality; it was smooth but not greasy and also plump and delicious. Furthermore, it came with certain buffs. From his understanding, it contained something similar to a stimulant, therefore eating it would increase the HP hundredfold. This further boosted his morale. There was so much meat. If he made a deal with the extremely fierce and warlike Beastkins, who were fond of meat, he estimated that he might be able to trade it for a city. Its bones were solid and tough, making it an excellent material for forging. It also seemed to have some medicinal value. Therefore, the ferocious beast in front of Suo Fei was a mountain of treasure. It was indeed vexing to enter a mountain of treasure but return empty-handed. However, Suo Fei still had some apprehensions concerning the demon. What if he wasn’t dead and woke up once again? But...;.. what if he’s seriously dead? Then he would regret it to death. He hesitated repeatedly but in the end, his heart was swayed. He wouldn’t gain anything if he had no courage. If he wanted to have a bright future, how could there be no risks? As he was about to roll up his sleeves and get things done, Suo Fei encountered another problem. This ferocious beast was a mountain, whereas he was merely a weak elf. He wanted to start but how? Don’t tell him that he’d have to slowly cut using a pocket knife...; Then he’d have to cut until God knows when. At this time, the little cub who was unwilling to be neglected roared without stopping. Suo Fei turned around and was embarrassed with just a glance. This little thing’s saliva almost spilled to the ground...;. Boss, is there anything that you don’t eat?! Judging from your size, even if you ate this huge mountain throughout your whole life, you definitely wouldn’t be able to finish it all. In the end, the little cub couldn’t stop being greedy. It sprang forward and opened its mouth to take a bite. Suo Fei shook his head in dismay and ridiculed, ‘It was really naive and ignorant. It had an impenetrable defense. Using his teeth like that, wouldn’t it just break?’ The cub’s teeth did not break, but it was evident that it couldn’t penetrate through its coat. It tried to bite over and over, innocently believing that it was wearing it away. It wanted to eat but it couldn’t eat. It felt voracious, extremely voracious. The little cub was furious and began howling loudly. Although the fur’s defensive ability was not top-notch, it would take at least a [Rare] grade weapon to deal some damage. But, where could he find a [Rare] weapon? Phew...; Then, Suo Fei remembered the interspatial bag and hurriedly went to search for one. Unfortunately, let alone a [Rare] weapon, he wasn’t even able to find a [Common] weapon. Vixanne, who was an Archmage, was a typical example of someone who was physically weak. Naturally, she would not have a collection of weapons. After pondering for a long time, the corner of his eye caught sight of the demon who was ‘sleeping soundly’ and an idea suddenly struck him. The Demons were a rather unique race. Their special living conditions had directly influenced their constitutions, resulting in their lack of magic affinity. Therefore, all demons were powerful warriors, and the one before him should be the same. To be able to kill a seventh-grade beast, he definitely must have a high-end weapon, it may even be a holy weapon. Suo Fei rubbed his hands together, itching to touch him once more. The clothes of the young boy were already in tatters, and if one looked closely, one would see that he was wearing a long, plain grey robe. Suo Fei frowned. The robe was actually crafted using the most common type of cotton. For a demon, this was a bit too poor. Even an ordinary human would refuse to wear such shabby, miserable clothes. Feeling doubtful, Suo Fei carefully moved to the right of the teenager. There should be a scabbard buckled to his side, but ...; there was nothing. Was it on his back? Suo Fei gently turned the youth over, but there was also nothing on his back. Could it be that this demon could PK such a ferocious beast with his bare hands? After pondering a while, his gaze thoughtlessly fell on the boy’s back. The clothes had been torn, revealing his pure white skin. There was an unexpected sense of beauty when the youth wore those tattered clothes. Suo Fei coughed and shifted his eyes away. The Demons’ wings were special. It was usually shrunk down to tiny little wings, looking so adorably sexy, but when unfolded, it could cover the whole sky. He felt somewhat curious. He had no idea how would the wings of a primeval demon, who were known for their unparalleled beauty, look like. He pulled the youth’s robes open and the scene in front of him made his heart thump wildly.  Shockingly, on his pure white skin, were two huge, horrifying wounds. His wings had been cut off! Suo Fei froze, he was suddenly hit by a strong sense of déjà vu. A forest, a seventh-grade ferocious beast, and a broken-winged demon! To confirm his thoughts, he reached for the youth’s left arms, and sure enough, an inconspicuous dagger laid quietly in his hand. [Asura Blade] The youth had already lost his consciousness, and he had not even the slightest bit of grip on the dagger. Therefore, Suo Fei was able to take the dagger away effortlessly. It was the most common type of dagger, so low-key that it made people not pay any attention to it. However...; Suo Fei gently slid the sword across the youth’s fingers. Blood dripped like raindrops, falling onto the common dagger. Then, its appearance abruptly transformed. After absorbing blood Qi, in what way did it look like a dagger? It was obviously a Divine Artifact that was the cause of countless disasters for all of eternity——the Asura Blade. It was said that the Asura Blade could be bound by blood. To activate it, it had to feed on blood. Although it would only recognise the blood of its master, it had invincible power. In the whole of Yalance, there were only three Divine Artifacts and only the Asura Blade was a weapon. From this, it could be seen how rare it was. A drop of blood was only enough to maintain its form for a few seconds. Hence, it had already turned back to a dagger. However, Suo Fei was still stuck in a daze for a long time, looking at the young demon with a complicated expression. He knew the identity of this young boy —— Samael Launay. If he really was Samael Launay, then he’s most likely at the Knuhl Forest. When he remembered the deception level of the forest, he was stuck thinking about it over and over again. Looking at the sky, he hurriedly took the Asura Blade and went towards the Frostflame Beast. Although it looked like an ordinary dagger when unactivated, it was not to be underestimated. Its sharpness had no equal in this world, therefore cutting the Frostflame Beast was honestly as easy as cutting cabbage. Suo Fei directly plunged the dagger into the ferocious beast’s legs, easily creating a huge cut. Although the blade was sharp, it wouldn’t be easy to finish cutting up this hill in a short time. But then, there was a certain someone who would share his burdens and overcome this difficulty. <strong>Edited by: </strong>Shwifty To be exact, it was someone that would indulgently share his burden and help him overcome his difficulty. Suo Fei had just made a large cut on the ferocious beast’s leg when the little cub noticed and leaped towards him. It then opened its mouth and bit into it. At first, Suo Fei shrugged it off. There’s such a big mountain of meat. He might as well let his cute, little pet eat as much as he wanted. He’s a generous master. But just as he thought of that, the whole beast leg was gone! Suo Fei gaped in fright at the eaten beast leg that was now nothing but fur and bones. He turned to look at the little cub who was staring at him with sparkling big eyes and a face full of expectation. He immediately comforted himself. An Illusion...; It must have been an illusion. With a solemn face, Suo Fei started cutting the other leg. As before, just as he had cut it open, the little cub excitedly pounced onto the meat. The next moment, only the fur and bones were left. This time, Suo Fei was unable to console himself. The legs were really eaten by this little thing, a little cub the size of two palms! The scene was just like an ant eating two legs of an elephant. The main problem was that its size had not changed at all! Suo Fei picked the little cub up and swung it around. This weight should only be around three or four catties. What about the two gigantic beast legs? Where did they go? He wanted to ask it to spit it out, but sadly, he could not speak the beast language. Forget it! The cub had already eaten it. He didn’t even have any idea where it went. Therefore, Suo Fei had no choice but to forget about discussing it and continue cutting the giant beast. Unfortunately, he had still underestimated his cute little pet. As soon as the fur’s protective layer was cut through, in a flash the flesh of the giant beast would be eaten up, just like the first time, with nothing remaining but bones and skin. This way, skinning and deboning was completed very quickly. However...;.. From a whole giant beast, only one of the forelegs was left! The eagle-eyed Suo Fei swiftly threw it into the interspatial bag to safeguard it. Glaring at the little cub whose face was full of satisfaction, Suo Fei bellowed, “You! Is your stomach a black hole?! Do you realise that you ate a whole city?! You prodigal beast!” Little cub: If this divine beast’s teeth were all grown, I would’ve eaten everything – fur, bones, skull, and all! I would not leave even a little bit for you, you stupid servant! Although he was shouting, Suo Fei wasn’t actually that angry. The ferocious beast was truly too big. Even if he wanted everything – fur, meat, and even the bones, it was impossible to keep them all. Originally, he wanted to take as much as he could, but right now, most of the space had been occupied so he took out the snacks and replaced them with meat. What was left of the fur were placed into the interspatial bag in rolls. The bones were also easily placed inside piece by piece. The way the little cub ate was extremely amazing. It ate the meat clean off the bones, saving him a lot of trouble. <i>Ah, one more important thing!</i> Suo Fei suddenly remembered. In Yalance, ferocious beasts of all grades have a beast core, it is equivalent to its origin. The higher the beast’s grade, the higher the grade of its beast core. Ordinary low-grade beast cores had little use. It could only be used to refine some medicine. On the other hand, beast cores above fifth-grade were extremely valuable. It could be used as a material for many things. It was a necessary component to make clothes and weapons of superior quality as it could greatly enhance its stats and abilities. Beast cores above seventh-grade had another feature: It contained the innate ability of the ferocious beast. Even if it wasn’t integrated into the item, the ability could still be activated just by holding the beast core. For a weakling like Suo Fei, this was simply a life-saving item. After digging around for a long time, Suo Fei finally found the palm-sized beast core. It was oval-shaped, with colours of blue and red revolving with splendour. Sometimes it was cool, sometimes it was warm. The size of the beast core determined the number of times it could be used. A palm-sized beast core like that could be used up to ten thousand times. It was an extremely rare, huge beast core. If it was inlaid into a staff, its number of uses could potentially double. Although he didn’t know what innate ability the beast core possesses, Suo Fei was already brimming with joy. He joyfully stowed it into the interspatial bag. This was his means to braving Valinor and rescuing Vixanne! Thinking of Vixanne raised his spirits. Right now, getting out here was a matter of great urgency. His eyes fell onto the unconscious young demon and his expression turned complicated. Was he really Samael Launay? Suo Fei heaved a heavy sigh. He sized up the youth lying on the ground with mixed feelings in his heart. Why? Since Samael existed in this world, why the hell didn’t he transmigrate as him?! When he played the game, he obviously played as Samael Launay. According to reason, he should have transmigrated to him. He didn’t have any connection with Sofey Evans. Well, other than their names being similar...; but there’s a difference between English and Chinese. <i>Transliteration really sucks.</i>  If Sofey Evans liked being a super M, then Samael Launey loved being a super S. Their upbringing and life experiences could not be more different. Before the plot unfolded, Sofey Evans was a young master who was born with a golden spoon. He had a noble status, the love of his parents, and a bright future. Whereas Samael Launay was the most unfortunate of all the unfortunates. Not only did his parents disappear when he was born, but he was also discarded into the territory of the extremely ruthless and greedy Demons. He had to live arduously and had several close calls with death. Then, he took advantage of a fortuitous opportunity to escape from the Demon territory and entered the territory of the Humans. As he looked like an adorable three-year-old child, he was adopted by an ordinary human. His misery was, in fact, not over. Contrarily, it got worse. Although ordinary humans were at the very bottom rung of the society, with barely enough to eat and wear, they still treated him very well, as if he were their own child. It didn’t last long. Samael was not human. His life span was hundreds or even thousands of times that of humans. For that reason, his speed of growth was unbelievably slow. The human had raised him for five years, but his appearance still remained like a three-year-old In the small village which had little or no connection to news, Samael’s abnormality sent them into a panic. To them, Demons were fierce and cruel beings that were more terrifying than Devils. The child before their eyes turned out to be a demon, which frightened them. As time went on, the human who adopted him became more and more fearful of the child until he couldn’t bear it any longer. He heeded the villagers’ advice to discard Samael. He was abandoned a hundred li outside the village, but Samael unexpectedly returned within three days and three nights. He was abandoned, again and again. However, no matter how far the place was, he was able to find the village and come back. The people went insane. They wanted to kill Samael. This was when the calamity started. For a human to want to kill a Demon the normal way was simply a joke. As a result, they paid a heavy price for their recklessness. When the sharp blade pierced through Samael’s small body, the protection system of a demon was activated. During an outburst of a primeval demon, the power it exuded was quite amazing. Even though Samael had no consciousness at all of what was happening, his power was still enough to destroy the entire village. Even then, Samael subconsciously tried to protect the villagers. However, the surviving villagers did not appreciate him. Because of this calamity, the villagers buried their fears in their hearts. They approached Samael, fawned on him, before using more cruel means for their crazy revenge. This background summary unfolded before his eyes as a CG cutscene when Suo Fei was choosing a character. He remembered it well but had not experienced it himself. Many people lamented that this person was really tragic, they vented their emotions until the world thoroughly collapsed. When Suo Fei finished venting, he mused that such a malicious character setting, in fact, could also be a foreshadowing of the future plot development. Just like Sofey Evans who grew up like a flower in a greenhouse. After he was faced with major life changes, his worldview collapsed. He was unable to recover from the disaster and thus, he could only succumb to his fate, allowing anyone to play with him. Samael Launay was the exact opposite. After he was born, he suffered one tragedy to another. Before he even reached adulthood, he had already wandered through the continent of Yalance. He already came into contact with each of the races, but he had always been mistreated due to his demon identity. Being used and betrayed by others were common occurrences to him. This was the way Samael grew up. He was simply the emissary of vengeance. He lost faith in all of the races and loathed the entire world. As a matter of course, his revenge came. When Samael grew up, the game officially started. He had outstanding abilities due to his primeval demon lineage. His heart was filled with malice, making him merciless. He started from scratch and traveled across the entire Yalance, took over all races, and conquered the nine peerless little shous...;. And then...;. Suo Fei had no idea what happened after that. Because ...; because after that there was a power outage ah! After that, he couldn’t play anymore ah! His 10P feast hadn’t even started when he crossed over ah! At this very moment, Suo Fei who had become the most tragic character in 《Yalance》 stared at Samael who was about to become the most domineering character in 《Yalance》, silently weeping. It...;it should have been him! Those nine little shous should have also been his! Let this damn, super M, ultimate shou go to hell! He wanted to be Samael Launay ah! Can’t you let me [LOAD] the game from the start? Suo Fei, who was immersed in his own world, didn’t realize that the youth lying on the ground had already opened his eyes. Samael looked at the elf in front of him. He could clearly see the familiar look of disgust (fog) and hatred (dense fog) from those beautiful silver eyes. He had seen it too many times that he was already accustomed to it. The corner of his lips turned up with indifference. He sat up and pulled the elf over. While he had yet to react, Samael bit down onto his pale neck. Suo Fei stayed still as his mind had momentarily blanked out. He sensitively felt a lick on his neck, followed by a prick. He gasped, immediately understanding what was happening. Samael was sucking his blood! This place was the Knuhl Forest. Samael obtained his Divine Artifact in here, the Asura Blade then he tested out his blade on the now-dead Frostflame Beast. The Asura Blade required its owner’s blood for it to be activated. Killing a monster like the seventh-grade ferocious beast required a lot of blood. The Asura Blade was invincible, but only a few would dare to make a contract with it. The reason was that the risks were too great. Before you could become its master, you might have already been sucked dry by it. But who’s Samael? He became the game developer’s object of affection when they finally found their conscience after madly abusing him. For some unknown reason, his body could suck other people’s blood and transform it into his own. This was simply a golden finger tailored for him to use the Asura Blade. As the blood in his body was rapidly sucked out, Suo Fei began to feel dizzy. He will die. He will surely die. The young Samael could probably still have a good heart. The adult Samael however...;. Even primeval demons would sobbingly run away when they meet him. Suo Fei didn’t die. It wasn’t that he suddenly possessed superhuman strength that allowed him to kill Samael in a flash. It was only that Samael relaxed his bite on him. Suo Fei was confused. Although Samael was still considered a minor, it would not be for long. His conscience and whatnots had long been fed to the dogs. How could it be possible for him to let him keep his life? However, Suo Fei was already extremely happy that he could survive. Why would he dare to ask? Samael stared at him motionlessly which caused him to suddenly shiver. He quickly adjusted his facial expression and tried to appear as someone who had a deep sense of righteousness and let bygones be bygones. What did it matter if he drank some blood? It was truly an expression of someone who would do anything for his brother. Unfortunately, he only appeared to have a stiff expression in Samael’s eyes, a face that had a mocking, false smile. The demon’s purple eyes darkened to a deep indigo hue. Suo Fei: Damn, someone please teach me how to act like a soft-hearted person! He couldn’t pretend to be a Bodhisattva, so he figured that he should just drop the act. Suo Fei knew perfectly well the tragedy of trying to scheme but ending up being bitten in the end. Compared to this kind of unskilled people, he would rather prove his loyalty through action. Although he didn’t know why Samael didn’t suck him dry, Suo Fei knew that Samael needed more blood as the consumption was high when the Asura Blade was activated for the first time. Initially, Suo Fei’s HP was close to zero and presumably, Samael was not any better. Earlier after Suo Fei hacked the Frostflame Beast, he immediately drank its blood to restore his vitality. But now, the beast had already been picked clean by him and his cute, gluttonous pet. Fortunately, there was still a beast leg in his interspatial bag. He hastily took it out to declare his loyalty. Of course, Suo Fei was not stupid enough to let Samael recognise where the beast leg came from. Luckily, he had separated the meat from its fur earlier to store it conveniently. Even if he took out the meat, not even the Frostflame Beast would recognise it as its own leg, let alone Samael. The blood of the Frostflame beast was pure white. With a quick glance, it looked just like milk which was why Suo Fei was able to dismember it calmly. There was not any sense of bloodiness. He, like a lackey, grabbed a container from his interspatial bag, took out a large glass brimming with milk (beast blood) from it and passed it to Samael, “Here, have some beast blood.” Samael’s sense of smell was extremely accurate. He was able to determine that not only was it a beast’s blood, it was also the blood of a seventh-grade ferocious beast, precisely, the Frostflame Beast. Looking around the empty space and the elf in front of him, it was obvious where the dead ferocious beast had gone. He gave Suo Fei an intense look before he took the blood with a straight face and downed it in one gulp. Suo Fei sighed with relief in his heart. By the glance just now, he thought that the matter of him feathering his own nest had been exposed, but fortunately, Samael didn’t seem to discover anything. Suo Fei quickly offered another large cup of beast blood. The two sat in silence. After drinking three large glasses, the cute lil’ pet crouching beside him couldn’t endure it. It cried out to Suo Fei and rubbed itself against his legs. Suo Fei patted his head: “Come on, you can’t drink this!” Cute lil’ pet: This divine beast will drink even if it costs my life, you foolish servant! Seeing that Suo Fei was unmoved, it rubbed itself against him even harder. In the end, it bit him hard. Suo Fei was filled with pain and he was slightly furious. He turned to glare at the little cub, and accused it with his eyes, ‘You have eaten a whole city, and you’re still greedy! Cute lil’ pet: You’re the greedy one! Greedy every day, greedy every night...; Oh, foolish servant, this divine beast doesn’t care about you! If you die early, as master and servant, this divine beast will only observe a moment of silence for you! After roaring, the cute lil’ pet run for its life. Suo Fei caught it with his quick hands and didn’t let it escape. It got mad and tussled with Suo Fei. Samael looked with cold detachment at the two dolts and said, “It’s getting late.” This was the first time Samael had spoken. Suo Fei was stunned, and he inwardly praised his voice — so magnetic and alluring. The character he chose was indeed the imposing ultimate gong. Wait...;. It’s. getting. late?! Suddenly, Suo Fei’s white and delicate face went ghastly pale. Holy- How could he forget! This was the Knuhl Forest, the legendary Myriad Poison Forest! Knuhl Forest had long been renowned in Yalance. It covered a vast expanse of area rich in natural resources and bordered on the territories of the Humans, Beastkins, Dwarves, and Trolls, the four races existing side by side. For adventurers, the Knuhl Forest was the land of their dreams, but it was also their nightmare. During the day, the jungle appears calm and peaceful, just like an ordinary forest. But only on the surface. In reality, there were countless high-grade ferocious beasts hidden behind the shadows of the forest. A little carelessness may cause one to become food for the beasts. This was not the most life-threatening factor. Although ferocious beasts were frightening, all parts of their body were of much value. Hence, they were the capture target of adventurers. However, at night, when the sky was completely dark, the originally ordinary plants would emit poisonous gases, spreading throughout the whole forest. Normally, miasma would not be terrifying. A grandmaster apothecary in Yalance could concoct all sorts of antidote. Just collect some forest miasma. Even if the miasma was heaven-defying, the numerous apothecaries would not be daunted. If that’s what you’re thinking, then you’re too young, too simple. The reason why Knuhl Forest was such a heaven-defying place was that all the plants emit different kinds of miasma. How many different kinds? Perhaps you can concoct hundreds or even thousands of antidotes but there would still be another problem: The gas here will mix together, and form new kinds of gases. So, how many kinds of miasmas were there in the Knuhl Forest? As many as the stars in the heavens! No matter how outstanding the apothecary was, he would only be helpless when confronting this jungle. Therefore, the Knuhl Forest was also known as the Myriad Poison Forest. It was already late in the afternoon. Once it gets dark, life would not be guaranteed. Although the night in Knuhl Forest was terrifying, there were still places to lodge for the night. It should be known that there are a lot of ferocious animals in Knuhl Forest. Since they could stay here for the entire day, naturally they could also survive the perilous night. At night, they would hide inside a naturally-formed underground cave. It was unknown how it came to be, but this cave had an ingenious design. During the day, there would be many passageways to enter the cave, but when night fell, there will be some kind of liquid falling from above the cave, forming a water curtain. This water curtain would form a barrier against the miasma at night, preserving the clean air inside the cave and creating a utopian refuge. Suo Fei could not remember how he controlled Samael in the game to find the cave. In fact, playing the game was very different from now. There was a map back then, but he didn’t have one at this moment. But Suo Fei was not worried. The foodie in his grasp was born and bred in the Knuhl Forest. To survive up until now, it definitely knew the way to the cave. Without further ado, Suo Fei released the cute lil’ pet and let it lead the way. He then turned to Samael and said, “Come with me.” Samael stared at him, revealing no emotions in his purple eyes. Suo Fei was confused for a while, then he understood. At the moment, Samael was not aware of the dangers of the Knuhl Forest and this version of Samael had long been inundated by the world’s malice. How could he trust others easily? Suo Fei did not possess a glib tongue. How could he possibly persuade him? He could not leave him alone either. So, he stumblingly persuaded, “Here, it’s dangerous at night. Follow me, I know where it’s safe.” Samael stood perfectly still and continued staring at him. Suo Fei wanted to say more, but his cute lil’ pet gestured, I don’t have time for your chatter. If you don’t leave now, you won’t be able to catch up! Then, the little thing started running madly. Suo Fei anxiously glanced at it. If they were unable to keep up with it, they might end up losing their lives here. Looking back at the poker-faced Samael, Suo Fei lost his patience. Since persuasion didn’t seem to work, he reached out his hand in hopes of dragging Samael away. Before he even touched him, his hand was already mercilessly pushed away. Suo Fei depressingly clutched his hands. On hind thoughts, he felt that he was worrying in vain. Samael absolutely would not die here. Instead of worrying about him, he should worry about his own life! After rationalising, Suo Fei wanted to follow his cute lil’ pet which had run away. But when he turned around, he was dumbfounded. Bloody hell! It was only a while, but the little cub already was like a star in the sky! Did you have to run so fast? Did you have to be so disloyal? This goddamn pet! It was actually so merciless that it could even leave its master behind! It’s so unfair. Wasn’t it that all the transmigrators in novels have wholeheartedly loyal and devoted pets? Why was it that he got an ingrate? It even gobbled up so many cakes and a whole mountain of beast meat! Suo Fei was raging mad that he had to vent out his anger. After venting out, he realised a problem. What should he do? His cute lil’ pet had run away. How could he get to the cave? Did he dare not to enter the cave? How miserable would his death be if he waited for the miasma to permeate the air? This was impossible. According to the plot, Sofey Evans would not die here. He would flit through the territory of all races and be oppressed, bullied and abused...; Ptooey! He was Suo Fei, not Sofey Evans. Wait a minute...;. Suo Fei suddenly realised a big problem. In 《Yalance》, there were many characters that could be conquered, but there were two characters that were extremely special and could not be chosen on one’s own initiative: the ultimate gong—Samael Launay, and the ultimate shou—Sofey Evans. Most importantly, these two roles could not coexist. A world with an ultimate gong could not have an ultimate shou. A world with an ultimate shou could not have an ultimate gong. That was why when Suo Fei first played 《Yalance》, he played as Samael Launay and never met Sofey Evans from beginning to the end. Because Sofey Evans did not exist. But now, in the world of Yalance, the two of them met. When the original plot had just begun and the two of them had just undergone major changes...; they met. What did this mean? It meant that one of them would die here, and the plot would only unfold for the one who lives. Suo Fei looked at Samael as he bawled internally. One is a weak elf carrying an interspatial bag filled with fur and bones, while the other is a powerful demon carrying the Asura Blade that was able to hack down a seventh-grade ferocious beast. Is there any need to think about who will die and who will live? No, no, maybe the situation is not that hopeless. Suo Fei comforted himself. <i>He is a transmigrator.</i> He knew their fate beforehand but Samael didn’t know that they had to fight each other to death. Using this advantage, maybe he could use his wits (scheme) to knock down the young demon! After all, every man for himself and the Devil take the hindmost. Suo Fei was filled with pity towards Samael. Boy, blame yourself for being born under a bad sign. ——You’re too imaginative. The leaves rustled in the cold breeze, a sign of nightfall. Looking at Suo Fei, Samael asked in his deep voice, “You’re not going?” Suo Fei was startled but recovered quickly. Fudge, he was overthinking things. The most pressing matter at hand was to find the cave. If he couldn’t find the cave, then Samael would not even have to do anything. He would die by inhaling the miasma alone. However, how should he find it? The disloyal little cub had already run away. There was not even a ferocious beast in sight. If he were to explore the way by himself, what kind of luck must he have to be able to encounter it? He became a little discouraged. Just as he was about to speak, Samael walked over and reached out his hand. Suo Fei looked at him with uncertainty. Samael suddenly smiled. His delicate features were already extremely beautiful but when he smiled, it was like opening a jewellery box, so dazzling, so radiant. The face-con Suo Fei instantly lost his bearings. Samael said, in a low voice, “I’ll bring you there.” Suo Fei didn’t know where he was bringing him, but he nodded in assent. Then, his feet left the ground. When he recovered his wits, Suo Fei was shocked. He...; he was actually held up by Samael! It...;it was even a princess carry! This pose, for a tough guy like him, was an absolute disgrace. Suo Fei tried to struggle but Samael strengthened his grip and whispered, “Don’t move.” Must I not move if you told me not to? It’s my legs, not yours! Suo Fei cursed silently to himself, itching for a fight. Unfortunately, he had yet to make his move when he was frightened, frozen in place. Samael held him tighter and moved at breakneck speed. The reason he didn’t use the word ‘run’ was because Suo Fei truly did not consider it ‘running’ as it was extremely fast. It could not be considered as flying either, but it was just as exciting. Suo Fei finally stopped grumbling about being princess carried. Rather than destroying his image, this kind of flying at high speed without caution might literally disfigure it instead. Therefore, he perceptively wrapped his arms around Samael’s neck. In the face of death, whether he was unmanly or not was not important. After a while, Suo Fei finally saw the cave entrance from a distance. It was already getting dark. To prevent the miasma from entering, a water curtain had already begun to form. Although it was called a water curtain, it was actually not composed of water. It’s a very fluid, light blue liquid that looked just like water. This liquid was harmless but it can’t be drunk. The sole function it had was its strong isolation. With its ability to block out the all-pervasive miasma, one could imagine how dense it was. When the two smoothly burst into the cave, it was already completely dark outside. Suo Fei heaved a sigh of relief. It was a close call. If they were one step too slow, they would breathe the miasma in. It was all thanks to Samael. If it hadn’t been for him, even if Suo Fei knew where the cave was, he would have been done for if he ran with his bloody short legs. So then, this teenaged Samael, had he not reached the extent of being an extreme chuuni? First, he didn’t suck him dry, then he brought Suo Fei into the cave before dark, saving his life. The first one was the grace of not killing him, and the other was the grace of saving his life. Considering that this came from the ultimate gong who was born to wreak vengeance, this was simply unheard-of! On the other hand, Suo Fei had evil intentions of murdering him. He was really...;. really the worst! Suo Fei felt ashamed. Although he was not soft-hearted, he was also not a despicable person. Samael was so kind that he could even return good for evil...; Wait. How could Samael know where the cave is? Although he fast-forwarded most of the plots when he was playing the game, he could still clearly remember. In the original plot, Samael came across the Knuhl Forest, acquired the Asura Blade, killed a seventh-grade ferocious beast, and then fell unconscious. When the sky turned dark, miasma pervaded the air. Thus, he was poisoned by several deadly poisons. He was on the verge of death when he found the cave by lucky chance and hid inside. However, in this plot, it was impossible for Samael to know where the cave is. He met Samael when he finished killing the seventh-grade ferocious beast. At this point in time, Samael should not even know that Knuhl Forest is the Myriad Poison Forest. But ...; he easily found the cave. He appeared to be taking a familiar route, so it is clearly not his first time going to the cave. A troubling idea formed in Suo Fei’s mind. What if, when he met Samael, it was not the first day he came to Knuhl Forest? What if Samael had already stayed in Knuhl Forest for a long time? He subjectively believed that Samael had just killed the seventh-grade ferocious beast which meant that he had only arrived at the forest. In fact, although seventh-grade ferocious beasts were unlikely to walk in groups, it was not difficult to find one or two of them. What if this was the second time Samael killed a Frostflame Beast? If this was the case, then it made sense how Samael knew about the cave. He also finally figured out why Samael would save his life. That was because he would be of great use. Here he was, actually thinking that the ultimate gong still had a conscience. Truly foolish and naive. Stay alive, my ass! Pretending to be dead would be more than ten thousand times better! When Samael was poisoned, he was unbearably weak even though he managed to escape into the cave. Fortunately, there were several herbs in the cave that could suppress the poison. Furthermore, he drank the blood of the seventh-grade ferocious beast, which was slightly resistant to the toxicity, so he did not die immediately. However, to completely detoxify the poison, he needed to eat the beast core of a ninth-grade ferocious beast found deep inside the cave. It was true that all the apothecaries in the entire Yalance could only feel helpless in the face of the Myriad Poison Forest’s miasma. However, all things have their match. In this case, it was the ninth-grade ferocious beast residing in the cave — the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice. Strangely, even though the ferocious beast was born and raised inside the cave and thus, had never left the cave, its beast core could neutralise hundreds of poisons. Since Samael ate its beast core, he acquired the golden finger of being resistant to all kinds of poison, which was necessary for when he travels back home to exact his revenge. However, the reason why the Ten-coloured Cockatrice was a ninth-grade ferocious beast was because of its domineering power. It’s wishful thinking to easily get rid of it. Samael relied on the herbs to suppress the poison. When he first arrived, he went to pick a fight with the ninth-grade ferocious beast. Let alone killing the ferocious beast, he was also nearly swallowed up. However, Samael had experienced too many ups and downs growing up, raising him to have a vengeful, jet-black heart and an extraordinarily tenacious temperament. He pestered it every day. After pestering the ninth-grade ferocious beast for ninety-nine days straight, he discovered the ferocious beast’s fatal flaw. While the ferocious beast is still young, its power would be reduced to a third if the feeler on its forehead was pressed, increasing the prospects of hacking it to death. However, another difficulty arose. All the ferocious beasts in the Knuhl Forest knew how vicious the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice was. Even in the cave’s limited space, the creatures never dared to approach it within a range of one kilometer, let alone challenge its authority. Therefore, even though Samael knew its weakness, it would be difficult to carry out. Hence, Suo Fei was a heaven-sent lucky charm. The initial form of the ten-colored giant beast appeared very harmless. It was a small palm-sized dumpling, so fluffy and adorable. Nevertheless, all the ferocious beasts inside the cave knew not to provoke it. Suo Fei, however, was an outsider and could be exploited. Once he discerned the truth of the matter, Suo Fei felt like crying. He would be offered as a sacrifice! The only reason Samael didn’t kill him early on was to let him die for a cause. How to make use of trash? Learn from Samael. Suo Fei’s imagination was too active that he visualized how he would die a horrible death. The elf in a certain someone’s arms was stuck in a motionless trance. His short, silver hair and silver eyes could be seen under the faint glow inside the dimly-lit cave. <i>The Elves are truly worthy of being one of the most beautiful races in Yalance.</i>Such a pity. Samael’s mouth quirked up and he asked in a low voice, “What’s wrong?” Suo Fei woke up from his trance, only to realise that he was still being princess carried. He tried to come down from his arms and Samael relented. Once he stood on solid ground, Suo Fei looked up at Samael. Samael smiled at him and Suo Fei’s heart shook. It was extremely beautiful and captivating but...; it was murderous! Suo Fei quickly shook his head, conveying that he was alright. In reality, he was frantically trying to figure out how to save his life. He dared not even use his wits to kill Samael. How should he avoid being treated like a doormat? Samael pretended to be gentle and considerate by habit. He held Suo Fei’s hand and softly said, “It’s dangerous here. I’ll bring you to a safe place.” When Suo Fei heard it, it was automatically translated to “It’s dangerous here. I’ll bring you to feed the ferocious beast.” Suo Fei went pale, but he dared not say anything. It wasn’t that his sociophobia was acting up again. He only feared that if he accidentally exposed that he knew Samael’s intentions, he would be immediately killed to silence him. So, he could only brace himself to follow Samael. Samael’s slender hands were warm, but Suo Fei did not feel comfortable. Instead, he could feel his hands breaking out into a cold sweat. After walking for some time, Samael indifferently said, “Your little pet should also be here.” Suo Fei appeared slightly stunned but recovered almost instantly. <i>Boy, your conversation opener is so damn befitting.</i>  Sure enough, at the next moment, Samael turned back to look at him and with a gentle smile, he said, “If you can’t find it, then I’ll help you catch another one.” Crap, here it comes. What do you mean you’ll help <i>Laozi</i> catch another one? You’re obviously taking <i>Laozi</i> to feed your pet! Boy, it’s a waste of your talent not to contend for Oscars! The film emperor Samael deliberately pulled Suo Fei’s hand gently (fog), dotingly (dense fog), and affectionately (boundless fog) to go deep into the cave. Suo Fei bowed his head to think. If he didn’t know the plot beforehand, he would definitely believe that the demon in front of him fell in love with him at first sight. But true love only happens in romance novels, and this is a highly explicit, danmei game masterpiece! Love at first sight? What’s that? Love? Is that something you eat? Suo Fei: QAQ In this way, a demon boy and an elven boy reached the lair of the ninth-grade ferocious beast hand in hand, filling the air with all kinds of sweetness. The Ten-Coloured Cockatrice held true to its name. It had ten colours interspersed on its shiny fur, as dazzling as a neon light. The Ten-Coloured Cockatrice had not lost its temper yet and was uncommonly lovely. It was about the size of an adult’s palm, and its fluffy fur shone with a resplendent glow. It was cute enough to make a girl’s heart flutter. Although Suo Fei was not a girl, he was a fur-con! Its shiny fur deeply moved him. Oh, how beautiful. He knew that it would be extremely vicious after transformation, <i>but...; it is so beautiful! </i>Samael caught the look of adoration in his eyes. He averted his gaze with a deadpan expression and softly prodded him, “You can adopt it if you like.” Suo Fei raised his head to look at him. Listening to his tone and looking at his expression, if he was a naive girl, his whole face would most likely blush shyly and timidly run over to adopt it. However, he was not a girl. Deep inside, he was a 27-year-old uncle! Suo Fei kept a straight face and spoke with difficulty, “It’s furry, I don’t like it.” “Oh?” Samael squinted his eyes, and pointedly stared at the pink pouch hanging on his chest. Suo Fei frowned. “The fur of the Frostflame Beast only has two colours, this one has ten. Are you sure you don’t like it?” Crap, he knew. He knew that he kept the Frostflame Beast’s corpse to himself. Suo Fei gritted his teeth and forced himself to reply, “It has too many colours, I don’t like it.” <i>Don’t like it, my arse. I really like it!</i>  “You don’t like it?” Samael looked at Suo Fei, his purple eyes were pitch-dark. What gentle? What doting? All of it went down the drain! He could not even block this murderous gaze, okay! Realising that he could only take the soft approach, Suo Fei caved in, “I like it. I quite like it.” A weakling like him could only be helpless in the face of this formidable evil force! Suo Fei organised his thoughts. If the ferocious beast was not suppressed, Samael would definitely drink his blood to replenish his power and suppress the beast. If Samael enacted his ploy quickly and the two of them moved with tacit understanding, he would be able to survive. Hence, Suo Fei dug into his interspatial bag. He needed to equip himself. Since Samael already knew that he had taken the body of the Frostflame Beast and still wanted to use him as bait, Suo Fei was suddenly emboldened. He gallantly took out more than half of the Frostflame Beast’s hide. Then, the arrogant Suo Fei hinted to Samael, “A dagger would be useful.” Samael raised his eyebrows. The elf in front of him had instantly changed from timid and cowardly to fearless and awe-inspiring. His personality changed a little too fast. Asura Blade was an artifact that could be bound by blood. There was no such thing as stealing and looting as no one could activate it except him. So, he generously handed the dagger to Suo Fei. Suo Fei took it and began to cut it skillfully. He became more comfortable with it after each use. It was sharp and required little effort, truly a great [Skinning Knife]. The hide of the Frostflame Beast was moderately thick. It was also clean and tidy. Suo Fei cut it back and forth. He soon lopped off a big fold of fur which he spread on the ground. Again, he cut it back and forth until it resembled a humanoid. After tossing about for a long time, he finally finished his work and handed back the Asura Blade to Samael. Then, he draped the hide over his body and fiddled with it until he was covered tightly, only revealing a pair of eyes. He appeared ridiculous and comical. However, Samael did not laugh at all. The hide of the Frostflame Beast had high defensive power hence it was clear that the elf was trying to protect himself, but why would he? It must be because he was aware of the danger. The Ten-Coloured Cockatrice appeared cute and harmless to entice its prey. People unfamiliar with it would be easily fooled, but evidently, the elf before him knew it was a trap. He knew but he still intended to walk into the trap? Samael looked on coldly. Suo Fei had wrapped himself up hence it was not very convenient for him to move. He was also deeply afraid, so he advanced slowly. In the midst of it, he suddenly stopped and looked back at Samael. Samael’s expression darkened. Is he scheming something? Suo Fei hesitated before asking, “Would you like one?” Samael: ...;.. As soon as he said it, Suo Fei felt stupid for asking. He is going to be the meat-shield so it did not matter if his movements are restricted. On the other hand, Samael is a powerful DPS. How could he move about if he is all wrapped up? If he is a step slower, wouldn’t his odds of dying increase? However, to protect the vital parts, Suo Fei took out a beast hide the size of his chest and threw it to Samael, “Chestguard.” Samael looked at the hide with uncertainty before picking it up and tying it to his chest. Suo Fei took a deep breath before moving forward. When he was halfway through, Samael suddenly uttered, “Tell me...; Your name.” “Sofey Evans,” Suo Fei replied after a slight pause. “Samael Launay.” Suo Fei realised that the two of them had been together for a while but they only exchanged their names at this moment. He had known the other person for a long time, but Samael did not. Suo Fei miserably realised that Samael didn’t want to know his name at all. After all, he was going to die. Who would bother remembering a corpse’s name? Suo Fei continued to walk towards the fierce beast. Looking at the gentle and adorable kid in front of him, he was filled with mixed emotions. Acting decisively, Suo Fei suddenly charged forward as he unleashed his Elven ability, enhanced agility. His accuracy surprised Samael. As expected, this elf knew the Ten-Coloured<i>Cockatrice</i>, he thought. Without thinking, Samael activated the Asura Blade. He vanished in a flash of light and the giant blade struck the ferocious beast. Suo Fei was able to grab the feelers but it was difficult to accomplish. It would only be exposed while they were unevolved. As soon as someone approached it, it would immediately transform, hence the feelers would be hidden inside it. Suo Fei’s task was to hold its feelers sternly so that it would not be able to conceal it even if it transformed. This was why it was difficult for Samael to carry out on his own. As long as the feelers did not shrink into its body, the ferocious beast’s defensive power would only be a third of its original strength. As long as it did not launch an attack and was promptly hacked into halves, their problem would be solved in an instant. However, the sequel was that Suo Fei would die. Originally, if Suo Fei did not constrain the feelers, it should have been hidden inside. Once the ferocious beast died, its antennae would explode and its whole body would detonate. Everything from fur to beast core would be blown up. Since Suo Fei held the feelers outside its body, even though it would still explode, the ferocious beast would not. Therefore, it could be said that Samael would successfully acquire the beast core while Suo Fei’s life would be gone, gone with the feelers. When he saw Asura Blade being unsheathed, Suo Fei silently prayed in his heart, hoping that the fur of the Frostflame Beast could withstand the shockwave. It was fine even if he was seriously injured, as long as he could keep his life! As he thought of this, he was shocked to find that Asura Blade was not aimed at the ferocious beast, but was instead directed straight at him! <i>W-what’s this situation? </i>Boy, even if you wanted to silence me by killing me, now is not the right time! People often say, “don’t burn bridges after crossing it” but why are you burning the bridge even before you cross it?! Suo Fei had yet to react when the Asura Blade mercilessly slashed before his eyes. A moment later, an explosive stream of sword Qi gushed out. <i>He’s not dead?</i>  He then noticed that there was still a soft thing on his hand. Suo Fei took a quick glance and was stunned in place. Samael first chopped off its feelers. Suo Fei was only stunned for a while before he threw the feelers into his interspatial bag and ran in the opposite direction. Freaking hell, they might really lose their life! Originally, Suo Fei was supposed to suppress the feelers then Samael would immediately kill it. This would happen in a split-second. Their problem would be immediately solved, even though it might endanger Suo Fei’s life. However, Samael backhandedly slashed the feelers. Although Suo Fei did not have to worry about the explosion, they also missed the best opportunity to kill the ferocious beast. Now that its feelers were cut, although its defensive was reduced to a third, its attack damage had not changed! If it went on a rampage, it may even destroy the entire cave. Suo Fei did not know whether to laugh or cry. Obviously, Samael wished to protect his life, but in this situation, all the ferocious beasts would be buried together with him...; <i>is it worth it?</i>  All these thoughts passed in a flash. While he was running away, the ferocious beast launched its attack. The huge shockwave shook the entire cave. Suo Fei looked back and confirmed that Samael was able to protect himself with the Asura blade. His face was dreadfully pale and blood dripped from his lips, but his purple eyes were steady and fierce. He was obviously hurt, but he still had no intention of retreating. The ferocious beast roared furiously. Samael raised the Asura Blade with one hand and stabbed it to his own chest. The Asura Blade greedily sucked the blood gushing out of his wound, occasionally emitting sounds of contentment. At the same time, the black blade glowed with red light as Samael’s blood activated the mad nature of the Asura Blade. Samael pulled out the blade from his chest. Blood dripped onto his clothes without him realising it. His black hair fluttered in the wind, and his purple eyes were dark. Under the dazzling red glow, the Asura Blade pierced the ferocious beast and slashed it in half. The Ten-Coloured Cockatrice fell with a loud thud. Suo Fei stared at it for a long time, stupefied. Samael stood with the support of the Asura Blade. The red glow had disappeared and Suo Fei could only catch sight of his back. He was tall and slender, but he had a stubborn and unyielding temperament. Fate treated him unkindly, but he never surrendered. Samael was seriously injured. First, he was poisoned by the Myriad Poison Forest. Then, he suffered a fatal blow from a ferocious beast. After that, he offered all his blood to the Asura Blade as a sacrifice. Suo Fei knew that if he left him alone, he wouldn’t have the strength to pick up the beast core so he could only wait for death. Since the rule of this world was that Sofey Evans and Samael Launay could not coexist. He could coldly watch Samael die...; <i>‘Coldly watch’ my arse!</i>  He is an actual, living person. A young man who is so miserable that he had to struggle to live up to this age. Although he suspected that he wanted to kill Laozi, he still let go of Laozi at the last minute. Although Laozi is not soft-hearted, Laozi also couldn’t just sit by and watch a person lose their life! What ‘it was in the plot’ bullshit? What ‘rules of the world’ nonsense? If I listened to you, wouldn’t Laozi become just like that cowardly Sofey Evans? Laozi is Suo Fei, got it? Let that ultimate shou go to hell. Suo Fei rushed back. He wanted to approach the dead ferocious beast first, but a thought flashed across his mind. He ran towards Samael and took the Asura Blade from him. Without his support, Samael fell to the ground. His purple eyes shifted towards Suo Fei, the light in his eyes slowly fading away. He surely misunderstood something judging by the look in his eyes. Suo Fei did not bother explaining to the boy who was possessed by paranoia. He hurried to the ferocious beast and cut its fur with the Asura Blade. Cutting the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice was not as tidy as when he was cutting the Frostflame Beast. Its blood was bright red, similar to the human blood, emitting a strong smell of iron. Such a gory dissection was truly difficult for a recluse like Suo Fei. But now that a life was at stake, Suo Fei could only prevent himself from vomiting and quickly cut open its body. After he retrieved the beast core, he was surprised to find that it had been damaged. It seemed that Samael had cut the ferocious beast exactly where the beast core was located. A third of it was rapidly dissolving into the dead body. Suo Fei immediately took out what was left of the beast core and ran back to Samael. When he returned, there was a flicker of doubt in Samael’s eyes. Just as he was about to speak, Suo Fei abruptly stuffed the warm and bloody beast core into his mouth. It was totally unexpected, causing Samael to choke. His eyes widened with surprise. Suo Fei saw that the beautiful purple eyes of the young demon in front of him were filled with surprise and disbelief. His enchanting face was no longer cold and indifferent, neither was it falsely gentle and caring. He was just like a normal teenager, showing all his emotions on his face. Samael had only lapsed for a second but it was enough to make Suo Fei’s heart skip a beat. Sure enough, he was a face-con. The beast core slowly melted in his mouth, accompanied by the smell of blood and a sweet refreshing feeling. Samael fixed his gaze towards the elf. He had short, messy hair. His face, neck, and hands were covered with blood, appearing to be in a wretched plight. He detested blood, detested his vampiric physique, but at this moment, he was dazzled by the beauty of the elf who was drenched in blood. <i>Sofey Evans, was it?</i> Seeing that Samael had consumed the beast core, Suo Fei breathed a sigh of relief. He sprang up to his feet and ran back to the ferocious beast. Such beautiful fur, he had to quickly store it before it turned bad! With his past experience, he could already use the blade deftly. The proficiency level of his [Skinning] skill definitely increased, it might even be close to the level cap. After getting used to seeing the blood, it did not seem to be as scary as before. Besides, the fur was rather unusual. There was not even a speck of dust to be seen. Although he didn’t know its characteristics, looking at its gorgeous appearance, it was definitely more fashionable than the fur of the Frostflame Beast. The transformed Ten-Coloured Cockatrice was not huge, but it was still twice the size of Suo Fei. However, Suo Fei, who had already practiced with the hill-like Frostflame Beast, thought that this was a cinch. The process of skinning, deboning and meat-cutting was smooth and effortless. In the blink of an eye, everything was arranged into the interspatial bag neatly. Patting the bag on his chest, Suo Fei grinned broadly. He finally had a sense of security now that he had an interspatial bag filled with good stuff. Just as he was feeling proud of himself, violent convulsions were heard in the quiet cave. The sound became louder and louder with each passing second, as if there were a stampede of horses galloping. It was deafening. Suo Fei swiveled his head to find where the sound came from and was dumbfounded by the sight that met his eyes. S-so many! So many ferocious beasts were rushing to him! It was like a bullfight in which countless crazy bulls sprinted towards the red cloth, and the red cloth was Suo Fei. There was no room for him to escape. Soon, the ferocious beast would trample him to pieces. In a flash, Samael appeared in front of him and activated the Asura Blade. With a slash of his pitch-black blade, he drew a line between them on the ground. The ferocious beasts abruptly stopped and threw a guarded look at Samael. Suo Fei was stunned by the situation. Somewhat uncertain, he murmured, “What in the world is happening?” Samael, with a sword in his hand, icily stared at the crowd of ferocious beasts and his voice deepened as he replied, “The Ten-Coloured Cockatrice is dead.” It is. Its fur and its everything are even in his pouch, but what did it matter? Did these big group of ferocious beasts come to mourn? Samael cleared his confusion, “The Ten-Coloured Cockatrice used to guard the cave. Since it is dead, the water curtain at the cave entrance would no longer have any support. Once the miasma invades, Knuhl Forest would no longer have a refuge.” “The water curtain was its doing?” “Its excrement, to be exact.” Suo Fei’s whole face turned green. Well, that’s not the point. The point is that they have broken the ecological balance between the Knuhl Forest and the cave. The group of inhabitants before his eyes would likely be poisoned. Wait. A dreadful question popped up in his mind. He was too impulsive earlier. How could he give all of the beast core to Samael and not save some for himself? Now, wouldn’t he end up being poisoned together with the ferocious beasts? Hey, hey, hey. Can you let me [LOAD] the game? Please help...; Clearly, Samael also realised this problem and suddenly cut his wrist. Then, he extended his bleeding wrist to Suo Fei. “Drink it. You will be resistant to poison for a short time.” Suo Fei blinked, and blinked again. Then, he went to drink without any psychological burden. But just as his mouth touched Samael’s wrist, the cut was gone. The arm was as smooth and clean as ever. Suo Fei was stunned. What a godly healing power. Samael frowned. He made another cut. Again, the wound healed even before Suo Fei got to suck some blood. There was not even any scar. It was truly amazing! The two dawdled but the water curtain would not wait for them. It began to dwindle and the miasma started pouring in. Some of the weaker ferocious beasts had already fallen down. It had not reached Suo Fei yet, but the gas scattered extremely fast. Since it was a confined space, it was only a matter of time before the whole place was pervaded. Suo Fei had to think quickly in the face of despair. As he could not drink Samael’s blood, he thought of the ferocious beast’s meat in his pouch. At that time, when he took the beast core, a third of the beast core had already dissolved into its meat. Hence, the meat may have the ability to resist poison. Time was of the essence. Suo Fei quickly took out a piece of meat. He didn’t care whether the raw meat was delicious or not. He clamped his nose shut and forced to swallow it. Well, not only was it fresh, but it also tasted like sashimi. When the beast meat reached his stomach, a cool and refreshing feeling surged. He felt the air was a lot fresher, so it seemed to be effective. Suo Fei described the whole matter to Samael who nodded in assent, confirming his assumption. The Ten-Coloured Cockatrice was innately resistant to the miasma of the Myriad Poison Forest. Its beast core had the strongest resistance. Consuming the beast core itself would give everlasting immunity. On the other hand, the beast meat soaked with beast core essence was not as effective, nevertheless, it could provide immunity for at least a decade. After the matter was settled, Suo Fei felt dizzy looking at the ferocious beasts that were starting to become violent. He suddenly had a terrible headache. He turned to Samael and asked, “What should we do?” Samael gripped his Asura Blade and twirled it in his hand. In a hushed tone, he said, “Kill.” It was like saying ‘If its cabbage, cut it all. If its pork, fry it all.’ Cut, your arse! Fry, your arse! Bro, how could it be so simple? All the ferocious beasts in the Knuhl Forest were gathered here, how could you kill them all? However, Samael seemed serious...; Suo Fei was speechless and then he happened to see a familiar face at the corner of his eyes. That smooth and shiny fur, that round figure, as well as those four strong, powerful, fat little legs. Isn’t that the ungrateful little cub that abandoned its master? The young cub seemed to be poisoned, as it lay listless. At this time, it also saw Suo Fei. It was stunned at first, not expecting that he was still alive. Then, it discovered the difference between Suo Fei and Samael. Although the little cub was small in size, it had lived for so many years. What had it not seen? Hence, it immediately understood. It reflected on the past and remembered Suo Fei’s love for Frostflame Beast’s fur. After relaxing its heart, it leaped right in front of the vast army of ferocious beasts, whining. When it saw that Suo Fei’s eyes fell on him, its big, agate-like eyes immediately became watery, and its fur suddenly became golden and glittering, more dazzling than the sun. Then, it stretched out its four legs then rolled over. With this roll, his fur looked softer, smoother, and more charming. Suo Fei’s heart was pierced by Cupid’s Arrow. Too...; too cute! I really want to pat it over and over! The cub was very understanding. It immediately jumped into Suo Fei’s arms and let Suo Fei fulfill his urge. While it was nestled in Suo Fei’s arm, it gave a pretentious cough. Suo Fei: Do not ask me why the little beast suddenly started coughing. It’s genuine. See, he’s as weak as Lin meimei. The soft-hearted Suo Fei naturally understood why this little thing was trying so hard to put on an act. Although this thing ruthlessly abandoned its master in the past, that was because their master-servant relationship was not deep. At a critical moment, it was reasonable that it would run to save its own life. With so much beast meat, sharing a bit would not be a problem. So, Suo Fei pulled a small piece of beast meat and fed it to the little cub. The little cub ate the beast meat and was full of energy as the poison was eliminated from its body. It rubbed against Suo Fei before jumping down with satisfaction. The ferocious beasts across them could see its actions clearly. Then...; Suo Fei saw the most unforgettable scene in his entire life. Across him, across the divide marked by sword Qi, there were countless ferocious beasts of all ages and sizes. Most importantly, among the furs of various colours, there were soft ones, tough ones, and even semi-tough and semi-soft ones. All kinds of ferocious beasts emulated the little cub one after another. They blinked their eyes, whined, shook their fur, and rolled. They rolled over...; rolled back...; shook their fur...; kicked their legs. Crowd of ferocious beasts: The Devourer taught us that circumstances are more powerful than individuals. We must sell meng for survival. They rolled over...; then they rolled back...; I’d say, you, big bro on the left. You’re supposed to be overbearing and powerful. What are you rolling around for? Not only would your image be destroyed, you would also stir up dust! Is it good or not?! And you lil’ bro, you on the right. You don’t even have any fur. What are you shaking around for? Also, you with the smooth fur, shaking your smooth fur here and there, it looks scary alright! Lastly...; Nightmare Fiend baobei, what did you come here for? Join the excitement? You have no skin and fur. Not even a body! What are you selling meng for? This scene...; Suo Fei facepalmed. If his roasting skills had attack damage, it would be as powerful as an atomic bomb! But there were really too many things to rant about. Even if he ranted for three days straight, he could still continue ranting. As such, Suo Fei gave up. If he went on, he would have already turned blind and spent all the roasts of his lifetime right here. To ensure that he still had something to do for the rest of his life (sure enough, you’re a full-time ranter), Suo Fei compromised. He looked at Samael and asked him after a slight pause, “Can I share the beast meat with them?” Samael owned the beast so he had to ask. Samael: “...;..As you wish.” Samael could still maintain his stoic and cold attitude and did not laugh under the circumstances. ‘<i>This is definitely a talent,’</i> Suo Fei muttered inwardly but the expression on his face revealed his thoughts. After receiving his permission, Suo Fei stepped forward. With a broad sweep of his arm, he instructed, “Okay, okay. Stop rolling around. Line up. Stop whining. Good. Wait. Everyone will get their share!” He had no doubts regarding the IQ of the crowd of ferocious beasts. They could even sell meng, they would definitely understand what he had said. Sure enough, the beasts stood up obediently. As for lining up? In this society, the strong prey on the weak. The low-grade little beasts dared not move forward at all. There were not many high-grade ferocious beasts but each of them had distinctive features, widely broadening his knowledge. Seeing that Suo Fei wanted to save the beasts, the little cub volunteered to arrange their line-up sequence. Despite its small size, it had a high prestige. Even the high-grade ferocious beasts at the front were courteous to some extent, surprising Suo Fei. The Ten-Coloured Cockatrice had little meat so it was difficult to divide the meat for all of them. Suo Fei racked his brains and an idea occurred to him. He threw the meat and bones into a large cauldron, then added a lot of water to boil the soup. As long as it had a hint of beast core essence, it would provide resistance to the miasma. However, the more dilute its concentration, the shorter its effectiveness would be. In this case where it was boiled into a soup, although the duration could not be accurately determined, it would still be effective for at least five to six years. Five to six years is not a long time for the Elves but it is enough for the cave to raise another Ten-Coloured that would, again, maintain the ecological balance between the Myriad Poison Forest and the cave. Suo Fei was not aware of this. The reason why he divided the beast meat was not so much because he was a fur-con or he was being soft-hearted, but because he needed to score some brownie points. The ferocious beasts were blocking their way out. They dared not rush forward because of the might of the Asura Blade but if they were ignored, he and Samael would have to pay a high price if they wanted to leave the place. Both sides did not want to be obstinate and it was a good thing to settle the dispute harmoniously. Moreover, the two of them broke the ecological balance of the place for their own selfish reasons. As a modern person, Suo Fei knew perfectly well that destroying the ecological balance would bring about numerous disasters. It was unavoidable but Suo Fei was willing to put some effort to minimise the damage. After two days, all the surviving ferocious beasts more or less got their share of the meat soup. Suo Fei solved the issue of their survival, so they also pointed the way out of the forest. There were four exits in the Knuhl Forest, which lead to the Humans, the Beastkins, the Trolls, and the Dwarves respectively. Suo Fei wanted to return to Valinor, but he couldn’t remember which territory was closer. He searched his memory in vain, before deciding to travel to the Human territory. Among the nine great races, the life span of the Humans was the shortest, but their race was the largest in number. In addition, because of their versatility, they could get along well with all the other races and had the best access to information. When Suo Fei and Samael left the Knuhl Forest, a large number of gigantic ferocious beasts came to see them off, right to the border of the Knuhl Forest. An adventurer saw this magnificent feat by chance, scaring him shitless. Later, a rumour circulated in Yalance that an S-tier Beast-tamer had appeared. It was said that he was an Elven boy with unparalleled beauty. Suo Fei: Hehe. <strong>***</strong>  After leaving the Knuhl Forest, Suo Fei looked at the little cub that was only the size of two palms, walking with its head held high like a mighty and overbearing Laozi. He somewhat didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. This guy was rather complicated. From the ferocious beasts’ attitude towards it, Suo Fei thought that it would stay in the Knuhl Forest. Who knew that when he and Samael left, it followed them as if it was a matter of course. Suo Fei poked it with his foot, “What are you doing here?” The little cub replied but Suo Fei could only hear its roar. Suo Fei: ...;.. He turned to ask Samael, “Can you speak the beast language?” Yalance had a common language used by all races. Especially after co-existing for thousands of years, the common language had become infinitely popular. However, each race also had their own language. Each of their languages came with a unique ability. The Elves could communicate using Elvish with plants through spiritual energy, whereas the Beastkins could communicate using the beast language with ferocious beasts. Samael frowned. The translation of the little cub’s words were: You stupid servant! How dare you be so rude to me! Forget it, this divine beast is a greater man than you are so I will let you go for now. Also, there were only a few high-grade ferocious beasts left in the Knuhl Forest. You already killed the rest. Why should I stay there and starve to death? “No,” Samael replied after a pause. Suo Fei sighed. It can’t be helped then. It was only years later that Suo Fei remembered that not only could Samael speak the beast language, he even fully mastered the languages of the nine great races! This was an innate skill, otherwise how could he conquer the nine little shous?! It was just that Samael found translating troublesome. But at that time, Suo Fei had already bought a language skillbook and was already able to fluently exchange verbal jabs with the little cub, thus it was too late to make a fuss about it. The territory of the Humans was called Attis. Because of their uniqueness, where their vast population had contrasting ideas, Attis had three major cities and their leaders were the three City Lords. The life span of the Humans was the shortest among the races, with an average life span of about 100 years. But, the Humans reproduce the fastest out of all the nine races. Therefore, the human race also had the highest population in Yalance. Not only were they superior in numbers, but they also had strong faith. Although they were weak as f**k, they had high psychic talent. It was different from the Celestials whose psychic powers were strong from the start. Humans had untapped potential but their psychic powers were very ordinary. Once developed, humans at their zenith could even surpass the psychic powers of the Celestials. However, this was a miracle that would only appear once every thousand years. However, Humans were amenable to other races and had excellent adaptability. After conducting exchanges with all the other races for the past ten thousand years, they were able to possess their own cultivation method to improve their physical abilities and even their life span. The City Lords of the three major cities were among the best. They could live up to five-hundred years and if they continued cultivating, they could prolong their life span ceaselessly. On the downside, they would lose their ability to reproduce. This was the perpetual cycle of give and take. The Knuhl Jungle bordered on one of the three major cities ⁠— Mauer City. Suo Fei saw the city gate from afar. He felt fortunate in his heart. Aryan Mauer, the City Lord of Mauer City, was the first little shou he had conquered, his super moe and adorable shou. It was very easy to subdue him. Aryan immediately submitted under the ultimate gong’s extremely overbearing aura the first time they met. <i>Wait</i>...; Suo Fei who was happily fantasizing, suddenly realised that he wasn’t playing the game. Furthermore, the ultimate gong was now someone else. Suo Fei glared at Samael with indignation. Could it be that his adorable shou would fall into the other’s hands?! <i>I’m not willing!</i>  His eyes failed to hide his emotions. Samael turned his gaze to him, sensing his anxiousness As soon as his gaze met those purple eyes, Suo Fei hurriedly looked away...; Even if he was unwilling, what could he do about it? Should he tell Samael, ‘Boy, we have been through life and death together. The little shou in this city is mine. Don’t rob him away. Blah blah blah’? Samael would most likely think that he’s an idiot. The Humans were the most open-minded among the nine great races. They did not prevent any races from entering their territory. They would be allowed to enter as long as they registered and paid a few silver coins. However, Suo Fei had some apprehensions. The tragedy of Valinor must have spread all over Yalance. The Elves must have already cast an inescapable net, watching out for him who had earlier slipped through their net. His appearance stood out from the masses. Even though the Human territory had a large stream of people, there was no guarantee he would be left unnoticed by observant people. Therefore, as soon as he left the Knuhl Forest, he cast a spell to change the colour of his eye-catching silver eyes and silver hair. This was all thanks to Vixanne’s mindfulness. In the interspatial bag, there was a bookshelf filled with books. At first, Suo Fei had no time to read them but after reading them, he discovered that all of them were spellbooks. It recorded all kinds of spells, from low-grade to high-grade. Sofey Evans was the young master of the Evans family. Despite being a Pureblood elf, his magic affinity and agility were not high, but it was still higher than the ordinary humans. It was easy to practice some simple spells. The transfiguration spell was one of those simple spells which made it easy to be seen through. His transformed appearance could only fool the city guards and ordinary people. However, he had still underestimated the sensation brought about by the matter. As soon as he entered Mauer City, he was blinded by the overwhelming number of newspapers. The front-page headlines were all about Valinor, including news about how the life of the Evans Family had turned upside down. Suo Fei took a quick glance and his face immediately paled. <strong>“The prosperous Evans Family declines with the fall of the Holy Tree.”</strong>  <strong>“Under the wrath of the Elven King, the whole family executed.”</strong>  <i>Vixanne...; Was she dead after all?</i> Suo Fei stood in a trance. Did Vixanne lose her life because of the forbidden technique or because the Elves left no room for consideration? Suo Fei didn’t know. Wait. Suo Fei skimmed through the newspaper carefully, then he scanned the area. He found that there was no news about tracking down Sofey Evans. As if there were totally no survivors of the Evans Family. <i>Why?</i>  He escaped so how could the Elves let him off? News circulated fast in the human territory due to its large stream of people, so it didn’t make sense for them not to patrol here. Moreover, they directly declared that there were no survivors. It was as if...; as if they were protecting him. It made Suo Fei feel, albeit naively, that the Elves had not killed Vixanne. After the whole incident, Grantlyn was nowhere to be found and Suo Fei had fled. Only Vixanne was left. Thus, no matter how one looked at it, the Elves should protect Vixanne. Even if they couldn’t use Vixanne to threaten Grantlyn, they could use her to threaten him instead. But if she was really alive, why did they conceal the truth? Suo Fei thought, for a moment, that maybe she was really dead. Maybe she overused her blood Qi that even Elven Elders could not heal her. He then remembered that he could determine whether Vixanne died using the forbidden technique. There was a bookshelf filled with books in the interspatial bag. Teleportation was a remarkable spell, therefore Vixanne will certainly place the spellbook inside together with the other books. As long as he could find the spellbook, he would be able to judge whether using the forbidden technique would cause Vixanne’s life. However, there were a lot of books on the bookshelf. How could he find the spellbook in the least amount of time? After much thought, he looked at Samael and solemnly asked, “Can you help me with something?” Samael observed him before nodding in assent. “Come with me.” Suo Fei went to a nearby inn, casually threw a bag of gold coins and led Samael into the room. Without waiting for Samael to ask, Suo Fei took the whole bookshelf out of the interspatial bag. Samael’s eyes flashed when he saw the large number of books. Suo Fei pointed to the books and requested, “Help me find a book,” he paused before continuing, “a book about a forbidden technique...; the Teleportation spellbook.” Suo Fei started to roll his sleeves to get working but Samael stood motionless. Suo Fei shot a questioning glance at him. Samael pulled out a book from the top shelf. He rubbed his slender fingers against the edge of the very thin book for a while, before he muttered, “What you’re looking for.” Suo Fei was stunned. The book was only as thick as a finger, but it was still in good condition. The only design on its cover was a light blue pentagram. This pattern looked familiar to Suo Fei. It took a while for him to recognise that it was what the teleportation array looked like. It really was this book! How could Samael find it so quickly? Samael held the spellbook in his hand, with no intention of giving it to Suo Fei. He stared at Suo Fei, his purple eyes undecipherable. After a couple of minutes, he asked: “Would you do this with anyone?” Suo Fei blinked, confounded. Then he realised what Samael meant. Was he implying that he’s too careless? “No.” He wouldn’t show these things in front of strangers. “Then why me?” He opened his mouth to speak but did not say anything. Even if his sociophobia did not start making trouble, he still could not say it. That he didn’t treat Samael as a stranger, and that he also couldn’t treat him like one. Seeing that he would not answer, Samael stopped asking. He shifted his sight to the spellbook, and seemingly thoughtlessly, he revealed, “I was using you.” Suo Fei kept silent but in his heart, he thought dully to himself, ‘Hero, what do you mean you were using me? You wanted to ruin me!’ “And you knew it.” Of course, I knew. If I didn’t, I would have already died in your hands! “But, you still saved me.” I was just being soft-hearted...; “So,” Samael turned and locked his gaze at Suo Fei. Word by word he asked, “Why is that?” Suo Fei was silent as he tried to think of an answer. Seeing that Suo Fei still refused to answer, Samael approached him and gently caressed the side of his face before the corner of his mouth drew up in a slight grin. Samael inherited the unparalleled beauty of the primeval demons. He appeared somewhat cold when he was not smiling. He might even seem insensitive because of the lack of emotions in his purple eyes. But when he smiled, he would exude the temperament unique to the Demons — evil, overbearing, and intolerant of others. “Tell me.” With Samael’s face so close to him, Suo Fei’s mind blanked out. He knew this person’s past. Whether it be from birth to childhood, or from adolescence to adulthood. However, his past was merely a ‘playback’ that showed through his computer screen. When he saw him in person, the illusory veil faded and became reality. Samael had been robbed of his childhood. The Humans rashly attacked him, causing him to unconsciously destroy the entire village. The surviving villagers were terrified. Thus, they put on a false mask to hide their hatred and disgust and patiently coaxed him. Samael who was still a child, could not understand that the momentary feelings of warmth and tenderness only served to make the betrayal more painful and unforgettable. Since Samael could not be killed using ordinary methods, the villagers turned to their divine religion. They sincerely prayed and gave all their savings as offerings, just to put the monster to death. They continued to tenderly appease Samael. Then, while celebrating his birthday, Samael was pierced to his chest by a sharp knife infused with the spiritual power of the Celestials. The malevolent betrayal awakened the Devil and the whole banquet was stained red with blood. By the time Samael had regained his consciousness, he was already surrounded by a pool of blood. Warm and sticky blood slowly dripped down his hands. He looked at the only surviving human in the room; his beautiful gem-like purple eyes glazed with panic and helplessness. He falteringly walked towards the human but he was met with a fit of desolate fury. The human’s voice was filled with revulsion, “Devil! Devil! You’re a Devil!” Samael stopped dead in his tracks. The human was so terrified that his face turned hideous. He screamed and shouted, blaming Samael for everything. His face was full of frenzied resentment and the pool of blood made him seem more hostile. He had lost his sense of reason. He burst into a howl of madness as he once again thrust the knife towards Samael. He was not yet close when he abruptly stopped. Then, he fell to the ground with his eyes bursting from their sockets. The young Samael’s vision fell on the beating heart in his hand, his bright eyes turning dark. These memories passed in a flash, but the last image of Samael, standing alone in a pool of blood, made Suo Fei’s heart tremble. Looking at the youth before him, he felt mixed emotions. He was not an expressive person, so he could not comfort Samael with words. He might even seem unsympathetic since he had never felt sympathy or pity for the youth. These emotions would only serve as an insult to a demon. In the end, Suo Fei expressionlessly spoke words that seemed like a promise, “I won’t leave you.” If you need me, I won’t leave you as they did. After saying those words, Suo Fei felt embarrassed. It’s okay, he began comforting himself. He and Samael had already known each other for a while. Although they had a rough start, they soon bonded well. They had gone through life and death together so they were almost as close as brothers. He never had a brother before, but this should be the case. At the least, he was sincere to Samael. He would not hypocritically fawn over him then ruthlessly forsake him. He lifted his gaze to Samael who calmly stared back at him. Staring straight at those purple eyes, his heart felt like it stopped. <i>Damn it. I admit it, alright! Everything I said was nothing but an excuse! Laozi is lustful! Laozi is a face-con! Laozi will chase guys even after death!</i>  Samael smiled, obscure emotions hidden deep in his eyes. He let go of Suo Fei and passed the spellbook to him, “You wanted this.” Suo Fei quickly shifted his eyes away and faked a cough. He took the spellbook and flipped through it to calm himself down. There were strange characters in the spellbook which should be Elvish. However, Sofey was a Pureblood elf hence Suo Fei was able to read it effortlessly. Suo Fei was not interested in how to use the teleportation array. He knew his own capabilities. It was impossible for him to use it like Vixanne who is an archmage. After hastily flipping through, Suo Fei was a lot more calmer. The spell was certainly dangerous. The way to activate it was similar to the Asura Blade. The Asura Blade required the blood of its owner, whereas the teleportation array required the blood of the caster as a sacrifice. Nevertheless, it would not use up all of the caster’s blood. Although Vixanne had to pay a huge price for teleporting him, she would not die on the spot. She might lose a lot of blood but the Evans Family had an impressive treasury. Vixanne, being the wife of the family head, had a valuable collection. It would not be difficult to find high-quality herbs that could enrich the blood. He had trust in Vixanne. She must have made some preparations. Even if she had not been prepared due to the unexpected situation, Manzy would still give his all to save her because of her sentence ‘I will tell you what you want to know’. As long as she did not die because of the forbidden technique, then there was a high chance that she was still alive. Suo Fei felt relieved at the thought. Now, it was his top priority to save Vixanne and so, he had to meet his first little shou——Aryan Mauer. The reason why Suo Fei chose to travel to the Human territory was that among the four races that surrounded the Knuhl Forest, only the Humans had a friendly relationship with the Elves. For example, the Beastkins upheld the belief that physical strength is God. Therefore, they held the Elves, who were known for their magic power, in contempt. The Elves naturally taught many of them a lesson. Even so, the Beastkins were still insanely optimistic about themselves and looked down on the Elves. Trolls, on the other hand, wanted to befriend the Elves because of their specialness. Unfortunately, the Elves looked down on them. As for the Dwarves, they were the most similar in character with the Beastkins. They didn’t revere power. Instead, they revere themselves. They might be small but they had a large temper. Their way of thinking is that the heaven may be great, the earth may be great, but they could not be as great as the Dwarves. The Dwarves who were the smallest and shortest among all races had the most self-confidence in the whole Yalance. Of course, don’t ever mention height with them. You will definitely regret it. Such a prideful race, they were on bad terms not only with the Elves, but also with all the other eight great races. Compared with these weird races, the experienced and worldly-wise Humans were cuter. Although they had a bad habit of fearing the strong and bullying the weak, at least their way of thinking was normal. Suo Fei’s first little shou, Aryan Mauer, was one of the City Lords of the Humans’ three major cities. Aryan had a way to enter and leave Valinor. So, Suo Fei was struck with an idea. However, Aryan was one of the leaders of the Humans. How could it be easy for Suo Fei to see him? Fortunately, Suo Fei had a strategy in mind. He knew how to approach the City Lord. Aryan Mauer was more than five hundred years old but in the game, he was a lively blond teenager who loved to laugh. His appearance and temperament were not outstanding out of the nine little shous, but his personality was very endearing. Suo Fei always had a smile when he was pursuing him. It was a very healing plot. Aryan looked like a teenager, so it was inevitable for him to be slightly childish. In his setting, his favorite hobby was taking care of pets. He liked all kinds of small, cute things; he especially had no resistance to furries. As he thought of this, he scrutinised the little cub. I must say, the little cub’s appearance really hits Aryan’s moe point. It would seem a shame not to make good use of its cuteness. Suo Fei grinned evilly. He held the little cub in his arms and rubbed its smooth and silky fur. Then, he felt reluctant. Such good fur...; it’s a shame to give it away! Well, I can use the second-best option. Suo Fei thought of the gorgeous fur of the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice in his interspatial bag. It was shiny enough to blind people. It definitely can capture Aryan’s dorky and adorable heart! Wait...;. Suo Fei suddenly realised a problem. These series of events, seemed to be for the person next to him. He clearly remembered that Samael left the Knuhl Jungle and attended an auction in Mauer City to auction the treasures he had hunted in the Knuhl Forest. He met Aryan at the auction. Then little by little, he captured his first little shou who was playing hard to get. But...;. what should have been Samael’s prey had already been stored into his interspatial bag. It seems that the treasureless ultimate gong doesn’t have a reason to go to the auction. Suo Fei’s conscience was greatly disturbed. He not only stole the Frostflame Beast, he even shamelessly accepted the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice. Although Samael did not complain, he couldn’t be so unmindful! Then, he even wanted to capture his little shou. The little shou should obviously belong to the ultimate gong. Although he was not befuddled by lust, he needed Aryan so that he could go to Valinor. But just in case, I mean, just in case Aryan fell in love with him at first sight, oh my, how could he refuse, right? <i>But if that happened, he not only stole the ultimate gong’s treasures, but also his little shou</i>. —— How can you be so shameless! After a fierce struggle, Suo Fei’s conscience gained the upper hand, so he yielded. The treasures were already in his interspatial bag. How could he take it out? Moreover, the fur and bones were so large. Samael had nowhere to put it. He had to reluctantly give up on pursuing the adorkable Aryan. Sigh, who would want to fight with their good brother? Nothing good would come out of monopolising everything. ...;.. <i>Alright, the truth is that he’s a face con!</i> He preferred the other little shous who were remarkable beauties. If he pushed Aryan to Samael under the guise of doing him a favour, he can then approach the stunning beauties without any scruples later! ...;.. After thinking it through, Suo Fei, who was synonymous with the words ‘shameless and immoral’, started scheming how to let Samael attend the auction and create an opportunity for Samael to top Aryan. After mulling it over for a long time, Suo Fei looked at Samael and solemnly said, “I want to go to the auction in Mauer City.” “Oh?” When Samael turned to him, Suo Fei fixed his gaze on him. He was slightly embarrassed, but he continued, “Can you accompany me?” The elf’s eyes were very light. Under the sun, those silver orbs were almost transparent that not even a ripple of emotion could be seen in his eyes. But now, his eyes were filled with anxiety. Was he afraid of being rejected? Samael’s heart thumped. He responded in a deep voice, “Okay.” Seeing him agree, Suo Fei was filled with joy. He even wanted to clap in admiration. <i>Samael’s ultimate gong radar is really convenient. He already knew without being told that a little shou would appear at that place.</i>Don’t worry, bro. I will help you get that little cutie! Naturally, he swallowed these words and his reply came out stiff, “Thank you.” Mauer City is one of the major cities of the human race. Needless to say, its prosperity was second to none in the whole Yalance. Although it was not as resplendent and dreamlike as Valinor, but it was just as rich. It was just that the Elves were very conceited so they looked down on treasures. At most, they would only be interested with red jade. Humans were different. They liked anything as long as it was valuable. The Humans had a lot of exchange with the other races, therefore the whole city had a lot of personality. One could faintly see traces of all the races in their buildings. So, don’t be surprised to find a thatched cottage next to a glorious palace in Mauer City. This only represented the unique taste of the Beastkins who regard themselves as bold, manly men. The auction would be held at the town square of Mauer City, at Mauer City’s most beautiful building. Of course, this was only based on the aesthetic standards of the Humans. They used everything splendid. Its sides were plated with silver, gold and etc, definitely with the purpose of blinding all kinds of delicate eyes. They even used titanium. Suo Fei held the little cub and walked together with Samael. The both of them adjusted their appearance as they really stood out from the crowd. Elves and demons were not rare in Mauer City. However, pureblood elves with silver hair and silver eyes as well as primeval demons with black hair and purple eyes were rare not only in Mauer City, but also in the entire Yalance. To avoid stirring up troubles, it was necessary for them to put on a disguise. They needed to pay some gold coins to enter the auction. Although Suo Fei was not sure of the prices in Yalance, that could not stop him from being extremely rich. He had chests filled with gold coins and whatnots in his interspatial bag. He casually threw ten gold coins to the gatekeeper. The human gatekeeper’s eyes lit up and he complaisantly asked Suo Fei if they wanted a private room. Suo Fei nodded in assent. The gatekeeper summoned a young man to lead them through the special lane to enter the auction hall. His actions made Suo Fei miserably realise that he was being regarded as a squanderer. However, the gold coins he threw were like spilled water so he could only resist the impulse to take it back. Suo Fei had only seen the auction hall through his computer screen before. As he entered the place, he marvelled its grandness. It gave him the illusion that he was visiting the Grand Hall of the People...;...; Ninth-grade ferocious beasts were rare in Yalance. Even if Suo Fei brought out the fur of the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice, he estimated that ninety percent of the people attending would not recognize it. The fur of the Frostflame Beast however may be recognized. With that in mind, Suo Fei opted for the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice’s fur. First, its fur was more colourful. Second, by the time someone actually recognized the ninth-grade ferocious beast’s fur, he and Samael would have already left. Thus, they would not get into any trouble. Suo Fei was not so stupid that he would take out everything. He only snipped off a small piece from the corner, which was about the size of a handkerchief. After entrusting it to the auctioneer, Suo Fei and Samael went into their private room. In Suo Fei’s memory, there was nothing outstanding in this auction. As usual, there were some high-grade materials as well as some tamed low-grade ferocious beasts. In the original plot, Samael Launay was the star of the auction. At first, the Samael Launay that Suo Fei played didn’t know what Aryan liked, but the system hinted that he could attract Aryan’s attention here. Therefore, Suo Fei put up everything that he had hunted in the Knuhl Forest for auction one after another. He had set off waves after waves before finally figuring out Aryan’s preferences amidst it all. Since he already knew it beforehand, naturally he need not be so wasteful. Suo Fei was bored to death as he waited, but not for long. The fur of the ferocious beast was brought out. It was even deliberately embellished by the auctioneer, packed in an exquisite, transparent case. It looked glamorous under the fluorescent light. The ten colours rotated slowly, as if they had a life of their own. As soon as it appeared, it stunned everyone in the hall. The bidding started. As Suo Fei predicted, the bid gradually rose but as it reached six hundred gold coins, most of the people conceded. After all, this was just a piece of beast fur, and an unknown beast fur at that. If it’s only use was to be flashy, then the loss outweighs the gain. After someone shouted eight hundred gold coins, a sky-high bid of two thousand gold coins was suddenly heard from a private room located at the topmost east corner. Immediately, there were no more contenders. Suo Fei smiled faintly, knowing that the fish had been hooked. When he commissioned the fur for auction, it was so that he could have an ace up his sleeve. What could such a small piece of fur be used for? It could only serve as decoration at most. So, he purposely left a message to the auctioneer that he had more of this fur. The auctioneer would naturally want to fawn over Aryan, hence he would pass on the news to him. By then, Suo Fei would not have to worry as Aryan would take the initiative to meet with him. As expected, the auctioneer came to his private room after the auction. While delivering the two thousand gold coins, he attentively mentioned that an important person wanted to see him. Suo Fei obviously would not refuse. He followed the auctioneer towards the topmost private room together with Samael and the little cub. At the doorway of the private room, the auctioneer told Suo Fei, “Please wait for a moment.” Then, he went in by himself, most likely to ask further instructions. After a while, the auctioneer came out and invited Suo Fei and Samael to enter. When they entered the private room, both of them could see that it was the most luxurious private room in the auction house. It had a thick carpet, a dazzling chandelier, and a precious sofa made with soft leather, revealing a luxurious interior. The young man in the center had blonde hair and green eyes. His eyes were curved into a smile, revealing a faint dimple on the corner of his mouth. It was the City Lord of Mauer, Aryan Mauer. However, there was another person to his right. He had long silver hair and pointed ears. He had a cold expression as his silver eyes locked on to Suo Fei. Suo Fei uttered in his heart, Who is this, if not Manzy Argoux? Ninety-nine percent of the people present might not know that it was the fur of the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice, but Aryan belonged to the other one percent. He looked at the two people who came in. Although they were disguised under magic, their real appearance could not be concealed from him. The first one who entered was an elf with silver hair and silver eyes. Turns out that he was a Pureblood elf, Aryan laughed and glanced slightly at the person beside him. The figure behind the elf was taller. Although he looked like a teenager, he already had the body of an adult. Aryan’s jade-like eyes lit up with just a glance. Those black hair and purple eyes. He’s a demon? And a primeval demon at that? He didn’t see the Demons’ unique bone wings, but the young man before him could even disguise his appearance. It was very likely that he hid his bone wings. Moreover, the fur was from a Ten-Coloured Cockatrice which was a ninth-grade ferocious beast. How could an average person kill it? Therefore, the demon in front of him certainly must be a primeval demon. He could already kill a ninth-grade ferocious beast at such a young age. How terrifying would his strength be once he grew up? Aryan already loved to laugh to begin with. Now, he laughed even more, which made him look all the more adorable. He immediately got up to approach the demon. Slightly looking up, he asked Samael in a clear and melodious voice, “Was the beautiful fur yours?” The moment he saw Manzy Argoux, Suo Fei became absent-minded. His brain revved up a gear, as it simulated countless scenarios of how he would die a bizarre death. In the end, there was a freeze-frame with four, big words that were the colour of blood: ‘How could I survive?’. Suo Fei was completely taken by surprise to meet Manzy in such an unexpected place. Both of them looked at each other. He didn’t want to say anything, he only wished to turn around and run. Of course, he wasn’t sure whether he would be able to escape. He thought that Manzy would arrest and question him, even kill him, but in reality, Manzy turned his gaze away after motionlessly staring at each other for a long time. He didn’t say anything, neither did he do anything. His expression changed from a profound look to a look of indifference, as if he didn’t know the person before him. Suo Fei was momentarily at a loss, his expression suddenly confused. Manzy had such an irritable temper so how could he not stab him to death? <i>What in the world is happening?</i>  As he was feeling doubtful, Suo Fei woke up from his daze by a clear and melodious voice. He shifted his gaze away from Manzy and looked to his side. Aryan was standing next to Samael, his short golden hair was dazzling. His green eyes were full of admiration. He had a clean and delicate appearance. Because of the small dimples at the corner of his mouth, he looked more likable. Suo Fei who was a shou-con at heart felt restless, itching for some ‘action’. <i>This cinnamon roll is such a cute little shou! He is just like in the game, truly beautiful...;</i>  However, Aryan’s next sentence struck Suo Fei silly. “Would you like to stay with me tonight?” These words were all addressed to Samael. Suo Fei was only a listener. Although he was only a listener, his heart still stirred into a tempestuous storm. I knew it. Plot-kun, you’re irreversible huh? These two talents had just met. He had only said a few words but he was already openly hooking up with him? Even if this was a highly erotic danmei masterpiece, was it really okay to be that blatant? <i>But cinnamon roll, you’re so liberal, this Gege gives you a </i>‘like’. Suo Fei was happily fantasizing but then he caught a glimpse of Manzy out of the corner of his eye. He sharply came to his senses. <i>Give like, my ass! You two can’t hook up together yet!</i>  He counted on the PK between Manzy and Samael for him to escape this hell-hole, okay? I cannot afford to be dragged down by your cinnamon roll, ultimate gong daren. When Suo Fei realised this, he abruptly grabbed Samael’s hands and flatly refused, “No.” <i>Sorry, cinnamon roll. I will surely let you two who are so in love become friends with benefits afterward!</i>  His voice was too haughty. He even rejected on behalf of others. If Aryan had a hot temper, he would have already lost it. However, Aryan was only slightly startled. Then he looked at Suo Fei and smilingly asked, “Why?” Suo Fei didn’t know how to answer. <i>He definitely couldn’t explain to Aryan his enmity with Manzy, right?</i>  Since he couldn’t say it, he just clammed up. He pouted his lips and held Samael’s hand tightly, as if he wouldn’t let go even if he was killed. Samael who was one of the people involved kept silent. However, instead of Suo Fei holding his hand, he changed it to him holding Suo Fei’s hand. Suo Fei didn’t notice this small detail, but Aryan did. He squinted his eyes but didn’t say anything. Manzy who had been sitting on the sidelines finally spoke. He walked towards Suo Fei. He deliberately softened his gaze as he whispered, “Fey, stay.” Must I stay if you asked me to? Then, if you wanted to behead me, must I give my head to you? Huh? These roasts that were building up in his stomach reached his lips, but instead came out as a sharp reply, “No.” Manzy didn’t get angry. He stared at Suo Fei and enticed in a low voice, “Don’t you want to know what happened in Valinor?” The dauntless Suo Fei was shot. The marksman Manzy shot another fatal arrow, “Vixanne...; Don’t you care about her?” <i>Blackmail! This is definitely blackmail!</i>  Unfortunately, he couldn’t do anything even if he knew that it was blackmail. Manzy surely knew what happened after he escaped. Right now, it is necessary for him to know what is Vixanne’s actual condition. He was also curious. <i>What kind of medicine did Manzy take? Manzy Argoux abhorred those who betrayed the Elves so why is it that he always felt that Manzy is very tolerant of him?</i>  Although he was in fact innocent, it was a fact that Sofey’s father did such a thing. If he said that he was innocent, who would believe him? He weighed the options and found that he could only compromise for now. Hence, he chose to stay. Suo Fei arrived at the city lord’s residence. Although it was his first time coming, it was not his first time seeing it. As a matter of fact, he was very impressed by Mauer City. Aryan was his first capture target when he played the game, therefore he had high interests and was very eager to start. In order to pique the interests of the players, the game developers set Aryan’s character as a soft and tender sweetheart. Although he had an important position as the city lord, he was easy to please. Capturing him was simply too easy compared to the other lil’ shous. He was also very efficient. When they first met, Aryan pretended to be reluctant to his kisses but soon gave in and reached the first base in one night. Then, he hit a home run in just three days. This made Suo Fei who had just started playing 《Yalance》 yell out ‘GOOD!’ But now, all these benefits belonged to Samael. <i>Sigh...; what a pity.</i>  Suo Fei frequently sneaked glances at Samael when he thought of this, his heart filled with envy. Aryan acted his part as the host to everybody. He prepared a sumptuous dinner, however, Suo Fei lost his appetite when he saw Manzy. Instead, the cub, who had been nestling in his clothes, caught a whiff of the aroma, howled and then jumped out with a pair of sparkling eyes. As soon as it came out, Aryan’s eyes sparkled with interest. He who was initially eating gracefully, disregarded etiquette and trotted over. A look of longing could be seen in his eyes as he ogled at the little cub. Aryan looked at Samael, and asked in a whisper, “Can you sell it to me?” He felt that he was being rude again after asking so he quickly added, “I- I just really like it. I’ll give you anything you want within my power.” His pair of bright eyes were full of expectation as he stared at Samael. This conversation and this scene were very very very familiar to him. It was clearly what Aryan said to Samael in the game. At that time, the ultimate gong character that he played smiled evilly. He raised Aryan’s fair chin and said in his deep, sexy voice, “I want you. Is that okay?” Suo Fei was excited. He was no longer the ultimate gong and he was not Samael, but he was still able to see the plot unfold before his eyes. This feeling of being a spectator of a gay AV. <i>Ai</i><i>yo, it’s so amazing!</i>  He locked his gaze at Samael and waited for him to say his very important lines. As he wished, Samael looked at Aryan and smiled gently. Although Suo Fei could not tell whether it was the legendary evil smile, it was definitely the smile of a gong. <i>So handsome!</i>  <i>It’s coming. Get ready everybody, he’s about to say one of the classic hook-up lines...;</i>  “It’s not mine. You asked the wrong person.” <i>Ara...;</i>  <i>Your lines are wrong, boy.</i>  Suo Fei was stunned and turned to glance at Aryan. Aryan stood at a loss for words, his big eyes filled with tears. He blushed as he did in the game, but it was not because he was acting coy. He was blushing scarlet because he was slapped in the face, alright...; However, Samael only said the truth, making it impossible to refute. This little cub was really not his. Suo Fei wanted to ease the awkward silence, but what could he say? Should he coax Aryan and give the little cub to him? <i>Please.</i><i>Even though he treats Samael as a brother, the little cub went through life and death with him </i>(during the Nightmare Fiend incident). <i>He would certainly not give away his sworn brother...; </i>  <i>Okay, I lied. The truth is that the little cub’s fur is so beautiful that he is reluctant to give it away.</i>  Manzy His Highness, who should not have appeared on the set, was extremely calm. As if he didn’t hear anything, he finished a large piece of pig trotters. Aryan who was filled with grievances could only return to his seat. They ate in complete silence. The little cub who was the cause of the incident thought: <i>This divine beast is so invincibly charming. Everybody scrambles to become my servant. Serve me then, foolish mortals.</i> 。╮(╯▽╰)╭。 Although the dinner was very unpleasant, Aryan was really soft and gentle. After recovering from his embarrassment, he enthusiastically arranged rooms for Samael and Suo Fei and carefully informed them. When he was leaving, he threw a glance at the little cub then threw more glances at Samael. Samael and the little cub had no reaction, so Suo Fei who was a spectator felt terribly ashamed. <i>I’m really sorry, cinnamon roll. Rest assured, you will</i><i>get into the ultimate gong’s bowl</i><i>sooner or later!</i>  When he entered his room, Suo Fei tucked the sleeping little cub into the bed. Then, he sat in a chair by the bedside and silently waited. There was a knock on his door after a short while. The author has something to say: Years later: Suo Fei: Lil’ shous, get into this daye’s bowl. Samael: En? Suo Fei: ...;...; (smiles fawningly) I-I will get into your bowl. Samael: (pats head) Good. Suo Fei: (gets into the bowl): Cheh, I dare you to find a bigger bowl! <strong>Bonus Chapter!</strong> Thank you so much <strong>Mrow</strong> for the ko-fi! Suo Fei was waiting for Manzy Argoux. Since he asked Suo Fei to stay, then he would surely come. When he heard someone knocking, Suo Fei got up to answer the door. The colour of the night was so intense, as blue as the deep blue sea. There was a kind of refreshing coolness even during the hot summer. Suo Fei had just opened the door, he had yet to even say a word when he was immediately hugged by the other person. Because of his small height, his face was buried on the other’s chest. He felt the coldness of the silk clothing as the arms that embraced him tightened even more. It was as if he was afraid that Suo Fei would run away as soon as he let go. His silver hair was extremely eye-catching as it seemed to shine in the deep blue night. Suo Fei didn’t see the person’s face but with his long hair and pointy ears, he could only be Manzy Argoux. So...;.. What kind of situation is this?! Greeting me with such a warm hug, is it because Manzy baobei saw through this ultimate shou’s outer shell and discovered that deep down he has an ultimate gong aura? Was that why he thirstily threw himself into my arms? But baobei, can’t you be a little bit delicate? Laozi is about to be strangled by you! He couldn’t move nor could he shake off the arms that were choking him. Suo Fei was speechless. Fortunately, Manzy wouldn’t go so far as to actually strangle him on this dark and windy night. When he was finally ‘emotionally stable’, he sighed against Suo Fei’s ear, “I’m glad you’re okay.” What did he mean by “I’m glad you’re okay?” Suo Fei reflected on these six words. He clearly understood every single word, so why is it so confusing when put together? Manzi finally let go of him. There was still a sense of arrogance in his eyes, which was characteristic of the Elves, but in those silver eyes was a sliver of warmth. He held Suo Fei’s hand and softly spoke, “It’s cold outside. Let’s go in.” Suo Fei followed him, entering the room in a daze. His head was spinning very fast. This situation, there’s definitely an inside story! If we rule out the imaginary scenario that Manzy was submitting to his ultimate gong aura, then it could only be that Manzy was in a relationship with the real Sofey Evans. Manzy had unyielding love for his family, his kingdom and his race. Sofey Evans’ father chopped down the Holy Tree, almost ruining the Elven race. After such a major event, he could still talk to Grantlyn’s son in such a gentle and warm voice. <i>The worth of this relationship is definitely not small!</i>  Upholding the sophisticated idea of ‘meeting contingencies by sticking to his old ways’, Suo Fei clamped his mouth shut tightly. He was determined not to say a word, knowing that if he exposed something, he would be killed to silence him. The two sat face to face after entering the room. Still holding Suo Fei’s hand, Manzy looked at Suo Fei and asked in a whisper, “Why did you leave? Isn’t it safer to stay by my side?” Suo Fei kept silent. There was a flash in Manzy’s eyes as he asked, “Are you still mad at me?” Seeing that Suo Fei still didn’t respond, Manzy sighed. There was a hint of helplessness in his beautiful eyes, “Fey, you know that it was just a fling. I only care about you alone.” Manzy spoke with sincere affection. Suo Fei felt a bit disconnected from the plot.<i> What the hell? That escalated quickly. The two were definitely in a relationship, then?</i>Manzy was screwing around but still expects Sofey Evans to be understanding of him? <i>Huh</i>. <i>Sofey Evans, you are not only an ultimate shou, you are even a magnanimous</i><i>cheap shou</i>  Seeing Manzy this way, Suo Fei thought carefully. He lowered his head and nervously replied, “My father destroyed the Holy Tree...;.. I...;” Manzy cut him off, “I believe you. It has nothing to do with you.” Suo Fei was surprised in his heart, but he still kept a face filled with grievances as he uttered, “M-My mother...; Is she alright?” Manzy responded after a short pause, “Come with me to Valinor. I’ll take you to see her.” When he heard this, Suo Fei finally let go of the worries in his heart. ‘Vixanne is still alive, that’s great!’ Manzy saw that his expression loosened up so he persisted to convince him, “Come with me, I will hold a right of passage for you there.” Suo Fei was still immersed in the good news that Vixanne is alive. He didn’t pay much attention to what Manzy said. <i>Isn’t rite of passage just a formality?</i> He already came of age whether they hold it or not. However, Manzy’s following words made him return to the matter at hand. “When you officially become an adult, give it all to me. Okay?” ...;...; <i>Is this a roundabout way to ask for sex?</i>  Seeing that Suo Fei was in a trance, Manzy smiled ambiguously. He leaned forward and dropped a kiss on his forehead before whispering in a husky voice, “Fey, I’ve waited for too long.” Suo Fei was still in a daze even after Manzy had left the room. To be precise, he was in a daze as he had let his imagination run wild. He sat motionless, fantasizing for a long time when he suddenly slapped his thigh, he had come to a verdict: What a good dog bloodprime time soap opera! Let’s leave aside the truth for now and see how Suo Fei had been fantasizing. Scum gong Manzy Argoux and cheap shou Sofey Evans flirted with each other for a long time then finally hooked up together. (Suo Fei: The time they were together is definitely not short.) However, the amorous nature of the scum gong didn’t change even after they got together. Every now and then, he would linger around wild flowers and wild grasses. The cheap shou knew that he couldn’t leave the matter at that. He would pick up a fight with the scum gong, but the scum gong would be able to coax the shou to forgive him. Then, the cycle repeats. However, although the gong is a scum, he unexpectedly cherished the teen-aged shou. He didn’t even touch him yet because he was still a teenager. It seemed that the two made a promise that once he reached adulthood they would blah blah blah...; <i>Tsk</i>. After filling his imagination, Suo Fei came to a conclusion: <i>Sure enough, it is the scum gong x cheap CP from time immemorial.</i>  Suo Fei sighed with satisfaction. Just as he was about to get into the bed to sleep, the door opened again. Manzy came back. Suo Fei looked in surprise at Manzy. With some association with his previous thoughts, he suspected that Manzy was regretting it. <i>He didn’t want to wait until the rite of passage and wants to do it with him now, is that it?</i>  <i>But baobei, although this daye is interested in you, daye’s chrysanthemum is not interested at all, okay!</i>  Suo Fei watched him vigilantly. Manzy was not in the least aware of it and approached him. He pulled out a palm-sized round bead from his bosom. The bead exuded a milky white glow as if it was dripping with lanolin, soft and smooth. “This is a gift I got for you when I went traveling but I never had the chance to give it to you.” Suo Fei accepted the bead. “Thank you,” he muttered after a while. “What are you thanking me for? Alright. You should rest early. Good night.” With these words, he kissed Suo Fei again on the forehead. Suo Fei stood motionless as he watched him leave. When Manzy had left, Suo Fei bolted to the door to lock it. He took out the bead and scrutinised it under the dim room lights. It didn’t seem anything special except that it was beautifully round. However, Manzy is the sole prince of the Elves. The gifts for his lover shouldn’t be so bad. Based on the supreme principle that people should accept what has been given to them, Suo Fei wordlessly stuffed the bead into his interspatial bag. Then, he remembered the beast core of the Frostflame Beast which he had thrown inside a while back and was suddenly curious about what skills it had. He opened the interspatial bag to find the beast core but was struck dumbfounded. *** In the master bedroom of Mauer’s City Lord. Aryan had just finished bathing. His short golden hair was dripping wet, playfully sticking out everywhere. He only wore a loose bathrobe, slightly revealing his slim figure. He walked out barefooted. He was about to call for someone but he stopped before it left his lips. There were no lights in the room, but it was not pitch-dark at night in Mauer City, therefore he could see a vague figure under the deep blue glow of the night sky. The man was dressed in a black robe with only a rim of black and shiny fur on its collar. The robe was made of special material. It didn’t have any luster as if it had sucked in all its luster. If Suo Fei was here, he would definitely cry out in alarm as the man’s robes were exactly the same as what Grantlyn’s group wore. When Aryan saw the man clearly, a gust of impatience surged up in him and he angrily said, “I already told you, I won’t join your group. It’s impossible...;...;” “Stop stubbornly saying that.” The black-robed man interrupted him. The voice of the black-robed man sounded strange. His tone was slow and unhurried, and the sound gave a vague feeling that it came out from something. Aryan was immediately on guard. He pursed his lips and watched the black-robed man. The black-robed man stood motionless. His whole body was covered in black and his face could not be seen. “I’m not here today to talk about it.” Aryan stared at him, “What then?” The black-robed man paused for a while before asking, “Did a primeval demon come to Mauer City today?” Aryan knitted his eyebrows. The black-robed man must be referring to Samael. He was not surprised that he would know about Samael’s arrival, but it was unexpected for him to be interested in Samael. “Yes, I arranged for him to rest here.” “How come,” the black-robed man flashed a smile before he continued ambiguously, “you didn’t ask him to sleep with you?” Aryan was stunned. Even if he loved to laugh, he would still somewhat feel ashamed when facing such glaring sarcasm. He had a high status now so no one would dare rake up his past. He kept everything in his heart and yet, this ‘old friend’ is so fearless to actually recklessly ridicule him. However, it seemed that the black-robed man’s teasing was unintentional so he didn’t make any fuss about it. He glanced at Aryan and said in a whisper, “It’s just that I saw you struggling so I wanted to advise you. Don’t let such a good opportunity go by.” He continued after a pause, “A Divine Artifact is right in front of you. It would be a pity if you’re not able to seize it.” After he said this, the black-robed man vanished from sight. He didn’t reveal anything about him from beginning to end, except his unique black robes and his deliberately disguised voice. ‘One of the three Divine Artifacts in the entire Yalance is actually within my reach!‘Aryan’s green eyes brightened at this thought. The interspatial bag had a lot of space. Suo Fei had already sorted the things inside into different categories and arranged them properly. He originally intended to put the beast core of the Frostflame Beast into a case, but because he was rushing, he conveniently threw it towards the meat of the Frostflame Beast. He didn’t have time to properly store it and only remembered it now. When he took it out, he didn’t know whether to laugh or cry from what he saw. The beast core was enclosed by the beast meat. The blue and red colours of the beast core had stopped circulating. It became fixed like a yin-yang symbol, fiery red on one side and ice blue on the other. Half of the beast meat that was in contact with the ice blue side was covered with a layer of frost, emitting cold air. The other half that touched the fiery red side was the exact opposite. It had been roasted for a long time so it was now well done, sweetly drizzling in oil and releasing an enticing smell. The Frostflame Beast meat was known for its deliciousness. It had been roasting for a good while so the aroma was overflowing. Suo Fei’s mouth watered at the smell even though he was already full after eating dinner. Suo Fei tore a piece of the roasted meat’s crispy skin. It was surprisingly not hot but was nice and warm instead. He ate it in one bite and suddenly pictured the little cub whining. It was so delicious that his tongue felt like melting. He couldn’t refrain himself from tearing off another large piece. When he brought it out, the drowsy little cub who had been dozing off was stirred up by the smell and jumped up. Its fluffy little head was still covered with a quilt and its eyes were a little confused but its nose was already sniffing like a piglet. Suo Fei sneered at the chowhound. He took this opportunity to touch it a few times before tearing off a small piece of the roasted meat and stuffing it into the cub’s mouth. Then, the little cub suddenly howled loudly. Suo Fei was frightened and hurriedly covered its mouth. It was already in the middle of the night. Did it want to frighten someone to death? The little cub whose mouth was covered was still seething, letting out loud roars. Although Suo Fei didn’t understand beast language, he knew that this thing still wanted to eat. Even if the little cub thought that the roasted meat was not delicious, the aroma was still extremely tantalizing. Hence, it was inevitable for this purebred chowhound to be awfully gluttonous. Therefore, he had to tear off another piece for the little cub. Its manner of eating was simply like Zhu Bajie eating the ginseng fruit. Suo Fei then recalled that the little cub had eaten almost the entire Frostflame Beast. With its stomach capacity, it would be too costly for it to eat until it was completely satisfied so he decided to ignore it. The little cub had lived for nearly a thousand years. All these years, it had been eating raw meat and had never eaten such delicious meat. The meat’s taste awoke its ravenous appetite. It felt that everything it had eaten before was nothing compared to the roast meat. However, Suo Fei had resolved himself not to give the little cub any more food. It anxiously walked round and round until it finally was unable to endure. It roared at Suo Fei. If Samael or anyone who could understand beast language were here, it would be impossible for Suo Fei to miss the golden opportunity that the cub offered. The translation of what the little cub said was: <i>Give me food! Give me food! If you do, I will take you to Salvag’s treasury!</i>  Unfortunately, Suo Fei could not understand what the little cub had impulsively said. Just as the little cub finished saying those words, it immediately calmed down. Cold sweat flowed through its fur as it scolded itself for being so foolish. Fortunately, Suo Fei did not understand the beast language. The little cub heaved a sigh of relief. It then recalled the roasted beast meat which was crispy on the outside but soft on the inside. Its mouth could not help but water at the thought. It forcefully swallowed and dared not howl anymore. Seeing the little cub behaving, Suo Fei felt soft-hearted. He thought that there was still a big heap of roasted beast meat inside the interspatial bag. If he kept it for a long time, then it wouldn’t be as warm and delicious as it was at that moment. So, he straight away tore off another palm-sized piece. He placed it on his palm for the little cub to eat and chided it, “You kiddo, eat slowly. I won’t care anymore if you’re not able to taste it properly.” The little cub was still scared after the slip-up earlier. Hence, it was stunned when Suo Fei unexpectedly gave him another piece. It slowly climbed towards Suo Fei. It savoured its food with tears streaming down its face. It thought, ‘It’s so delicious. So delicious that I can’t help—I can’t help but want to tell him the secret. Damn servant. Stop giving me food! You’re baiting this divine beast!’ Suo Fei didn’t understand the beast language so his mind was on the beast core. From what he knew so far, it was a rare beast core that had two skills. It was even a fire-type skill and an ice-type skill which were extremely opposing of each other. At the moment, it seemed to function only as an oven and a freezer but he could discover more of its functions later on. He happily kept the beast core enclosed by the beast meat before going to sleep. Early next morning, Aryan warmly served breakfast. Even though the breakfast was unreasonably sumptuous, Suo Fei was somewhat preoccupied. Manzy wanted to bring him back to Valinor so he didn’t have to go after Aryan in order to go back. Although it saved him some troubles, he was uncertain about Manzy’s intentions. <i>Is it really because of love? Does Manzy truly regard Sofey Evans as important to reach this point?</i><i>He valued Sofey so much that after such a heaven-shaking rebellion, he could still let bygones be bygones?</i> Suo Fei thought, I’m not a little girl who loves to dream. Do you think I’d believe this? What a joke. Manzy must be scheming something. He wasn’t sure what it was, but he planned to beat him at his own game. As long as he could meet Vixanne, he would have a way to bring her away. It was much better than now where he was running around like a headless chicken. However, he had to ensure his safety. He looked at the ultimate gong at his side, then he silently clenched his fist. He wanted to bring Samael if he could. With such a cheat character, his safety factor would be much higher. As he was pondering, an elf who seemed to be Manzy’s attendant came. He walked to Manzy’s side and whispered something. Suo Fei was next to him so he vaguely heard a few words spoken in Elvish, seeming to hear him mentioning the Holy Tree. Manzy abruptly put the knife and fork down. The ringing sound of them hitting the plates sounded even more jarring in the silent dining hall. He squinted his eyes before saying to Aryan, “Thank you for your hospitality these past few days. I have some urgent matters to attend to so I would not trouble you any further.” Aryan was stunned. He didn’t understand Elvish but he realised that something must have happened for Manzy to want to hastily leave. He recalled the information he received last night and was delighted that Manzy was leaving. However, he didn’t show it on his face. He merely offered some courtesies, “Your Highness, it is this humble one’s honour for you to come to Mauer City. I hope you will excuse us if we have been a poor host.” Manzy responded to his courtesy with a slight nod. When he turned towards Suo Fei, his indifferent silver eyes softened and he gently said, “Fey, I can’t take you to Valinor now. Stay here and wait for me. I will come pick you up within three days.” Suo Fei blinked. He had no idea what was happening but he knew that Manzy was intolerant of his opinions. Manzy looked at Aryan once more and said, “I hope that the city lord can look after my younger brother.” Aryan promised him. Then, Manzy left in a hurry. With his reaction, a major event must have happened in Valinor. Suo Fei narrowed his eyes, bad thoughts filling his mind. <i>It couldn’t be that the remaining Holy Tree was cut down too, right? Holy Tree, this old thing, who in the world did it provoke? Everyone wants to hack it down...;</i>  Because of Manzy’s request, Aryan treated Samael and Suo Fei with more enthusiasm. After having breakfast, he offered to show them around Mauer City. Suo Fei was not in the mood. He was just about to postpone it, but he saw the look that Aryan cast towards Samael and had a sudden moment of realisation. He had a feeling that the little cinnamon bun wanted to get into the ultimate gong’s bowl with a greater determination. He thought of his promise from before and felt that he had to give them a hand. Therefore, he solemnly nodded in agreement. Mauer City was one of the three major cities of Humans. It was needless to say that they were rich. The issue was, Aryan, being a City Lord, unexpectedly didn’t bring his entourage, not even one bodyguard. The three went out of the city lord’s residence. Aryan was dressed in a light equestrian outfit, with his blond hair and green eyes, smiling like a naïve teenager. He kept following Samael around. His lively and sweet voice was filled with unconcealed enthusiasm. Samael was neither hot nor cold and seemed less than enthusiastic. Suo Fei, on the contrary, looked on worriedly. Ultimate gong, you should take the initiative ah. Your family’s Adonis is almost sticking on to you. If you do not know how to be romantic, then back off and let me do it! The three people had different things in their mind so no one was in the mood to appreciate the scenery along the way. Aryan led the way. It didn’t take long for them to leave the city. It wasn’t safe outside Mauer City because it was close to the Knuhl Forest. From time to time, ferocious beasts would go out for a walk. Because Humans were open to diplomacy, many from other races wandered outside the city. Most of them intended to explore the Knuhl Forest. Suo Fei frowned. <i>Why are they going farther and farther away?</i> Their group had a human leader, a primeval demon and a half-baked pureblood elf so no one would dare to provoke their lineup. However, their aim was to see the scenery so what could they possibly see in the wilderness? He looked at Aryan and then looked at Samael. An idea formed in his mind. Could it be...; Could it be that...;. Aryan baobei wanted to seduce the ultimate gong in a desolate area? F*ck. Baobei, don’t look down on this kilowatt-lightbulbgrandfather! The more he thought about it, the more he was convinced that his idea was correct. He couldn’t help but tug on Samael’s sleeve. Samael turned to him and asked, “Tired?” Suo Fei was about to reply when Samael suddenly pulled him back and he fell into Samael’s arms. He was confused about what was happening. His head hit Samael’s chest, making him dizzy. He had just looked up when a heaven-shaking roar sounded in his ear which made his ears tingle. Then, a beast that was no less than five-meters tall suddenly came out of nowhere. Suo Fei did not recognise the ferocious beast, but looking at its bearing, its grade was definitely higher than a fifth-grade ferocious beast. Aryan was next to Suo Fei, to his left. He was extremely pale, obviously caught unaware of the situation. However, as one of the leaders of the Humans, he was able to respond to the predicament very quickly. He swiftly took out his magic staff and attacked the ferocious beast with a fire-type magic spell. The ferocious beast was filled with pain. It turned its attention to Aryan and its gigantic claws lashed out towards Aryan. Suo Fei’s heart did a somersault. Aryan was a fire-type mage. They have very high magic damage but their drawbacks are also obvious. Their agility is very low therefore Suo Fei wasn’t sure whether Aryan would be able to avoid the beast’s attack. However, Suo Fei was unable to even fend for himself. He simply had no energy left to save Aryan. Fortunately, Aryan’s hundreds of years’ worth of cultivation were not just for show. He didn’t hide away but instead, formed a sturdy fire shield in front of him. With these few seconds of leeway, Aryan ran away to avoid the massive physical attack. The huge claw smashed to the ground and a cloud of dust rose up into the air. The instant he escaped, he turned to Samael and Suo Fei and shouted, “You two, run!” After telling them to run away, Aryan cast a Grasping spell to trap the ferocious beast and give them an opportunity to escape. Suo Fei originally had some doubts, but he had no time to think about that now. Aryan was a human after all. No matter how high his cultivation was, it could not exceed his innate talent, and yet, he fought the ferocious beast on his own, completely disregarding his own life. Suo Fei quickly took out the beast core from his interspatial bag and threw a ball of fire towards the ferocious beast. Its power was far greater than he imagined. The burning ferocious beast wailed like a ghost and its attention turned towards Suo Fei. When Suo Fei confronted the ferocious beast, he discovered that the ferocious beast’s eyes were bloodshot and out of focus, which was definitely a sign that it had lost its mind. How could this be? He had yet to straighten his thoughts when the ferocious beast that had gone mad lunged at him. Even though its appearance was slightly terrifying, Suo Fei was not that worried. Samael was behind him therefore his life was not at risk. However, he forgot about Aryan. The ferocious beast crazily bounded towards the two people. Aryan turned pale. He didn’t have much time to think. He dashed towards Samael and Suo Fei while struggling to hold up his fire shield. He appeared to be trying all his best to protect them. In a flash, Samael activated the Asura Blade. A demon had admirable physical strength and Samael had very high innate talent. He moved so fast, it seemed like he teleported himself under the ferocious beast. The sharp bloodthirsty Asura Blade sounded in the air as it flashed like Aurora. The beast that was initially baring its teeth and claws suddenly fell to the ground. It was a seckill. Suo Fei, who had already seen his prowess, was shocked to see this scene, let alone Aryan. He was utterly shocked. He was in a wretched plight because of his prior fight. His blond hair was covered with dust but his dark green eyes were surprisingly bright. ⁠— ⁠<i>This is the might of a Divine Artifact. It’s so fascinating.</i>  The giant beast fell to the ground with a loud crash, signalling that the battle was over. Suo Fei heaved a sigh of relief and looked at Samael. The Asura Blade had already returned its appearance into a dagger. His fingertips were still dripping with blood, which was an eye-catching bright red against his fair skin. Suo Fei frowned. He felt that something was amiss. Samael also glanced at his fingers. His purple eyes flickered. He turned his sight towards Suo Fei, locking on his lips. His gaze was too intense that it made Suo Fei feel a twinge of embarrassment. At the same time, he was also unable to make head or tail of the situation. Is there anything on his mouth? He was just about to touch his lips when Samael finally stopped staring at him. He handed the Asura Blade to him and said, “It’s your turn.” Suo Fei was stunned. It’s...;. It’s his turn? He took the Asura Blade that had already turned back into a dagger. He only reacted after he realised what was happening after a long time. This...; Had skinning and deboning become his profession? He looked up at the giant beast that had dropped dead on the ground and felt that this profession was not bad. He immediately rushed up towards the beast, brimming with joy. The ‘sleeping’ Asura Blade became as mighty as a tiger in his grasp. The skinning and deboning of the meat was outrageously smooth. This time, Suo Fei relied on the Elves’ enhanced agility and physical strength to finish his job. Aryan who was resting at the side was dumbstruck watching him. If Samael’s seckill shocked him because of his ferocious strength, then Suo Fei made him feel somewhat terrified. The ferocious beast was no less than four meters high. Although the Elves were tall, Suo Fei was still not an adult so he was still small and slender. When he stood in front of the ferocious beast, describing him as too frail to stand a gust of wind was already being too polite. Yet, this frail youth was actually able to dissect the ferocious beast which had been split into two using a dagger calmly (excitedly). The separation of the flesh and skin was a bloody mess. Aryan took a glance and couldn’t help but avert his gaze. The scene was too disturbing. If Aryan knew that the first time Suo Fei wielded his dagger against a mountain-like seventh-grade ferocious beast, and the second time, he skinned the legendary tenth-grade ferocious beast, then he might not be as surprised as he was at that moment. For Suo Fei, the first time was difficult but he was more skillful the second time. Therefore, for the third and fourth times, it was simply a trifling matter. He quickly separated the fur, bones, and the meat before meticulously dividing them into three portions. He wiped his sweat before looking at Samael with sparkling eyes, “I’ll help you keep your share.” Samael replied with an okay. Then, he turned towards Aryan. He pointed to a hill-like pile and said, “That is yours.” “...;..” Aryan was speechless for a long time. Realising that Suo Fei was serious, he quickly waved his hands and said, “I don’t need it. I didn’t do anything. You guys killed it so it belongs to you two.” Although Suo Fei divided it into three, Aryan’s portion was as much as the portion of his and Samael combined together. Firstly, he wanted to increase Samael’s favourability. Secondly, he also felt grateful to Aryan. He was not stupid and could clearly see that Aryan risked his life to save them beforehand. He was bad with words. He cannot butter someone up so he could only express his gratitude through actions. However, Aryan refused to accept it so he didn’t know what to do. Samael saw through his intentions so he told Aryan, “He’s thanking you.” Suo Fei nodded in assent. Aryan was surprised. His eyes narrowed slightly and he spoke somewhat vaguely, “Mauer City is my territory but this kind of ferocious beast appeared. If it weren’t for your extraordinary abilities, I would have lost my own life here. I am a City Lord. Since this thing happened in my own territory, this is due to my own negligence.” The more he spoke, the lower Aryan’s voice became. As he had just gone through a battle, his neat and tidy equestrian outfit was badly torn. The white clothing was also stained with dirt which made him appear all the more embarrassing. Now that he hung his head low and uttered words of self-accusation, he looked very pitiful. Suo Fei terribly wanted to comfort him with words but he was already not sociable even before he became an out-and-out recluse. When he turned into a recluse, it got even worse. His mind was filled with a barrage of words on ‘how to coax a self-blaming beauty’ but when it reached his lips, he could not spit a word out. He couldn’t speak out but the gears in his mind turned. He thought that this was a great time to show that the ultimate gong’s tender doting was peerless. Look! Quickly look at Aryan’s weak appearance. He definitely needs a sturdy arm to lovingly pamper him! If Samael was able to seize this opportunity well, Aryan would definitely get shot by an arrow, p.s: a Cupid’s arrow. The more he thought about it, the more he felt it was reasonable. He then started to clearly and intensely hint at Samael, blinking until his eyes hurt. “If you don’t want it, then forget it,” Samael said at last. Ara...; Is that the main point, boy? In this situation, ultimate gong, you should embrace the depressed little shou in your arms. Comfort him in a gentle, sexy voice that is deep like a cello. Tell him that it’s not his fault, that this was something completely unexpected. Tell him that he had done well, that he already did his best and risked his own life. Tell him how brave he was, how kind-hearted he was. Unfortunately, ultimate gong daren was already lost in the piles of skin, meat and bones. Suo Fei sighed wearily and glared at Samael with a look of resentment for failing to meet his expectations. Samael smiled faintly at him, “These are all yours.” Suo Fei was confounded for a moment. When he understood, he blushed with shame. F*ck, ultimate gong, you’re using your skills on the wrong target ah! Don’t carelessly fire your ‘tender doting’ shots on the wrong person ah! Your aiming point should be your little shou over there! Unfortunately, Samael’s scope was most likely broken. Aryan still hung his head down. His blond hair draped on his forehead, covering his eyes. It also covered his mouth that was slightly curved. After such a thing happened, their stroll naturally came to an end and they went back to the City Lord’s residence. Aryan Mauer was the City Lord so he was not an idle person. He told his people to earnestly examine Samael and Suo Fei’s body before leaving in a hurry. Samael and Suo Fei were not injured. After the healers conducted a routine check-up, they gave the two a lot of buff spells before they left since Aryan attached great importance to them. After the strangers had left, Suo Fei looked at Samael, wanting to talk with him. Talk about what? Of course, he would give out pointers to this muddle-headed youth by relying on his rich experience as an adult. He would help him fix his scope to accurately lock on the unknown little shous. Then, Samael would fire his shots, capture them one by one, and enjoy the life of having a harem. However, how should he start the conversation to discuss this kind of deep topic? Suo Fei pondered. As he was lost in thought, Samael suddenly got up, walked towards the door, and locked it. Then, he went back to Suo Fei’s side. “Do you want to tidy up your interspatial bag?” Suo Fei froze slightly. He was used to throwing everything into his interspatial bag before slowly arranging it afterward. Samael unexpectedly noticed this. However, he had a more important matter to attend to so he evidently didn’t have time to tidy it up. “I’ll tidy it up later.” “All right then,” Samael paused for a while before continuing, “We should verify one thing.” Ara? Suo Fei confusedly looked at Samael. Samael took out the Asura Blade, and lightly glided it against his arm. Blood immediately dripped out of his tender skin. The Asura Blade began to suck greedily and transformed into its real form. Suo Fei was dumbfounded. W-what is going on? There were no ferocious beasts or enemies in sight, only him and Samael. Samael activated the Asura Blade...;.. Could it be that Samael wanted to hack him to death? F*ck me! What is this unexpected plot twist? Suo Fei began to reevaluate his earlier actions and determined that he had not done anything to Samael. Obviously, the atmosphere between them just now was pretty good! How is it that their blades were drawn against each other the next second? Samael approached Suo Fei step by step as the Asura Blade hummed with excitement. Suo Fei was already drenched with cold sweat. He slipped his hands into the interspatial bag, mulling over how he could put up a fight. <i>I can’t die so unjustly.</i>  Samael was already near him when he forcibly suppressed the Asura Blade into its dagger-like appearance. Suo Fei was confused about what was happening so he couldn’t help but cry out, “Why...;” Before he could finish his sentence, his mouth was suddenly covered. Don’t be dirty-minded...; It wasn’t covered with Samael’s lips or anything like that, but with Samael’s arm. The smell of blood reached Suo Fei’s nose and he tasted a little bit of rust. Then, he couldn’t smell anything anymore. He looked at Samael’s arm in doubt. Where is the wound? It was as extremely smooth as before. Samael’s eyes flickered. He once again swung his sword against his arm before Suo Fei could stop him. Blood started dripping continuously as the cut was much bigger than last time. Suo Fei who saw him cut himself felt that it was extremely painful yet Samael did not even flinch. He wordlessly placed his arm in front of Suo Fei’s mouth once again. If Suo Fei still did not understand the situation at this point, then he could only be an idiot. He cleverly pressed his mouth to the wound. As before, the wound quickly recovered just as he tasted the blood. It was simply amazing. After Suo Fei got over his shock, he remembered that when they were in the Knuhl Forest, Samael wanted to cut his own arm to let Suo Fei drink his blood in order to resist the poison. They tried a few times but all were obstructed by Samael’s godly healing power so he couldn’t drink. Thinking back, could it be that it wasn’t because Samael could heal quickly but because of him? A kiss from him could heal wounds? This is too insane! While Suo Fei was still dumbfounded, Samael was also lost in deep thoughts. After a while, he picked up the Asura Blade. Seeing that he wanted to cut himself again, Suo Fei hurriedly stopped him. Even though he can heal him, wouldn’t the wound still be painful? He should learn to cherish himself. Samael appeased him, “Don’t worry, you don’t have to open your mouth this time, just try pressing your lips against it.” Er...; Suo Fei understood what he meant. He wanted to verify which had a healing effect: was it his saliva or a simple kiss from him? Without waiting for Suo Fei’s assent. Samael cut himself and handed his bloody arm over. Suo Fei paused, feeling somewhat uncomfortable in his heart. He lowered his head to the wound, holding his mouth tightly shut. After a short while, the wound healed again. It was truly amazing. Suo Fei felt unresigned. He snatched the small dagger and stabbed himself in the arm. Grimacing in pain, he lowered his head to reach the wound. His lips had just touched the wound when he clearly felt warm current flowing into the wound. Immediately, the wound naturally healed and didn’t hurt anymore. No wonder Samael felt suspicious. It turned out that there will be a distinct sensation after kissing. After several experiments, they came to the conclusion that Suo Fei’s mouth had a miraculous effect: it could act as a super-powerful bandage. With just one kiss, the wound would immediately recover, leaving no scars. However, they were still uncertain whether it could heal all kinds of wounds. It was hard to say whether it would work for injuries like fatal injuries, fractured arms and fractured legs. After all, the risk would be too great if they wanted to verify it. It would be too idiotic to experiment on themselves. At last, Samael looked at Suo Fei and warned, “Don’t use it rashly. Don’t tell anyone else.” Suo Fei nodded in agreement. This ability was way over the top. If someone else knew about it, he couldn’t imagine what kind of disaster it would lead to. In fact, Suo Fei had always wondered before. Sofey Evans’ appearance was not the best and his personality was even annoyingly weak and cowardly. So, why was it that he was always under the limelight everywhere he went? It would be ridiculous if it was because of his Mary Sue aura. However, if it was because his ability got exposed, then it would make sense. So...; The reason why the ultimate shou became the ultimate shou was that he had this kind of cheat? Suo Fei was lost for words. Although 《Yalance》 was primarily a highly erotic danmei game, the reason why it was called a masterpiece was not because of its stunning graphics and its numerous sub-plots and side-stories, but because the settings of all the characters who appeared in the game were intricately linked with each other. Moreover, each of the playable characters had a distinct and clear main plot. Of course, capturing the shous (or gongs) was the ultimate goal, but it was not the only goal. Just like Samael’s character. At the beginning of the game, they recounted his past experiences. Looking at his rough childhood, it could be seen that the original game took great care of the details of his childhood. Such a f*cking miserable past made Samael’s character gloomier, foreshadowing that he would blacken and become powerful later on. After Samael began to capture each of the races’ little shous, the players could follow his perspective and find the root cause of his blackening. It went without saying that he had a past with all the races. His past with the little shous was mainly filled with him suffering tragic betrayals or exploitations, followed by the worsening of his frame of mind. In short, others felt sorry for him. When he was ‘remembering the past’, the players would discover that most of his actions were making trouble out of nothing. For example, an orc unintentionally made a joke, but Samael kept it in mind. Therefore, he inflicted his ruthless revenge afterward. As a matter of fact, attentive players would find that Samael at that stage already had a completely twisted personality. His dark side had thoroughly taken over him. He was truly an evil scum gong. So, the ultimate gong capturing the nine little shous might have seemed like it was because of love, but in reality, it was thoroughly because of revenge. It could be seen from the capture targets he chose that it was a premeditated revenge. This was the reason why Suo Fei was deeply terrified of Samael. He was keenly aware of how mentally deranged Samael was at the later stages, whereas in comparison, the demon youth in front of him was too darn cute. Suo Fei frowned at the thought. He remembered that Samael had always appeared as an adult when he was playing the game. So why is he a juvenile now? The thought only flashed through his mind. H was more concerned about Sofey Evans. He looked back on Sofey Evan’s past with the awareness of Sofey’s magical healing ability and could see the malice of the original game. It also cleverly explained why was it that even though Sofey Evans’ appearance and personality were not outstanding, he would always bewitch thousands and end up being harassed. In Yalance, healing spells are rare and very ineffective. They could only temporarily relieve pain. It is considerably difficult to heal wounds quickly. Therefore, Sofey Evans’ ability would no doubt move the heart of those wildly ambitious authorities. He was simply a moving health potion that can be used unlimited times. Anyone could become invincible! Hence, it was only natural for them to contend for him. After Suo Fei was done contemplating, he thought of how he is now Sofey Evans and that he had inherited the cheat ability, successfully transforming into a powerful health potion with a supplementary function of being a bed warmer. I really want to say: I bought a watch last year! Aryan didn’t show up for a whole day. Suo Fei finally calmed down after he bought a watch and mowed the den. It’s useless to be bad-tempered right now. The cheat software had already been installed. Obviously, there’s no uninstall function so he could only accept it. <i>Fortunately, this cheat is an active skill.</i> As long as he could prevent others from kissing him, then it wouldn’t be discovered. Naturally, if nobody discovered it, then he wouldn’t pull aggro. So, being reduced to a health potion, this kind of miserable situation, would not easily happen. After comforting himself, Suo Fei felt much more relieved in his heart. Wait...; something occurred to him once again. Doesn’t someone already know about it? Samael dage found out about it earlier than he did! He abruptly looked at Samael who also happened to be looking at him. Before he could even open his mouth, Samael already spoke, “Don’t casually kiss others.” Suo Fei: ...;...; “As long as you don’t recklessly kiss people, no one will find out,” he advised in a more serious tone. <i>Is he concerned for him?</i>  Suo Fei stared at Samael. The demon youth in front of him had an extremely delicate appearance, but because of his dazzling looks, it was easy to make people forget that he was still young and somewhat naive beneath that appearance. Suo Fei suddenly felt that he was somewhat too prejudiced towards Samael. He feared the adult Samael, but forgot that Samael right now was still not an adult. He was still a youth who suffered from a tragic and f**king miserable childhood. He was far from being the future extreme <i>chuuni</i> who is hell-bent on taking revenge on society. After spending so many days together, he found that although Samael is taciturn and dislike meddling in others’ business, he is very easy-going. He would even take note of Suo Fei’s preferences. Suo Fei felt flattered by this sudden thought. <i>Maybe, Samael is actually trying to befriend him? Like a somewhat awkward but attentive friend...;</i>  <strong>...;</strong>  Aryan changed out of the equestrian outfit torn by the ferocious beast. He finally felt refreshed after taking a bath. He glowered at the clothes lying on the bed, his eyes flashing with disgust. He eventually stifled his disgust, skillfully wore the clothes and stood in front of the dressing mirror. The youth in the mirror stood barefoot, he appeared delicate but enchanting. His skin was fair and smooth with a slight tinge of pink, just like a petal that would easily break. His clothes could not even be counted as clothes. Although the long-sleeved wide robe was elegant, it was merely made of chiffon. The hazy outline of the youth’s slender figure made it all the more tantalising. Deep inside the residence, a teleportation array that was difficult to be distinguished by the naked eye emitted a light glow. Then, a huge figure came out of it not long after. The huge figure was very sturdy and no less than three meters tall. He was wearing a sleeveless top, his exposed arms looking strong and powerful. Even in the dark, it could be seen that the man had dark skin with a slightly greenish cast. He walked up behind Aryan, completely wrapping the youth’s slender waist with just the palm of his hands. His dark, rough palm caressed the fair, smooth skin, the contrast making it all the more striking. His hoarse voice sounded somewhat strange, “My baby, you’re so beautiful.” Aryan’s body stiffened slightly for a moment before relaxing against the man’s splayed fingers. He turned his head and his sparkling big eyes squinted faintly, instantly becoming enchanting and amorous. His voice was as smooth as water as he cried out, “Balnor...;” edit: <i>pls <strong>click this</strong> to read the NSFW scene.</i>  His sultry whisper pleased the man. He lowered his head, exposing his face. He had dark skin and boorish features. What was even more interesting was that there were two tusks sticking out his mouth, bringing out a fierce and savage air. However, at that moment, his bell-like eyes blazed with blatant lust. Balnor lifted Aryan up with one hand and directly placed him on his arm. The height was just right for Balnor to thirstily lick the pink dots on the youth’s chest. The wet chiffon clung tightly to his skin which made the pink protrusions all the more eye-catching. Aryan didn’t show the slightest resistance. He knew the preferences of the person in front of him very well. He moaned faintly as he stuck out his chest even more, bringing it closer to the other person’s lips. Balnor licked harder, faster. The desire in his brown eyes heightened until it became unbearable. He impatiently tugged the youth’s waist closer and forced his legs apart, wanting to wrap them around his waist. Aryan was startled. He didn’t expect that Balnor would be so impulsive. His hard-on scared him to death so Aryan hurriedly tried to stop him, earning a look of dissatisfaction from the troll who was on top of him. He immediately softened his tone, “No hurries. Let me help you.” Balnor understood what he meant at once so he loosened his grip. Aryan deftly jumped off and stood in front of Balnor. Due to their height difference, Aryan who was already standing upright only reached up to the troll’s waist. However, this only made the scene more sensual. Aryan looked up and sweetly smiled at Balnor. He began unbuttoning Balnor at his waist. The clothes of the troll were uncomplicated. As soon as it was unbuttoned, something huge sprang out. Although he had already seen it many times, it still gave out a strong visual impact. His eyes quivered for a moment before he gently touched the scorching, hard-rock thing. It was a stark contrast to his fair and slightly cold hands. Balnor growled in comfort. Aryan lowered his head, cleverly running his tongue along its outline. Balnor felt the veins on his dick bulge with excitement, as if it was about to explode. In the end, he was unable to restrain himself so he grabbed Aryan’s head and shoved his dick into his mouth. However, it was truly too disproportionate so only the head could fit. Aryan’s mouth was tight and narrow, making him madly want to slam hard and come inside his mouth. However, he also wanted to hold it in to relish in ecstasy. The next moment, the soft tongue teased his tip, hitting it like a drum, while the pair of soft, tiny hands stroked the shaft more swiftly. The faster and faster Aryan stroked, the higher and higher he climbed. The urge became harder and harder to bear until he finally reached the peak of pleasure and he thoroughly spurted out his hot load. The cum spurted all over Aryan’s white, tender skin. After Balnor recovered from his orgasm, he looked at Aryan and saw white fluid dripping from the corner of his red lips. He immediately felt distressed so he held Aryan in his arms, wanting to clumsily wipe it off him. However, Aryan turned his head away and directly pulled open his chiffon robe, his legs clinging onto Balnor. His movements were deliberately light and slow as he grinded against him. Using his most charming voice, he teased, “Enter me?” Balnor’s sense of reason was immediately swept away. The limp thing stood erect in a split-second. He roughly groped Aryan’s rear, feeling a warm liquid as soon as he touched it. It was already lubricated, making his blood pump in excitement. The Trolls have long and thick fingers so he had to use his pinky finger to slowly open it up. Then, he slid his fingers in and out of Aryan. Although his actions were still cruel and impatient, it could already be considered as considerate for a Troll. Aryan wasn’t used to such fingering. The troll’s rough finger glided against his delicate flesh which made him feel itchy to the core. He knew in his mind that he should dislike this feeling but his body was enjoying every minute of it. The once limp place was gradually aroused. His fair and delicate cheeks were flushed red and his green eyes misted with desire. The fingers had already increased to two. He could hear the fingers sloshing with each thrust in and out of him. Aryan gripped onto the troll’s clothes as he moaned louder and louder. He screamed wildly, “Balnor, I want it. Give it to me. Quickly give it to me...;” Hearing this, the troll couldn’t endure any longer. He grasped Aryan’s bottoms in one hand and his waist on the other. He squeezed his massive member into Aryan’s small, delicate red hole. Even though he was overcome by emotions, Aryan’s face still paled as the disproportionate member filled him to the brim. However, Balnor couldn’t care any less, only reveling in the feeling of his member ruthlessly entering Aryan’s soft and tight flesh. Aryan convulsed in pain, but he was powerless to resist. He groaned softly, crying for mercy over and over, but even so, he didn’t shed a drop of tear. With eyes wide open, he felt the violent vibrations underneath him which felt as if his entire being was being torn apart. It was dreadfully painful but pleasure rose deep within him from the pain. His green eyes were once again tinged with lust. Under the powerful thrusts, he let himself go and moaned out, “Stronger...; Harder.” Balnor’s eyes had already turned bloodshot crimson long before he noticed the smell of blood. When he finally found out that Aryan was injured, his remaining sense of reason told him that he had to slow down, but he couldn’t. Aryan wanted him, he wanted him harder. The troll’s sense of reason completely disappeared and he continued thrusting madly. His big hand no longer stayed on one place but was already kneading the fair skin of the person in front of him all over, impetuously bruising it green and purple. These colours stimulated him like a red flag to a bull, making him crazier. He kept on coming until the very end. At some point, he didn’t know when, Aryan had already lost consciousness. When Balnor finally woke up, he saw the livid purple bruises on Aryan’s body and the messy mixture of blood and murky white cum leaking from his rear. His bell-like eyes flashed with remorse. ...; When Balnor finally woke up, he saw the livid purple bruises on Aryan’s body and the messy mixture of blood and murky white liquid leaking from his rear. His bell-like eyes flashed with remorse. Smacking himself with his big hands, he hurriedly carried Aryan into the bathroom. He had never served anyone before and they had different body physique, so he simply didn’t know how to handle the slim and delicate body in front of him. It was truly too weak. It seemed like it would break if he exerted even a little bit of strength. But...; he couldn’t call people in so Balnor had to clumsily and cautiously clean the body before applying the medicine. When he finally placed Aryan on the bed, Balnor was already dripping in sweat after tossing about for a long time. He took a final glance at Aryan and was about to leave when he felt his clothes being tugged. Aryan opened his eyes. He was fully exhausted but he forced himself to speak, “Balnor, come here.” Aryan spoke in a quiet voice but the troll heard it clearly so Balnor went over. The troll’s eyes glinted, itching to ask a question. Aryan then asked, “You...; would you give me anything?” His voice was weak and his green eyes glistened with tears. Balnor immediately responded, “I’ll give you. I’ll give you anything you want.” When he heard this, Aryan smiled in relief and closed his eyes. His body was riddled with pain but he was clear-headed. No one could give him what he really wanted. So, he will strive for it himself. As long as he could get the Divine Artifact, as long as he could inherit that heaven-defying power, he would not depend on anyone anymore. No one would dare to laugh at him anymore. If he could really have that irrefutable power that could make anyone submit, he could let all those disgusting races go to hell. He could...;...; Mauer...; big brother will avenge you. ...; Suo Fei was in great spirits. Although his cheat ability was god-like in pulling aggro, he luckily found out about it early, therefore the risks would be greatly reduced. Moreover, because of this, he had changed his prejudice against Samael and unlocked the wonderful achievement of ‘Being Friends with the Ultimate Gong’. Suo Fei had been living with his grandmother since young. Even though his parents had passed away early, they still left a considerable amount of wealth for them. Although it guaranteed the affluence of the pair of grandmother and grandchild, it also drew the attention of those who covet such wealth. All of their close and distant relatives from far and wide showed up, probing them one after another. At that time, Suo Fei was still young so he could not determine who was genuine and who was fake. When his grandmother was not at home, facing the amiable smiles of all his ‘relatives’, he easily listened to their words. Thus, he got deceived and abducted to a faraway place. His grandmother eventually found him back, but they lost a large sum of money. Since then, his grandmother repeatedly warned him: no matter what others say, don’t acknowledge them and don’t respond to anything. That event completely frightened Suo Fei so those words were deeply etched in his mind. He would be a small chatterbox in front of his grandmother but when in front of strangers, his mouth would be tightly shut and he would refuse to say a word. When he grew up and was finally able to distinguish between true and false, he had already developed the habit. He would talk incessantly towards people he’s familiar with but he could not even utter a simple greeting towards strangers. Because of his disposition, he had lived for more than twenty years and yet he only had one person that could be called a friend. Then, his grandma passed away. His only friend had also migrated to the US hence Suo Fei became alone. Since then, he also turned into a recluse. Being a homebody further boosted the arrogance of sociophobia-kun. Apart from video-calling with a certain someone from the US to chat about random stuff, he thoroughly had no other opportunities to speak. And now, he inexplicably transmigrated into this world where there’s no computer, internet, and his small room where he had hermetically sealed himself off. Although his life was in danger from time to time, he was no longer locked up in his room. Moreover, it seemed like he was about to gain the second friend he ever had. Having reached this conjecture, he immediately felt his blood racing. He turned to Samael and earnestly vowed, “Rest assured. You can entrust all your major and minor injuries to me.”<i> The more loyal he is, the manlier he would be!</i>  Samael was startled for a moment before he threw a faint smile and softly said, “Okay.” Oh my, Suo Fei blushed in embarrassment. <i>I say, with your good looks, please don’t smile so randomly. This is a foul. A foul, you know!</i>  The next day, it was almost lunch when the busy Aryan showed up in front of them. Aryan wore a pale blue, long robe. He wrapped himself so tightly that even his collar was turned up, tightly held in place by an exquisite, tiny clasp. Although not even an inch of skin was exposed, it was still highly fashionable. Furthermore, the tightness made him appear taller. He was still the same refreshing blond boy, warmly inviting them to eat as thanks for saving his life yesterday. Suo Fei knitted his eyebrows. They didn’t actually save his life. Instead, it was Aryan who tried to prevent them from getting injured several times. In fact, Suo Fei had some doubts. Mauer City was bordering the Knuhl Forest, but because of this, Mauer City has had a protection barrier since ancient times used to protect the residents from the invasion of ferocious beasts. They had not stepped out of Mauer City’s boundary so how could they come across a fifth-grade ferocious beast? That’s right. After Suo Fei received the beast core, he determined that it was a fifth-grade ferocious beast. Furthermore, because of the incident in the cave, most of the ferocious beasts in the forest could recognize Samael and Suo Fei. It had only been a day or two. It’s highly unlikely that they would attack them after that right? When he conveyed these thoughts to Samael yesterday, Samael disclosed to him that it was a tamed ferocious beast. Speaking of which, Suo Fei also remembered that the fifth-grade ferocious beast’s eyes were bloodshot and out of focus. It was obviously provoked by something and had completely lost its mind. In Yalance’s setting, this crazy attitude would only occur if the relationship between owner and pet was forcibly severed. Someone was actually willing to abandon a high-grade ferocious beast. Tsk tsk, such a squanderer. This was evidently not an accident, but a premeditated attack! But, who was it directed against? Only the three of them were implicated, so it must be one of them. Suo Fei was deep in thought. When they came to Mauer City, He and Samael didn’t interact with others, let alone offend anyone. Then, was Aryan the target of this incident? Perhaps this was the case. Aryan was one of the leaders of the Humans, the ruler of Mauer City which was a major city. It was likely that he had offended quite a lot of people. It was not impossible that there will always be someone wanting to kill him. Suo Fei’s thoughts had always been confined to his impression of Aryan when he cleared his route in the game. He had always believed that this little shou was a cinnamon roll. Not once had he reflected that if he was truly a cinnamon roll, how could he possibly climb to his position? Especially in the Human race, where the population is numerous and highly competitive. He blindly worried about Aryan’s safety, entangled with the urge to warn him. However, he had yet to speak when Samael stopped. He held Suo Fei’s hand, lightly squeezing it to divert Suo Fei’s attention to himself. Then, he looked at Aryan and said, “Okay.” This was in response to Aryan’s invitation. Aryan’s eyes lit up. He looked very happy as he said, “I have already instructed my people earlier so it has already been properly prepared. Follow me.” Therefore, Suo Fei held hands with Samael all the way to the dining hall. On the way, a profound realisation finally hit Suo Fei. He decided not to tell Aryan. He already gave up on this little shou to Samael. Naturally, he shouldn’t steal the show. The ultimate gong should be the one to tell him. This had nothing to do with him. Thinking this way, he willingly shut his mouth. When they entered the restaurant, Suo Fei finally felt Aryan’s sincerity. He truly spent all his hard-earned savings. A long table that was no less than eight meters long was completely filled. Even if we disregard the taste of the food, the gold and silver tablewares were enough to render people motionless. Even the corners of the white tablecloth were beaded with pearls. It was immensely extravagant. Suo Fei’s swallowed hard as his mouth watered. He suddenly wanted to ask, ‘Can we not eat?’ <i>Just move these things ah...; His interspatial bag still has a lot of space. Enough to fit all these glittering gold!</i>  This idea only crossed his mind. Suo Fei was not a poor wretch any more. How could he do such a degrading thing? Even after taking their seats, Aryan was still ardently expressing his gratitude. Suo Fei was listening quietly for a while when he suddenly remembered something. So, he interrupted Aryan’s words halfway through and abruptly said, “Let’s eat later.” Suo Fei’s tone was terse when he said this, stunning Aryan. His body went slightly stiff. At this time, Samael who was sitting next to Suo Fei looked to him and asked, “Why?” Suo Fei looked at Samael and was immediately filled with confidence. He planned his words before he spoke again, “The meat of the fifth-grade ferocious beast seems really good. After all, we had worked together to kill it. Since this is a celebratory feast, we might as well try how it tastes.” He said all this to Samael, but Aryan was also present. Naturally, he heard him clearly so he hastened to refuse, “You have already accepted it. Don’t trouble yourself. Today, let’s just try Mauer City’s specialty.” Suo Fei pursed his lips into silence. Samael glanced at him and asked, “You want to eat it?” Suo Fei nodded with all his might. Although that beast meat is not as good as the Frostflame Beast, given its grade, it should definitely be delicious. Samael turned to Aryan and said, “Sorry to trouble you.” Aryan was stunned and finally turned his gaze to Suo Fei. He looked narrowly at the elf in front of him. To be honest, he knew who the person was. He was the Young Master of the Evans family, the elf who was well known for being a good-for-nothing. He was a Pureblood elf, but he did not manifest any oracle. In other words, he did not inherit the unique special ability of the Elves. Even so, he was still much loved because of his noble background. Because of the protection of his parents, he had lived a happy and comfortable life since childhood. It would not be an exaggeration to say that he’s a moon surrounded by a myriad of stars. Following the fall of the Holy Tree, all of these were shattered. From being the moon high up in the clouds, he fell and turned to dust. Even so, why is it that there’s still someone sticking up for him? Manzy Argoux did. Even now, the devil in front of him is siding him. This person...; What’s so great about him? He’s incompetent and cowardly. He’s also timid and weak. Apart from his impressive bloodline, what else did he have? Without the help of these people, can he survive? Can he comfortably lay down conditions? Can he...; When the unbearable past was about to rush through him, Aryan quickly interrupted his own thoughts. He did his best to fight down his anger, adjusting his mood in an instant. He consented to Suo Fei, “Well then, I’ll instruct the kitchen to prepare it.” “No need,” Suo Fei interrupted him again. A flicker of impatience crossed Aryan’s eyes. He couldn’t fathom what the elf, who had been spoiled since childhood, was up to. Suo Fei looked at Samael and explained, “It’ll be faster if I do it.” “You’ll do it?” Samael asked to which Suo Fei nodded in response. Aryan stopped him at once, saying, “That won’t do. You’re a guest. How could I let a guest cook? And besides, I still want to show my gratitude to you two...;” Suo Fei hurriedly waved his hands and insisted, “It’s no trouble. I’m fast.” In fact, when he was tidying up his interspatial bag last night, he purposely slotted in the beast core of the Frostflame Beast into the meat of the fifth-grade ferocious beast. It had already been roasted until it was crispy on the outside and soft on the inside, its aroma tantalising. If it wasn’t, he would also not insist on taking it out to eat. When the beast appeared out of nowhere, Aryan risked his life to protect them. Although he lacked the ability, his intention was clear. That was why Suo Fei wanted to share the beast meat. Moreover, after eating the Frostflame Beast that was roasted using the beast core, Suo Fei felt burning hot inside. The little cub was also as hot as a little fireball for a whole day. Hot. Therefore, he surmised that the fire-type elements in the beast core ran into the beast meat with some kind of buff. Aryan was a fire-class mage so it would definitely be beneficial if he consumed it. <i>But how can he explain this to Aryan...; Too complicated, I’m crying. It’s too challenging.</i>  He was silent for a while before he eventually said, “Just bring me to the kitchen.” <i>Laozi only needs a knife and a few plates, that’s it.</i> If the cooked meat was cut using the Asura Blade, it might cry...; His tone was unyielding, which made Aryan resentful in his heart. His hatred towards Suo Fei reached new heights. He couldn’t lose his temper now, so he could only personally lead them to the kitchen. The way Suo Fei handled the knife was bold and rough. The meat was cut into huge chunks. It was fat but not greasy so he thought that eating more would be beneficial to the body. Therefore, he generously cut three platefuls of meat. Finally, he wanted to personally bring it over, but Aryan stopped him. Aryan told him that the servants could do it. Suo Fei thought that even if he wanted to show his good intentions, he should be more conscientious of being a guest so he stopped insisting. When the three of them were returning to the dining hall, Aryan exchanged a glance with his personal maid. The maid was standing with her hands at her side before she held the plates of beast meat. She took out a thumb-sized bottle and poured three drops of blue-black liquid on top. After tossing about, they were finally about to eat. Aryan sat at the centre of the table, looking on coldly. Suo Fei enthusiastically boasted about the beast meat to Samael. Samael was the first to take a bite. He nodded and praised, “It’s delicious.” Suo Fei was filled with joy and ate a few pieces himself. Then, he remembered Aryan and signaled him to eat. Aryan waved his hands in refusal, “I’m vegetarian. I’ve never eaten meat.” Suo Fei was stunned. <i>Aryan is a vegetarian? It cannot be ah.</i> He clearly remembered when he was conquering Aryan, beautiful fur and delicious food can madly increase his favourability. This ‘delicious food’ was not restricted to vegetarian food. <i>He clearly ate both meat and vegetables, so why is he vegetarian now?</i>  Did he remember wrongly? Suo Fei frowned and thought carefully. Impossible. He didn’t remember it wrongly. Because when he came to this world, he thought about all the minute details of the game countless times. If he wasn’t afraid that writing it on paper would cause trouble later on, he would have already written it down. So, he didn’t remember it wrongly. That meant that Aryan was lying. Why would he lie? He looked up at Aryan. He saw his lips hook up at the corner and disgust flashed through his green eyes. Something is amiss! The next moment, Suo Fei understood. His limbs became stiff and it rapidly spread to the rest of his body. He hastily looked at Samael. The pair of purple eyes were dark and downcast. <i>Poison!</i>  The author has something to say: Okay. It’s time for Suo Fei to get a reality check! Here’s a bonus chapter thanks to <strong>Mello</strong>‘s ko-fis. <i>Poison!</i>  Moreover, it’s toxicity was not negligible. Suo Fei had eaten the meat of the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice. Although he was not as resistant to poison as Samael, he was definitely immune to at least hundreds of types of poisons. It should be known that he could stay safe and sound even against the Knuhl Forest’s incurable miasma. From this, it could be seen just how awesome this beast was. But now, he could feel the poison rapidly spread throughout his body. It was like he was being sedated. He couldn’t move even a fraction of an inch. However, it was only for a brief few seconds. Then, the poison resistance in his blood kicked in. The poison was slowly eliminated and he gradually regained control of his body. Suo Fei’s body had this kind of response, so most probably, Samael’s poison had also been eliminated. The toxicity was strong, but they gained something from it. If the toxicity was too weak, they might not even feel anything and them being resistant to all kinds of poisons would be discovered. But now, it served as a warning to them hence they could beat Aryan at his own game. Suo Fei remained perfectly still, holding onto the knife and fork on the table. Aryan’s brisk voice rang out after a long silence, “Why aren’t you eating? If you dislike the fatty beast meat, you might as well try the vegetarian dishes of Mauer City. It tastes pretty good.” His voice was calm, not the slightest bit different from usual. Suo Fei kept silent. He maintained his act, but his eyes were riveted on Aryan. If he still didn’t understand what’s happening at this point, then he could only be a fool! But, why? Why did Aryan want to poison them? Faced with Suo Fei’s sharp gaze, it was as if Aryan was completely unaware. Aryan tidily put down his knife and fork. Then, he picked up the napkin near him and slowly wiped his fingers. His movements were graceful and delicate, following the rules of etiquette, like a noble who had lived his whole life in opulence. He placed his napkin down and stood up. His long robe reached right to the ground. The gorgeous cuffs and hems were adorned with gems and intricate laces. It was not convenient to move around, but he had long been used to such clothes. He walked towards Samael at a relaxed pace. He bent slightly forward and, somewhat amused, poked Samael using his white and slender fingers. Then, he naively laughed, “Can’t move?” Samael’s acting was much more leisurely than Suo Fei, but his line of sight had always been directed towards Suo Fei. Even now, Suo Fei had not moved even the slightest. Aryan smilingly looked at him. His hands caressed Samael’s cheeks, lightly scratching it with his fingernails. He spoke in a soft voice, “This face looks really good. Even the Elven Prince Manzy Argoux, who is renowned for his beauty, somewhat falls short. This is a primeval demon race? Tsk tsk, truly a powerful and extraordinarily beautiful race. “ Samael was not bothered by his laments. He ignored Aryan’s body that was almost sticking to his arms and asked in a flat voice, “The fifth-grade ferocious beast from before was something you arranged?” Although it was a question, his tone was full of certainty. Aryan was startled, but he indifferently answered, “That’s right.” Samael continued on to say, “You are a fire-type Archmage on the surface, but in fact, you’re actually a Beast-tamer.” At these words, the smile on Aryan’s face became somewhat stiff. That was the ace up his sleeve, his hidden greatest power. Except those very close to him, no one knew about it. He squinted his eyes. His voice no longer contained the briskness of a youth, but was low and slightly hoarse, “How did you find out?” Samael’s voice was steady and smooth, “Fifth-grade ferocious beasts are high-grade beasts so they possess intelligence. Although they’re aggressive and vicious, they wouldn’t attack people indiscriminately. The ferocious beast that day had plunged into madness, and the most simple and practical way to induce this state is to forcibly terminate the contractual connection with it. So, it’s your tamed beast. “ Aryan pursed his lips, casting off his facade of being a young and inexperienced youth. His eyes squinted with a glint of fierceness in them, “I am one of the leaders of the human race. It wouldn’t be surprising for there to be a high-tier tamer under me. Why are you certain that it was me?” “Because you only trust yourself.” Aryan’s pupils constricted. Samael continued on, “You like exquisite fur, but you never wear fur-trimmed outfits. Because all those furs were used to learn taming.” “You built Mauer City on the periphery of the Knuhl Forest to suit your own ends. It also helped you cover your identity as a Beast-tamer.” “This is a really crazy and selfish move, isn’t it?” Everything that Samael said was spot-on. Aryan couldn’t help but straighten up. He was clearly looking down at the demon youth from his high position, but at this moment, he felt that he was the one being seen through. Striving to purge out this feeling from his body, Aryan didn’t want to waste any more time. He looked at the small dagger at Samael’s waist. He quickly reached out his hand, seized the dagger, and held it in his hand. Suo Fei, who had always been watching on the sidelines, was completely stunned. Samael’s inference entered his ears without missing a single word, and immediately felt a sense of enlightenment. He had doubts regarding the ferocious beast incident but didn’t think much of it. From beginning to end, all of it was Aryan’s doing? Suo Fei stared at the human in front of him. The naive appearance had long disappeared and the eyes were slightly narrowed. The once clear eyes became bottomless green pools. His mouth was turned down at the corners, making no attempt to conceal the sinisterness therein. <i>Where is the soft and adorable first little shou he knew?</i>  Suo Fei tried to recall everything he knew about Aryan. From head to toe, there was no resemblance at all between him and the human in front of him. In the game, Aryan had attached himself to Samael from the get-go. He was loving, thoughtful, considerate and absurdly good-natured. Wait a minute. Suo Fei suddenly realised, this is not a game anymore! Manzy Argoux could change, so why can’t Aryan? Or rather, neither of them had changed. It was just that he was looking at them from a different perspective so the one he saw was different. Everyone has many faces. All along, he had been thinking in only one direction. Thinking about it carefully, although Aryan had always kept a youthful appearance, he was no less than five hundred years old. Moreover, he was one of the three leaders of the Human race. From what he remembered, the game had not revealed Aryan’s life experiences. However, he knew that Aryan had not inherited the City Lord position from his family. Instead, he single-handedly founded Mauer City! <i>Such a character like him, how could he be as naive as he seemed to be?</i>  Thinking this way, Suo Fei suddenly felt that the game had dug a pit for him. He blindly relied on his walkthrough and held a preconceived impression of others. He seemed like a prophet who knew a lot about the future, but at the same time, he had been misled all along. If Aryan’s true colours had not been exposed today, then he would surely be like an idiot being strung along in circles. <i>F*ck conquering this little shou ah! Compared to this old minx, thinking of a way to survive is of paramount importance!</i>  The Asura Blade had been taken away but Samael remained motionless. However, his tone was filled with ridicule, “Is this what you consider as meticulous acting? Aryan tightly held onto the dagger, inexplicably feeling nervous. The next moment, his eyes widened as his nervousness escalated into fear. It was a hot summer day but chills shivered down his spine. The demon youth in front of him stood up and slowly turned around, his gaze falling upon him. His pair of purple eyes were amazingly beautiful, but it was full of darkness as if it could swallow up all the light. His gaze was not that of a hunter looking at its prey. Instead, he stared at Aryan as if he was already looking at a dead man. Aryan looked as white as a sheet. His hands lost strength, causing the dagger he was holding to slide out of his hand. The Asura Blade did not clatter to the ground. As if it had life, it flew into Samael’s hand and greedily sucked the demon’s blood. Whirring sounds of contentment, the blade was like a living beast of prey. With its appetite satiated, it indolently exposed its aggressive and dangerous appearance. Samael held the sword with one hand. The Asura Blade was pitch-black, its side slightly flashing with the lustre of crimson blood. “This is what you wanted, isn’t it?” Aryan stepped back in fright. He didn’t know why the poison wasn’t working, but the sight before him made him feel an unprecedented sense of death. “You⁠—You can’t kill me.” “Can’t kill you?” Samael laughed, “Then, should I wait for you to come and kill me?” “N-no, I won’t...;.” he uttered. Aryan felt wan and weak. The demon before his eyes wouldn’t let him get away with what he had done. No, no way. He can’t die here! Aryan drew back step by step, knocking over a heavy wooden chair. He then saw Suo Fei who was sitting quietly at the side. It was as if he saw the last life-saving straw he could grasp. He looked at Suo Fei and shouted, “Don’t kill me. I will bring you to see Vixanne Evans!” Hearing Vixanne’s name, Suo Fei’s eyes constricted. He stared at Aryan. <i>I will not attack unless I am attacked</i>. Although it did n’t feel good to watch a ‘human’ die in front of him, he wouldn’t stop Samael’s action. Having reached this point, they would be risking their own lives to let go of Aryan. “I don’t need you to.” Aryan froze. He didn’t expect Suo Fei’s downright refusal. No, he couldn’t let go of this opportunity. Almost as an afterthought, he blurted out, “Manzy Argoux had been lying to you! He wouldn’t bring you to see Vixanne Evans!” The author has something to say: The best part has just begun. Aryan stared at Suo Fei and quickly pleaded: “As long as you let me go, I will definitely take you to Vixanne Evans! I will also tell you everything I know!” Although it was an urgent plea, he refused to divulge any more information and steadfastly emphasized only these two points. However, these two points alone were enough as they were Suo Fei’s most fatal points. Thoughts buzzed around in his head. He never trusted Manzy. Ignoring Manzy and Sofey Evans’s past and only considering their few brief encounters after coming to this world, his behaviour was enough to make Suo Fei vigilant. <i>Such a fickle and unpredictable person, how could he trust him?</i>  When Manzy offered to take him to see Vixanne, he knew that it wasn’t a trap, but at the same time, he had to consider the wide disparity of strength between him and Samael. If Manzy wanted to harm him, it was completely unnecessary for him to lie and deceive him. He could directly use violence and he wouldn’t even be able to escape. However, Suo Fei’s thoughts changed after learning that his body had a skill. If Manzy knew his physique and wanted to use him, Manzy would naturally have to act familiar and deceive him that he is more than willing to serve him. Thinking this way, Suo Fei really couldn’t help but want to complain. Having such a Mary Sue skill, it would be difficult for him not to be a Mary Sue! <i>So, how much does Aryan know?</i>  Wait...; Suo Fei’s mind churned and realised that Aryan surely knew less than he imagined. It is clear that Aryan recognised Sofey Evans, so the life-changing news he brought was naturally what Sofey Evans wanted to know. It might not necessarily be what Suo Fei wanted to know! From Manzy Argoux’ attitude, he believed that Sofey Evans was deeply in love with him, so deep that he could get away with cheating by coaxing him. He could tell from Manzy’s self-confidence that the original Sofey Evans truly loved Manzy. What Aryan wanted to tell Suo Fei was probably something like: ‘Manzy doesn’t love you. Manzy only wants to use you.’ Aryan didn’t even have to explain exactly how Manzy wants to use him. For the deeply infatuated Sofey Evans, simply knowing that it wasn’t true love was enough for him to fall apart. How could he still care about such matters? Unfortunately, he’s Suo Fei now. Therefore, he once again stoically rejected Aryan, “I don’t need you to.” He did not expect to be rejected twice. Aryan gaped at Suo Fei in shock. The elf in front of him had short, silver hair and silver eyes. Although he wore simple clothing, it couldn’t conceal his natural bearing. This is the remnant of a family that had existed for thousands of years. He lived in wealth and honour for decades. Even though he had become a down-and-out with no home to return to, it didn’t change the fact that he is of noble bloodline. <i>Why are some people born to stand out from the crowd? He could stand tall without effort, trampling those who are struggling to climb up the social ladder with silent ridicule.</i>  <i>You’ve already fallen to dust, so why are you still assuming an air of superiority?</i>  <i>Bloodline? One of the remaining Pureblood elf?</i>  <i>Why? Why don’t you die?</i>  Aryan drew himself upright. The cowardice and fear on his face vanished. He looked straight ahead and revealed the secret that he had been hiding deep inside. “Don’t you want to know where your father is?” “Don’t you want to know why he betrayed you and Vixanne?” “...; and, why he cut down the Holy Tree and destroyed the embodiment of the Elven clan’s soul? “Don’t you want to know these things?” Suo Fei was somewhat surprised. He fixed his eyes on Aryan, staring directly into his eyes. <i>How could he know this?</i>  After Suo Fei came to this world, there were only two things that left him unable to relax. One was Vixanne’s safety, and the other was his hatred towards Grantlyn. It was these two things that made him so distressed. Moreover, in Suo Fei’s mind, he wanted to treat Vixanne well. On one hand, he was grateful to her for looking after him even if it was only a short period of time. On the other hand, he bore Sofey’s responsibility. Although he didn’t know where the original Sofey Evans went, he had already transmigrated into his body so he should at least take on this obligation. Grantlyn’s matter was just as important. The huge cut from his left shoulder to his right waist was still slightly painful until now! He held no feelings towards Grantlyn, this <i>thing</i>. Between them, there’s only a deep-seated hatred that could only be appeased with blood! Now, Aryan dropped these two bombshells at the same time. Therefore, Suo Fei couldn’t help but waver. Aryan looked at Suo Fei and spoke with composure, “You come with me to my bedroom and I’ll tell you everything.” Suo Fei had yet to speak when Samael said, “We’ll go together.” Aryan’s eyes batted before refusing, “I’ll only tell Sofey Evans.” “I won’t let the two of you be alone.” Samael smiled and indifferently continued, “Either I come or you need not tell him anymore. You are not the only one who knows these things.” Aryan squinted his eyes. He had seen the viciousness of the demon before his eyes. He knew that this was already his bottom line so he relented, “Alright, let’s go together.” Aryan walked in front, followed by Samael. Suo Fei was the last in line with Samael separating Aryan and Suo Fei the whole time. The distance from the restaurant to the master bedroom was not short. There were human imperial guards patrolling on the way, but these guards’ fighting strength was at the level of an ant compared to the demon in front of him. Aryan wouldn’t be stupid enough to ask for help here. They walked all the way to the master bedroom. Then, Aryan looked at Suo Fei and began, “Manzy Argoux has been using you. He never loved you.” “These things don’t matter to me. I only want to know about Vixanne and Grantlyn,” Suo Fei interrupted him. Aryan smiled meaningfully. He then spoke in a low voice, “Vixanne Evans...;” His voice became lower and lower, as if he was talking to himself. Suo Fei couldn’t hear him clearly so he couldn’t help but inch forward. He vaguely heard him mutter, “Grantlyn Evans, he’s defying the heaven...;” <i>Defying the heaven?</i> Suo Fei couldn’t hear the latter part of what he had said. He was just about to ask when he suddenly felt something cold on his back. His heart jolted, knowing something was wrong. Without any warning, he felt a brief pain in the neck. Suo Fei’s mind started to become fuzzy. <i>Is he poisoned again? No! It’s not poison!</i>  He felt his body falling into a soft but cold embrace before completely losing consciousness. A man donned in black clothing silently appeared, his long blue hair fluttering behind him. He had fair skin and a beautiful but ice-cold face. Not even a tiny bit of emotion could be seen. Most importantly, it’s simply impossible to determine his gender. Everything happened in an instant. The blue-haired person was faster than everyone present could imagine. He didn’t seem strong, but he one-handedly caused Suo Fei to faint. Before he acted, even Samael didn’t receive anything unusual. By the time he reacted, Suo Fei had already fallen into the enemy’s hands. Aryan stood behind the blue-haired person. He smiled at Samael and crooned, “Want him to live? You know what you should do.” Samael looked at him stolidly. The next moment, the Asura Blade was forcibly suppressed. The dagger slipped out of his hand and fell to the ground. Aryan didn’t pick it up. His eyes flashed with viciousness as he looked at the dagger on the ground, “That’s far from enough.” Suo Fei was awakened by the dousing of a bucket of cold water on him. He had not opened his eyes yet, but he felt that his hands and feet were tied up. His mouth was also sealed so only his eyes could move. He confusedly opened his eyes and was greeted by Aryan’s smiling face. Seeing this face again, Suo Fei’s heart was utterly filled with loathing. <i>He was still careless!</i>  Aryan was not the least disgruntled by the blatant loathing in his eyes. He smilingly slapped Suo Fei’s face with the back of his hand, leaving a red handprint on Suo Fei’s face. He didn’t hold back his strength at all. Suo Fei was filled with pain. His teeth just happened to bite his tongue, piercing him with an even sharper pain. Aryan was extremely pleased. He slapped him again with the back of his hand on the other side of Suo Fei’s cheek and watched it leave two symmetrical handprints. He immediately spoke with satisfaction, “Obediently watch. Watch how both of you will die.” It was only then that Suo Fei realised that they were already in a different place. The room was empty and there wasn’t any furniture. It was dark except for the complicated array that was drawn on the floor, its intricate lines flashing in the darkness. The silhouette in the centre of the array made Suo Fei’s eyes widen. <i>It’s Samael!</i>  The Asura Blade was activated, hovering directly above him. Samael’s arms and legs were chained by a spell. Blood flowed out of his limbs ceaselessly, which was greedily sucked by the spell. The whole place was dyed with blood. It was an indescribably strange sight. Suo Fei watched with great trepidation. They were forcibly terminating the contract between Samael and the Asura Blade. In order to not impair the power of the Asura Blade, Aryan actually wanted to drain all the blood out of Samael’s body. Since the Asura Blade recognised its master by a drop of blood, it would only return to its uncontracted state when its master completely lost their blood. The clothes on Samael’s upper body had already been torn. The exposed skin was white as snow, unsullied by even a drop of blood. Weakness permeated his whole body. His head was drooping down, black hair falling over his forehead. His pair of beautiful eyes could not be seen. It gave a sense of unreality. An excruciating pain engulfed Suo Fei’s heart. It was obvious why things had come to this point. When he was attacked, Aryan must have held him hostage to threaten Samael. <i>But...; Why would Samael go to this extent for him?</i> They clearly met by chance and the time they spent together was unbelievably short. He could have left him behind and fled. If he wanted to leave, no one could have stopped him! Suddenly, a scene flashed through Suo Fei’s mind. A young little demon was abandoned by a human a hundred <i>li</i> away. Then, step by step, he walked back to the village. When he saw the human again, the fatigued little demon wearing ragged clothing smiled slightly. The scene in Suo Fei’s mind froze. After that scene, Samael’s trust and sincerity were broken by the human because of the human’s ignorant fear. Suo Fei felt that his heart was tangled into a mess. Samael never thought of hurting anyone, but fate played jokes on him again and again, forcing his hands to spill the blood of many people again and again. <i>Just like now...;</i>  Suo Fei immediately returned to reality. No! No way! This can’t go on! Suo Fei was tightly tied up. He struggled intensely. His mouth was muzzled so he could only let out a vague whimper. Aryan impatiently looked at him. He ruthlessly kicked him before spatting out with disgust, “Feeling distressed? Tsk tsk, such deep affection is truly disgusting. But, you need not hurry, you can die together in a moment.” <i>Deep affection, my arse! Go die, you f**cker! Ah no, the two who will die together will be you and me, you f**cker! What the f**k! Jus thinking about it f**king nauseates me!</i>  Suo Fei stared at him with reproachful eyes. If looks could kill, Aryan would have already been hacked into a million pieces. <i>Aryan, this idiot, he surely has no idea what trouble he’s in!</i>  Samael definitely won’t die. Instead, if this goes on, the entire Mauer city would be destroyed with not a single survivor! When Suo Fei operated Samael to clear the game, he discovered that Samael had a heaven-defying skill. When his immeasurable HP nears zero, this skill would be activated. It had a wide AoE. Moreover, this vicious skill attacked indiscriminately. How exactly was it indiscriminate? Whether one was good or bad, friend or foe, all living beings within the attack range wouldn’t be able to escape. In reality, when Samael’s immeasurable HP neared zero, he would lose control of his consciousness. Furthermore, his attack damage would be off the charts, and his kill count would be maxed out. No one would be able to survive, alright?! The ignorant villagers had once activated the skill back when Samael was a child. At that time, the entire village was annihilated. Samael’s ability, at this moment, had already soared to unknown heights. Wouldn’t his fighting strength be as powerful as a nuclear weapon? The elf’s strength was too weak. Suo Fei simply couldn’t break free. But at this time, he suddenly felt fluffy fur behind him...; <i>It</i>‘<i>s the little cub!</i>  When did it come in? The little cub struggled to tear the rope that tied Suo Fei up in an attempt to rescue him. Suo Fei was moved to tears. Little thing, if we make out of here alive, I will let you eat to your heart’s content. The little cub’s teeth were not only for show so gnawing through the rope was as easy as falling off a log. As soon as Suo Fei’s hands were freed, he immediately tore the paper seal off his mouth, but he was unable to utter even a single word. <i>...; It’s too late</i>. The primeval demon, who had kept his head down the entire time, looked up. His purple eyes had already been dyed into a deep crimson by blood. The Devil...; had awakened. Mauer City which was one of the three main cities of the Humans turned into ruins overnight, shocking the whole continent of Yalance. This event was different from the fall of the Elves’ Holy Tree. It became widely known that the buildings were wholly reduced to ashes and that not even a single evidence was found. Later on, there was no way of knowing the truth of the matter. That was because the people related to this event seemed to have disappeared together with this main city. It was as if a punishment from the heavens descended where the people were unable to fight back and could only silently wait for their annihilation. Did Suo Fei die? No, he survived. Moreover, he was the one and only surviving eye-witness. He managed to break free from the chain at the last minute, but he wasn’t stupid enough to turn tail and flee. Instead, he took out all the furs in his interspatial bag in one go using the fastest speed he could muster in his entire lifetime. Then, he hastily folded them and wrapped layers and layers of fur over his body. Of course, he didn’t forget about the little cub. In fact, the beast was extremely sensitive. It was keenly aware of the danger so it wrapped itself like a zongzi together with Suo Fei. The two hugged each other and huddled into the smallest ball they could manage to make the best use of the fur. Even then, when everything had calmed down, the furs of the Frostflame Beast, the Ten-Coloured Cockatrice, and the fifth-grade ferocious beast, which died tragically, that he worked hard to collect had been turned to scraps. The furs had heaven-defying defensive power. He was initially rolled up in more than ten layers, but in the end, he was only covered by one layer of scorched fur. From this, it could be seen how frightening the damage was. As for the defenseless Aryan and the unknown blue-haired person, Suo Fei suspected that they were already dead with not even a hair left behind. Although dying this way was letting them off a little too lightly, they already died and he could not rewind time to change it. Moreover, he really had no mood to think about such matters. Such a significant event had happened so it will inevitably cause a sensation throughout the whole of Yalance. At that time, the other races would definitely deploy ‘peacekeeping forces’. If they discovered that there were still people alive in the ruins, the matter would cause a greater commotion. Therefore, it was utmost priority for them to quickly escape. He crawled out of the chaotic mess. Fortunately, he had wrapped himself with a sufficient number of layers. Although he felt some pain in his body, there were no serious injuries. The little cub was rather quiet as it must have been scared witless. Even so, it also did not sustain any major injuries. Suo Fei looked around and caught sight of a demon youth lying in the midst of the rubbles. He quickly ran over. Samael’s clothes had been torn to pieces. He laid quietly in the ruins, as if he had already stopped breathing. Suo Fei’s heart jolted. He hastened to place his fingers under Samael’s nose and was greatly relieved when he felt a weak breathing. It seemed that he was only exhausted. After thinking about it, Suo Fei realised that it would have been strange if he was not exhausted after releasing the Blast Wave that was comparable to a nuclear weapon. The scene before his eyes was strangely somewhat familiar. It seemed like the first time he met Samael in Knuhl Forest was also like this. However, back then, he was frightened to death by the demon. At this time, he was not afraid even though he knew that Samael destroyed the entire city. Taking a deep breath, Suo Fei meticulously examined Samael’s condition. Each of his limbs had a cut that was no less than ten centimetres long which should be Aryan’s doing. Suo Fei carefully leaned over and gently kissed each of the wounds. He saw the wounds healing as he had hoped. Samael had lost a lot of blood. He had consumed too much so it was impossible for him to regain his consciousness within a short time. Suo Fei had no choice but to pick up the Asura Blade and fasten it to his waist. Then, he lifted Samael up with all his might. He already had a plan. Aryan’s master bedroom certainly must have a teleportation array. Otherwise, the blue-haired person couldn’t have appeared so unexpectedly. Right now, they could only rely on that teleportation array to leave. He found the teleportation array that was emitting a light glow without much trouble. Suo Fei hastened over but he suddenly realised a problem after arriving. <i>How does this thing work? Can he just stand within the array? Does he need to select his destination?</i>  When he played the game, if he wanted to teleport, he only needed to click with a mouse and the teleportation array would prompt him to choose where to go. But, how should he do it now? <i>How can he click without a mouse?!</i>  <i>Could it be that he has to use his hand to click it? Or is it by thought? Does he only need to think about where he wanted to go, stand within the array, then it would bring him there?</i>  <i>I don’t get it, but I’m impressed</i><i>ah!</i>  He pondered for quite a while. There were only the unconscious beautiful young boy and the unspeaking little cub. In any case, he could not just wait for their demise. He could only take his chances. He carried Samael on his back and held the little cub in his arms. With his big family in tow, he entered the teleportation array. Then, he really had no selection ah! As for thoughts and whatnots, he already became dizzy before he could even think it over. What Suo Fei didn’t know was that the teleportation array was a fixed teleportation array. Under normal circumstances, it could only teleport to the designated destination. However, teleportation array-kun was also damaged under Samael’s powerful Blast Wave. With such a dysfunctional teleportation array, if he had some sense, he would not be so stupid as to step into it. If they were not lucky enough, it was highly likely for them to be torn to pieces. Even if they had better luck, it would still be uncertain as to where they would be transported. They may even get trapped within the spatial magic. After Suo Fei and Samael had left, the debilitated teleportation array also disappeared with a whirring sound. ...; A man donned in black appeared out of nowhere in the ruined Mauer City. He had a tall stature, but he was wholly covered in black. Except for the shiny jet-black fur on his collar, not the least bit of lustre could be seen from top to bottom. The place was a chaotic ruin, but he walked leisurely as if he was strolling through a beautiful back garden. Although his face couldn’t be seen, it was difficult to ignore his imposing manner. He went to where the teleportation array had disappeared and paused slightly before he continued walking forward. He stood where Aryan’s master bedroom was located and looked around. Then, he walked north with a clear goal: the scene of the incident, the root of all tragedy. He didn’t do any peculiar action the entire time until he stopped. He quietly chanted an incantation. The content was ancient and unfamiliar, but his voice was pleasant to listen to. It was an alto that was not too high nor too low. It was smooth and steady, seeming to calm people’s minds. The incantation ended and a shocking scene appeared. The debris of the buildings disintegrated and vanished after a while, revealing the sight beneath them. There was a crushed body. He was missing an arm and a leg and had a huge gaping wound on his chest. His elegant blue hair was still dazzling. His eyes were open but they were hollow and soulless. The black-robed man smiled, seemingly muttering to himself, “The injury is really bad this time.” Naturally, no one responded to him. However, it was clearly a dead body that was already not breathing and yet, he still used the word ‘injury’. The next moment, his slender, fair-skinned bony hand extended out of the black robe and hovered above the body. He closed his eyes and recited a long incantation. An orb of intense black slowly gathered in his hand. Then, it fell and shrouded the corpse on the ground. After that, something magical happened. The torn-off arm and leg rapidly drew near the body. Within the black mist, the severed limbs rejoined with the body and returned to its uninjured state. After a while, the blue-haired person sprang to their feet and immediately bowed down upon seeing the black-robed man, “Master.” Placing his hand on top of the blue-haired man’s head, the black-robed man whispered, “Summer, tell me everything that happened.” “Yes.” The blue-haired man called Summer calmly recounted what had happened without the slightest fluctuation in his voice, narrating the events clearly and coherently. After listening, the black-robed man pondered for a while before he smilingly said, “Very well, you did a great job.” Summer kept his head down and did not say any superfluous words. The black-robed man looked at him with satisfaction. Then, as if he had just thought of something, he asked him, “What about Aryan? Go find him.” “Yes, master.” As soon as he had spoken, Summer quickly took action. His speed was so fast that he couldn’t be seen by the naked eye. Not long after, he ‘found’ Aryan in the ruins. Aryan was in no better condition than Summer. His blond hair was in a mess and his body was damaged to an astonishing degree, especially the horrifying fatal injury on his chest. There was no doubt that he was completely dead. “Master, forgive me. Summer has not protected him well.” The black-robed man smiled and said, “It’s fine. Since he summoned you, then it could be regarded as him agreeing to join us. His condition doesn’t matter. Take him back and turn him into a human puppet. “Yes, master.” The two people left. A shichen had passed when Mauer City welcomed its second batch of guests. A whole party of trolls unexpectedly appeared in this deserted and messy place. Their imposing manner was so great that it seemed like it could cover the whole sky. The troll leading them was especially lofty and strong. His pair of tusks were sticking out his mouth, his eyes were bell-like and his face had boorish features. It was precisely the King of Trolls —— Balnor. At this time, when he saw Aryan’s mansion reduced to such a state, his huge brown eyes were filled with panic. He ordered with a voice that was almost a growl, “Go search! As long as it is a survivor, bring them all over!” The troll’s loud voice died out and the group fanned out in all directions. Balnor himself also scoured the place. His huge body moved the rubbles cautiously as he was afraid that if he was too rough, he would hurt the person buried underneath them. <i>Aryan...; Aryan...;</i> He kept muttering the name in his mind, as if it could calm down his almost frantic heart. He’ll be fine, he’s definitely...; definitely alive. They searched endlessly from dusk till dawn. After three days and three nights, his last kindled hope was extinguished. At this very moment, the eyes of the King of Trolls who searched without rest were red. The paper in his hand was crushed into powder and the veins on his forehead throbbed. He gnashed his teeth and growled, “...;I’ll definitely make them pay a heavy price for this!” The black-robed man looked at the blue-haired person who had just returned and asked rather unhurriedly, “Have you delivered it?” Summer answered in a low voice, “Yes, Balnor accepted that Aryan is already dead and that the murderers are Samael Launay and Sofey Evans. “Very good.” ...; Suo Fei was propelled out of nowhere. Naturally, he fell. He fell to the ground under such gravitational acceleration but miraculously, he only uttered out a soft cry. The next moment, he realised that something was wrong so he quickly got up. F**k me, I was clearly carrying Samael so why is it that I’m now on top of him?! Samael was already so weak. If he pressed him down, he might die. Suo Fei panicked and wanted to examine him but then the little cub, this thing, fell from the sky directly crashing onto Samael with a pow. F**k! The awe-inspiring ultimate gong <i>daren</i> had endured countless sufferings and had escaped death several times. It would be intolerable for him to be crushed to death by him and the fat cub! Dazed, the little cub’s furry head rested on Samael’s body. Its big eyes blinked. It wasn’t crying but was evidently confused as to why the ground was so soft. Suo Fei lunged forward and hurriedly hurled the little thing away. Then, he thoroughly examined Samael’s body. The little cub crashed to the ground and rolled a couple of times, smearing his nose with dust. Its fur was just about to bristle in anger when it saw Samael lying on the ground. It quivered when it realised that it fell on Samael’s body. The little cub, after all, was someone who had seen the world. Thinking of the demon’s menacing fighting strength, it suddenly wilted and roared weakly. The translation is: Servant, this matter should only be known between you and me, alright. You absolutely mustn’t let others know blah blah blah...; Suo Fei completely had no idea what the little cub was saying. He merely focused on examining Samael. He turned him to side until Samael’s already tattered clothes had almost torn off. But fortunately, he didn’t find anything unusual. However, even after being pressed by the little cub and him, Samael still didn’t show any signs of waking up. Suo Fei suddenly felt doleful. His healing skills, in fact, could only treat external injuries. He simply couldn’t heal internal injuries. As a doctor specialised only in treating external injuries, coming across a patient suffering from internal injuries, Suo Fei could only...; touch all over and eat some tofu. Little cub: ...;...; Suo Fei was greatly relieved after confirming that Samael’s breathing was smoother than before. Sadly, there wasn’t any beast blood left in his interspatial bag. Otherwise, he could have given him some to speed up his recovery. As for his own blood, Suo Fei defended that it wasn’t that he was ungrateful to the point that he would ignore his saviour’s life and death. It was only that they were in the wilderness. If he carelessly let himself bleed, he might lure some strange thing and their whole team might be wiped out! His top priority was to determine their location. He needed to see whether he could find signs of inhabitation so that he could find a comfortable place to settle down. He also must attentively look after Samael and let him have a good rest. As Suo Fei looked around, all he could see was lush trees and bushes. <i>It’s a forest. Again.</i>  At that moment, Suo Fei was overwhelmed by emotions. He couldn’t help but trash-talk. <i>Sure enough, teleporter array-kun and forest-kun are in a relationship! Sure enough, they love each other! Otherwise, why is it that he is always teleported to a forest?</i>  <i>What forest is it now? Don’t suddenly take on a</i><i>face</i> ah, <i>forest-kun!</i>  <i>So, where the hell is this?</i>  Some people were born unlucky and unfortunately, Suo Fei was one of them. Therefore, when Suo Fei looked around with eyes full of dejection, the clue delivered itself to him. It was even with an added effect of dust vigorously flying around. Rumble...;. Listening to the sound, he knew that it was definitely not a good thing. Sure enough. When Suo Fei looked up, he couldn’t help but think: F**k. A huge wild boar rushed towards him. That thing should be a wild boar. <i>It definitely is one. It has a black, fat body as well as four pig’s feet. But, why is it shooting fire out of its mouth? This cheating world!</i>  Then, Suo Fei noticed that in front of the huge wild boar, there were two little things sprinting the whole way. He had to take a closer look before he could clearly see then. <i>It’s actually two little friends? Ah, no. It’s two little dwarves!</i>  The little dwarves seemed to have noticed Suo Fei. The one in front shouted at the top of his voice, “Help! Hero! Help us!” Suo Fei was truly embarrassed. <i>Hero your ass ah! The hero is still cosplaying as Sleeping Beauty ne!</i>  Regrettably, the dwarf didn’t know that so he dashed towards Suo Fei. As expected, the boar also came running with a swoosh. Suo Fei wanted to swear. <i>These two dwarves can run. He, on the other hand, has to carry his family so how could he possibly run ah?</i>  He watched helplessly as the wild boar came closer and closer. The little cub who had been keeping its silence, suddenly jumped out and stood in front of Suo Fei, roaring at the wild boar. RTT: This divine beast is here. Stupid boar. Still not kneeling down! It had just finished roaring when the wild boar really stopped. It turned its head to look at the little cub. Although Suo Fei didn’t know what the little cub said, the sight in front of him made him feel relieved. He thought about the incident at the Knuhl Forest where those high-grade ferocious beasts who were courteous towards the little cub. It’s really the perfect deterrent ah. Unfortunately, he had not yet finished rejoicing when the wild boar which had just stopped kicked its hind legs and hurtled towards them. Little cub: Sh*t sh*t. This bugger is a low grade beast. It doesn’t understand beast language! Suo Fei: MF! If the little cub is reliable, then pigs can fly! Seeing the boar dash closer and closer, Suo Fei finally got up. He first covered Samael with the last remaining fur before taking out the two beast cores in his bag. One was from the Frostflame Beast and the other was from the unfortunate fifth-grade ferocious beast. Suo Fei tried each of them. The Frostflame Beast’s beast core had two skills. One was a fire-type attack and the other was an ice-type shield. The fifth-grade ferocious beast on the other hand had a lightning-type skill. It was powerful, but looking at its size, he surely could only use it a few times. Suo Fei first used the Frostflame Beast’s beast core to prop up an ice shield and told the two dwarves to take cover behind it. Then, he took out the fifth-grade ferocious beast’s beast core and shot out lightning. Thunder rumbled and struck down, but...; it missed! The boar was frightened at first. Then, it ran over and rammed the ice shield. Suo Fei who had never fought on his own before was very nervous when confronted by the fellow. Thus, his next lightning attack missed again. <i>MF...; Doesn’t all games have auto-aim? Who will teach him how to aim now ah!</i>  Fortunately, the dead Frostflame Beast was not only for show. The power its beast core possessed was no ordinary. The boar struck and collided with the ice shield to no avail. This gave Suo Fei the opportunity to practise his skills. If he couldn’t aim well at such a close range, then he might as well die! As such, Suo Fei finally got the knack of how to use the beast core of the fifth-grade ferocious beast that was only the size of a chicken egg. He took a deep breath and a huge crash of thunder fell from the sky, directly striking the pig’s forehead. Its huge body crashed to the ground. BATTLE OVER. XP GAINED...; Experience points, your ass! He didn’t get anything. The lightning attack was too strong and directly turned the boar into ashes. At any rate, they survived through the crisis. It was only then that Suo Fei had the time to size up the two dwarves who were fleeing earlier. Their height only reached up to Suo Fei’s waist. Both had short hair. One had flaxen hair while the other’s hair was a deep shade of dark green. The flaxen-haired dwarf’s eyes were round as a ball. He was extremely adorable and spirited. In comparison, the dwarf with the dark green hair was much calmer. His mouth remained shut tightly. Even when they were fleeing in panic, he still had a calm face. The flaxen-haired dwarf spoke first, his voice surprisingly loud. Obviously, he was the one who called for help earlier. “Elf, thank you for saving me. Words cannot express how grateful I am for your kindness. My name is Jonah. His name is Evelyn, and I am a blacksmith!” “A blacksmith without any work to his name,” the dark green-haired dwarf quietly quipped. Jonah’s face flushed red but he immediately puffed out his chest and said, “Although I don’t have any achievements yet, as long as I put in tremendous effort, I would certainly become the most outstanding blacksmith of Yalance! The dark green-haired dwarf once again threw cold water on his enthusiasm, “Only under the premise that you wouldn’t die in the mouth of a ferocious beast.” Jonah finally lost his temper, “Evelyn, you...;” The eyes of a dwarf named Evelyn remained like that of a dead fish. Jonah stared at him for a long time before finally losing heart. He turned to Suo Fei and somewhat dejectedly said, “Fine, I’m still a blacksmith apprentice.” Suo Fei, who had been watching on the sidelines, was not interested in whether Jonah was an SSS-tier blacksmith or a blacksmith apprentice. He only speechlessly stared at this tiny race. <i>Oh my, they are so tiny. Oh my, their faces are so round. Oh my, I know they are adults, but it feels like they are children pretending to be adults. What to do?</i>  Seeing that Suo Fei didn’t utter a word, Jonah puzzled asked, “Elf?” It was only then that Suo Fei returned to his senses. He realised that he should introduce himself. Samael was still unconscious. No one would speak on his behalf so he had no choice but to pep himself up and say, “My name is Suo Fei, an elf.” ——You don’t say. However, Jonah didn’t care. He obviously cared more about what just happened. He stared at Suo Fei and began chattering ceaselessly, “Elf, the power of your lightning attack is really extraordinary but its accuracy is not high. If you can wield a staff that improves accuracy, your ability will definitely increase a hundredfold!” Suo Fei truly felt no shame to admit to Jonah that he simply couldn’t cast spells and that the lightning spell was casted by a beast core. However, seeing Jonah’s sparkling and worshipping eyes, he swallowed the words back. “If you can find a Dragon-Phoenix Wood, a Flying Wolf Bone and a Cyan Flame Stone then I can definitely forge a staff with an extremely high precision, unfortunately I...;” Jonah sighed before continuing, “Elf, although I still lack the ability, but if you need one, I can ask grandpa to tailor-make a staff that is most suitable for you!” For him to use a staff, he’d have to learn magic first, no? Suo Fei had no choice but to wave his hand in refusal, “Don’t bother.” Jonah felt somewhat let down and wanted to continue persuading him, when he suddenly saw Samael who was lying on the ground. Noticing that Jonah was staring at Samael, Suo Fei became more vigilant. He already fell into Aryan’s trap and learned from his mistake. He may look like a cutie pie but he may not necessarily be an authentic cutie pie. Suo Fei felt extremely uncomfortable especially since Jonah was staring at Samael with such a fervent gaze. However, his imagination was brought to a screeching halt. Jonah let out a scream and pointed at Samael. He then stutteringly said, “E-E-Evelyn! T-t-that is a Frostflame Beast’s fur! Hurry, you hurry and tell me that I am not dreaming aaaah...;..” Suo Fei: ...;...; <i>Dwarf, your focus is on this? So, a primeval demon of unparalleled beauty can’t even compare to a piece of scorched fur? Is there something wrong with your eyes?!</i> Here’s a bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>Lenette </strong>&amp; <strong>Junksnack</strong>‘s kofis~ Jonah was still talking aggressively, “My god, why is this fur damaged to such an extent? The fur is all burnt and only the skin is left. This is definitely a...;. a what of valuable resources again?” Evelyn kind-heartedly supplied, “A waste of valuable resources.” Jonah clapped his hand in realisation, “Right, a waste of valuable resources!” He sighed with regret. It was only a long time later that he realised that there was someone under the Frostflame Beast’s fur. Jonah jumped up in surprise and yelled, “There’s a person underneath!” Evelyn whose eyes were still like that of a dead fish spoke, “A demon, to be exact.” “Demon? Aaaahhhh! Elf, there’s a demon! Quickly run away with us! If the demon catches you, you will die with no corpse!” “...;...;It’s ‘die without a whole corpse’.” “Right!” Suo Fei face-palmed. This was the first time he had encountered a fool. It really made people feel caught off guard and not know whether to laugh or cry. He snapped back to reality and immediately placated Jonah, “He is my friend.” “Friend? Your friend is a demon?” Suo Fei nodded. Jonah’s eyes lit up and his face was filled with worship, “Elf, not only did you amazingly roast the boar with magic, you also have such high-grade clothing materials. You even have a demon friend! You are so amazing!” Suo Fei was speechless. Could he say that he had never been worshipped like this before? That he had never been praised like this? That even he himself had never thought that he was so strong? Suo Fei quickly stopped himself from getting carried away and kept a straight face, “My friend has exhausted his physical strength and currently needs to rest well. Can you help me arrange a place for us to stay?” Jonah thumped his chest and assured, “Our village is just outside the Munroe Forest. I will bring you guys to my house!” When he saw the two dwarves earlier, Suo Fei had already determined that he was in the Dwarven territory. In Yalance, if we were to rank the races based on how difficult they are to deal with, the Dwarves would be first and no one would dare regard them as second. The difficulty lay not with their strength, but with their personality. They were not as unpredictable and brutal as the Demons. In fact, they were enthusiastic and candid. They were fond of liquor and fine cuisine. They were also magnanimous and value relationships. It may sound like there was no relation between Dwarves and the words ‘difficult to deal with’, but they had a fatal shortcoming: they were extremely xenophobic. They treated others with dislike, even to the point of aversion. Their bad attitude was enough to even make the most good-tempered person complain to high heaven. To others, these dwarfs were downright racists. They considered themselves as the most outstanding race in Yalance. Their self-confidence was negatively correlated to their size. They were as warm as the breeze in spring to their own people, but they were as cold as the ice in winter to outsiders. However, Suo Fei, this person who had thoroughly conquered the Dwarves before, knew that they were actually not racists. Merely, they were clear about their likes and dislikes. As long as they approve of a person, they could put up with whatever that person does. Similarly, if they did not approve of a person, no matter how that person ingratiates themself, they would still thoroughly reject that person. This clear way of life applied not only to foreigners, but also to their own race. It was just that it was rare to see one that they disapprove of within their race. At the least, this point shows that they were not born hating other races. In fact, as long as one increased their favourability well, one would find that Dwarves were the most loyal friends. However, Suo Fei brooded that this would only hold true if everything in this world of Yalance followed his walkthrough and that another Aryan incident would not happen again. Tragically, according to this world’s nature, everything was hard to tell. It was also not impossible for things to take a turn for the worse. It seemed that he could only take measures if the situation called for it. When Jonah and Evelyn were being chased by the wild boar, the two dwarves ran madly towards the direction of the village. Therefore, they were already near the village. It did not take long for them to get out of the forest. Then, they travelled a long way more. Suo Fei was already tired as hell when they finally saw the village that Jonah mentioned. It was truly a little too modest to call it a village. Don’t think that just because Dwarves were short, their villages would also be small. In fact, the area of the Dwarven territory was among the biggest in Yalance. It went without saying that the Humans and Elves were both tied for first place. However, the territorial area of the Dwarves, whose total population was only slightly more than that of the Elves, actually ranked second. It could be seen from this that these little friends were not to be underestimated. The outer wall of the Dwarven village was very high. Fortunately, the scale of the village gate was acceptable. Otherwise, Suo Fei would have to climb in which would be too embarrassing. As Suo Fei entered the centre of the village, he was immediately fascinated by the scene in front of him. The numerous little houses were densely packed, like chocolate sprinkles on a cookie. It looked disorderly, but it somehow felt warm and cordial. The Dwarves were tiny but loud. Although their population was small, they were still outrageously enthusiastic. The village was bustling with activity, way livelier than the Human territory. The dwarves saw Jonah and they all clamoured to greet them. Jonah also enthusiastically introduced Suo Fei’s group with pride in his voice, “The elf and demon are both my friends.” Hence, they didn’t show them any racial discrimination. Although the dwarves had to look up at the elf, they accepted it quickly because the Dwarves took the word ‘friend’ very seriously. Suo Fei looked around the Dwarven village along the way and the sense of discrepancy gave him an extremely novel feeling. He really wanted Samael to see how pocket-sized the little houses were, but sadly, he was still unconscious. The little cub, on the other hand, had been very excited ever since it had entered the village. Oh lord, this divine beast suddenly grew a size bigger! These little houses are suitable for this divine beast! They walked a little further and met a dwarf uncle whose face was covered with a beard. He immediately shouted after seeing Jonah, “Jonah, you brat! Your grandpa has been looking for you all day! Now, he’s waiting for you to come back to give you a beating!” Jonah immediately wilted after hearing this. He mumbled, “Uncle Simba, is my grandpa at home or is he in the shop? I...; I just went out to play. Isn’t this returning before it gets dark?” Evelyn, whose lifelong mission was to cut the ground under Jonah’s feet, followed to say, “Indeed. We came back before the sky turned dark the next day.” The dwarf uncle called Simba narrowed his eyes, “You brats actually spent the night outside. No wonder Eugene, that old man, was that anxious. Hurry and go back!” Jonah didn’t dare to speak more. He merely quickened his pace, speedily running home. Suo Fei didn’t have the chance to make fun of Uncle Simba’s mighty and domineering name because he was stunned by the name ‘Eugene’. <i>Eugene the Dwarf...; it couldn’t be him right?</i>  <i>Should he probe about it? In the end, is his luck super good or super bad?</i>  Finally, Suo Fei couldn’t refrain himself and asked the dwarf, “Jonah, is your surname Hall?” Jonah’s face was scrunched up with worry. When he heard Suo Fei’s question, he bafflingly answered, “Elf, how did you know? My father’s surname is Hall. I’m Jonah Hall.” <i>It really is Eugene Hall! Eugene Hall the Dwarf!</i>  In Yalance, Eugene Hall was not a conquerable character (<i>Who would want to conquer a rotten old man?</i>). Nevertheless, he was an eminent NPC in the game. Eugene was the only Craftsman God in the entire Yalance. Why? Simply put, he was an S-tier Craftsman. To be more precise, his skills were heaven-defying. His Crafting skill was all maxed out and he was also a top-tier Grandmaster of life skills. In the game, he was synonymous with the words ‘top-grade equipment’. Except for a few renowned artifacts, he was the only Grandmaster who was able to manually make [Epic] grade equipment. It stood to reason that Suo Fei should have felt happy to be able to meet such a mysterious money-spinner. However...; it would be underestimating 《Yalance》, this despicable game, if he were to say that it was too easy. It was true that Eugene Hall’s crafting ability was extraordinary, but his temper was as stinky as a century-old stone found deep in a pit latrine. Calling him a rotten old man was already a compliment. He was the perfect representation of the Dwarves’ trait of being clear about their likes and dislikes, but unfortunately, his worldview was that he hated everyone except himself. He lived alone year in, year out. He obviously was an old dwarf with a sunny disposition, but he lived like a ghost in a gloomy castle. His cynicism was in the same league as that of the adult ultimate gong-kun. He was such a cheat character that he held the title of having the most creative talent in Yalance. He was unparallelled to the extent that others scramble for his creations. But, he hated everyone. He would never waver even if he was offered countless treasures and top-grade materials. If one wanted him to personally craft an item, there was only one condition——They must kill their most important person with their own hand. It went without saying that Suo Fei encountered Eugene Hall back when he played the game. It was naturally not difficult even when faced with the conditions he proposed as players can still [LOAD] their saved game file. At that time, Suo Fei had just captured the lil’ shou of the Sylph race and the Sylph was the only one with him. Therefore, he saved the file, and then, he ruthlessly killed the lil’ shou of the Sylph race in front of Eugene. He initially thought that he would be able to obtain a top-grade equipment once he had satisfied the condition. Who knew that the rotten old man would gloomily say, “How can the person you could kill with your own hands be your most important person? You can never kill your most important person yourself. Never.” Therefore...;. he killed for nothing. So, this condition was simply farcical and full of ill intentions! To put it plainly, it was simply tricking the players! For no reason, it will let you gape at all the shimmering top-grade equipment behind the rotten old man, but in reality, you could never obtain any of it. At that time, Suo Fei badly wanted to punch the life out of the deranged old man. Unfortunately, he was unable to attack the NPC. Even while he was recollecting, his feet didn’t stop walking. Thus, a while later, he was already in front of a commodious cottage. As soon as Jonah arrived, an old dwarf rushed out holding a slipper in his hand. He shouted, “You brat, I must have been crazy to let you go out! Come here! Watch me beat you black and blue!” At nearly the same time, Jonah dashed off in big, rapid strides. He shielded his head as he begged for mercy, “Grandpa, grandpa, I was wrong. I know I was wrong. Don’t hit me. Wu wu wu...;” Suo Fei who was supporting Samael and dragging the little cub merely gawked at the grandfather-grandson pair. The old dwarf chased the young one, going round and round within the small courtyard. Compared to the stunned Suo Fei, Evelyn was already familiar with the scene before him. Thus, he turned to Suo Fei and calmly said, “Follow me. Let’s find a place for your friend to rest.” Suo Fei followed Evelyn into the room. He strenuously pushed the two beds together, and placed a thin mattress pad on top of it. He tried it and found it comfortable. It was only then that he placed Samael down. At this time, the grandfather-grandson pair who had run a lot finally came in. Jonah had a lot of shoe prints on his body but it was obvious that it was more bark than bite. It didn’t hurt at all. On the other hand, Eugene was heavily panting. Suo Fei scrutinised Eugene Hall. The dwarf was not the dirty and gloomy old man in his memory. Although he still had a lot of beard, he was much cleaner. His eyes were also not as dull and lifeless as it was in the game. Instead, he was as vigorous as the dwarves in the village. Eugene Hall also sized Suo Fei up at this moment. Then, his voice was brimming with energy as he forthrightly showed his gratitude, “Elf, thank you for saving my disgraceful grandson. If this old man could be of any help to you, please don’t hesitate to mention it. “ <i>...;...;T-this is definitely not that cynical old man!</i>  Suo Fei wanted to yell, ‘Craftsman God sensei, please forge an OP equipment for me.’ But...; would it really be that easy? Suo Fei, who had already fallen into a pit numerous times, thought that he should make more observations before deciding. At night, Eugene enthusiastically served dinner for Suo Fei, personally preparing sumptuous dishes and fine liquor. After an afternoon of observation, Suo Fei thoroughly felt the affection between the grandfather and his grandson. The grandfather might look temperamental and serious, but he felt deep love towards Jonah. Jonah might be naughty, but he was extremely dependent on Eugene. Seeing them getting along, Suo Fei thought of his grandmother. Weren’t they like this back then? His grandmother and him had to depend on each other to live but in the end...; Suo Fei couldn’t stop his eyes from turning red at the very thought of the scene of his grandmother’s departure. He had to quickly divert his thoughts so he once again locked his gaze towards the pair of grandfather and grandson. Suo Fei suddenly remembered that in the game, although Eugene had the shining reputation of being a Craftsman God, he was a lonely person who lived by himself. Furthermore, he had also left the Dwarf territory. Wait. An awfully terrible idea formed in Suo Fei’s mind. He probably is that same Eugene Hall, but he is now the Eugene Hall who is still not alone. That is to say...; Eugene became like that later on because his grandson Jonah died? The grandson that he cherished and valued the most was gone. The pillar sustaining his sanity collapsed which was why the old man’s attitude was extreme to such an extent. Was that why he hated everyone? Suo Fei remembered that when he met Jonah, the two dwarfs were being chased by a ferocious beast. Although the fierce beast was not that powerful, it would still be easy for it to kill two weaponless dwarves. At this moment, Suo Fei simply couldn’t imagine it. If he didn’t appear in the jungle at that time, no one would come to their rescue. Therefore, these two dwarfs would have been buried there for eternity. Then, Eugene who had lost his beloved grandsons would become completely deranged. Then, the grandfather who was initially candid, enthusiastic and amiable would fall into such a gloomy and sickly state. Suo Fei was lost in a world of his own and didn’t notice that the unconscious Samael had opened his eyes. The excessive blood loss and power consumption left Samael, who had barely woken up, feeling extremely dizzy. He thought that he would be left at the ruins, alone, reeking with the scent of blood that he could never get rid of. However, what greeted his eyes was a wooden ceiling with tree markings on it. A small chandelier hung from the ceiling, emitting warm rays of light. He fell into a trance upon seeing the unfamiliar sight. The room had simple furnishings. Opposite him was a small wooden table which was full of dishes and fine liquor that was exuding a rich aroma. There seemed to be three dwarves: one was old while the other two were young. Although they were small, their voices were loud. However, it unexpectedly didn’t make people feel that it was noisy. Opposite the dwarves sat a vague figure, his back facing Samael. It was only after squinting his eyes that he could clearly see his slim back, his distinctive short, silver hair, and his pointed ears. The purple eyes suddenly dilated. Samael’s fingernails dug deep into the flesh of his palm. <i>He did not die? He didn’t kill him?</i>  When Suo Fei returned from his own world back to reality, his eyes as he looked at Jonah was filled with the light of the Holy Father. <i>Jonah, you must live well. This concerns the level of the equipment in the whole of Yalance! There is a great difference between an affable Craftsman God and a Craftsman God who only wants to take revenge on society.</i>  Jonah knew nothing about Suo Fei’s thoughts. On this day, Grandpa took out his favorite blueberry wine so he drank until his small face turned bright red. When he saw Suo Fei looking at him, he raised the glass and candidly said, “Come, elf, let me drink a glass as a toast to you!” Suo Fei also picked up the cup in front of him. To be honest, this glass might be a glass in the eyes of the dwarf but it was only a small teacup in his eyes. Therefore, drinking a glass wasn’t really an issue for him. Thus, he unhesitantly downed the whole glass. His unreserved manner excited Eugene, this old man, to happily pour wine. Evelyn, who was the only one sober, looked at Suo Fei and suddenly said, “Your friend seems to be awake.” Suo Fei froze only for a moment before he quickly put down his glass and ran towards Samael’s bedside. In what sense is he awake? His eyes are still closed, okay? Suo Fei was somewhat disappointed. He swept aside the black hair that had fallen across Samael’s forehead and pulled up his quilt and tucked him in. Jonah criticised Evelyn, “Look at yourself, making the elf happy for nothing...;” Evelyn frowned. He clearly saw that the demon had opened his unique pair of purple eyes. Nevertheless, he did not argue back and acquiesced, “I saw wrongly.” Suo Fei comforted them, “It’s okay, he will wake up tomorrow.” He planned to find some beast blood once the sun had risen. As long as he provided him with enough blood, the demon would be able to recover quickly. During the dinner with the dwarves, Suo Fei was in a drunken stupor. It was only later that Suo Fei found out that although the blueberry wine was refreshing, the after-effects would hit you much harder than you expected. He took it lightly and drank one cup after another until he became awfully dizzy. There were three beds in Eugene’s house, two of which were combined for Samael to sleep on. The grandfather-grandson trio had to huddle in one bed thus Suo Fei had no choice but to move Samael slightly inward to make a slight space for himself. Finally, he fell asleep after much difficulty. At this time, the benefit of drinking wine finally manifested. Even though the bed was hard, even though the space was only the width of a hand that he could not even turn or move the slightest iota, Suo Fei still drifted off into a deep sleep. He slept like a dead pig, so much so that he didn’t feel that his entire person was embraced in the middle of the night, completely nestling in Samael’s arms. Even though the arms wrapped around him were immensely tight, Suo Fei merely moved in discomfort with no signs of waking up. It was not until the sky had brightened that Suo Fei woke up from his drunken state. His head still hurt slightly, but he had slept very soundly. He was a little worried about whether he had occupied Samael’s spot in the middle of the night. He crawled out of bed and heaved a sigh. His sleeping posture was unexpectedly good. He woke up at the same spot that he slept last night. He didn’t even move the slightest bit! So amazing. I give myself a ‘like’! He joyously leaned down and surveyed Samael. Seeing that his complexion was a lot better than yesterday, Suo Fei felt relieved. He must get beast blood for Samael today! During breakfast, he inquired Eugene about where to buy some beast blood. Eugene’s eyes flashed but he merely lowered his head and responded, “Jonah can take you there after a while.” Suo Fei nodded in agreement. The Dwarves were good at manufacturing. They were experts in everything, be it forging, tailoring or jewelcrafting. They were the provider of Yalance’s top-grade equipment. As such, the materials they needed were also beyond one’s imagination. However, the Dwarves didn’t like to talk with other races and their inherent personality was not suitable for conducting businesses. It was at this point that another race that was good in profiteering came at their own volition. One of the sub-races of the Sylphs, the Goblins. They had the height of the Dwarves, the ears of the Elves, the complexion of the Beastmen and the hideousness of the Trolls ⸺ they were truly a mix of all races. They were born to be businessmen. They wandered around the whole continent of Yalance. It was intuitive for them to follow the ‘buy low, sell high’ strategy. It was their common practice to buy goods on a large scale in order to demand a lower price. They dug pits for everyone all over Yalance and were only genuine and friendly towards the Dwarves. Naturally, this was because of the Dwarves’ personality. If they dug a pit for a dwarf even once, they would not be able to conduct businesses with them in their whole lifetime. However, the Dwarves had the highest demand for materials in the entire Yalance. The equipment they produce was also the best in the whole of Yalance. Thus, the loss would only outweigh the gains if they offended such a client. The Goblins, who were good at calculating, naturally would not do anything that would cause them to lose money. Therefore, there was a saying that circulated in Yalance: The Goblins are only conscientious towards Dwarves. The reason was this: After trading for many years, the Goblins left the Sylph’s territory and directly moved into the Dwarven territory. Then, they established a huge trading market on the border of the Dwarven territory. First, it helped the Dwarves in selling their manufactured goods. Secondly, it served as a shopping place for the other races. After all, not everyone could enter the Dwarven territory. Suo Fei wanted to explore the Goblins’ trading market, but he knew that it was not the right time. Beast blood was of little value to Grandmasters as most of the equipment they forge did not require beast blood. However, beast blood was also indispensable to the entire Dwarven race as many types of beast blood were good materials for making liquor. Words would not be able to describe the Dwarves’ love for liquor. Therefore, it was not difficult to find beast blood in the dwarven race. Eugene was an old drunkard. Jonah inherited this quality very well and became the quintessential young drunkard. Therefore, he definitely knew his way around the wineries. Leading Suo Fei along, he moved quickly and reached the winery in a short time. The winemaker dwarf was an uncle who had shoulder-length hair and a thick beard. He almost couldn’t bear to look straight at his heroism. Naturally, a strong smell of wine lingered around his body. If he was not an alcoholic, then he was a winemaker. Jonah explained the purpose of his visit and the winemaker uncle immediately thumped his chest and guaranteed, “No problem. Come with me and pick what you like.” Suo Fei followed him into the room. There were many materials required for winemaking and beast blood was not the only one. It could only be regarded as a flavouring or a neutralizer. The amount required was also not too much therefore there wasn’t too much stock in the winery. Suo Fei was somewhat disappointed but it was still better than nothing. Although the blood contained in the jar in front of him was not from a high-grade ferocious beast, Samael could still recover to some extent if he gave it to him. If it didn’t work, he could just bring Samael with him once he had woken up to the Goblins’ market. As long as he could afford it, there would be nothing that he couldn’t buy! While holding the jar in one hand, Suo Fei took out gold coins from his interspatial bag. Seeing his action, the uncle immediately blew his mustache and glared at Suo Fei, “This thing is of little value to me. Just take it if it is useful to you. You are Jonah’s friend. How could I charge you for this?” Jonah also stopped him. Although Suo Fei felt embarrassed, he didn’t bother making another excuse. He put away the gold coins and thought of a better idea when he remembered about the fragrant roasted beast meat in his interspatial bag which was enough to serve as compensation. He cut a large piece, handed it to the uncle and said, “Please accept this.” The aroma of the roasted beast meat assailed his senses and he thought that it would go well with wine. Thus, the uncle was brimming with joy and immediately accepted it. Before Suo Fei and Jonah left, he foisted each of them with a large jar of fruit wine. The two had just left the winery when they saw Evelyn breathlessly running over. Suo Fei frowned and was just about to ask what happened when Evelyn pantingly said, “Quick—quickly go back. Y-your friend h-has woken up.” Suo Fei was stunned before he immediately quickened his pace. Woken up? In his haste, he traversed the originally short route in a much shorter time. It wasn’t until he saw Eugene’s cottage that Suo Fei understood why Evelyn, who had always been calm, had become so anxious. Samael had really woken up. He was still standing by the door and he held the activated Asura Blade in one hand. His purple eyes were profound as he spoke in a voice that was low but full of deterrence, “Step aside.” Eugene Hall stood in front of the door and faced him squarely. Gritting his teeth, he kept still for a little while. The stalemate only eased slightly after Suo Fei appeared. Suo Fei hurriedly came forward and placated Samael: “They are not bad people. We escaped and settled here temporarily.” He was anxious so his explanation was not clear but he knew that Samael would understand. Samael stared at Suo Fei. He hid all his emotions underneath an ice-cold appearance. Expressionlessly, he told Suo Fei in a cold tone, “Step aside.” Seeing Suo Fei return, Eugene Hall no longer blocked Samael and finally let him out. Samael strode away without halting which caused Suo Fei to freeze. He immediately rushed forward and caught Samael’s sleeves. Questions rushed to his lips but refused to come out. Samael looked back at Suo Fei. Suo Fei managed to force himself to speak after a long time, “Where are you going?” “Where am I going,” Samael paused for a moment before smiling strangely, “What does it have to do with you?” Suo Fei was absolutely astounded. He couldn’t process what Samael was talking about. “We only met by chance and travelled together for a while, but there’s no need to do so anymore. It’s time for us to separate.” He spoke about their time together in a light manner. Seeing that Suo Fei wasn’t saying anything, Samael turned around to leave. But before he even took a step, Suo Fei’s hand that was holding Samael’s sleeve let go and grabbed his wrist instead. The elf’s voice was unprecedentedly low: “I said, I won’t leave you.” Samael’s body suddenly stopped. Suo Fei looked at him and spoke in a soft tone, “At that time, you were conscious, right?” “You see, I’m not dead. I won’t die.” Suo Fei paused and then, in a calm tone, he uttered an unusual promise, “I promise, I won’t die in your hands.” The author has something to say: That, let’s talk about it in advance, to reduce the confusion of everyone. The spiritual power of the young Samael was not enough so he didn’t know how to activate his ultimate skill. That’s why he let Aryan, this lil’ bitch, tie him up and torture him. It was only when his HP neared zero that he realised that his uncontrollable killing mode was activating. While still sober, he could see his own pair of hands become bloody but he couldn’t control them anymore. 【Okay, you can beat me to death, but I will never concur that this is the scum author’s malice at work】 Four more~~ Really want to give myself a round of applause! Didn’t overdo it this time = 3 = Look at my conscience! “...;I won’t die in your hands.” Others would be unable to make heads or tails out of this strange guarantee, but Samael became stiff after hearing it. He stood motionless with his back facing Suo Fei. His back was straight, stiff like a solitary pine tree that stood firm in the cold winter, lonely and with no one to depend on. After being in a stalemate for quite some time, Samael’s voice eventually rang out: “I killed them with my own hands. I tore their bodies to pieces and ripped their hearts out. Everything turned into ruins. Endless screams filled the air and the ground reeked with blood. I had lost my sense of reason. I could not control myself. I was deranged...; like a monster.” Then, he finally turned around, his purple eyes tightly locking onto the elf, “Aren’t you afraid?” Samael’s voice was gentle when he spoke, but no emotion could be seen in his eyes. His clear purple eyes were frozen like ice but Suo Fei had a feeling that it would completely break with just a touch. “I’m afraid. I’m a coward.” Suo Fei laughed at himself but he continued to speak with conviction, “But I already said this long ago: I won’t leave you.” <i>Even if I am afraid, I will hold on. That’s my promise.</i>  His answer was obviously much more sincere than the thoughtless two words ‘not afraid’, bringing some warmth to Samael’s coldly features. He leaned his body slightly closer to Suo Fei and whispered, “Remember your promise. Don’t be killed by me.” Suo Fei was just about to solemnly nod in assent but suddenly paused in shock. His mouth...; was blocked. This time it was not by an arm, but a mouth, mouth, mouth x infinite loop n times. Suo Fei’s cheeks turned bright red. Samael kissed him. He kissed him mouth to mouth...; <i>F**k, what in the world is going on? Who can tell me what he is up to!</i>  His eyes were wide open and he dared not move. His brain froze and shut down. All his senses were concentrated on his lips but he couldn’t describe how it felt. He just thought that right now, facing Samael who was less than inches away from him, with his eyes slightly narrowed, his good looks felt a bit unreal. <i>Wait wait wait...; Could it be that it is now common to express the deepening of friendship by kissing? It must be! That’s right, he can’t be wrong!</i>  <i>Can’t be wrong, my ass! Common, my ass! This is Yalance, a highly explicit, danmei masterpiece where everyone is gay! </i>He was deeply knowledgeable due to his gaming experience. How could he not know the meaning of a kiss? This indicated the start of a hook-up! <i>Could it be that the ultimate gong’s </i><i>soul</i><i> finally awakened and mistook him for one of his capture targets? Then, he launched his offensive to make him part of his np harem?</i>  <i>There is a saying that there’s no need to be polite towards a friend’s wife. But friends should not be treated as wives! Ultimate gong-kun, wake up! Quickly pick up your sense of shame. Nothing can happen between two gongs!</i> 【Is this the point?】 He complained ceaselessly in his mind until he finally couldn’t help but speak out heartfelt words to earnestly persuade Samael. He was determined for the ultimate gong-kun to have some sense of shame, “We are...;” Before he could utter out the word ‘impossible’, Samael spoke with a frown, “Why did I not recover?” Suo Fei was stunned. <i>Why. Did. I. Not. Recover?</i>  These five words caused a chain of explosion in Suo Fei’s head. For a moment, his face resembled the crimson clouds from a sunset sky. F**k, is this the truth? <i>Samael was only after ‘Sofey’s healing skill’? He wanted to use his kisses to recover his strength?</i>  ⸺Suo Fei shed a tear after knowing the truth. ⸺His active imagination embarrassed him to death. Samael was ‘puzzled’ for a while and asked Suo Fei, “What did you just say?” Suo Fei: “Ah, just now, oh, I was saying, I...; I can only cure external wounds. I can’t treat internal injuries. Yes, yes, that was what I wanted to say.” Samael knitted his eyebrows, “How come I heard you say ‘we are’.” “Ah...; ahaha. You misheard me, haha.” Samael didn’t probe him any further and asked about his previous remark, “You said that you can’t treat internal injuries, you...;” He paused and smilingly continued his question, “have you tried it before?” Suo Fei: Why do I get the feeling that Samael’s smile is very ambiguous? Is it an illusion? It must be an illusion. If I misunderstand him again, I would need to find a hole in the ground to hide in. “I haven’t tried it.” How could he say that he had tried. Would it not mean that he secretly kissed Samael while he was unconscious? Although he is very lewd, he still has a bottom line. “Then, let’s try it.” “Huh?” Before he had time to react to what was happening, Samael already acted. The Demons and Elves were tall races but the Demons had a much stronger physique than the Elves. Keeping one arm wrapped around Suo Fei’s waist, Samael lifted Suo Fei’s chin with his other hand. This simply rendered Suo Fei unable to struggle or resist. Samael squinted his eyes and gently pecked the elf’s pale lips. It was as supple as always. Like the softest dessert, it was sweet and tempting. He lightly forced the elf’s mouth to open using his left hand, presenting more of the soft dessert before his eyes in which Samael crashed straight into without hesitation. In Suo Fei’s life, he held some fear towards his own sexuality before he reached twenty years old. When he finally figured it out seven years later, he was already an out-and-out recluse. The only thing he dared to do was play scum ** games. He would wretchedly face the screen and fantasize that he was the ultimate gong-daren eating up all the lil’ shous from far and wide. In fact, he was inculcated by two-dimensional works so much so that he firmly believed himself to be a gong. It is known that all the gongs in fictional manhuas and games were mighty and domineering, and their golden guns had infinite ammo. Furthermore, doing it would not hurt but would be pleasurable instead. When compared to the f**king miserable shou, the huge disparity between the two could be seen immediately. With such a comparison, Suo Fei thought that even if he was gay, he would opt to be the better gay, which is the gong. But in fact, someone who holds this kind of idiotic notion is an idiot himself. As the saying goes, real gongs would never need to mention that they are gongs, whereas, real shous would always loudly profess that they are gongs. By the time Suo Fei understood this point, it would already be a little too late. As he didn’t have any prior actual experience and was only an imaginative incompetent gong, the first time he experienced a genuine kiss was enough to knock him senseless. Facing Samael’s penetrating kiss, Suo Fei was taken by surprise so he could only passively accept it. He felt himself tremble under Samael’s kisses. His innate ranting skills failed to work at this moment; he could not even properly breathe. In order to prevent Suo Fei from being the first Pureblood elf in history to die of suffocation from kissing, Samael had no choice but to let go of Suo Fei. Suddenly able to breathe in air, Suo Fei’s extremely oxygen-deprived brain was completely blank before he started gasping for air, his heart nearly jumping to his throat. Suo Fei slowly calmed down after a while. Samael’s eyes were smiling as he deliberately spoke, “Seems like I recovered a little.” Suo Fei was petrified. <i>D*mn game developers! D*mn pre-installed cheat software! D*mn healing skills! These f*ckers definitely want to pit laozi to death!</i>  Samael thought for a moment. Then, he looked at Suo Fei and earnestly suggested, “Maybe we should try a few more times. Maybe the effect will be much better once we’re more experienced.” Suo Fei: ...;Do you really dare say so many things I could rant about? If it accumulates to an unthinkable degree, there will be a rant (nuclear) explosion! Suo Fei was about to blow up after being entangled by Samael on this matter. Then, he finally regained his IQ and remembered the beast blood that he recently got. He hurriedly brought it out and forcefully handed it to Samael: “Here. Beast blood. Drink it to replenish your strength!” The dwarf Evelyn who had been watching at the side calmly said, “It turns out that (gay) friends in the Elven language meant this. It is truly a race with a long history and a deep-rooted cultural heritage.” Not only was the beast blood from a low-grade beast blood, it was also only a small amount. It was only a drop in the ocean when compared to Samael’s consumed power. They would still need a lot of high-grade beast blood for him to recover completely. Obviously, the most convenient way was to go to the Goblins’ trading market and directly purchase beast blood. Furthermore, Suo Fei had other plans. He had a lot of gold coins at hand thus it seemed a pity to let such an opportunity go to waste. He could try his luck at the Goblins’ trading market. It would be fortunate if he could buy a fixed-point teleportation array. If so, he would be able to directly teleport to the border of Valinor. Then, he could secretly sneak in and rescue Vixanne. After knowing that they were going to the Goblins’ trading market, Jonah excitedly proposed for them to go together. Suo Fei thought about it before finally proposing that he would bring them along after getting Eugene’s permission. Bringing a dwarf to the market was almost like having a truckload of discount coupons. It could even be used for all the stores in the market. Moreover, the vendors would deal with them with honesty, selling them genuine goods at a fair price. Eugene did not reject Jonah’s request but he privately talked to Suo Fei just as they were about to head to the market. He slipped a piece of paper to Suo Fei and told him, “I’ve listed down some rare materials. If you are lucky enough to come across them, do your best to gather them.” Suo Fei was surprised. He flipped the paper open and was suddenly astonished after taking a quick glance. The materials were not only rare, they were also materials of the highest grade. It was something that could only be encountered by chance. Eugene paused for a moment before continuing, “The divine artifact has not been fully activated and two-thirds of its power is still sealed. If you can gather all these materials, I can try to fully activate it.” This sentence shocked Suo Fei. It was not unusual for Eugene to know the secret of Asura Blade. Rather, it would be strange if a grandmaster at the level of a Craftsman God did not know about it. However, Eugene actually revealed that the power of Asura Blade had not been fully activated and that no less than two-thirds of its power was still hidden. What did this mean? There was no one who would know more than Suo Fei, who had almost cleared the game, what this meant. Samael was already able to conquer Yalance’s every nook and cranny with just a third of its power. If it was fully activated, wouldn’t he be even more heaven-defying? A thought suddenly crossed Suo Fei’s mind. If—if he could really activate the Asura Blade, then Samael’s ability would be tripled. By then, simply no one in Yalance could threaten him. In that case, it would be almost impossible for Samael to fall into a situation where his HP nears zero. As such, wouldn’t it be unlikely for his crazy Berserk mode to be incited? As long as Samael’s sense of reason remained, Suo Fei believed that Samael would not kill the innocent. With this thought, Suo Fei tightly gripped the paper and solemnly told Eugene, “Thank you.” Eugene said with a sigh, “Power is always a double-edged sword. You should think about it clearly.” *** In a dark gloomy room, intricate silver lines intertwined with each other. It resembled the most ancient form of enchantment, enshrouding it in mystery. A black-robed man could be seen sitting in the center, where the sole source of light in the room was. Shining light purple eyes could be seen under his robe, so unique that it could not be ignored. A transparent round bead was in his hand. He intently stared at the myriad of colours rotating within it. After a while, he let out a slight smile and spoke, “It turned out to be these nine materials.” Shockingly, it showed the content of the slip of paper in Suo Fei’s hand. “Let me help you out then.” The author has something to say: So, I still obligingly updated. Isn’t this chapter a little bit sweet? Of course, it’s interesting for the abuse to come after the sweetness. 【Hold up, what are you talking about?!】 The Goblins’ trading market was situated at the northern border of the Dwarven territory. It was initially a forest. At first, Goblins had to scale mountains and ford streams to trade with the Dwarves. Since then, the place went through earth-shattering changes. The Goblins had always kept a low profile but everyone could imagine how rich they were. They always relied on their outstanding business sense and strong ability to protect themselves to safely deal with all races. After they started trading with the Dwarves, this forest had been continuously expanding until it eventually became this large trading market renowned in Yalance. This trading market was known as Benesse City, named after the first goblin who traded with the Dwarves long ago. To commemorate this historically significant first transaction, the built city was named after him. Although the Dwarven territory was right next to Benesse, they must traverse a vast distance to cross the entire territory. If they walked, it might take them seven or eight days to reach the market. Therefore, they would need to ride a mount to go to Benesse. In Yalance, horses were the most commonly used mount. However, most of the people who had the status and capability would buy tamed ferocious beasts as mounts. The first reason was that they were of high quality. Secondly, they could also protect their owners. Of course, another one of the reasons was that they would be more eye-catching than horses. Bird-type ferocious beasts that are capable of flying were the most sought-after mounts of the highest grade. They could fly at high altitudes and see far ahead. They could even throw out magic spells. Such a tamed ferocious beast was considered as the “Ferrari” of mounts. The relationship between the master and the tamed ferocious beast was usually maintained by a contract. Under these circumstances, they would be called tamed beasts. They were like an animal that has no fangs hence the word ‘ferocious’ would not be applicable to them anymore. Moreover, it was difficult to arrange a place to keep them due to their huge physique. Hence, more astute Tamers specially came up with a restraining contract. The ferocious beasts’ size would shrink upon the request of their owner, resembling the appearance of a cub. The best tamed beasts could both adorably sell meng and look eye-catchingly impressive. As such, they were the best choice to hook-up with someone whether one is at home or out travelling. Therefore, just as Samael and Suo Fei were about to leave for Benesse City, the three dwarves of the Eugene family expectantly turned their gazes towards the yawning little cub that had eaten to its heart’s content. Little cub: What are you guys trying to do, looking at me like that?! Suo Fei immediately realised what they were thinking. He looked at the small cub that was only as big as two palms and stated, “It’s not a mount.” Jonah was surprised for a moment before disappointedly asking, “It isn’t?” Little cub: Stupid dwarf! You actually thought that this divine beast is that sort of inferior ferocious beast! I’m a divine beast but, f**k, this divine beast will not tell you! Evelyn looked at the little cub and asked, “What’s the use of it? Is it a protector beast?” Suo Fei recalled that ever since he met the little cub, he speculated it several times, desperately wanting to discover its skills. Unfortunately, until now, it had disclosed nothing apart from being able to eat a lot. However, Suo Fei refused to lose even if his cub was lacking. So, he thickened his face and praised it, “He is clever, cute and has smooth fur.” Evelyn, who had been devotedly sharp-tongued for the past hundred years, added: “Also a glutton, a sloth and a loudmouth.” Suo Fei couldn’t refute. However, Suo Fei patted the little cub’s head and smilingly spoke, “He has saved me numerous times and I’m very grateful to him no matter what.” Evelyn did not refute him anymore. Little cub: QAQ, you...; you fouled. Speaking of mounts, Suo Fei looked at Samael. He had cleared the entire game but Samael had never adopted any cute pets, even more so a mount. Although he was surrounded by many lil’ shous who would always sell meng to him, but a shou is not a beast. From a business perspective, the game developers should have given him one or two that can adorably sell meng. However, the ultimate gong didn’t have any from start to finish. In the end, Eugene generously lent his own domesticated beast, a Three-headed Hound. Its appearance could be deduced from its name. As its name implied, it had a very fierce appearance even when it is in its cub form. It was absolutely a manly man’s mount whose cuteness level is at a negative value. However, Eugene loved it to the bottom of his heart and felt extremely reluctant to let it go out. It was apparent that Jonah had long coveted the mount as he looked at the three-headed dog with sparkling eyes. On the other hand, Evelyn frowned and stopped him, “Grandpa, you should let Sansan stay at home, it is your protector beast.” The meaning of this sentence was obvious: the dwarf was worried about his grandpa’s safety. The slow-witted Jonah also realised it in hindsight. Instead, Eugene waved his hand dismissively, “Does it really matter? I’m in the Dwarven territory. If I don’t go out, who can mess with me?” With this, he activated the Three-headed Hound. What he said was right thus Evelyn and Jonah no longer insisted. Eugene would be safe as long as he did not leave the Dwarven territory hence they need not worry too much. The two dwarves excitedly climbed onto the Three-headed Hound and hurriedly asked Suo Fei to climb up. Suo Fei was just about to climb up when Samael grabbed his wrist. Suo Fei confusedly turned to look at him. Samael did not return his gaze but instead said to the dwarves, “You guys go ahead. Let’s meet up outside the gate of Benesse City.” Suo Fei was confused. <i>If the dwarves left together with the Three-headed Hound, they would not have a mount. So, how could they get there?</i>  Jonah also thought of this problem. He was just about to ask when Evelyn interrupted him with an affirmation, “Okay, see you at the gate.” With that, he prompted the Three-hounded Hound and departed. Suo Fei was stunned. <i>He wouldn’t actually let me walk all the way, would he? Bro, his legs would break if he actually walked okay?</i>  “Come, let’s also head out.” Samael said to Suo Fei. Suo Fei truly had no choice. The mount already ran away. It was virtually impossible if he wanted not to go on foot. Sigh, I’m so miserab–<i>E-eh? Eh?!</i>  Suo Fei surprisingly felt something light wrap around his waist, then his feet were lifted off the ground. The next moment, Samael lifted his entire body by the waist. Suo Fei felt weak. What is up with this situation? Samael looked down at him and whispered, “Don’t move.” Suo Fei also wanted to say something but unfortunately lost the chance. Samael held him and began moving upwards. <i>This scene is so f**king familiar. Ahhhh! In the Knuhl Forest, in order to avoid the miasma, wasn’t he also princess-carried?</i>  <i>But at that time, there were only two of them in the forest. No one else saw them. Even if he was princess-carried, it was</i><i>daijoubu. But they are in the Dwarven territory now! It’s extremely freaking embarrassing, okay!</i>  At this instant, Suo Fei immediately realised why Samael didn’t have a mount. He didn’t need one at all, okay. What mount could compare to him? Furthermore, in a BL game, Samael moving at breakneck speed while princess-carrying a lil’ shous was simply a justified way of getting closer to them and madly increasing their favourability. At this moment, Suo Fei felt that he had realized the intention of the game developers. <i>Ultimate gong-kun, don’t bless me too much with your hook-up skills!</i>  <i>Also, don’t use me as a guinea pig!</i>  The two sped off and the little cub followed them closely. At this very moment, it held its head up high with pride. Behold this divine beast’s might! The trio who travelled without a mount safely arrived at Benesse City before the dwarves. They had agreed to meet up outside the gate, thus Suo Fei and his group waited in that area. Suo Fei took advantage of this time to change the eye colour of Samael and him using the only magic he knew. Samael’s eyes turned into black which was a distinguishing characteristic of ordinary Demons whereas Suo Fei’s eyes turned into royal blue which was common for ordinary Elves. This would make them less conspicuous in Benesse City’s crowd of different races. Suo Fei thought that if his ability was high enough, he could even make Samael look uglier so that they would be even less conspicuous. Unfortunately, his inadequate magic skill was beyond embarrassing. As expected, I still have to find an opportunity to seriously improve and practice his magic. Samael is a demon and Demons inherently reject all types of magic except black magic. Black magic advocates destruction and annihilation and thus, Demons could not practice any ordinary magic spells. When Suo Fei thought of this, he suddenly felt that if he worked hard, he could become valuable! After all, the Elves were the only race in Yalance who could easily learn magic. Not long after, the dwarves finally arrived. Surprisingly, the little thing did not curiously ask how Samael arrived earlier than them. Suo Fei was only too glad to be spared from giving an explanation. If it was him who dashed all the way while carrying Samael, he might have considered explaining. But it was the opposite...; Quickly ‘obliviate’ba! Benesse City had a layered structure. The lowest layer was a free trade area where anyone could set up a market stall as long as they paid certain taxes. There was no restriction on what was being sold. Nobody would care even if you put up a withered branch for sale as long as you had the ability to sell it. The middle layer was the hub for affluent traders. This was not confined to Goblins alone. Although most of them were goblins, there were still a handful of Humans whose families had established a name for themselves. The quality of the products of the middle layer was relatively high thus the entry requirement was also high. Just like a specialty store in a shopping mall, the shops were exquisite and the items for sale were neatly categorised. However, one must prove their wealth in order to enter. As for how to prove it, the crudest and simplest way was to bring boxes of gold coins. The upper layer of Benesse City was the most luxurious and exorbitant place in the whole Yalance. There, it was common to see Oracle Celestials, Primeval Demons as well as the upper class of all races. At the same time, many of the things being traded in this place were not valued by money alone. The sellers also look at the customer’s status and power. Therefore, for some of the best items, what was more important was whether one could hold on to it after obtaining it. Suo Fei’s scheming mind churned. He initially wanted to stroll around the whole lower layer of Benesse to scour out gold buried in coal. That’s right, he wanted to extract those gold and take them to Benesse’s upper layer to deceive people. As for how to enter the upper layer, hehe. As long as ultimate gong-kun revealed his true identity of being a primeval demon, he would definitely receive the privilege of entering the premise. Of course, before that, he needed to purchase a large amount of beast blood first. Not only so that Samael would have enough to drink, but also for assurance. After stocking up his interspatial bag full, let’s see if anyone can still make him lose a lot of blood! Laozi can drown them with blood! With such a lofty ambition, Suo Fei entered Benesse City but a loud noise attracted his attention. Blocking the main road into the city, a group of Humans wearing the same uniform stood in a circle. They laughingly teased the person they were surrounding, “Beauty, it’d be more dangerous for you to be alone. It would be better to join us. “ Suo Fei followed their line of sight, landing on a unique colour. It was dazzling, like a violet that is in full bloom. Yalance had a western setting, and there were many kinds of races. The races had different eye colour, however light purple was rare. Although it was not a characteristic of any race, this rare characteristic represented a few people. There was one such person in Suo Fei’s memory. His name was Emia who was a Sylph. Although he was not someone of royal lineage, his status was high. Every hundred years, a Seer would be born in the Sylph race. They believed that the Seer’s soul is immortal and that they would reincarnate every generation. Although they were so weak that they could not even withstand a single blow, they had the ability to foretell the future. Because of this ability, they were well-protected by the Sylphs. They were worshipped by their race, and the whole Yalance was filled with curiosity about them. Naturally, this curiosity caused a lot of ambitious people to try to control them. However, Seers would lose their prophetic ability if they were forced. Then, their body would collapse and fall into reincarnation. The person who forced the Seer would suffer from an extremely cruel curse for a lifetime. As for what the curse would be, it differed every time. Emia was exactly the Sylph race’s Seer that would only appear every hundred years. He had beautiful, long light purple hair. He had a bewitching appearance unique to Sylphs. Most Sylphs were asexual, thus their beauty stood out from the crowd. If the Celestials were noble and holy, the Elves were gorgeous and delicate, and the Demons were overbearing and wild, then the Sylphs were bewitching and charming. An indescribable charm surrounded their every move. Their eyes would droop down when they smile, their tender and loving gaze enticing anyone. The Seer of the Sylph race, Emia, was a living example of an enchantress. His face may not be as exquisite as Manzy’s, but his temperament was definitely enough to set off the hormones of any male. When Suo Fei first met Emia when he was playing a game, his hormone level shot up unwaveringly. How could he be worthy of his ‘ultimate gong’ title if he didn’t take such an enchantress into his harem! Unfortunately...; Emia was not a conquerable character! Such a beautiful enchantress that was emitting a seductive aura in all directions was actually not a conquerable character. This is impossible, Suo Fei thought at that time. Suo Fei refused to believe it and wanted to forcibly conquer him. Then a tragic matter happened. Although the forced Emia was as bewitching as before, he lost his prophetic ability. Then, his body functions started to gradually decline and he eventually died. Suo Fei only found out after Emia’s death that he would immediately receive a curse after forcing him. The name of the curse was straightforward: Emia’s Curse. Afterwards...; Suo Fei spat out three litres of blood in frustration. The curse he arbitrarily got was a lifetime of impotency! I bought a lot of watches last year! I also mowed a lot of grass! (Yes, this is an upgraded version of ‘I bought a watch last year and ‘I mowed the grass’.) Suo Fei looked at the cruel “debuff” in his status bar and utterly collapsed. Is there anything more tragic than this? He is a dignified ultimate gong playing a highly explicit BL game. But, he was actually impotent for life! Then what is he playing for? Watch a bunch of peerless lil’ shous have fun and look on in despair? What was even more tragic was that when he was forcing Emia, he detestably didn’t save the game file, so he could only load the game to the last save file. It was truly, exceedingly tragic! Therefore, even though Emia was good-looking, he was not the least bit interested. He was a pit, a bottomless pit unparalleled in this world. Anyone who fell into this pit would be screwed over ceaselessly until death. If you assumed that the entanglement between Emia and him had ended with this matter, then you’re really underestimating this game’s capability! Just when Suo Fei was about to forget this embarrassing past of being cursed with impotence, game-kun became mischievous once again. When Suo Fei was conquering the lil’ shou of the Dwarves, he followed the directions to Benesse City to find the highest grade items to hoodwink the dwarf lil’ shou. The search process was a puzzle game which made Suo Fei want to smash the mouse. It relied on his IQ level and Suo Fei really didn’t want to waste time, so he just asked Miss Baidu for a walkthrough and was fortunate to find tips from an expert. It turned out that there were a few places in Benesse’s lower layer that would sell high-grade items at extremely low prices. This was simply a shortcut to getting rich. Suo Fei minutely jotted it down and hurriedly arrived at Benesse City, but unexpectedly encountered Emia. The scene was similar to what was in front of him at this moment. Even if he changed his appearance, the Sylph Seer was still so attractive that others simply could not stop their raging hormones. Thus, a gang of wretched Humans encircled him. When Suo Fei was playing the game, he was momentarily kind-hearted, thinking that he had f**ked Emia to death (fog) so he somewhat could not bear seeing him being surrounded. Like a god that descended, he easily finished off the miniscule humans and saved Emia. Emia had good manners and thanked him profusely but he still left in a hurry. Suo Fei didn’t think too much about it and only thought that he had a lucky encounter. He surmised that he had triggered a hidden storyline which could increase Emia’s favourability and allow him to conquer Emia. After imagining such a situation, he rushed to the few places that were mentioned in the walkthrough, wanting to quickly acquire the items and make a fortune. Who would have thought that after dashing to those few stalls, he could not find any sign of those few items. It would have been fine if it was only once or twice. However, all of the four places actually claimed that they didn’t have the items! What kind of scenario is this? Suo Fei was furious. He hurriedly went to Miss Baidu again and saw a post. The OP wrote a shocking information in bright red: If you meet Emia in Benesse, don’t ever rescue him!!! Suo Fei was puzzled. Other people who read the post were also puzzled. Thus, there was a long list of replies asking why. Suo Fei had to load the next page to see the OP’s reply. Then, he could have opened a watch shop last year! (yes, this is the update v2.0 of ‘I bought a watch last year’) <i>Emia is such a cheater! Shouldn’t a Seer be like a celestial being who never involved himself in worldly affairs? However, this scum actually used his prophetic ability to foresee the location of the treasures and freaking went to the market of Benesse City’s lower layer! This is cheating, for sure! You are an npc but you still steal treasures from players!</i>  <i>Just how perverted are these damn game developers? What are all these deceitful storylines?</i>  At this moment, Suo Fei was truly in the real world of Yalance and the scene that he had seen in the game appeared once again, filling him with overwhelming emotion. After calming down his raging emotions, he planned to drag Samael and run away. <i>I can’t afford to be slow.</i><i>Must quickly leave first and acquire the treasures while this cheating scum is still being pestered by others or else the treasure would surely disappear without a trace.</i>  Suo Fei’s gaze had been fixed on Emia when he was reminiscing. His gaze was so focused that it was difficult for Samael to not notice. So, Samael followed Suo Fei’s line of sight and saw Emia. His expression darkened in an instant. Suo Fei just happened to snap back to reality at that instant and saw Samael staring at Emia, setting off alarms in his mind. <i>Ultimate gong’s soul, don’t wake up at this time! Don’t be fooled by that guy’s appearance! I’m not stopping you from taking people into your harem but you definitely can’t take this scum in. It’s a trap! If you really jumped into this trap, you would become impotent!</i>  The more he thought, the more anxious he became. In the end, Suo Fei simply placed his hand on Samael’s face and earnestly said, “Don’t look.” This sudden action startled Samael, but he gradually smiled and replied under his breath, “Okay.” Suo Fei was frightened by his stupid and foolish action. <i>Why is the atmosphere extremely like a prime-time idol drama?</i>  He quickly withdrew his hand and tried to remedy the situation by adding, “Y-you shouldn’t approach him!” Samael took his hand and replied, “Okay.” The softness of his low voice stirred something inside Suo Fei. Suo Fei’s brain crashed. <i>This atmosphere is about to be upgraded to a</i><i>Chiung Yao</i><i>drama! Aaaah! This is such a ‘making trouble out of nothing’ x ‘don’t know how to appease his lover’ scene.</i> He wanted to explain his original intention but...; <i>F**K ME. Long time no see, sociophobia-kun. What a timely appearance! But...; </i>C<i>an you control yourself a little?</i>  Suo Fei could not utter a word so he gave up trying. Instead, he relied on his actions and dragged Samael along as he started running in big strides. He acted quickly with a clear purpose so he had already gone to three stalls in the twinkling of an eye and had acquired a worn-out book, tattered clothes, and an interspatial bag that was only the size of a cube. There was only one place left. Suo Fei took a deep breath and, brimming with ambition, he dashed towards the last stall. The seller was a goblin aunt. Her short, round body was unexpectedly well-endowed. She had just set up her stall when Suo Fei impatiently arrived. Goblins were inherently eloquent. Seeing Suo Fei’s manner, she immediately greeted him and boasted to high heavens about her stall’s items. Although her stall was only located in the lower layer of Benesse City, she gave the impression that you would miss out on high-quality goods if you didn’t buy from her. Suo Fei ignored the long row of dazzling goldware but instead picked up the broken sword at the corner and asked its price. The goblin aunt obviously didn’t expect that someone would still want the useless junk. Although goblins were unscrupulous profiteers, the aunt was still a profiteer that had her own bottom line. Looking at the boy’s adorably fair and delicate appearance, she was somewhat reluctant to dupe him too much. Thus, she prattled on and tried to change Suo Fei’s mind by recommending a golden longsword. Suo Fei did not concur and continued to hold onto the broken sword. In the end, the goblin aunt had no choice but to cheat him and sell the thing that she originally wanted to throw away. They had just completed their transaction when Suo Fei saw Emia hurrying over. He quickly put everything into his interspatial bag. Then, he squared his shoulders and put on his best front as if he was meeting his enemy. Although Emia was out of breath, his beautiful appearance still caught the eyes of others. He had already made his appearance less outstanding, but even so, the way he stopped to catch his breath still caused people to be entranced. He looked at Suo Fei. His limpid eyes were full of passion as he spoke, “Elf, can you resell the iron sword that you bought just now to me? I’ll pay you twice the price.” Suo Fei was extremely mirthful. <i>Cheater, you had it coming!</i>  <i>Twice the price? So enticing, ne. Who are you trying to deceive? Do you really think that laozi can’t determine whether a good is valuable or not?</i>  Suo Fei was unmoved and he coldly stared at Emia. At this moment, Emia realised that he had encountered an expert. He retracted his light-hearted appearance and became serious, “Elf, I really need it. Name me your price.” Suo Fei didn’t want to reply. He truly didn’t want to be further involved with Emia and it would have been better if they never met. However, Emia’s words at this moment completely changed his mind. “I can trade it with the Brewmoon Springwater and the Sky Crane Silk!” Suo Fei was stunned. The broken sword was indeed a treasure as there was a rare and expensive tenth-grade material hidden inside it. The two materials that Emia wanted to trade were also tenth-grade materials which were just as rare and expensive. More importantly, these two materials were on the list of materials that Eugene had asked him to gather! Now, two of them are within his reach! It turned out to be easier than he had expected. For fear of Emia going back on his words, Suo Fei immediately took out the broken sword. Emia also took out a jade bottle and a cloth bag. Suo Fei was just about to hand it over when Samael, who had been keeping his silence, finally spoke, “Wait, buy a material appraiser first.” Suo Fei froze and a jolt of realisation coursed through him. <i>Oh crap!</i> ​​He almost made another blunder. He was too hasty to trade with Emia that Emia could have cheated him! The material appraiser was a small instrument made by the dwarves which could accurately identify the grade and name of materials. This thing was not cheap, but it was necessary for large transactions. Emia also agreed. Actually, Emia already had a material appraiser but he did not take it out to show his sincerity. If they used his appraiser, who would have known if he had tampered with it or not? Suo Fei spent five thousand gold coins to buy the appraiser. Although his heart ached to spend that much money, it was merely a drop in the ocean when compared with the tenth-grade materials that were in front of him. The material appraiser was only the size of a palm. It only needed to touch the material and the result would be determined in a few minutes. Suo Fei nervously stuck the appraiser to the jade bottle and the cloth bag. They quietly waited for a while before the appraiser showed the results. Brewmoon Springwater, Tenth-grade Water-type Material. Sky Crane Silk, Tenth-grade Wood-type material. After verifying the authenticity of the materials, Suo Fei finally completed his trade with Emia. Suo Fei was overjoyed to obtain the two materials with such ease, so much so that his eyes were much friendlier when he looked at Emia. After parting ways with Emia, Suo Fei wanted to buy beast blood for Samael next. However, he had just turned around the corner of the road when he saw a familiar figure. That striking silver hair, pointed ears, and a pair of eyes that were changed to crimson. Grantlyn Evans! Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>Mello</strong>‘s donation!~ 1/5 bonus chs down Grantlyn Evans! His cheap father who’s forever good at digging pits for his son! Grantlyn wore a long, black silk robe. It was unadorned except for the collar and sleeves that were lined with silver, perfectly complementing his silver hair which glistened like a waterfall. His eyes were no longer light silver but were a deep crimson instead. It was like blood that couldn’t be erased, giving people a feeling of viciousness. Suo Fei’s eyes blazed with anger. If looks could kill, Grantlyn would have long been riddled with gaping wounds. What a scum father! He caused his son to flee and his wife’s life to be at stake, and yet here he is still wandering around so leisurely! He could actually still be at large after committing such a transgression against his own race? Are all of the Elves dead? Manzy Argoux, what’s the use of you being the strongest Elven warrior?! Suo Fei was furious. The mere thought of Vixanne and the last time he saw her would make his heart twist in pain. Thus, when he saw the root cause of her suffering once again, he gnashed his teeth in anger and almost lost his sense of reason. All he wanted to do was to rush up to him and ruthlessly beat him up. It was at this time that Samael gently held his hand, the warmth of his palm calming Suo Fei’s nerves. Grantlyn also saw Suo Fei. He glanced at Suo Fei’s direction. Then, his lips curled up ever so slightly at the corners and his eyes were tinged with ice-cold mockery. Suo Fei was instantly riled up. <i>F**k, my heart would truly be ill at ease if I didn’t settle old scores with this scum.</i> However, he knew that he could not risk being impulsive at this moment. Grantlyn wasn’t alone. He walked ahead and there was another person following behind him. It was a dark-skinned man. He looked unfamiliar but his long, narrow eyes were viciously riveted onto Suo Fei. Suo Fei looked at him and realised that the man was one of the black-robed men who had attacked the Elves that day. He had helped Grantlyn slaughter the Elves and had also spoken to him. When the man saw Suo Fei looking at him, he silently mouthed something. Suo Fei couldn’t understand as he could not lip-read, but Samael dangerously narrowed his eyes. Suo Fei took a deep breath and finally managed to press down his anger. Samael had yet to recover his fighting strength so they could not afford to be ignorantly impulsive. The most imperative matter at the moment was to obtain beast blood. As if he didn’t know these two people, he calmly looked away and turned to leave together with Samael. It was more time-consuming to buy special items in Benesse’s lower layer as each stall was run by only one person. Furthermore, the quantity of an item was usually relatively small thus if one wanted to purchase in bulk, they would have to ask the stalls one by one, which was truly troublesome. Therefore, it would save him time to directly go to Benesse’s middle layer. However, the items would also be relatively more expensive. Suo Fei still had some money at hand so he didn’t want to continue wasting time in the lower layer and thus proposed to stroll around the middle layer. Jonah and Evelyn were still interested in looking around the lower layer. Hence, Suo Fei decided to let them stay and arranged a time to meet up with them at the city gate. Then, he took the lift together with Samael and went to the middle layer. Compared with the bustling lower layer, the middle layer was quieter. Although there were still a lot of people, the scene changed from scattered stalls to orderly interspersed shops, improving the overall ambience of the place. It was also extremely well-planned. The entire middle layer was divided into several sections, such as the raw materials section, auxiliary materials section, equipment section, and many more. Each section was also detailedly divided into sub-sections, thus enabling customers who had come to purchase items to easily find what they wanted. This allowed them to save time and made shopping more convenient for them. Although the price was more expensive than the lower layer, it was worth it considering the trouble-free experience that came with it. The brief meeting with Grantlyn had ruined Suo Fei’s mood. However, his still-sour mood slightly lifted when he was greeted by the sight of the middle layer. He followed the signs to the raw materials section and then went to the shop that sold beast blood. Antonio was a Beastkin healer. This pairing was considered as the most unpopular out of all the unpopular pairings in Yalance. Most of the Beastkins had a straightforward and easy-going personality. They revere strength and love fighting. They didn’t like to pay attention to detail, thus Beastkins who had professions such as a healer could be counted with one’s fingers. Nevertheless, this did not mean that Beastkins ostracised healers. On the contrary, Beastkins were very protective of them. They believed that Beastkins who chose to become healers of their own accord were doing a contribution to their own race. They felt that those Beastkins gave up on their own dreams in order to serve their motherland, which was a behaviour that deserved respect. Unfortunately, the innate disposition of the Beastkin race deemed them unsuitable to be a healer. Even though it was Antonio’s passion, it was difficult for him to succeed even after studying diligently for years. If he was unable to prescribe potions, there was no way for him to sell them. He was unable to make money but he still persisted in becoming a healer, this kind of profession that requires a lot of money. Thus, he had to find new ways of making money. Using what he had accumulated for the past few years, he set up a shop in Benesse’s middle layer. He wanted to earn money by selling raw materials in order to continue studying potions. Recently, he bought beast blood in large quantities at a very low price in the lower layer of Benesse. Although Antonio knew that the beast blood was not in great demand, he felt that the low price was worth the risk. Thus, he bought all of them at once. Then, he felt regret after buying them. Beast blood had a short shelf life and he could not store all of them in his low-quality interspatial bag. Furthermore, he had such a large quantity that it was simply unrealistic to be able to sell them quickly. Although he would not lose much even if he threw the beast blood away, he could not overcome the mental hurdle. He felt that it would be too wasteful and regrettable. Under such circumstances, when Suo Fei and Samael came to his store and offered to buy beast blood, Antonio’s eyes shone in delight and he attentively received them. For some reason, Suo Fei had always had a good impression of the Beastkins. Therefore, at this moment, when he saw the young beastkin healer, Suo Fei immediately felt well-disposed towards him. Suo Fei’s impression of him improved even further when Antonio showed him a huge tank filled with beast blood. He immediately conveyed, “I’ll buy all of these. Just name your price.” Antonio didn’t expect that the Elf would buy all of them. He only paid a hundred gold coins for the beast blood. He was already happy that he was able to sell them off so he didn’t want to ask for a sky-high price. He only marked up the price slightly, “A hundred twenty gold coins will do. “ Suo Fei was shocked. A hundred and twenty gold coins? That’s too cheap! Especially in Benesse’s middle layer, this place where money is spent like it’s water. Antonio stared at him in silence. He thought that Suo Fei was reluctant to buy it so he hurriedly added, “The beast blood is extremely pure but it doesn’t have much use so it has been here for a while. I also think...;” “Three hundred gold coins.” Samael suddenly interrupted Antonio. Antonio looked at the demon in surprise. Beastkins had burly physiques but they were not tall. Thus, he had to look up to make eye contact with the tall demon. Samael looked at him and said, “I’ll pay you three hundred gold coins for the beast blood.” He paused before continuing, “I will also pay you fifty thousand gold coins in advance. Buy as much beast blood as you can. I will buy everything as long as the purity is greater than this beast blood. You can decide on the price. “ Antonio felt as if...; a gold bar fell from the sky and landed on his head! Samael took out a rectangular pouch and passed it to Suo Fei. Suo Fei was caught unaware so he opened it before immediately closing it. It was so bright that it blinded his titanium alloy dog eyes. It was filled with shining, shimmering gold coins! <i>How could I have not known that this person is a moving treasure trove? Oh my. Dage, you are too secretive.</i>  Holding the bag, Suo Fei understood what Samael wanted him to do. It seemed like he wanted him to use it for payment. However, Suo Fei had already planned long ago. Although fifty thousand gold coins might be a huge sum, it still paled in comparison to what he could give. He had taken Samael’s Frostflame Beast before. Hence, he needed to compensate Samael for it at this moment. He felt that it was his obligation to help Samael acquire beast blood. Therefore, he passed the bag back to Samael, “I have money. I will pay.” “I know,” Samael looked at Suo Fei and continued, “Keep it for me.” Suo Fei: ...;...; Great. Sociophobia, this <i>tsundere</i>, would always come whenever he gets flustered. Suo Fei stood tongue-tied and didn’t make a sound. Samael tightly held his hand, moved closer and asked in a whisper, “Didn’t you say that you’ll never leave me?” So close. Suo Fei could even see Samael’s eyelashes clearly. His brain suddenly malfunctioned and he was wholly absorbed in the important task of counting Samael’s eyelashes...; As Samael asked a question, he nodded by habit. When Samael saw him nod in agreement, he pulled away slightly and told him, “Alright, go and pay for me. I’m penniless right now.” Suo Fei continued nodding. It wasn’t until he entered the inner room with Antonio that he recovered from his daze.<i> Can someone explain to me why he would give me all his money just because I said that I would never leave him</i><i>?</i>  <i>Whose language teacher is at fault?</i>  At this moment, the beastkin Antonio sighed and said, “Your lover treats you well.” Then he sighed again before he continued despondently, “When can I find someone who can entrust his entire wealth to me?” Suo Fei was petrified. When Suo Fei and Antonio entered the inner room, Samael’s warm expression cooled into iciness. There was no one outside the door, but he stared straight at a spot with his left hand on his waist. “Don’t. I don’t bear any ill will.” A voice suddenly rang out, and a figure appeared. His light purple hair flowed gently behind him. Emia removed his disguise, revealing his original appearance. His long and narrow phoenix eyes were raised slightly upwards and his thin lips were a natural shade of red. A hint of a smile could be seen in his eyes, filled with elegance and charm. It was exactly the person who Suo Fei claimed was a cheating Seer. Samael expressionlessly stared at him and Emia exaggeratedly waved his hand and spoke, “I dare not offend you. I’ve been following you merely because I wanted to have a word with you.” “I don’t know you,” Samael replied. The implication was that they were strangers to one another, thus there was nothing to say between them. It was an outright refusal. Nevertheless, Emia wasn’t angry. He merely hummed in response before continuing, “I’m just entrusted by someone to convey something to you.” “Hey hey, don’t look at me like that. I’ll immediately leave after saying it. I can’t beat you in a fight.” Emia took a deep breath. Then, his face turned serious as he spoke out a foreign but profound language. His pleasant voice turned into a low and husky voice that seemed to reverberate endlessly from ancient times. It wasn’t the common language of Yalance. Even Samael, who could speak the languages of all the races, had to strain his ears to catch the words. When Emia completed his task, he breathed a sigh of relief and resumed the appearance of an enchantress and bid farewell, “Okay then, see you when I see you.” After speaking, he slipped away faster than a rabbit. At this moment, Suo Fei came out after suffering from all kinds of embarrassment. He had signed a contract with Antonio and had paid gold coins in advance according to their agreement. He understood Samael’s intentions. Benesse City was the largest trading market in Yalance. If they had someone like Antonio to gather beast blood for them, it would save them a lot of trouble. It was worth it even if they had to spend a huge amount of money. Antonio was also pleased with their transaction. He was not good at doing business. He was substandard when compared to those talented goblins. The meager profits he earned was barely enough to sustain him. But now, Samael had paid him fifty thousand gold coins in advance. Moreover, he only needed to buy beast blood, this kind of unpopular material. It was truly the case of a good thing falling into his lap. It might be difficult to find beast blood that was as cheap as the one he previously bought, but he could easily purchase beast blood at their original price. In this way, he could save a lot of time and have enough money to study potions. This job suited him perfectly. Therefore, when he heard that Suo Fei was going to the upper layer of the city of Benesse, he earnestly showed them the passageway that was only known to sellers. The upper layer of Benesse City only allowed a certain number of customers inside. One had to obediently line up regardless of their status. Naturally, people were not lined up as if they were buying a movie ticket. There was an assigned rest area for people to wait in. The luxurious and exquisite furnishings naturally would not infuriate those who are waiting. However, Antonio had lived in Benesse for a long time. Thus, he knew of another way to enter the upper layer. He temporarily closed his store and brought Samael and Suo Fei to the upper layer of Benesse. The upper layer of Benesse could be likened to the peak of a pyramid. The place was much smaller than the lower layer and the middle layer, but its elegance was also dozens of times greater. The ornaments that greeted his eyes were not blindingly extravagant. On the contrary, they exuded an elegance that was reflected by the countless details that attract the viewer’s eyes. Suo Fei and Samael had resumed their original appearance. Antonio left after bringing them to the upper layer. Suo Fei and Samael had only walked for a short while when a goblin came up to them and respectfully asked, “Excuse me, is Your Excellency surnamed Evans?” Suo Fei was shocked. Why does this goblin know who I am? The goblin was still gazing at him. Suo Fei nodded in agreement, “Yes.” The goblin gave Suo Fei the two jade tokens in his hand. Suo Fei lowered his head to look at it. The surface of the jade token was carved with a name, ‘Grantlyn Evans’. Suo Fei’s eyes narrowed into slits and his confusion was instantly cleared up. There were very few silver-eyed Pureblood elves in itself. Furthermore, both of them were being accompanied by a demon to the upper layer of Benesse at the same time. That person must have made an appointment...; What a wonderful coincidence. The author has something to say: How is it that nobody figured out that Emia was the mysterious (cheating) person (scum) who exposed his face and touched the crystal ball at the end of the chapter 32? Why do people assume that it’s Manzy? Manzy clearly has silver eyes. Emia has light purple eyes and so does the mysterious person. Also, this color is extremely rare. I emphasised it so many times, ying ying ying. It turned out that the goblin was referring to Grantlyn Evans. Since Suo Fei and Samael took Antonio’s shortcut, they arrived at the upper layer before Grantlyn. The goblin who received them must have not seen Grantlyn Evans before. However, Pureblood elves had easily recognisable features. On top of that, Grantlyn was being accompanied by a demon and so was Suo Fei. It was for these reasons that the goblin assumed that Suo Fei is Grantlyn. Grantlyn had obviously made an appointment which was why the goblin had prepared a jade token for him. The jade token served as proof of identity that would allow one to enter a designated private room. Fortunately, Suo Fei knew the rules. Otherwise, he would be unable to do anything with the jade token even if he accepted it. Grantlyn’s jade token was light green. A green jade token was for those who are selling items. Those who are participating in an auction would receive a dark green jade token. A light green jade token was for those who have made an appointment for trading. The upper layer of Benesse had a special feature. The Goblins had spent a large portion of their wealth to create a near-invincible protective barrier for Benesse City. The lower layer had the weakest protection followed by the middle layer. The protection for the upper layer, however, was top-notch. No matter how high one’s attack damage was, their power would still be restrained in the upper layer. This ensured an impartial and safe trading platform. Suo Fei looked at the light green jade token in his hand, a tad of curiosity coursing through him. <i>I wonder what item Grantlyn wants to trade for.</i> Then he thought of the “safety net” of the upper layer of Benesse and suddenly felt that it would be regrettable if he did not seize this heaven-sent opportunity. The front of the jade token had the bearer’s name while the back had the private room’s number. The goblin left after giving the jade token to Suo Fei. Suo Fei then turned to Samael and suggested, “Let’s go to the private room first, alright?” Samael seemed a bit preoccupied. It was only after Suo Fei had repeated himself that Samael finally looked at Suo Fei and agreed, “Okay.” Suo Fei frowned. Samael had been in a trance ever since they had left Antonio’s shop. He couldn’t help but ask, “What’s the matter?” Samael paused before answering, “Nothing.” However, his eyes were evasive. Suo Fei frowned. Samael appeared fine, but he seemed to have something on his mind. Suo Fei was worried but Samael refused to divulge anything. He was also not skilled in pumping someone for information, so he didn’t mention it again. They turned a corner and walked a short distance before finally arriving at Grantlyn’s private room. Suo Fei tapped the jade token against the door and it opened. Suo Fei was just about to enter when Samael suddenly pulled his hand and whispered, “There’s someone inside.” Suo Fei was shocked, subconsciously releasing his hold on the door. After a moment of thought, he cast a spell, changing his appearance into Grantlyn’s and changing Samael’s into the dark-skinned demon’s appearance. Benesse would block all attack damage, but it would not block spells that had no attack damage which was why Suo Fei was able to cast the spell successfully. After ensuring that everything was in order, Suo Fei pushed the door open and walked in. There was a round carpet in the centre of the room that was completely made of beast fur. It was truly interesting and unique. There was a person sitting on the middle of the carpet. It was a human. Suo Fei narrowed his eyes. When he caught sight of the human’s appearance, relevant information swiftly popped up in his head. The name of the human was Gowers Carter, one of the three leaders who was ordained together with Aryan. Suo Fei had been acquainted with only two humans in the game. One was Aryan and the other was Gowers. Aryan was the capture target in the Human race, while Gowers was that cannon fodder-<i>kun</i> that must exist in all kinds of works. Gowers was a small boss whom Suo Fei was up against when he was conquering Aryan. The Humans had three main cities which were ruled by three leaders. They were fearful of each other, but at the same time, they also wanted to seize each other’s territory. The other races lived in unity, whereas the leaders of the Humans never stopped thinking of uniting their race. Among the three leaders, Aryan was the least prestigious. He had founded Mauer City on his own and had gained a firm foothold alongside the other two cities. But in fact, the fighting strength of Mauer City was still relatively weak. Gowers had long eyed Mauer City with greed. He came from a noble background, his family being one of the Great Clans of the Humans that had been around for a long time. He had always looked down on Aryan and had ridiculed Aryan ceaselessly. He had also launched numerous attacks on Mauer City, but Aryan would always ward him off. When Suo Fei was conquering Aryan, Gowers came to provoke Aryan once again. In order to increase his favourability, Suo Fei naturally spared no effort to help Aryan. He completely obliterated Gower’s existence. While he was at it, he also assimilated Carter City into Mauer City’s territory. As he thought back of the time when he was playing the game, Suo Fei deeply felt that he had been exploited by Aryan. <i>F**k. It’s an erotic game! Is it really necessary to flesh out the characters?!</i>  He felt disgusted thinking about how Aryan pretended to be a weak and delicate white flower to win people’s sympathy in the game. Seeing Gowers again, Suo Fei wished that he could load the game file and help Gowers by killing Aryan. Unfortunately...; his game files had been f**king wiped clean. He’s not in the game anymore! When Gowers saw someone entering, he immediately stood up. His coat was made of exquisite velvet and was embellished with dazzling gems. His bootcut pants were the same colour as his coat, but the leather boots he was wearing were pure black. His attire made him appear tall and handsome, but his expression revealed a slight unease. Upon seeing ‘Grantlyn’, he immediately inquired, “I brought what you wanted. Are you confident that you can do what you have promised?” This question had revealed a lot of information. Suo Fei narrowed his eyes, feeling certain that he had come across a good fortune. Gowers’ IQ was truly not at the same level as Aryan’s. Gowers had succeeded his father’s position, but his disposition had not been tempered well. If it wasn’t for his resourcefulness as well as the Carter Clan’s deep-rooted background, he would have already been killed by Aryan long ago. Suo Fei didn’t have to meticulously imitate Grantlyn. In fact, matters such as blood ties couldn’t be concealed. He only needed to change his appearance slightly and the look of indifference was already exactly like Grantlyn. He replied in a deep voice, “If I wasn’t confident, I wouldn’t have shown up here.” Gowers’ eyes lit up upon hearing this and he spoke, “I hope you can do it thoroughly. Don’t kill Baker alone. I want the entire Nelson family to be annihilated.” He paused for a while as a trace of viciousness flashed through his eyes, “Just like Mauer City!” Suo Fei’s expression did not budge but he was scolding him in his heart. He was wondering what it was about but Gowers actually wanted to annihilate another main city of the Humans! <i>What the f**k. I’m taking back my words of helping Gowers in killing Aryan. They are clearly birds of a feather!</i>  ‘Grantlyn’ responded in an ice-cold tone, “It’s a deal. I hope that Your Excellency will not irresponsibly go back on your words. Your item is only worth this much.” Gowers raised his voice, “That artifact has been our Carter family’s inheritance for hundreds of years. You dare say that it’s only worth this much!” ‘Grantlyn’ was unmoved and his voice remained calm, without any fluctuations, “Or...; is it that you want to back out from our deal?” Gowers was stunned. He had already seen how powerful the elf was. This was a heaven-sent opportunity for him. When he thought of his brother who was ready to make trouble, he knew that he had no other option. If he could capture Nelson City, those d*mn old officials would not dare question his ability! The city of Mauer had already been destroyed. If he could take over Nelson City, he would be the only leader who was able to unite the Humans in the past thousands of years! His blood boiled in excitement. This rubbish artifact had been kept underground by the Carter family. It didn’t have any use at all, but now, he could actually unite the Humans by merely trading this thing! There was no better deal than this! Gowers held himself back from rushing forward due to excitement. He looked at ‘Grantlyn’ and asserted, “I want to form a contract with you!” There was a pause as Suo Fei digested Gowers’ words. <i>Sh*t.</i> He thought that this fool could remain foolish until the end so he could easily swindle the human of his artifact. Who would have known that this thing still had a functional brain?! If he formed a contract, he would have to fulfill the content of the contract. Could it be that he truly intended to wipe out the whole Nelson City? <i>Puh-lease! I’m already distressed about wiping out Mauer City. Stop joking around, okay? We are the good guys, not the villains!</i>  At this time, Samael, who had been keeping his silence, answered, “Okay, I’ll form a contract with you.” The stunned Suo Fei quickly turned to Samael. Samael placated him with a glance. As a matter of fact, he wasn’t worried that Samael would agree to annihilate Nelson City. This was because Samael had already bound the Asura Blade with blood. The Asura Blade was so tyrannical that it would not allow its owner to form a contract with any person or item. <i>Wait.</i> A thought suddenly popped into Suo Fei’s head. <i>Could it be a bug? Can this be used unrestrictedly to terminate contracts? Wouldn’t that be such a cheat?</i>  Gowers didn’t care about who of the two would sign the contract with him. In any case, they are part of the same group. As long as they formed the contract, they would surely annihilate Nelson City. After all, what he wanted to sign was a death contract! If they failed to fulfill their part of the contract, they would be cursed until death. He had already prepared the items required to form the contact in advance. After receiving Samael’s assent, he inflicted a cut on his fingertip and allowed his blood to drip into the vessel before handing it to Samael. Suo Fei wanted to stop him but Samael had already made a cut on his skin and also let his blood drip into the vessel. The blood intermixed, activating the spell and thus establishing the contract. Gowers heaved a great sigh of relief as he passed the artifact to Samael. At this moment, the door was suddenly forced open. The person behind the door stood with his back facing the light, his long silver hair fluttering behind him. His exquisite features were contorted with unconcealed anger. He glared at Suo Fei and raged in a deep voice, “My good son, you truly have great prospects.” Suo Fei was not surprised to see someone come. He removed their disguise, revealing their true appearance. Gowers was dumbfounded. He pointed at them in shock and tremblingly asked, “W-what’s going on?” Grantlyn’s gaze fell on Gowers. His eyes were ice-cold, but underneath that thin layer of ice was a bottomless pit of anger, “Fool!” Not long after his words rang out, he raised his hand and attacked Gowers with a spell. The upper layer of Benesse had a near-invincible protective barrier so Grantlyn’s magic had been reduced by at least ninety percent. Even so, Gowers had still been knocked-out by his attack. One could imagine from this attack how immense Grantlyn’s true power was. At this time, the demon behind Grantlyn suddenly dashed forward and brandished a razor-sharp shortsword across Suo Fei’s neck. The corners of his mouth raised into a smile that was filled with malice, “Hand over the artifact, dear.” In a flash, Samael activated the Asura Blade and aimed it at the dark-skinned demon’s back. In a cold tone, he ordered, “Release him.” Emia’s vague words suddenly made sense the moment he saw Suo Fei being held captive. “Kill them, or else you will lose your loved one.” The author has something to say: To be honest, I originally wanted to end at the “My good son, you truly have great prospects.” part. But, I thought that y’all would be dissatisfied if I ended it there, so I decisively wrote a few more paragraphs! Fall in love with me ba~~! Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>Lehran</strong>‘s ko-fis~ The Asura Blade could pierce the dark-skinned demon with just a slight push. The atmosphere in the room suddenly became tense. A clang sounded not long after as the shortsword fell to the ground. The dark-skinned demon smilingly let go of Suo Fei. He exaggeratedly raised his hands, but his voice held no fear as he said, “It was just a joke. Why are you taking it so seriously? This is the upper layer of Benesse. I wouldn’t be able to hurt Suo Fei even if I was stronger. There is no need to be so nervous.” When he said this, the implication was that ‘I can’t hurt Suo Fei. Do you think you can hurt me?’ In his words, the tense situation a moment ago was but a joke. The reason why Suo Fei dared to pretend to be Grantlyn was that he knew that even if he ran into Grantlyn, Grantlyn still wouldn’t be able to do anything to him. On the contrary, he was able to sabotage Grantlyn’s joyous occasion. Seeing Grantlyn explode in anger filled him with exhilaration. <i>Sure enough, true joy is the happiness one feels in seeing their enemy suffering.</i>  Suo Fei went past the dark-skinned demon and arrived at Samael’s side. He held Samael’s hand that was holding the sword. The terrifying bloodlust of the Asura Blade vanished and turned to a sharp dagger. At this moment, Grantlyn was staring at Samael’s distinctive purple eyes. He was silent for a while before he spoke towards Suo Fei, “You’ve found a more dependable backer, huh? How come? Has Manzy, that boy, been kicked away by you?” Suo Fei: F**k. Is this something that a father would say to his son? Are my ears damaged or is it that Grantlyn’s brain has gone crazy? He is a scum who had abandoned his wife and child. Why is he paying attention to me now? Suo Fei stayed quiet for a while. In the end, he did not bother asking Grantlyn why he is doing these things. He didn’t want to keep on asking. He would only look like an idiot, asking in vain. <i>I’m not his son. We don’t have much of a relationship with each other. I also haven’t been pitted to death by Grantlyn. My life will eventually get better. Must I weepingly ask Grantlyn to raise me? What a joke.</i>  <i>Also, Grantlyn might not want Vixanne, but I do. I will surely rescue Vixanne and treat her with the respect that a mother deserves!</i>  So to say, he had not the least bit of desire to bicker with Grantlyn at this moment. Instead, he regarded him as a stranger. All things considered, it was the right thing to do considering what he had obtained. It was apparent that Grantlyn and the demon came to the upper layer for the Human race’s artifact that was in Gower’s possession. In fact, Suo Fei already knew about this item in the game. This thing had fallen into his hands when he was helping Aryan in seizing Gowers’ home. The game system allowed him to receive the item, but he only put it away. As for what was its use? Sorry, he didn’t bother finding out the use of this rubbish even until the 10P feast was about to start. It couldn’t be discarded nor destroyed, so he could only place the item in an inventory slot. Now, however, Grantlyn’s arduous desire to obtain this artifact had sparked Suo Fei’s interest. If it was rubbish, why would anyone scramble for it? It’s not as if Grantlyn’s brain had truly gone crazy. However, he wasn’t that optimistic considering the state they were in right now. Although nobody was able to do anything to anybody in Benesse City, no one could stay in Benesse City forever. It wouldn’t do them any good to offend Grantlyn here. Grantlyn had a lot of helpers with him when he wreaked havoc in Valinor. Two fists can’t beat four hands, especially if those four hands are still in the shadows. If he offended them now, they would surely lay numerous traps for him. Hence, Suo Fei didn’t want to leave himself no room for retreat. By that, he meant that he wouldn’t take away the artifact. However, letting a duck that is in his possession to easily fly away did not conform with his way of doing things. He had to ask for something that would appease his wounded feelings and, at the same time, piss Grantlyn off once again. <i>So...; what should I do?</i>  Suo Fei saw the Asura Blade from the corner of his eye, and he was immediately excited. He should take advantage of such a good opportunity to extort a lot from him. He couldn’t hurt Grantlyn physically and mentally, but making his pockets hurt seemed like a good choice. Suo Fei cast his gaze upon Grantlyn. He wanted to curl his lips into an evil smile, but he had no experience in this kind of thing, so he barely managed to put on an unnatural smile, “Want me to return to the artifact? Sure, we can make a deal.” Grantlyn’s eyes squinted. There was a fierce glint in his red eyes, and his voice was terrifying low, “Say it.” Suo Fei had long been the best in the world when it comes to death stares. Therefore, he remained undisturbed no matter how dreadful Grantlyn’s expression was. <i>Afraid? Afraid my a**!</i>  Suo Fei visualised the materials that Eugene had listed out, and slowly uttered, “Dragonbone Jade, Red Bloodstone, Black Moon Refined Iron, Bright Alcor Grass, Phantom Ice Crystal, Blood Jade Bead, and Thunderwind Sand...;” As Suo Fei spat out names one after another, Grantlyn’s expression became colder and colder until he finally couldn’t bear it, “You, don’t take a mile after getting an inch!” Suo Fei paid him no heed. On one hand, he was gloating on how clever he was. On the other hand, he thought that he could add another item onto the list of tenth-grade materials, “You can add a teleportation array that teleports to Valinor too.” He looked at Grantlyn. Since he couldn’t do an evil smile, he could only imitate an iceberg and act as if he had facial paralysis. This was easy to do. He could do a pretty good imitation as long as he kept his mouth shut. At this time, the dark-skinned demon smiled fleetingly, and spoke in an evil manner, “This is truly a lion with a big mouth, you ought to be ashamed.” Suo Fei remained unmoved. A lion with a big mouth? He didn’t know what these five words meant, thus he wasn’t provoked by it. Grantlyn stared long and hard at Suo Fei, and enunciated word by word, “What if I disagree?” Suo Fei indifferently replied, “I wonder if the lives of the two of us are worth an artifact?” The implication was that all of them would die together with the artifact. Those who are barefoot are not afraid of those who are wearing shoes. Officials are most afraid of encountering rogues. Sofey was a Pureblood elf of noble descent. Although he was now a declined aristocrat, his family used to be prosperous. He had lived a happy and comfortable life since childhood, and had always observed proper etiquette. However, sociophobia-<i>kun</i> had been slowly parting away from Suo Fei, thus his boorish and unscrupulous temperament was akin to a butterfly emerging from its cocoon. Grantlyn huffed, the veins on his forehead bulging out in anger. The dark-skinned stared at Suo Fei and said in a voice dripping with sarcasm, “Grantlyn, your son is getting more and more interesting.” Grantlyn glared at the dark-skinned demon: “Shut up, Ned.” The dark-skinned demon called Ned stuck his tongue out at Grantlyn. He kept quiet, but his face was not the least bit serious as he mirrored Suo Fei’s blinking eyes. When Grantlyn had calmed down a little, he turned to Suo Fei and said, “Those are tenth-grade materials. I couldn’t possibly have...;” Suo Fei interrupted him before he could complete his sentence, “The Evans family had been one of the Great Families of the Elven Race for thousands of years. Don’t tell me that a family head is unable to take out such things.” “Also, don’t say that you didn’t carry them with you. Almost everyone in Yalance has an interspatial bag. These things would surely be with you.” Suo Fei then summed it up, “We could make a deal if you’re sincere. If not, then just forget about it.” Grantlyn locked his gaze at Suo Fei for a long time. Then, he gnashed his teeth in anger as he spat out, “Deal.” The deal was smoothly completed to Suo Fei’s delight. Grantlyn stored the artifact and shot a profound look at Samael. He suddenly paused when he was about to leave the room. Then, he turned to Suo Fei and said, “Son, here’s a piece of advice: Letting your emotions control you will only cause you to die a faster death.” With that, he turned around and left. This sentence boggled Suo Fei’s mind, but he also didn’t take it seriously. Grantlyn had been thoroughly defeated today. He must have left those harsh parting words to give himself a way out of his awkward situation. Since it seemed reasonable, he magnanimously accepted it. Suo Fei held his pink interspatial bag on the way down from the upper layer of Benesse. Although it didn’t show on his face, he was so happy that his heart was letting out pink bubbles. He truly had a good harvest today. First, the cheating scum voluntarily sent himself for Suo Fei to cheat him. Then, he also managed to demand a lot of things from Grantlyn. The most important thing was that he had managed to gather all the materials required to fully activate the Asura Blade. Samael’s strength could be tripled as long as he handed them to Eugene. <i>At that time, I want to see if there’s still anyone in Yalance who would dare to mess with ultimate gong-kun.</i>  <i>Bow down, foolish mortals!</i>  <i>Cough...; I must remain low-key. I’m now an elf. This kind of expression that is like a villain who had achieved his goals is too inappropriate for his appearance.</i>  He was having crooked thoughts for quite some time when he suddenly thought of something. He quickly turned to Samael and asked, “What happened to the contract between you and that human?” Suo Fei’s bright eyes looked at him with a worried expression, warming Samael’s heart as he assured, “There’s no harm, the contract hadn’t been established.” “How come? I witnessed it myself.” Samael explained, “My blood does not have a fixed composition. I can transform the blood of others into my own if I drink them. At the same time, my blood can be transformed into the blood that it has come into contact with.” Suo Fei: ...;...;Ultimate gong-kun, you are truly the beloved son of the game developers. You have such a big golden finger and it’s still alright! Well...; This is a slash game, not an RPG. It seems like there wouldn’t be any obstructions even if he started out with maxed-out stats. However, another thought came to his mind, “So, is the contract between you and the Asura Blade invalid?” It couldn’t be...; A glint flashed through Samael’s eyes as he said, “My heart’s blood cannot be transformed.” Suo Fei understood. It seemed that when he was forming a blood contract with Asura Blade, he used blood from his heart. Then Suo Fei was stunned. <i>This heart’s blood, could it be that he stabbed himself in the heart and used the blood that came out to form a contract with the Asura Blade?</i>  <i>F**k...; Just thinking about it twists my heart in pain.</i>  Suo Fei couldn’t help but shift his gaze towards Samael’s chest. He didn’t say anything, but his thoughts were written clearly in his eyes: It surely must have hurt. Samael looked at him and suddenly pointed to where his heart was, “The wound here has healed, but it still left a scar. It would be best if you could help me get rid of it once we’ve returned.” Suo Fei froze for a moment as his brain slowly processed his words. <i>Is he suggesting that...; that...; I should kiss his chest?</i>  Suo Fei’s somewhat slow brain quickly started fantasizing. A half-naked portrait of Samael slowly formed in his mind, and then he took a bite of his pure, white chest. <i>O-oh my.</i> Suo Fei quickly contained the perverted thoughts racing through his mind. <i>Calm down, calm down. Friends can not be regarded as wives! The distance between two gongs is insurmountable!</i>  <i>Furthermore, Samael simply wanted him to heal him. Don’t. Think. Too. Much!</i>  Samael kept his eyes locked on Suo Fei. He had been absent-minded ever since they arrived at the upper layer of Benesse. Something in his heart had been throbbing incessantly, especially when he pointed his sword at the back of the dark-skinned demon. He could even clearly hear his heart madly clamouring ‘kill him, kill him’. He was unable to contain this feeling that even the Asura Blade shook with excitement. At that time, he clearly felt as if the protective barrier of Benesse City’s upper layer didn’t exist. If he wanted to, he could easily kill the demon. He suppressed it by force, but it was only when Suo Fei held his hand that the devil in his heart completely submerged into slumber. After succeeding in inculcating himself, Suo Fei turned his attention to another matter. He took out the teleportation array that Grantlyn had given him from his interspatial bag. He stared at it for a while, before eventually tearing it to pieces. He wasn’t stupid enough to use this teleportation array. He didn’t trust Grantlyn. Who knew if this thing would actually teleport him to Valinor? The reason why he wanted it was simply to test Grantlyn out. Sure enough, Grantlyn could still easily enter and leave Valinor. What did this mean? Suo Fei didn’t have time to continue thinking about it as he had to rush to Benesse City’s lower layer to find a teleportation array. The lower layer was so huge that it wouldn’t be easy for them to find one. As soon as Suo Fei stepped out of the lift, the dwarves Jonah and Evelyn came running towards them. “Elf, elf, hurry.” Suo Fei immediately asked, “What’s the matter?” Jonah, who was gasping for breath after running, pulled Suo Fei down, leaned closer to his ear and whispered, “Evelyn and I found a stall selling random teleportation arrays. You need them, don’t you? This kind of teleportation array is the most convenient. It’s just that it was too expensive so Evelyn and I couldn’t buy it for you. Suo Fei’s eyes lit up. <i>Random teleportation array, that’s something that can only be found by chance!</i> He hurriedly followed Jonah and was fortunate to arrive in time. Suo Fei then spent no less than ten thousand gold coins to buy one. Although it pained him to pay so much, this item was truly valuable and reliable. One only needed to write out their destination and they would be teleported to that place. There’s no need to worry whether there’s something shady about the destination of the teleportation array. Of course, there were certain teleportation restrictions. They couldn’t be teleported directly into Valinor, but they could be teleported to the border of Valinor, which was enough for Suo Fei. Jonah and Evelyn had shopped to their heart’s content. Suo Fei was also in an exhilarated mood. Hence, their group finally decided to return to the Dwarven village. Just like before, Jonah and Evelyn rode the Three-headed Hound and left first. Then, Samael and Suo Fei followed shortly thereafter. Although Jonah and Evelyn were the first to leave, Samael and Suo Fei still arrived before them. Since they already knew the way, Samael and Suo Fei directly hurried towards Eugene’s house. However, they stared in shock at the scene that greeted their eyes after arriving at their destination. Eugene’s house...; was in ruins. <i>What the hell has happened here?</i> Most of the Dwarves’ houses were made of wood. Since they were specialised in jewelcrafting, they were not that interested in things like jades. On the contrary, they were very fond of wood. A house built with rocks couldn’t compete with the cosiness and comfort that a house surrounded by the beauty of nature could provide. Moreover, the rigidity of the wood used by the Dwarves was not any worse than that of a rock. Instead, it was more pliable than rocks. Despite it being a wooden house, its impact resistance was actually beyond one could imagine. However...; It had one critical flaw that was difficult to overcome. Wood is flammable. Even a fire-resistant wood would be reduced to ashes if a raging fire breaks out. Eugene’s cottage was a victim of this raging fire. Suo Fei stood from afar, his mind buzzing with questions. This sudden disaster had caught him by surprise. At this time, the dwarves finally arrived. Jonah’s little face went pale at the sight of their ruined home. He fell off the Three-headed Hound. His clothes were torn and blood dripped from his arm, but he felt no pain. He staggered forward, his eyes filled with disbelief. Then, he frantically ran towards the ruins. He rummaged through the wreckage with his bare hands as he screamed, “Grandpa...; Grandpa...; Where are you, grandpa?” As the screams mingled with his cries, the deserted place appeared more melancholic. The cottage was already in this state, how could the person inside possibly survive? Evelyn also rushed over. Compared to Jonah’s loud cries, he was chillingly silent. He didn’t say a word, but he also rummaged the ruins like he had lost his mind. His pair of tiny hands were scratched by the broken chips of wood. Blood dripped onto the charred woods and was quickly absorbed. It was as if all of his vitality was gradually being drained into the dark. Eugene was their pillar. If he died, it would be as if the sky had fallen and the earth had crumbled. Suo Fei was abruptly brought back to reality. They mustn’t give up. Even if there is only a glimmer of hope, they must make every effort to find him! Just then, a person who was running over from a distance breathlessly shouted, “You, you guys finally came back.” They finally could see him clearly when he got closer. His light purple hair was in a mess and had been sullied by the black ashes. The silk robe he wore had also been smudged with dirt, obscuring its elegance. His bewitching and charming face was riddled with anxiety. It’s Emia...; Why is he here? Emia finally came in front of them. When he saw Jonah and Evelyn, he quickly stopped them and said, “Stop searching, your grandpa isn’t here!” This sentence caused everyone to turn to look at him. Emia gasped for breath to steady himself, and blurted, “I have taken him to the village infirmary. Although he is severely injured, his life is not in danger. Come with me quickly.” Their group hastily went to the infirmary. After seeing the injured and unconscious Eugene, Jonah started bawling. Evelyn, who had been shocked stupid, also burst into tears. This scene caused Suo Fei’s eyes to redden. He embraced the two dwarves and gently comforted them. At this time, Samael asked the dwarven healer, “How is his condition?” The dwarven healer frowningly said, “He had inhaled a lot of smoke, but his burns are not severe. The most life-threatening injury is the wound on his lower abdomen. Fortunately, the sylph had brought him in time, or else...;” He didn’t finish his sentence. After a pause, he continued, “His condition is currently under control, but he’s still in danger. The Dwarves are not skilled in healing and my healing skills are truly...; shameful. Inviting the High Priest of the Celestials would increase his chances of being cured.” The door of the room opened and a young dwarf came in. He had short and stiff brown hair and delicate features. However, his sharp eyes and thin lips carried an imposing aura. As soon as he came in, the dwarven healer immediately bowed in respect, “Your Majesty.” The person who came in was the king of the Dwarves, Tilly Lannis. Tilly waved his hand dismissively. The Dwarves weren’t particular with etiquette. He looked at Jonah and Evelyn and spoke in a deep and firm tone of voice, “I would surely give you an account of this matter. Whoever it was that bullied my race, I would surely make him suffer!” He turned around and said to the healer, “Keep watch of his condition, I will send someone to the Celestials to invite the High Priest.” The Dwarves weren’t good in maintaining diplomacy and they were on bad terms with all the other races. They would surely have to pay an exorbitant price to invite the High Priest of the Celestials. Suo Fei looked at Tilly. He had once vividly experienced this king’s sour and obstinate temper. At that time, he only thought that he was too difficult to deal with. But now, he felt that it would be fortunate to be ruled by such a responsible king like him. When he heard that he was going to invite the High Priest, Suo Fei finally spoke up, “I’ve learnt healing from my mother since young. I also have my family’s handed-down secret potion that can heal Eugene’s wounds,” Suo Fei paused before he added, “But I need a completely quiet room so I hope that everyone can wait outside.” Samael suddenly gripped Suo Fei’s hand. Suo Fei didn’t budge but merely cast him a placating glance. He understood Samael’s concern. His peculiar healing ability could easily heal Eugene’s injury, but it came with a risk. There are too many strangers present. If an observant person discovers his ability, the consequences would be disastrous. But in this situation, Suo Fei couldn’t be so selfish as to only think of himself. Since he inexplicably acquired this ability, he might as well use it. Standing idly by despite knowing that he is capable of helping out, this way of handling things, was entirely incompatible with his outlook on life. If there’s danger, then there’s danger. Since he could save a life at this moment, then he wouldn’t stand by and do nothing. Hearing his claim, Jonah tearfully looked at him and asked, “Elf, can you really save grandpa?” Suo Fei nodded his head vigorously and reassured him, “Don’t worry, the healing technique of us Elves is one of the best and my mother is an Archmage. Believe me.” The people present felt more assured after hearing him say so. A few moments later, they started leaving the room. The dwarven healer offered his help, but Suo Fei shook his head and only allowed Samael to stay. Since Suo Fei had already made a choice, Samael didn’t stop him and only stood by the door. He unleashed his spiritual power to the maximum extent possible, guaranteeing that no one would come close. Eugene’s wound had already been attended to and the bandage had been meticulously applied. Suo Fei carefully examined it and inferred that it should have been pierced by a sharp blade. It didn’t have anything to do with the fire. The assailant must have set the house on fire after hurting Eugene to destroy the evidence. Suo Fei squinted his eyes as he thought of Emia. Why would he appear in such a timely manner? Suppressing the doubts in his heart, Suo Fei examined Eugene’s body once again. There were a few burns on his arms and legs, which weren’t severe. They were now slowly recovering since the healer had already applied the medication on them. Suo Fei decided to only focus on the mortal wound and not on those minor wounds. It would be rather too suspicious to heal all the wounds on Eugene’s body in just a span of a few minutes. Suo Fei took a deep breath and started treating Eugene’s abdominal wound. When he was doing experiments with Samael before, it was just a few minor injuries. Suo Fei barely felt anything when the wound recovered. But right now, Suo Fei felt a huge suction force as soon as he had touched the wound. The wound was being healed quickly. Suo Fei clearly felt his energy being drained rapidly, but he held on firmly. A great gust of dizziness hit him that almost made him faint. Samael discovered his abnormality in time and caught his body that was about to fall. The pale-faced Suo Fei leaned on Samael’s arms and smiled bitterly, “It seems that this healing skill comes at a price.” Samael held him in his arms. He clasped his right hand and whispered, “Where is it uncomfortable?” Suo Fei shook his head and replied, “It’s just over-consumption. I’m so hungry that I could even eat a whole Frostflame Beast.” Samael’s expression improved after seeing that he could still crack a joke, “Have some rest first and eat something light afterwards. Don’t eat the beast meat in your interspatial bag yet.” His words instantly dispelled Suo Fei’s thought of taking them out of his interspatial bag. Alright then.According to common sense, eating beast meat that was a tad too greasy in this state would only do harm to his body. But, I’m really hungry...; Eugene’s wounds had almost completely recovered and his life was no longer in danger. It was just that Suo Fei deliberately didn’t heal him completely. The remaining superficial wounds were tended to, there wouldn’t be any major problems. Samael adjusted his posture to make Suo Fei more comfortable. He caressed Suo Fei’s back to ease his fatigue. Suo Fei muddle-headedly grunted in hunger, but Samael’s warmth felt comforting against his skin. However, he failed to see Samael’s eyes becoming gloomier. This ability must not be discovered by others. If someone knocks Suo Fei unconscious to let him heal them, Suo Fei would most likely exhaust himself to death. The elf fell asleep nestled in his arms. He was still gently caressing him and felt his soft and slender under his palm as his fingers swept across his thin clothes. When he touched his waist, the elf’s pointy ears visibly twitched, seeming to be a little ticklish. Samael gazed at Suo Fei intently. The elf had fallen into a deep, unguarded sleep. His countenance showed complete trust causing Samael’s eyes to become more profound. His head stooped down and dropped a kiss on his forehead. It was overflowing with gentleness and adoration. After half an hour, Samael came out while carrying Suo Fei. The dwarves gathered around them as soon as they came out. Jonah saw Suo Fei’s state and immediately asked, “What’s wrong with the elf? My grandpa, he...;” “It went without incident, he’s just exhausted.” The dwarves sighed with relief. Tilly immediately arranged for someone to lead him to a place he could rest in. Suo Fei was awakened by a fragrant aroma. He was really hungry. Even though he was still tired, he immediately opened his eyes when the smell of food wafted through the air. A voice came from above him, “You’re awake? Have some porridge.” It was Samael’s voice. With that, he held a golden spoon in front of him. Suo Fei took a bite without thinking. The rice porridge was so soft and smooth that it easily melted in his mouth. It had also been served at the right temperature, hence it felt incredibly comfortable when it passed through his throat and entered his stomach. Suo Fei delightedly ate spoons after spoons without lifting a finger. He only became clear-headed after eating to his satisfaction. He moved his gaze and suddenly wanted to knock himself out unconscious. He was being held in Samael’s arms. He need not guess that the person who had been feeding him was Samael. It would have been fine if that was just the case, but what about the seven or eight empty bowls on the table! He could still disregard that he had been spoon-fed, but why did he f**king finish so many bowls?! More importantly, what are the dwarves doing here? What’s with you feeding me in front of so many people! Jonah ran in with a large bowl in his hand. F**k...; It was filled with porridge. He breathlessly shouted, “Coming! I’ll fill the bowl right away.” Suo Fei: ...;Laozi is an elf, not a pig. The little cub who hadn’t appeared for a long time proudly wagged its tail: See, it really is this divine beast’s ser—I mean, friend (I’m applying what I’ve recently learnt), this appetite is as big as this divine beast’s! Samael glanced at the dumbstruck Suo Fei and muttered, “No need, it seems that he’s already full.” Suo Fei: It’s extremely embarrassing, okay! A certain pig who had eaten to his heart’s content...;.. a certain elf who had lost his face turned on his self-regulation mode. Pure Suo Fei: No, you didn’t eat that much. Real men must eat a lot. Only a strong man would have this vigour! Evil Suo Fei: A strong man had actually been spoon-fed while in the embrace of another man— eight bowls, no less. Pure Suo Fei: Can we stop talking about that embarrassing moment?! ...;.Self-regulation failed. Seeing that Suo Fei was full, Jonah hurriedly came over. His big, limpid eyes were filled with worship, “Elf, grandpa is already much better thanks to you. I don’t know how I could ever repay you.” The leader of the Dwarves Tilly stepped forward and solemnly declared to Suo Fei: “First, you’ve risked your life to save Jonah and Evelyn. Now, you’ve even saved Eugene. Elf, I, Tilly, vow that the Dwarves would always be your faithful friend!” If he had not seen what had happened earlier, Suo Fei would surely hold Tilly’s hand and mention his precious son. However, at this moment, all he wanted was to find a hole in the ground to burrow into. After imparting his impassioned words, the dwarves finally realised that Suo Fei needed to rest and left one after another. Suo Fei’s embarrassment diminished slightly when the others had left the room. He had eaten his fill, thus he was already in high spirits. It was just that he couldn’t disentangle himself from the embarrassing situation earlier. Samael noticed it and, with a slight smile, diverted his attention to another matter. “Would you like to meet with Emia?” This sentence successfully jolted Suo Fei’s mind back to the present. He turned to Samael and knew that Samael harboured the same suspicion as him. This matter was too coincidental. <b>T/N:</b> Tilly Lannis (提利·兰尼斯) in the raws is literally two characters short of Tyrion Lannister’s name (提利昂·兰尼斯特) from Game of Thrones LMAOOO can the author be any more obvious? Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>Sasha</strong>‘s ko-fis~ Suo Fei gathered his wits together. Although Emia was a cheating scum in the game, he was still an NPC that wouldn’t provoke you unless you provoked him first. However, Suo Fei had already learned from his mistakes hence he no longer dared to underestimate anyone. Nothing was as simple as it seemed. Relaxing one’s vigilance would be treating their own life as a joke! Emia opened the door and came in. He had already tidied himself up, wearing a white silk robe with wide sleeves. The cuffs were adorned with fine, light purple patterns that, when matched with his unique appearance, made his elegance even more evident. His long and narrow eyes were raised slightly upwards. His modest appearance was enough to entrance people, and it was even more so now that his appearance was extremely immodest. “My, my. You guys are done showing affection to each other? Although a relationship between an elf and a demon is relatively rare, this pairing where one is cold and noble while the other is wild and unruly is unexpectedly touching. Don’t worry, I don’t discriminate between races. As long as it is true love, let alone an elf and a demon, I could even acknowledge a relationship between a troll and a dwarf.” Suo Fei: Cheating scum, where did you come up with all this nonsense?! But...; A troll and a dwarf...; OMG, <i>Laozi</i> is not as hardcore as you! Compared to Suo Fei who went on a tirade in his mind, Samael acted as if he didn’t hear the man. He calmly looked at Emia and straightforwardly asked, “Wasn’t Eugene Hall stabbed by you?” Suo Fei was stunned. <i>Bro, isn’t that too direct? Is it daijoubu to get straight to the point like this?</i>  Emia was surprised for a moment, and retorted with chagrin on his face, “I obviously saved Eugene. Why are you saying that I was the assailant? I’ve done a good deed yet I’m being misunderstood. I really...;” Samael smiled with his left hand on his waist. Emia turned pale with fright, “Hey, hey, hey. Don’t resort to violence. Can’t you give people the opportunity to defend themselves? “Alright then. Explain why you’ve appeared at Eugene Hall’s cottage and rescued him in such a timely manner? Eugene’s cottage is located at the outermost part of the village. The Dwarves didn’t notice anything unusual. Why were you the first to arrive?” Then, he calmly held the Asura Blade in his hand. Emia was unable to laugh because of his obvious intent. After a while, Emia sighed helplessly and stared at Samael with hidden bitterness in his eyes. The spectating Suo Fei thought, <i>Such bitterness! I’ve got goosebumps all over my body!</i>  “This was the first time I’ve done a good deed in the past hundreds of years, but I’m being interrogated in such a manner. Sure enough, am I not skilled in my profession?” He heaved another great sigh before he resignedly said, “This matter has got to do with my identity.”  “My name is Emia, the Seer of the Sylphs. Mm, you two should know what a Seer is. In fact, it’s not as incredible as it sounds like. The only thing that’s rather special is that I have a unique ability,” He smiled in a humble manner before he continued, “I can foretell the future.” Emia: Come on, quickly admire me! ...;...;. ...;...;. Emia: F**k! Why are these two fools not worshipping me in surprise? It’s foretelling the future! Don’t you want a divination?! In fact, according to Suo Fei’s temperament, he would have exalted the divine being if he had not learned about it long ago. Unfortunately, in this world, Suo Fei was an inept divine being himself, therefore he genuinely wasn’t interested in Emia’s profession. Both of them remained silent, thus the conversation-killer Emia had no choice but to clear his throat and continue, “I did a divination and saw that Eugene would suffer from a calamity of fire, so I hurried over and saved Eugene in the nick of time. Don’t ask me who did it. There was already a blazing fire when I arrived. There was no one else inside except for Eugene who was then unconscious.” “Do you know Eugene Hall?” Emia froze before replying, “I’ve heard of him...; he’s the only Craftsman God in the entire Yalance.” “Don’t tell me that you’ll do a divination for all the important figures in Yalance everyday.” “How’s that possible! I can’t exhaust myself to death.” “So,” Samael directed his gaze upon him, “why did you choose Eugene Hall?” Emia was silent for a while before he finally relented, “It’s because of you two.” “Us?” “Fine, fine. I first divined the materials required to repair the Asura Blade. I believe that Eugene has already told you. Then, I paid close attention to Eugene’s actions. When I came out of Benesse City, I felt that something was wrong. I divined for Eugene and found that, sure enough, something terrible was going to happen to him. Thus, I hurried over and fortunately made it in time.” Emia said this long string of words in one breath. Then, he relaxed his tone and said, “I’m helping you guys, I’m doing a good deed!” Samael only stared at him so Emia heaved another sigh, “As to why I’m helping you—I was just doing what I was entrusted to do. As for who it is, even if you hack me with that blade, I won’t say it.” Then, he purposely glared with his long and narrow eyes and pursed his lips, appearing like Liu Hulan. En, this description was contributed by Suo Fei. “Okay, I see.” Emia anxiously inquired, “You don’t suspect that I’m the assailant anymore?” Samael asked, “When did I ever suspect you?” Emia: “Huh? Didn’t you ask me just now?” Samael smiled, “If I didn’t, would you have said all that?” Emia was stunned. The spectating Suo Fei was suddenly enlightened! <i>All along, Samael had not regarded Emia as the suspect? Speaking of which, if it was really Emia who did it, he would not be so stupid as to rescue someone he had attacked and get himself caught up in this mess, right? Moreover, Eugene is no longer in danger. If they wanted to know what had actually happened, they could just ask Eugene, who was one of the involved parties, once he had woken up.</i>  In the beginning, Samael indiscriminately accused Emia of being the assailant to pressure him. Hence, he rushed out to defend himself and revealed a lot of information. At present, it seemed that his words held a lot of credibility. The Seer Emia, who realised what had happened, was enraged, “Launey, you bastard is simply just...;” He abruptly stopped halfway through and quickly covered his mouth. Samael turned to look at him with a sharp glint in his purple eyes, “Go on.” Emia stared blankly for a long time before he went on, “Just...; just...; just playing me for a fool!” Samael threateningly narrowed his eyes. Emia embodied Liu Hulan and accentuated his dignity once again as he said, “I’ve already said what I should say.” <i>I’ve even almost said what I shouldn’t say</i>, “I have to get back. As a Seer, I shouldn’t leave the Sylphs’ territory. Goodbye!” When he finished, he ran away as fast as a rabbit. Suo Fei wanted to yell out: Cheating scum, put on your enchantress appearance, alright? Don’t act like a fool! The doubts that Suo Fei had concerning Emia earlier had completely vanished like smoke. There may have been some things that Emia wasn’t completely honest about, but at present, it seemed that he meant no harm to them. Suo Fei also figured out one more thing. Eugene’s glory of being a Craftsman God often made people forget that, being a dwarf, he was also a powerful warrior. He was especially skilled in using a one-handed axe. On the other hand, except for being fleet-footed and having the cheat ability to foretell the future, Emia was but a weak good-for-nothing. He would be overestimating himself too much if he wanted to restrict Eugene and inflict serious damage on him. Obviously, Samael had thought of this long ago. From the beginning, he had only been misleading Emia to draw his secret out of him. The cheating scum had also been easily fooled. Recalling the scene where Emia had stopped mid-sentence, Suo Fei asked Samael, “Did you know Emia before?” Samael shook his head and said, “I didn’t.” Suo Fei frowned, “But it feels like he knows you. From the way he spoke, he seems to be familiar with you?” Samael didn’t respond. Suo Fei tried to recall Samael’s past and finally determined that this character had not appeared before...; At least not in the game. The game plot that was related to Emia was only the curse he previously got. There was nothing else apart from that. While Suo Fei was lost in thought, Jonah excitedly ran over, “Grandpa’s awake. Elf, grandpa’s awake! He wants to see you!” The little fellow repeated himself in excitement. Suo Fei was somewhat surprised. He actually woke up so quickly. This just showed that Eugene indeed has a healthy body. He didn’t drink eight bowls of porridge in vain...; <i>Alright, don’t mention that embarrassing scene. Let it be gone with the wind.</i>  Samael, Suo Fei and Jonah went to the village’s infirmary. Eugene was sitting upright on the bed, joyfully leaning on the pillow. Evelyn carefully held a bowl of porridge and fed him spoon after spoon. Eugene’s face was filled with satisfaction while Suo Fei’s face flushed red.<i> F**k, this familiar scene is slapping me right in the face. My slapped face had gone completely red, alright!</i>  Seeing the elf and the demon coming in, Eugene quickly had a spoonful before giving his thanks, “Elf, thank you for saving an old crock like me!” Suo Fei hurriedly said that this was nothing and that it was his obligation as a healer (fog). In his mind, Suo Fei observed a moment of silence for Emia. Obviously, this enchantress had also exerted great efforts to save Eugene but no one paid him any attention. It was only after expressing goodwill to each other that they seriously asked what had happened. Eugene thought for a moment and said, “There was only one person, it should be an S-tier assassin. His agility was so high that I couldn’t dodge and was stabbed. But looking at his physique, it should’ve been a demon!” The two races who had the highest agility were the Elves and the Demons. The attack power of the Demons was the highest. Therefore, the possibility of the god-level assassin being a demon was extremely high. <i>But why? Why would a demon attack Eugene?</i>  Eugene was quite unperturbed about this, “I have offended many people because of my bad temper. Before, I feared nothing knowing that I’m in the Dwarven territory, but it seems that it’s time to move. It’d be much safer to live in the village centre. “ Regarding the matter of his bad temper, Suo Fei recalled the strange old man who lived alone. He suddenly thought that Eugene who had yet to become twisted was so amiable. Eugene regrettably spoke to Suo Fei and Samael, “I heard that you have collected all the materials. It is a pity that my current body has not fully recovered and I dare not rush to activate the Asura Blade. It would be difficult to find these materials again if I failed.” Eugene’s worries were grounded, especially when it came to forging. It required great physical strength, especially the arm and wrist strength. A slight carelessness would cause all of one’s previous efforts to go down the drain. Even if the physical strength had been fully restored, the mental state was also very important. A shocking event had just occurred. Although Eugene seemed to be in high spirits, in reality, he had been frightened deep inside. It would be difficult for him to activate a divine artifact in such a state. Suo Fei found it regrettable, but he knew that he could do nothing about it. He suggested giving the nine materials to Eugene first, but Eugene shook his head and said, “Keep it with you. If you leave it with me, I would surely exhaust all of my resources if any accident were to happen.” Suo Fei had no choice but to keep the materials. He couldn’t stay and wait for Eugene to recover. He had already acquired a teleportation array and all he could think about was returning to Valinor and rescuing Vixanne, thus he expressed his desire to leave. The dwarves had moved to the centre of their territory. The place was fully guaranteed to be safe, hence Suo Fei was relieved. However, he was a little worried when he thought of Jonah’s whimsical character. Before leaving, he braced himself and took out the beast core of the Frostflame Beast. Then he told Jonah and Evelyn, “Keep this beast core close to you. It has two skills: One is a fire-type attack and the other is an ice-type shield. Use this if there’s any danger. It would surely be able to protect you.” Although Jonah was impulsive, he was determined to become an outstanding blacksmith like his grandfather. He had an extremely keen sense for materials, thus he could see at a glance that the beast core was of great value. However, Suo Fei actually took it out and gave it to them just to keep them safe. This concern left the dwarf’s heart feeling extremely weak. He didn’t accept the beast core but only said to Suo Fei, “Elf, I can’t accept this. You have already helped us a lot.” Suo Fei wasn’t good at quibbling with words. He was truly worried about these dwarfs. They are enthusiastic and genuine, treating others with sincerity. His heart became tangled into a mess at the mere thought of Eugene’s future being in utter darkness because of the death of this little fellow. However, Jonah was reluctant to accept it. In a seriousness that was hard to come by, he said to Suo Fei: “Elf, my encounter with the ferocious beast in the forest had taught me a great lesson. I am well aware that I am not strong enough to protect myself, let alone protect my loved ones. But,” He paused before continuing in a firm cadence,” I can’t accept this beast core. With it, I will rely on the power it brings and continue to regress. I will never be able to improve myself. I want to become stronger, strong enough to protect everyone! Suo Fei was completely shocked by his words. Samael took the beast core in Suo Fei’s hand and said to him, “I remember that you have a lot of rare, secret cultivation manuals in your interspatial bag. It’d be better to give them to Jonah.” Suo Fei was still in a trance when Samael’s words brought him back to reality. He hurriedly ducked his head and rummaged his interspatial bag. He brought out a large stack of books suitable for a warrior’s cultivation and gave them all to Jonah. Jonah was surprised by the number of books, but his big eyes sparkled when he saw their titles. He didn’t refuse this time. Instead, he sincerely showed his gratitude, “Elf, demon, thank you!” After bidding their farewell to the Dwarves, Suo Fei and Samael left the Dwarven village. Suo Fei had been preoccupied until there were only the two of them. Suo Fei looked up at Samael and somewhat absent-mindedly inquired, “Am I being reliant on you?” “Am I being reliant on you?” Suo Fei was stunned by what he had said. <i>F**k...; Was Laozi possessed by a delicate shou? How could I say this sentence? Even though I had that notion in my mind, I shouldn’t have said it out loud. A gong actually admitted being reliant on someone. Do you want to throw your face into the Pacific Ocean? How could I mingle in the gong circle </i>(what?)<i> with such a stain in my reputation?!</i>  <i>Well, although delicate gongs do exist, but...; their market shares aren’t big. Have you seen a delicate gong having a shou harem?! Laozi had already spat a mouthful of blood when my outward appearance changed from an extremely overbearing ultimate gong to an ultimate shou. This time, even my inner self had deteriorated. How can I live this life?</i>  <i>No, I have to immediately rectify this.</i> Suo Fei racked his brains, thinking about what he could do to redeem his gong aura. At this time, Samael considerately gave him a way out of his awkward situation. “You’re not being reliant on me. It’s just that you have trust in me, and that you need me.” Samael looked at him with eyes filled with gentleness, “You make me happy.” At this moment, an overused but very accurate analogy was that Suo Fei was shot by an arrow straight to his heart. His heart skipped a beat after getting shot, and then resumed, thumping loudly in his chest. Suo Fei’s heart was beating so fast that his head spun. His face was also steaming hot. This feeling was strange and confusing to him. He looked at Samael straight in the eyes. He knew that the demon was extremely attractive, more attractive than all his lil’ shous. But now, looking at those eyebrows that were exquisite beyond words, those beautiful purple eyes, and...;.. those thin lips. Everything about him left his mouth feeling parched and dry. He felt that something was wrong with himself. He struggled to restrain himself and stiffly turned his head away. He had a hunch that if he didn’t look away, he might do something improper to Samael. <i>Damn it! What’s the matter with me?!</i>  Swiftly emptying his mind of wayward thoughts, Suo Fei finally felt the heat receding. He recalled what Samael had said and hurriedly replied, “Yes, it’s only mutual trust and need between us. You also want me, right? ” Suo Fei was utterly dumbfounded after realising what he had just said. It’s need ah! How did it turn to want?! There’s a vast difference between the two! At this moment, he really wanted to yell out: Sociophobia-kun, come back! Come back and control my mouth! Sociophobia-kun: Stop calling me! I don’t know this fool! We’re not familiar! Suo Fei: 〒 ▽ 〒 Spoken words are like spilled water, you cannot take it back. Suo Fei could only pray. There’s not much difference between the pronunciation of the two. Considering the context of his sentence, Samael could have heard it as ‘need’. Thus, he cautiously looked up at Samael and stared at his purple eyes. The gentleness within had been replaced by a deep, bottomless abyss. He gazed at Suo Fei and whispered, “Right.” Right? Right?! Suo Fei: What’s right? Bro, did you hear me clearly or not? You want me or you need me, which is it? If you want me...; Damn it, why does it feel like I’m getting hotter and hotter?! Suo Fei took a deep breath and spared no effort to suppress the heat deep inside him. He realised that he absolutely shouldn’t be engrossed in this matter. Regardless of what Samael meant, he didn’t care anymore! <i>Quickly, quickly change the topic, </i>he thought. He speedily took out the costly random teleportation array from his interspatial bag and studied it earnestly. Yalance had a lot of teleportation magic. Consequently, there were also a lot of restrictions that could block teleportation magic. The Elven territory, Valinor, had a restriction that wouldn’t allow ordinary teleportation magic to pass through. Of course, there were also some forbidden teleportation magic that couldn’t be blocked by this restriction. However, the random teleportation array he bought could be easily blocked. This was because it only had one teleportation mechanism which couldn’t store a large amount of magic, making it impossible for it to break through the magic restriction. Nevertheless, Suo Fei only needed to be teleported to the border of Valinor. He could slip in when the opportunity arises. He merely needed to save some time. Suo Fei studied it and figured out the way to use it. It was simple and straightforward. He would only suffer a wave of dizziness and, in a blink of an eye, his ten thousand gold coins would be gone. <i>What a fast way to spend money!</i>  The border of Valinor was an unnamed forest. In fact, this place originally belonged to the Bois Canyon, which was as famous as the Knuhl Forest, but the Elves purposely created a buffer zone as a form of protection. Samael and Suo Fei’s destination was this forest. The random teleportation array was extremely incredible as it would honestly teleport them to this place. The teleportation array could only teleport up to two people. The best way to minimise the risk of an accident happening midway was for the two to cling tightly to each other. Because of the earlier ‘need or want’ situation, what should have been an innocent hug became awkward for Suo Fei. He feared that Samael would discover that his heart was beating too fast. He was also afraid that Samael would feel his overheating body. In short, he felt uneasy in every way possible. Moreover, although it was a hug, his size made it seem like his entire being was being tightly embraced by Samael’s arms. The hands resting on his waist made him feel like a fish out of water. He tried to move slightly so that Samael’s hand wouldn’t be touching his waist. However, his movement only gave him the feeling that Samael was caressing him. As soon as he had this idea, his waist suddenly felt itchy out of nowhere. Samael’s palm felt extremely hot. The warmth penetrated through his silky clothing and lingered on his skin, making him feel weak all over. Suo Fei wanted to cry but the tears wouldn’t come. How should he bring up the matter of his waist being itchy in a pure and innocent manner? <i>Ultimate gong, there are a lot of ways to hug someone. Why are you persistently holding onto my waist, ah?</i>  Unfortunately, Suo Fei was extremely distrustful of his own mouth at this moment, so he blushingly endured and didn’t say anything. He was caught up in his dilemma that he didn’t see that a smile was on Samael’s lips the whole time. When they have been teleported, Suo Fei quickly broke out of the innocent hug that had only been necessitated by the situation. The unnamed forest had tall trees that covered the sky. Suo Fei was just about to take a step when he sharply heard footsteps. His ears twitched and he quickly hid behind a huge tree. They were heavy-footed, thus they definitely weren’t from the agile and elegant Elven clan. It also seemed like there were at least two of them. A gruff voice sighed and complained, “We’ve been patrolling here for so long. Let alone any Pureblood elves, we haven’t even seen any elves.” Another voice responded, “Stop complaining. It’s better to patrol here than to go to the territory of the Demons!” “Ah, that’s true. Although the Elves are prideful, they wouldn’t indiscriminately kill the innocent. If we patrolled the border of the territory of the Demons and happened to anger a demon, we could be killed.” “Exactly...; Say, that Sofey Evans and Samael Launey, what do they look like?” “Who knows, in any case, we only have to report it if we’ve encountered a Pureblood elf and a demon. The gruff voice deliberately lowered his voice, “Hey, do you know what those two did to anger the king?” “How could I know?” “I heard that they killed that human...;” “Human? You mean that person?” “Yes, a hundred year ago when the king was yet to be enthroned, two humans escaped from the Human territory after committing a crime. Later, the younger of the two died of an illness and the older human was sold. It was our king who had bought him. I heard that the human was so amazing that he even became a City Lord later on. Tsk tsk...;” “Hey, I’ve also heard that that human is good in bed...;” “That’s for sure. Otherwise, why is our king unable to forget him?” “Hey, these two guys actually got into trouble with the King of Trolls. They are really living life to the fullest.” The two sighed and walked away...; After listening to their whole conversation, Suo Fei thought that the two trolls must be blessed with good luck. They could even save their own lives while gossiping. If they had not spoken so clearly, when he and Samael heard their names, they would have undoubtedly appeared and subdued the two. Then, they would threaten and entice the two to spill out the whole story. Once the two had explained the matter to them, they would have killed them off to silence them. Now, they have explained so clearly that Suo Fei and Samael had no need to show up. Naturally, they wouldn’t bother dealing with the two trolls. That would only put the enemy on guard. Suo Fei was not compassionate, but it would be better if they didn’t shed any blood. He was a modern person who wasn’t that hard-hearted. But if his life was really at risk, he would have to be hard-hearted even if he’s not. Suo Fei was somewhat surprised by the information he had heard from the trolls. It was obvious that the human they were talking about was Aryan. <i>Aryan actually knew the King of Trolls? This game is truly filled with surprises.</i>  Speaking of which, when he played the game, Balnor the King of Trolls had always been steadfast in being a villain boss. He was always trying to hunt him down. At that time, he couldn’t figure out why this big chap was so hostile to him. It seemed that it was because he had snatched his lil’ shou from him. Now, however, this ultimate gong <i>daren</i> didn’t steal Aryan away but directly killed him instead. Balnor’s enmity would undoubtedly be greater...; He recalled the dreadful matters that happened when he was subjugating the Trolls and was reluctant to think about it. Thus, he pushed the matter aside. Instead, he deliberated on how to sneak into Valinor. His previous experience in the game was completely useless here. Looking back, he acted in an overbearing manner to ‘marry’ Manzy. He charged straight on and entered Valinor purely by force. The Elves were so weak that they couldn’t withstand a single blow. How could they stop the mighty and domineering him? But now...; He turned his head to look at Samael. Ultimate gong-kun was still here. However, Manzy was the sixth shou that he had conquered. The game had been nearing its end thus it was needless to say that the ultimate gong-kun was already unrivaled under the heavens, or nearly anyways. At this moment, Samael was still a teenager. As for being way out of their leagues...; Forget it. They could just run away if they were unable to control the situation well, but the losses would outweigh the gains. So, how could they get in? As it turned out, all his worries were for naught. Looking at the approaching silver-haired elf, Suo Fei only had one thought in mind: There must have been something fishy about that damned white bead! Bonus chapters as thanks to <strong>Sasha</strong>‘s kofi~ If there wasn’t something fishy about it, how could Manzy appear in such a timely manner? He got here so quickly that it was as if he had called him in advance to come pick him up. <i>What a pain in the ass.</i>  Even so, he didn’t bother hiding since his whereabouts had already been exposed. He merely stood and waited for Manzy to come over. Manzy came by himself. His silver hair was loosely held back by an emerald clip. He was garbed in bluish-green upper garments, paired with darker, tight-fitting pants. He was also wearing knee-length boots which made him appear taller and thinner. <i>I have to say, Elves are truly breathtakingly beautiful.</i>  However, Suo Fei had been able to restrain his face-con tendencies from acting up recently. He finally could remain sensible and wouldn’t become obsessively infatuated too easily. Pure Suo Fei: Look at my calm and steady temperament. Laozi is becoming more and more of a gong. Evil Suo Fei: Are you sure it’s not because you’ve become immune to beauty after looking at the ultimate gong <i>daren</i> for such a long time? Pure Suo Fei: Don’t rain on my parade...;.. 〒▽〒 Manzy looked at Suo Fei with a warm and tender gaze. His dignified and prideful iceberg appearance which seemed to be suffering from facial paralysis had become like this, scaring Suo Fei. He must’ve gone mad. Upholding the idea of ‘meeting contingencies by sticking to his old ways’, he stared at Manzy and used his expertise in pretending that he has facial paralysis. Manzy briefly smiled and softly said, “Why didn’t you tell me in advance that you’re coming back?” Suo Fei: But you immediately found out about it even though I didn’t tell you in advance. “I contacted you since you didn’t contact me, but you ignored me. Fey, I left early because Valinor was in danger and I was afraid of implicating you,” He continued by condemning himself, “I didn’t expect that something like that would happen to Mauer City. Fortunately, the heart bead remained as lustrous as before, thus I knew that you were safe.” As he said that, he took out a bead that looked identical to the one he gave to Suo Fei. It’s just that it was currently emitting a faint pink glow. “I’ve always kept it close to me. Today, I saw its colour and knew that you’ve returned.” Suo Fei completely understood at this moment that this suspicious thing should be something well-known. He had really given Manzy a call, it was just that it was an auto-dial call. He was certain that the bead should be something like a communicator. <i>Really amazing! Why have I not come across it when I was playing the game?!</i>  At the same time, Suo Fei’s eyes sparkled as his gaze locked onto the bead on Manzy’s hand. Wouldn’t it be wonderful if he could steal it and give it to Samael? This way, he wouldn’t be afraid even if he got separated from Samael since he could always contact him. Wait...;...; why give it to Samael? <i>Cough. Is there really a need to ask this question?</i> He had yet to capture his peerless lil’ shous so he must tightly latch onto ultimate gong daren! <i>Also, evil Suo Fei, don’t come out and make an appearance! You’ve been fired!</i>  Suo Fei was smugly fantasizing that he didn’t hear anything that Manzy was saying. When he came out of his trance, he was surprised to see Manzy opening his arms to give him an affectionate hug. Suo Fei had yet to react when he felt a burst of brute force pull him from behind. Then, he staggeringly fell into the other’s embrace. Surrounded by his familiar smell, Suo Fei knew that it was Samael and was immediately relieved. Manzy narrowed his eyes and drew himself upright. His face was unfriendly as he spoke in an unpleasant manner, “Fey, come here. Valinor doesn’t welcome outsiders.” Although the Elven clan didn’t isolate themselves from the world, Suo Fei knew that they didn’t permit other races to enter Valinor. However, although they didn’t welcome others, it didn’t mean that others couldn’t get in. If one was capable enough, nobody would be able to stop them in this world. It was only that he was very dissatisfied with Manzy’s tone. Suo Fei spoke at last, “I came back to get Vixanne out of here.” Manzy confoundedly asked Suo Fei, “Why would you want to leave? We belong to Valinor.” Suo Fei calmly replied, “Grantlyn Evans had betrayed the Elves. Can Vixanne and I continue staying in Valinor? A sliver of ferocity flashed in Manzy’s eyes, “As long as I am here, no one would dare to be dissatisfied in the two of you!” His words caused Suo Fei to frown. If they stayed in Valinor, he and Vixanne would have to live their lives in fear and apprehension. Whether or not what Manzy said is true, why should he rely on others to live? Outside Valinor, there’s still Yalance that’s as boundless as the sea and the sky, where they could live as free as the wind. Even going to the Dwarven village was a hundred times better than staying in Valinor. Seeing Suo Fei remain silent, Manzy emphasised once again, “Fey, I won’t let you leave again. Stay with me.” Samael, who had not spoken all this while, gently asked Suo Fei, “Do you want to stay?” Samael’s lips were parted in a slight smile, but there was not even the slightest bit of warmth in his eyes. Suo Fei was startled. They had gotten along so well these days that he had forgotten his initial fear of him. He had also forgotten that it was the Demons’ inherent nature to act willfully and recklessly. He had indulged in the gentleness that Samael had given that he forgot how dangerous this man was. “Do you want to stay with him?” Samael patiently inquired once again. Suo Fei’s somewhat dazed eyes immediately became clear as he answered firmly, “No!” A smile slowly bloomed on Samael’s face, like a bewitching poppy. Extremely beautiful, but utterly dangerous. He hugged Suo Fei with one hand and gently planted a kiss on his forehead. Then, he leaned close to his ear and whispered in a hoarse voice. Suo Fei heard him clearly. He stood perfectly still, as if he had been struck by a stunning spell. Then, Samael let go of Suo Fei and instantly activated the Asura Blade. He restrained Manzy immediately before anyone could even react. The Asura Blade was brandished across Manzy’s neck like a bloodthirsty viper. One slight movement and Samael could send him to his death. Samael indifferently looked at the beautiful Elven prince. He struggled to curb the Asura Blade’s bloodthirsty impulse as he calmly said, “I want to see Vixanne Evans.” Suo Fei was still distracted by what had just happened. He only collected his wits when he heard Samael’s words. Then, he instantly understood his intention. <i>...;...; So simple, but it’s surprisingly so cool!</i>  Must they be so long-winded? Prince Manzy delivered himself to their clutches. As long as they restrained him, it would be easy for them to take Vixanne away. Manzy Argoux had never suffered such grievance before. Manzy was enraged. His ice-cold silver eyes were tinged red as he stood in his spot. He gritted his teeth in anger as he spoke, “No...;..” He had only muttered out a word when the Asura Blade moved slightly and grazed his delicate skin, easily wounding him. Blood oozed out, causing the Asura Blade to tremble in excitement. Manzy’s words came to an abrupt stop. He had never felt such an imminent sense of death. Moreover, he had a feeling that the demon in front of him would be delighted if he refused as that would give him a good reason to kill him. The realisation terrified him. He felt unprecedented fear, as if a snake that’s flicking its tongue had coiled in his heart, causing him to tremble uncontrollably. However, he was an elf, a noble Pureblood elf. The prestige that had been passed on for thousands of years allowed him to stand upright. He suppressed the fear that was rising from deep inside him as he struggled to speak, “K...;.ill me, Vixanne also wouldn’t live.” “It’s alright,” Samael enunciated in a relaxed manner, “I’ll make the whole Valinor go down with her.” Manzy’s pupils contracted and he tremblingly refuted, “You’re not capable of that.” “Then, try it.” Samael spoke in a light-hearted manner but Manzy, who had been staring at him, felt that the demon wasn’t joking. Suo Fei, who had been observing from the sidelines, knew that Samael was threatening Manzy. This was normal. The one who could intimidate is the one who’ll live, the one who’ll win. This was the most obvious way of thinking. <i>However, ultimate gong daren, your acting is really impressive. Hehe. I almost believed it, let alone Manzy.</i>  Manzy kept silent for a while before he finally compromised, “Come back with me to Valinor. I’ll bring you two to see her.” Samael remained unmoved, “It seems that you still want to try.” Try whether I could destroy Valinor. Manzy scowled, “I can’t let her come and see you!” Suo Fei was stunned. His heart skipped a beat as he asked, “Why?” Manzy looked at him. Then, he looked away and whispered, “Vixanne Evans, she’s dead.” This sentence was like a bomb, exploding in Suo Fei’s mind. He stood in a trance with a face filled with disbelief. He grabbed Manzy and sternly said, “You lied to me. She couldn’t have died!” Manzy received a long cut from the Asura Blade when he was pulled. Blood dripped down along the blade, but he merely gritted his teeth from the pain and said, “Fey, I wanted to bring you back to Valinor. But at the same time, I was also afraid that you’d return. Vixanne died. I couldn’t save her.” Suo Fei felt a sudden pain in the head. He forced himself to calm down and asked, “Why?” Manzy paused for a moment before responding “She used a forbidden technique which inflicted serious harm on her body, but not to the point of death. I immediately asked the Elven clan’s High Cleric to heal her. When her condition was barely stabilised, I sent someone to the Celestials to invite their High Priest to heal her.” “However, she couldn’t persist long enough for the High Priest to come.” “Why? Wasn’t she already in stable condition? The healing technique of the Elves is by no means lacking!” Manzy’s eyes gleamed as he answered, “She suffered serious injuries before.” Suo Fei was stunned. “She was already seriously injured before using the forbidden technique. She could only somewhat manage because of her formidable healing technique. After using the forbidden technique, her body was overburdened and simply couldn’t be saved.” “Fey, I tried my best,” He lowered his head down as he continued, “Sorry.” Suo Fei didn’t utter a word. His mind was somewhat clouded. If he were to be honest, he only interacted with Vixanne for a few days. However, the striking image of Vixanne abandoning her life to save him was forever etched in his memory. He bore this body’s responsibility towards Vixanne. In addition, he also wanted to repay her for saving his life. He had always believed that Vixanne was still alive and that he would be able to save Vixanne. In the Dwarf Village, when he saw Eugene and Jonah together, he fantasised about rescuing Vixanne and bringing her to Dwarven village. It would suit her more to live there rather than living in the ice-cold Valinor. But now, his fantasy had been shattered. Manzy took out a crystal ball from his arms. He didn’t rashly pass it to Suo Fei but gave it to Samael instead. “This is Vixanne’s last memory orb. I didn’t look at it.” Seeing the memory orb, Suo Fei’s final hopes were shattered. For Elves, their body would disappear after death but they would leave a memory orb. It would contain the final thoughts of the deceased. It might contain meaningful information or it might only contain meaningless fragments. As for what it contained, it would all depend on the deceased’s volition. The memory orb was covered with Vixanne’s aura. It was an infallible truth: Vixanne had left the world. The author has something to say: Little cub, you chowhound, are finally coming in handy. Phew...; The memory orb on his hand was only the size of a goose egg. It was transparent with soft specks of light pink. Like Vixanne, it encompassed a beauty that would never leave the memory of anyone who sees it. Suo Fei seriously regarded it for a long time before carefully putting it away. He then raised his head to look at Manzy. The emerald clip that had been holding his hair in place had dropped off. His silver hair glistened behind him like a waterfall. The coldness in his countenance had been replaced with vexation and remorse. His silver eyes were filled with deep concern. A tinge of fear could also be seen within them. Seeing the aloof and remote Elven prince in this dishevelled state left a bad taste in Suo Fei’s mouth. He didn’t like Manzy and had an unpleasant first impression of him. Manzy’s outlook on relationships was messed up, but at this moment, Suo Fei felt that Manzy Argoux had true feelings for Sofey Evans. From the perspective of a bystander, Manzy’s love was selfish. He made trouble out of nothing and his behaviour was somewhat ridiculous. However, it would probably be another story if the real Sofey Evans was here. Everyone—No. Every couple had a different view on love. If they think that it’s love and accept one another, then a bystander had no right to question their relationship. Love had always been only between two people. Suo Fei was clueless as to why he came to this world. He didn’t want to occupy Sofey Evans’ body, but he was already occupying it. He didn’t know where the original Sofey Evans went, but he knew that if he was Sofey Evans, he would have been in love with the Elven prince before his eyes. Suo Fei let out a sigh as he drew nearer to Manzy Argoux. He took out a white bead that was surrounded by a glowing halo of light from his interspatial bag and placed it on Manzy’s palm. Manzy stared at him in a daze. The two white beads on his palm flickered with excitement due to being close to one another. This white bead was called the heart bead, which was the beast core from twin ferocious beasts. These ferocious beasts would never separate with their partner even until death. Their beast core had this ability: They would respond and be interdependent to each other for a lifetime. No matter how far they were to each other, they would always be linked at heart. Heart beads were a marvellous existence in Yalance. It symbolised genuine love. Lovers who own a pair of heart beads were favoured by God as it upheld the vow that they would never part. But now, Suo Fei handed back the heart bead. Suo Fei was unaware of its significance. In the game, there were only lust, possession, and extortion. There were no feelings involved. Thus, it was impossible for him to encounter things like the heart bead. He only returned the heart bead to Manzy because it was something that Manzy gave to Sofey Evans and Sofey Evans was not him. Suo Fei looked at Samael and quietly said, “Let him go.” Samael obediently willed the Asura Blade back to its harmless dagger appearance without hesitation. Suo Fei stepped forward and took Samael’s hand. Then, he calmly looked at Manzy as he slowly uttered out: “Your Fey⸺Sofey Evans, is dead.” Manzy blankly stared at him. His hand that was holding the two heart beads trembled slightly. Suo Fei looked on with indifference and continued, “I killed him. I’m a murderer but,” his tone became increasingly unfamiliar, “I won’t give you the opportunity to take revenge.” <i>⸺I transmigrated to this body. Whether or not it’s intentional, I am the murderer who killed Sofey Evans. But I want to live. So, I won’t give anyone the opportunity to take revenge!</i>  Perhaps Manzy would be unable to understand the true meaning of his words, but it didn’t matter. Suo Fei had already said what he wanted to say. Manzy was still in a daze. Suo Fei turned around and spoke to Samael with his head down, “I want to get out of here.” It wasn’t until the two had vanished into the depths of the unnamed forest that Manzy woke up from his daze. The heart beads slipped from his hands and shattered on the ground. The transparent and smooth crystal surface had turned into sharp shards. The liquid inside the heart bead was unexpectedly bright red—just like the color of one’s heart. Manzy slowly kneeled down to the ground on one knee. He held the shattered heart bead on one hand. The fragments cut his hand and his blood intermixed with the red liquid inside the heart bead into an indistinguishable amalgam. He slowly raised his head and looked at the direction where Suo Fei was heading. His silver eyes were filled with determination and paranoia, “Fey, you’ll never leave me.” Samael moved in a fast but stable manner. Suo Fei’s head was leaning on his chest. His own chest was tight as he clutched onto Samael’s clothes. He was only able to recover his senses when the whistling sound of the wind ceased and quietness resumed. Samael had stopped. Suo Fei’s hair had become messy and frizzy after rubbing against Samael’s body and being blown by the wind. He took a look around and was given a shock. It turned out that they had already left the unnamed forest. Past the unnamed forest was the Bois Canyon. Bois Canyon was a land of adventure which was as famous as the Knuhl Forest. The number of ferocious beasts living in Bois Canyon was by no means inferior to the Knuhl Forest. Standing in front of them was a huge ferocious beast that was five meters high. Although the ferocious beast was huge, its appearance was by no means unusual. It looked like an enlarged version of a buffalo. Well, an enlarged buffalo was still frightening. Especially at such a close distance. Suo Fei completely recovered his senses from the shock. He dumbly stared at the huge buffalo. The buffalo reacted by uttering a long cry. Suo Fei went silent. Game designers, you guys are really cutting corners. This is, in fact, just a buffalo. You designed it to be a buffalo, but regard it as some ferocious beast in the game. The buffalo cried out for a long time before finally looking down at the two ‘small ants’. Although the ants were small, they were barely enough for the buffalo. The buffalo opened its mouth wide, wanting to swallow the two. Suo Fei closed his eyes and observed a brief moment of silence for the buffalo. A long cry entered his ears, followed by an earth-shaking crash. Suo Fei opened his eyes, his gaze falling onto the buffalo that had been cut into halves. It had been hacked to death in a simple and crude manner that contained a hint of fury. The buffalo’s fur was light gray which had a good lustre. Suo Fei, who was still in a melancholic mood, thought that he might be able to lighten his mood if he tired himself out. Thus, he jumped down and Samael handed him the Asura Blade. Suo Fei started the huge skinning job. He attentively peeled the fur from beginning to end. In the past, he peeled the fur as he wished. At this moment, he was especially attentive in hopes of diverting his attention. When one was busy, they would become focused and wouldn’t think about anything. This attentiveness would lull the mind into a comfortable empty state. Suo Fei immersed himself in this state. When he completed skinning two impressively whole pieces of fur, Samael was shocked. Too meticulous. Even the finest details were excruciatingly skinned off. At first glance, it looked like a living creature and had a particularly strange feeling to it. When the little cub who had vast experience and extensive knowledge saw the two pieces of fur, its body tensed up as he remembered a long-lost forbidden technique. It was a gruesome and terrifying technique. Extremely horrifying. The forbidden technique was not difficult to cast. The only difficulty was the skinning part. As long as an intact piece of fur was obtained, one could easily create a beast puppet. Beast puppets were different from tamed beasts. They were incomparably loyal and immensely powerful. Most importantly, they were immortal. They could live forever as long as the puppeteer who made them didn’t die. Suo Fei...; had the aptitude to be one. However, this was an extremely ruthless technique. The little cub contemplated but decided not to speak about it. The elf is not an evildoer. He doesn’t need this kind of evil power. Suo Fei was exhausted after completing his work, but his mind was still out of sorts. He still couldn’t stop thinking about the earlier matter. Vixanne died. She died because of him. It was like a thorn, persistently piercing deep into his heart. If only he was a little more attentive, a little wiser, and wasn’t so careless, he could’ve noticed Vixanne’s abnormality. He could’ve stopped her in time. He could’ve not fallen into this situation. However, there was no medicine that would cure one’s regrets in this world. What-ifs were absolutely useless. Samael and the little cub knew why Suo Fei was sorrowful. The little cub silently padded towards the buffalo and swallowed the whole buffalo in one mouthful. Then, it silently padded towards Suo Fei and let out two soft roars. Suo Fei couldn’t understand what it was saying. He assumed that it was comforting himself, so he rubbed its furry head. However, Samael turned his gaze sharply to the little cub. ‘What did you say?’ The little cub was startled. It had always thought that neither of them could speak the beast language and did not expect that the demon actually could! It remembered what it had said and was a little nervous. It didn’t know whether he should talk about it or not. It had never divulged this information to anyone, nevertheless, nobody had said that it couldn’t be divulged. After a pause, it looked at Samael’s sharp eyes and repeated his words, ‘Somewhere, there is an artifact that can resurrect the dead.’ ‘Where is it?’ ‘Salvag’s treasury.’ The conversation between the person and the beast caught Suo Fei’s attention. He couldn’t understand what they were saying, but he also realized that Samael could converse in the beast language. He looked at Samael in confusion. Samael clasped his hand and gently relayed their earlier conversation. Resurrection? An artifact that can resurrect the dead? Suo Fei was stunned. Vixanne can be resurrected? He hurriedly looked at the little cub for confirmation. The little cub affirmed, ‘There is an artifact that had been lost deep inside the treasury that is able to resurrect the dead.’ “But, where is this Salvag’s treasury?” Suo Fei had never heard of this place despite having explored the whole Yalance. How could he have not known that there was such an important place? The little cub was silent for a while before saying, ‘My mission is to open Salvag’s treasury. However, I have to be in my ultimate form which I am currently incapable of transforming into. Suo Fei was stunned. The little cub’s words were intriguing. According to it, his mission was not to guard the treasury but to open it. <i>So to say, this place had been destined to be opened?</i>  The little cub didn’t confirm nor deny it. Samael asked him, ‘How do we restore you to your ultimate form?’ ‘Let me eat to the fullest.’ Samael: ...; ‘How do we do that?’ The little cub was meditating: ‘If we were to use the buffalo as an example, I would have to eat three thousand of them to be full.’ Samael: ...; He conveyed his words to Suo Fei and Suo Fei followed in response: ...; Seeing both of them remaining silent, the little cub quickly added, ‘If we were to use the Frostflame Beast as an example, three hundred of them would be enough...;’ Suo Fei: Please give me a rage comic’s emoticon, thank you. The little cub strugglingly straightened its back, ‘You see. I’ve grown so much since I ate the Frostflame Beast.’ Suo Fei earnestly examined the little cub and was barely able to see a protrusion on its back. The dead fish-eyed Suo Fei: You’ve grown a tumour? Little cub: Tumour, my arse! That’s the wings of this divine beast! The young cub wasn’t joking. In fact, with the amount it was currently eating, it would take at least thousands of years for it to eat its fill and Salvag’s treasury should only open after thousands of years. However, it met Samael and Suo Fei. And Suo Fei was determined to resurrect Vixanne. As such, Suo Fei rolled up his sleeves, ready to go all out for Vixanne. The little cub quickly added, ‘This would also be a form of training for you two. You demon might be powerful, but you elf is too weak. Salvag’s treasury is an extremely frightening place. At your current level, entering the place is simply courting death.’ As a result, the largest canyon in Yalance⸺Bois Canyon, was in deep trouble. The author has something to say: For the record, I am a fan of Game of Thrones and One Piece. I loved them very much for the past two years or so! And for the past two years, I’ve always been wanting to write a story. Yoshi! The day where I can see the grown-up Samael and Suo Fei sweeping across Yalance has come at last! Last bonus chapter for this month as thanks to <strong>silverness</strong>‘ ko-fis~ The fifth-grade fire-type ferocious beast, Blazing Black Turtle had been apprehensive and cautious as of late. It had already evolved into a fifth-grade ferocious beast. Thus, it stood to reason that it didn’t belong at the bottom of the food chain even in Bois Canyon which was swarmed with ferocious beasts. It could even oppress a group of ferocious beasts. In the small region, it could act despotically against others. However, everything changed after the two devils arrived. To be more accurate, they did not belong to the Devil race which had long since disappeared into the dust of history. However, their brutality was absolutely at the same grade as the Devils. In a short span of two years, many of its fellows and friends had died. Moreover, the higher their grades were, the quicker they died. On the other hand, the inferior low-grade ferocious beasts that were around first-grade to fourth-grade lived a leisurely and tranquil life. Blazing Black Turtle wanted to cry. Ying ying ying. If I knew that such a calamity would happen, why would I want to evolve into fifth-grade? Well-behavedly staying in fourth-grade would be safer. <i>I made my life worse for no reason.</i>  It had been hiding inside a cave for the past seven or eight days. It could still tolerate not eating, but it was impossible for it not to drink. It had reached its limit thus it needed to go out and find something to drink. The Blazing Black Turtle still had a mighty and domineering figure. The black turtle had a huge body and its shell was covered with raging flames. It walked in a slow but imposing manner but at this moment, the Blazing Black Turtle thought, How I wish I am an inconspicuous chameleon. Then I would be able to escape those two devils by hiding in the grass, innit?! Blazing Black Turtle sighed in despair as it cautiously walked towards the nearest pool of water. It walked slowly. Just as it was about to reach the pool, it abruptly stopped. Wu wu wu, why am I so unlucky?! Standing next to the pool, aren’t they the two devils?! Wait. The Blazing Black Turtle perceptively determined that they were not lying in ambush for a certain turtle. Instead, they were fighting against the pool’s Golden Tiger Shark. The Golden Tiger Shark was a seventh-grade ferocious beast. It had a huge body that was six metres long. Its body had the same colour as that of a gold coin, like a moving sun. It was a metal-type ferocious beast. Its defensive power was top-notch and its attack damage was even more unusually ferocious. At the current level of the Blazing Black Turtle, it could only wait for its demise if it encountered it. But at this moment, such an unruly and domineering seventh-grade ferocious beast was actually being thoroughly suppressed. The Blazing Black Turtle stealthily peeked and saw the silver-haired little devil holding a dagger. His slender figure was only the size of the tiger shark’s teeth, but he moved like a streak of light. He flitted across the tiger shark’s body. After traversing from its head to its tail, the tiger shark fell to the ground with a thump. The Blazing Black Turtle was unable to clearly see his attack. Ying ying ying. Too...; too scary! A loud rumble was heard at this time. The Blazing Black Turtle watched in surprise as a Sabre-toothed Shark that was twice as large as the earlier tiger shark emerged from the pool. It’s an eighth-grade ferocious beast! Although it was only a grade above the tiger shark, starting from fifth-grade, a difference of one grade would bring about earth-shattering improvement. The strength of an eighth-grade ferocious beast was equivalent to ten seventh-grade ferocious beasts. The Blazing Black Turtle thought that if he hadn’t been born having a stable lower body, he would have been trembling like a leaf by now. Then, something happened that frightened it so much that it had almost wet itself. The silver-haired little devil seemed to have been startled by the sabre-toothed shark. He stood frozen on top of the tiger shark and then a black light flashed. The black-haired big devil hugged the little devil with one hand while his other hand held an extremely common iron sword. His iron sword slashed down. It seemed effortless but the released sword energy was explosively powerful, directly cutting the sabre-toothed shark into halves. Blazing Black Turtle: Ying ying ying. Don’t cut it so easily as if you’re cutting cabbages, alright! The two ferocious beasts lay on the ground and the pool resumed its tranquillity. The Blazing Black Turtle wanted to run, but he was born a slow runner. How could he inconspicuously flee? <i>If I knew that I would die here today, I wouldn’t have starved myself for seven or eight days. How great would it be to die full!</i>  Suo Fei had long seen the boisterous Blazing Black Turtle. <i>To be honest, it hid its huge body behind the short bushes. Did this embarrassing thing think that he’s a little bird? If it wanted to hide, it still had to have some hiding skills to back it up, alright?!</i>  Seeing Samael also looking at it, Suo Fei sighingly persuaded, “Let it go. It should be enough for the chowhound to eat these two that delivered themselves to our door.” “Alright.” The sound was close to his ear. After realising that he was still in Samael’s arms, Suo Fei immediately jumped down. He let out a fake cough before he sprang towards the carcasses of the ferocious beasts and began skinning. Two years were not long for Elves and Demons. However, for Suo Fei and Samael who just came of age, their appearances had changed remarkably. Suo Fei’s short hair had grown long. He initially wanted to cut it short, but Samael personally made him a hairclip. It was made from the skeleton of a tenth-grade ferocious beast. It was extremely tough and hard thus it wouldn’t easily break. The pure black clip was a stark contrast to his silver hair. Since Samael personally made it and placed it on his hair, Suo Fei felt disinclined to brush off his kindness so he had to forgo the idea of ​​cutting his hair short. However, he truly wasn’t good at fixing his hair thus Samael had to help him most of the time. For some reason he could not make out, he would be overcome by a strange kind of feeling every time he saw Samael’s slender hands fastening his silver hair with the black clip. Then, he would inadvertently remember what Samael had whispered into his ears two years ago when he was having a dispute with Manzy, “Yes, I want you.” Stop stop stop. Suo Fei quickly ceased his imagination that had been spiralling way out of control for the past two years. Surely, he must have heard it wrong. Compared to Suo Fei who was becoming increasingly feminine (Suo Fei: What do you mean feminine?!), Samael was becoming increasingly serene. He had lost the look of naivety and innocence of his youth and his appearance had become more stunning, incessantly enticing Suo Fei’s face-con tendencies to act up. If his resistance to beauty was at LVL60 two years ago, then now he had already reached the maximum level LVL99! They didn’t spend all their time for the past two years at Bois Canyon. They also went to Benesse City twice. Suo Fei gave Antonio some herbs that were unique to the Bois Canyon as thanks for diligently gathering beast blood. Then, he went to the Dwarven territory several times and gave some bones to Eugene’s family for them to practice forging. In addition, Eugene had finally recovered a year ago and began the major project of activating the Asura Blade. He had shut himself behind closed doors for ten months to date and it was about time for him to come out. Speaking of ability improvements, although Sofey was a pure-blood elf, his body’s magic affinity was oddly mediocre. Suo Fei could easily practice zeroth-grade handy magic spells but he simply was unable to cast magic spells that were seventh-grade or higher. Although the zeroth-grade magic spells were easy to practice, their spellbooks were hard to find. When Antonio found out that Suo Fei was looking for these spell books, he paid more attention to them. Thanks to him, Suo Fei was able to gather a lot of various spellbooks such as his commonly-used cleaning spell. It was extremely helpful during skinning as it made the whole process less bloody. There was also the sorting spell which made it easier for Suo Fei to arrange the fur materials. The appraisal skill, however, was considered the most useful skill. It was too convenient as it could appraise the grade of both ferocious beasts and materials. Then he could immediately beat them up, so fun! In the past two years, he had dealt with more than two thousand ferocious beasts. All the beast meat had been eaten by the chowhound and all the bones had been given to Eugene. It was only the fur that he had attentively kept for himself. His thoughts were simple. If Samael were to be forced to go on a rampage in the future, he surely wouldn’t die with his more than two thousand furs! <i>Muahaha!</i>  Of course, it didn’t occur to him that this brilliant idea would end up helping him a lot. His magic affinity was mediocre, but his agility was higher than he had imagined. After skinning for so many times, his eyes had been trained to be extremely sharp. When combined with his appraisal skill, he could accurately determine the weak point of his opponent and send them to their deaths using a short dagger. Of course, this dagger was not an ordinary dagger. Eugene had specially made it for him using the materials from the same ferocious beast that was used to make his hairclip. It had become tougher after Eugene’s refinement. Its efficiency at skinning was no less than the Asura Blade. His magic power was lacking and his strength was insufficient, but he was able to create his unique attack technique just based on his keen eye, his rare appraisal skill and his top-notch agility. Compared to his painstaking efforts, Samael was still the game developers’ biggest bug. The Demons were indeed a powerful race, but was it really possible to reach that extent? When he first encountered Samael, he had been rendered powerless by the Frostflame Beast. That was even with the help of the Asura Blade. But now...; The Asura Blade was still deeply attached to Eugene and yet, he could take out an iron sword from nowhere and easily slice an eighth-grade ferocious beast in half. ⸺ Ultimate gong-kun is unmistakably the precious son! After Suo Fei finished skinning, the little cub immediately pounced and started eating. Suo Fei stroked the pink interspatial bag. Vixanne’s memory orb was still inside it. He had not watched it as the orb would disappear after watching it once. The resurrection artifact required a medium and the memory orb was undoubtedly the best medium. The Devourer who had starved for thousands of years had finally eaten to its fullest. The ultimate form of the Devourer was not as huge as they had expected, but its body was extremely beautiful. It had a smooth figure and its golden fur sparkled under the sunlight. It was as shiny and beautiful as the reflections of the ocean. The little cub’s round eyes were brimming with energy, its bearing was imposing, and its roars were deafening. As a whole, it conformed to Suo Fei’s imagination of a divine beast. Especially the Devourer’s huge pair of wings. Suo Fei had learnt the beast language in the past two years, so he quickly urged it, “Come, try flying around!” The little cub who had been holding back for many years was finally able to hold its head up high. It had a domineering appearance, but after hearing Suo Fei’s words, it somewhat revealed its inherent nature. Oh my, ​​the wings of this divine beast has finally grown! I can finally travel across the horizon! Fervently kneel down to me, foolish mortals. This divine beast can fly! After its sweet reverie, the little cub stuck its chest out in the most impressive pose it could manage. It took a deep breath and slowly unfolded its wings. Its wings fluttered, covering the sky. It was extremely beautiful. However after flapping its wings lightly, the earth shattered and the heaven shuddered! Before Suo Fei was a sight that he would never forget. It was as if a dragon that had been sleeping for thousands of years woke up from its slumber and let out an earth-shaking and heaven-rattling roar. Suo Fei had not experienced an earthquake before, but the scene in front of him seemed like it was the end of the world. The earth shook until it gradually collapsed. Innumerable colours filled the sky and finally converged into a singularity. Then, like the Big Bang that marked the birth of the universe, this singularity burst open. The sky was forcibly split open from the peak down to the earth. The huge crack slowly grew bigger and inside it was a vortex of utter darkness. Suo Fei had seen the images of black holes in space before, and the crack before his eyes gave him the same feeling. It seemed capable of swallowing everything in this world, filled with unknown terror. Salvag’s treasury, which had been idle for thousands of years, was opened. The tremor it brought was enough to shock the whole world of Yalance. When the stunned Suo Fei finally recovered his senses, he bellowed at the divine beast in front of him, “Bro, what the hell is going on?! If you wanted to open it, you should have waited for us to get ready! The Asura Blade is still in the Dwarven territory!” The mighty and domineering divine beast-kun had a stupid look on his face and its big eyes welled up with tears, “It was you who asked me to fly around. How could I know that the sky would split open with a flap of my wings? Wu wu wu...; Suo Fei was not the only one who was shocked after such a huge crack appeared in the sky. Everyone from all the races in Yalance who witnessed this scene were also shocked. Those who weren’t well-informed thought that a calamity had descended from the heavens and that the end of the world was near. They ate and drank as much as they could while they could. Those who had not confessed quickly confessed. Those who had not consummated their marriage quickly consummated. Those who had consummated their marriage quickly did it a couple times more. So that when the sky had fallen and the earth had crumbled, they could die without regrets. Those who were well-informed angrily flipped their tables, threw their cups and kicked the base of their beds. What the f**k, why is the lost Divine Ruins that should have only opened five thousand years later currently allowing entry?! Those that should’ve been trained had not been trained and those who should’ve grown up had not grown up yet. Should a group of old men who had had one foot in the grave bring a bunch of newborn weaklings to emerge victorious in this Divine Ruins? Is this a joke? But, letting this opportunity go? Please. If they did, their race would be seized by other races once the Divine Ruins had closed! Regardless, everyone’s conditions were nearly the same and it went without saying that they couldn’t miss this opportunity. Thus, the elites of the nine races were ready to stir up trouble. The little cub— Ah, it couldn’t be called a little cub anymore. It’s a divine beast now. The divine beast had already been wailing for a while that the veins in Suo Fei’s temples throbbed agitatedly. Samael took Suo Fei’s hand to appease him before shifting his gaze to the divine beast whose face was streaked with tears. He asked, “Can it be closed?” Divine beast: “Nobody taught me how...;” Samael: “Can you take us to have a look at it?” Compared to Suo Fei’s ill-tempered bellow, Samael’s calm tone made the divine beast feel much better. Thus, he readily agreed and repeatedly nodded his head in response to Samael’s request. It lowered its head slightly. Samael had already picked up Suo Fei, who was still enraged, and jumped onto the back of the divine beast. Its huge wings spread out as it flew to the sky in an extremely fast and stable way. Suo Fei leaned on Samael’s chest. He had already calmed down by this time. After thinking about it, when was the little cub ever reliable? Sigh...; The crack in the sky seemed near, but it was actually far away. It only looked close due to its expansive size. The divine beast flew for more than ten minutes to reach the crack. The shock of seeing the crack in such a close distance sent a chill down Suo Fei’s spine. Fortunately, Samael had been holding his hand all this while. Otherwise, his legs would have gone wobbly from the fright. It was narrow and towering. The dark purple vortex seemed that it would swallow people in. It was too astonishing. Must they really enter the place? Can they still come out after entering? “Don’t be afraid.” Samael gently comforted him. Suo Fei turned to look at him. He was truly, truly scared. Samael flashed a slight smile at him, “I’m here. It’ll be alright.” His words were like a warm spring that gushed into Suo Fei’s heart. With their fingers clasped together, his fears disappeared because he was not alone. Samael turned his gaze towards the dark vortex, his purple eyes reflecting the pitch-black darkness. It gave off an indistinguishable profoundness. Suo Fei watched wide-eyed as Samael slowly reached out his hand and touched the crack. He wasn’t pulled in as he had imagined. They can’t enter? Suo Fei also reached out his hand and touched it. Suo Fei reflexively shivered when a chill seeped into his palm. The chill rose from the depths of his heart, filling him with coldness and gloom. When his palm touched the crack, a mechanical voice inexplicably sounded, “The Divine Ruins will open in three days.” Suo Fei: ...;Did it have to be so intelligent? Laozi is actually still in the game, aren’t I?! It actually has a countdown timer for the opening of the instance? As he silently rambled on, he felt that the crack wasn’t that frightening anymore.. He felt it was opportune for it not to open at this time as it would give them the time to head towards Eugene and collect the Asura Blade. They could also stroll around Benesse City and gather some resources. However, the three-day countdown was enough for everyone in Yalance to come and watch. They should’ve been the only group that would get to treasure hunt, but now, they would have to share with the whole world. It’s too unfair! They have lost their upper hand, alright! Then, Suo Fei felt that something was wrong. As a recluse who spent all his time playing games, Suo Fei also played MMORPGs in addition to slash games. In this kind of game, each version would have a raid instance that had a grand backstory. The boss would be difficult to dispose of. More importantly, it required them to play in a team with a standard size of twenty-five players. A large group would surround the boss but would eventually end up being killed by the boss. It’s really sad, alright. Firstly, the existence of such large-scale instances gave the players the opportunity to obtain high-quality equipment. Its second purpose, however, was to repeatedly dig pits for the players to jump into. It would open grandly and let people enter in groups. Then, they would die together until their corpses filled the entire instance. At this moment, this huge crack gave him a feeling of déjà vu. F**k, this grand opening is simply announcing to everyone, ‘Everyone, laozi has opened. Come, come. Come and deliver your corpses to me! This treasury portal that could hardly wait for everyone in the world to know about its existence, is it really daijoubu? Did it really not open its mouth to lure people to enter it and court death? Suo Fei lapsed into deep thought, but he couldn’t give up despite knowing that it might be extremely dangerous inside. They spent two years just to fully satiate the chowhound’s appetite. Could it be that they would wuss out at the last minute? Not to mention, this might be his one and only way to resurrect Vixanne. How could he chicken out? He stopped himself from entertaining those thoughts. I can’t do anything about it. The road to happiness is paved with obstacles. The more things one wants to get, the more obstacles they will encounter. Overthinking is useless. Being well-prepared is the ultimate key. The little divine beast had transformed into its ultimate form. The only advantage was that it could finally be their form of transportation. It was even the flying type which was particularly flamboyant. They arrived at the Dwarven Territory without much effort. As they were a frequent visitor of the territory, the dwarves smilingly greeted Samael and Suo Fei upon seeing them. When they saw the little cub’s transformed appearance, everyone in the vicinity came over with sparkling eyes. When had the little cub ever received such kind of worship? It immediately puffed its chest out, stretched its wings wide open and posed in a bearing that stood out from the others, allowing the dwarves to stare as they wished. The dwarves had always been genuine so they praised it endlessly. The little cub’s eyes that were filled with pride squinted into a crescent. Suo Fei: “Look at this good-for-nothing!” Although he said that, he still left the little cub to let him have his fun. Meanwhile, he and Samael walked towards Eugene’s dwelling. The Eugene had moved houses. The king of the Dwarves, Tilly, specially renovated a delicately-sized residence which could be considered as grand for the Dwarves but Eugene had declined. He still preferred to live a simple life with his two grandchildren. However, this time, he specially added an extra bedroom that had simple furnishings and a large double bed. It was tailored with Suo Fei and Samael in mind. At that time, Suo Fei protested silently in his heart. <i>Why is it a double bed? Fine, it must have been to save space. It must be.</i>  When Samael saw this bedroom after its completion, his expression didn’t shift or waver but he harvested a tenth-grade ferocious beast deep inside the canyon and personally gifted all of its bones to Eugene. Eugene happily stroked his beard and smiled so broadly that his eyes nearly slitted shut. The next day, the bed was covered with a four-piece bedding set made of soft and comfortable velvet. Most importantly...; there was only one quilt! Suo Fei: I didn’t see anything. But until now, the two had not had the chance to spend the night in Eugene’s dwelling. Jonah was the first to greet Suo Fei, “Elf, did you see it? There’s a tear in the sky! Everyone says that monsters will come out of it, so scary~” Suo Fei was silent. In the end, he didn’t tell him the truth but merely patted his fluffy hair. A sonorous laughter was heard from inside and Eugene came out soon after. Suo Fei looked at him and thought, What a dirty old man! His hair and beard were in wild tangles, his clothes were filled with smudges and his body was emitting a peculiar odour. He was unkempt beyond recognition, however, his attention was immediately drawn by the thing on his hand. Unlike its previous ordinary dagger appearance, it became a three-edged bayonet. It had a slender and sharply-pointed black blade. Its outline was perfectly exquisite. One could imagine how easy it would be to cut one’s throat using this blade. Eugene’s eyes were shining as he handed the Asura Blade to Samael, “Kiddo, give it a try.” Samael took it and gently drew the blade across his fingertips. Bright blood dripped onto the pure black surface. Suddenly, the blood rose and danced around the blade. After whirring sounds of contention, the Asura Blade’s ultimate form emerged in front of their eyes. Suo Fei’s eyes widened. So beautiful. This is the Asura Blade, one of the three Divine Artifacts! The material of the sword from its blade to its hilt was the same. Its pure black colour made it seem as if it was a bottomless abyss that could swallow up all the light in the world. It wasn’t dazzling, but it made people incapable of looking away. It didn’t have any embellishments, because no matter how resplendent the gem was, it would be unable to match the sword’s unique momentum. Samael lightly brandished the sword and forceful sword Qi shot up to the horizon, as if muffled thunder exploded in the sky. It was truly a terrifying force. Eugene learned that Samael and Suo Fei were going to the lost Divine Ruins and earnestly prepared equipment with extremely high defensive power for the two. It was lightweight and had a marvellous design. “No need to thank me. The beast bones that you gave me in the past two years are enough to last this old man a lifetime. You two deserve this.” Hence, Suo Fei didn’t say anything and merely kept it. After staying in the Dwarven territory for a day, they went to Benesse City and collected all the beast blood that Antonio had prepared into the interspatial bag. Antonio had been financially affluent in the past two years. He devoted himself to studying potions and also had some achievements. He was far from mastering it, but it should be known that healer was a profession that was difficult to practice. Although Suo Fei gave him a lot of herbs for him to practice on, being able to reach mid-tier in a span of two year only showed that he was extremely hardworking and had great potential. He gave some of the potions he made to Suo Fei. Although it wouldn’t have that much of an effect on them, it was his thoughts that mattered. Suo Fei stored it and told him that he didn’t need to collect beast blood for a while. After thinking about it, Suo Fei took out another fifty thousand gold coins to Antonio: “Accept these. You should close up your store first and concentrate on studying potions.” Antonio was stunned. After a while, he choked back tears as he replied, “Elf, you have already helped me a lot. You’ve already done me a great favour for giving me herbs for the past two years. How could I accept these gold coins from you?” Suo Fei was the worst at handling this kind of situation. He knitted his eyebrows as he morosely contemplated what to respond. Samael answered, “Just consider it as pre-payment for your potions. Practice hard.” With that being said, Antonio couldn’t refuse anymore and could only gratefully accept the gold coins. Three days later, they were astounded by the scene that greeted them after returning to the vortex’ location. Suo Fei had long expected that there would be a crowd of sightseers, but he did not expect that there would be so many people that the place would be densely cramped. As the huge crack was in the sky, races that couldn’t fly could only look on while crouching on the ground. Therefore, apart from selling medicines, equipment, weapons, and talismans, there was an emerging business that was on the rise: renting flying mounts. There were many winged races in Yalance, such as the Celestials, high-tiered Demons as well as Sylphs. However, these races had a sparse population and terribly high self-esteem. Naturally, they would not lower themselves to carry others. So, the flying mounts became much sought after. Although winged mounts were rarely seen, they weren’t uncommon. As long as one had enough money, they could still buy them. Especially the Goblins. They were a money-obsessed race thus they naturally had a lot of flying mounts. Hence, they opened direct flights and charged others exorbitant prices. Unfortunately, this was a monopolised industry. Even if they didn’t want to spend a dime, there were still a lot of people queueing up to pay. Suo Fei felt somewhat envious of the extravagant profits they were making. F**k, five hundred gold coins for a flight? The dense crowd below is like a lamb to the slaughter! If he wasn’t in a hurry to be one of the first to enter, he really wanted the little cub to do this part-time job! It was too easy to make a fortune. Goblins are truly crafty geniuses! Samael and Suo Fei’s appearances were very eye-catching. Nevertheless, Suo Fei had already learned the Disguise Spell that had negligible magical fluctuations. This spell is much more advanced than the ordinary Transfiguration Spell. It would be difficult for people to discover because of its extremely low magical fluctuations. If one couldn’t sense the magic, they would naturally be unable to see through the disguise. This was all thanks to Antonio. As he thought of this, Suo Fei felt that he really deserved the fifty-thousand gold coins. Samael and Suo Fei disguised themselves into the most common appearances of the Demons and the Elves. Suo Fei also purposely disguised the little cub into an ordinary Pegasus, earning the dissatisfaction of the little cub. Under its urging, Suo Fei had to make it slightly more dashing and turned it into a Winged Leopard. It flew to the sky. There were already many winged races as well as dignitaries who were riding flying mounts near the crack. In comparison, Suo Fei’s group was seemingly unimportant. Suo Fei glanced around. There was the least number of people at the highest point, but they were the most distinguishable. Moreover, nearly all of them were familiar faces. Isn’t this his lil’ shou harem?! Except for Aryan, who had already kicked the bucket, as well as a certain lil’ shou who was unlikely to appear, all the other seven were right in front of him. At this moment in time, Suo Fei recalled his final 10P feast that hadn’t even started. Times have passed, people have changed...; Suo Fei didn’t feel much when he was playing the game. However, now that he was in Yalance, he was filled with emotions when he looked up at those faces that were somewhat familiar but yet so foreign. He looked at the nine lil’ shous from the nine great races. If they weren’t young masters or princes, then they were leaders or kings. All of them had high status. They were at the topmost rung of Yalance when it came to power and wealth. And he, was actually able to draw them into his arm. Tsk tsk, Suo Fei almost fell in love with himself! So cool, wild and domineering! This is the real ultimate gong! He looked at the real ultimate gong beside him who had not conquered even one of them. Sigh...; Suo Fei felt that it was a great pity. Unfortunately, the way to seduce the lil’ shous could not be taught. It could only depend on his perceptiveness. He couldn’t do anything to help Samael. Manzy Argoux, whom he hadn’t seen for two years, seemed to become more taciturn and unfriendly. He was not alone. There were about five or six elves who went with him. It could be seen from their appearances that they were undoubtedly Pureblood elves. Manzy’s indifferent gaze had been fixed on the huge crack. He didn’t talk to anyone. His silver eyes used to be like snowflakes that emitted a slight chill in the air. However, now, they were a frozen hue, sending a biting chill to the air. When Suo Fei saw Manzy from afar, he silently disguised himself into an ordinary demon as an elf was slightly eye-catching. It would be better to keep a low profile by being inconspicuous. The key figure of the great races stood in front of the crack, but they did not communicate much. The Celestials and the Elves were very close, but no one dared to provoke Manzy due to his unapproachable demeanor. The Celestials and the Demons had been nemesis since time immemorial. At this time, they did not come to blows but merely coldly eyed each other. They had sufficient IQ. Creating a ruckus at this moment would only benefit the third parties behind them. Nobody would be stupid enough to provoke others on their own volition. The clan members behind them were even more self-disciplined and strived to behave in front of their family heads. They were not stupid enough to cause trouble. Therefore, although the crack was surrounded by a swarming crowd of people, it was awfully quiet, which was a sharp contrast to the bustle on the ground. Suo Fei and Samael were at the outermost periphery. In the beginning, he wanted to be the first to enter so that he could hurriedly seize the artifact. However, seeing the current situation, it wouldn’t be the best idea for them. Putting aside the situation within the crack, not one of the people in front of it were to be trifled with. Even if they could charge in with difficulty and successfully obtain the artifact, they would have to face the joint attack of these great races, and would definitely pull the aggro to the maximum level. Hence, they must not rush. The artifact might not necessarily end up in the hands of the first to obtain it. For this matter, they must keep their cool. Suo Fei carefully sized up his lil’ shous. He had completely ended his relationship with Manzy Argoux whereas the Trolls’ lil’ shou was unreliable as his adoptive father Balnor was still ready for action and they still had not ended their feud that was caused by Aryan. The young master of the Sylph race was too unpredictable. He never played his cards according to reason. Suo Fei could still humour him back when he was still his lil’ shou. But when it came to working together...; Suo Fei would definitely be pitted to death by him. The Dwarves’ favourability towards Suo Fei was already maxed out and Tilly, who was the most difficult to deal with, had already been dealt with. Thus, Tilly’s son would be reliable. However, this kid’s thoughts were somewhat unconventional and it truly was not easy to keep up with his whimsical thoughts. The Celestials and Demons were worth considering, but these two were each other’s nemesis and only one of them could be chosen. <i>The question is, which one should they choose?</i>  Sigh. After deliberating on the matter, Suo Fei still gave up the idea of making friends with one of them. Although he knew their preferences very well, there were too many uncertainties. Having undue confidence in his own judgment would only make matters worse. He was imagining every possibility when he suddenly realized something. He had not seen Grantlyn’s group. It stood to reason that it was impossible for them not to appear for such a huge matter. Could it be...; Suo Fei immediately understood that they used a Disguise Spell. Grantlyn’s group certainly knew how to. They must have blended into the crowd after disguising themselves. Suo Fei silently reminded himself: Must be vigilant against strangers! The Divine Ruins only prompted that it would open after three days, but it was unknown what time exactly. Now they stayed far away so they could not touch it. They did not know whether there were any other prompts. Not long after, Suo Fei could finally ease his worries. A rumbling sound was heard. Then, the originally narrow crack gradually widened like a gaping mouth. All the clamour was stilled in an instant. Just like the center of a vortex, a tremendous pulling force came and everything that surrounded it, be it a person or thing, was sucked in. It came too abruptly and too quickly. The ‘elites’ who were near the crack were the first to disappear in front of everyone. Suo Fei and Samael had been spared because they were at the periphery. What the f**k, what the hell is going on here? Why is the ominous feeling that it wouldn’t be good to enter the place growing stronger? Other secret places were typically extremely ambiguous and bashful. One wouldn’t be able to enter them even after teasing them in every possible way. This divine ruins, on the other hand, was so forthcoming, directly sucking people in. Suo Fei silently complained: I definitely said secret place, not chrysanthemum. Please don’t misinterpret it! Suo Fei grasped the little cub’s head and began ranting, “Lord Devourer, we’re in this together. You’re not fooling me, are you? We enter this thingie to hunt for treasure and not to be eaten, right?” The little cub’s head was in a lot of pain due to being grabbed, but when he heard Suo Fei call him lord, he immediately burst with joy and quickly replied, “Right! This is a treasury.” As soon as it spoke, a stronger pulling force came. This time, Suo Fei and his group couldn’t escape and were wholly sucked in. Suo Fei was somewhat flustered amidst the whirring sound. Fortunately, Samael was behind him, embracing him in his arms. When Suo Fei discovered that someone was supporting him, he suddenly felt that the weightlessness was not so scary. After a wave of dizziness passed, it seemed that they had entered inside the crack. Suo Fei opened his eyes and was immediately shocked by the sight. He had envisaged the place for the past few days, but he had not expected that there would be such a beautiful sight inside the crack. The sky was the purest of blue. It was a bright azure blue, which seemed as if it could cleanse the soul of anyone who catches sight of it. It didn’t need any source of light. This clear sky was the brightest and the most beautiful, enshrouding the place with warm and gentle radiance. Valinor had been regarded as the most beautiful place in Yalance, but compared to this, Valinor’s beauty seemed too striking and too resplendent. It lacked tranquility and serenity. Suo Fei admired in amazement. The sky was such a familiar color, but it was thousand times more beautiful. The mountains were high, and the peaks were lofty. The birds sang their sweetest songs, and the enchanting fragrance of flowers wafted through the air. The buildings were not piled with gems but were completely made of wood. Some were even wholly made of plants. With a huge flower bed and an exquisite treehouse, it seemed like a beautiful fairytale. It made people feel soft and warm from the bottom of their hearts. However, not the slightest breath of life could be found in such a beautiful place. There was no breath of life nor any sign of activity. It was like a freeze-frame of a magnificent landscape. Suo Fei who was in a trance suddenly heard Samael say something. He turned to look at Samael, only to find that he was still clinging onto him like an octopus. He quickly let go of Samael in embarrassment, but Samael continued to embrace his waist, motionless. Suo Fei asked him, “What did you just say?” Samael’s eyes were looking straight ahead, his purple eyes reflecting the beautiful scene in front of him. He seemed to be recalling something, “I’ve been here.” <i>Been here?</i> Suo Fei was stunned. How could that be? He was just about to ask when a sudden shout rang out, “Oh my god!” Suo Fei’s attention was drawn to the source of the sound and was suddenly stupefied. Then, cries of surprise in various languages of all the races rang out continuously. Indeed, it was too shocking. It was a mountain, a mountain that reached the sky. It was towering beyond anyone could imagine. However, that was not the main point. The main point was, it was a mountain of gold, silver, pearls and other treasures! It was a real mountain of treasure, not a mountain that was merely exaggeratedly decorated. After seeing the scene in front of him, Suo Fei thought, I would never dare say the word ‘blinded’ by the future. <i>Compared with this mountain of treasure, other things would be embarrassed to claim that they could blind people’s eyes!</i>  Everyone was dumbfounded in the face of such wealth. After being absent-minded for a few seconds, they swarmed towards the mountain of treasure. Everyone’s eyes flashed with greed and desire. They could still remain rational when facing ten thousand gold coins, a hundred thousand gold coins, or even a million gold coins. However, when such a large amount of wealth appeared, anyone would go crazy for it. At that moment, Suo Fei was itching to hurriedly fly over and fill up his interspatial bag. However, his remaining sanity allowed him to come to his senses. Don’t forget where you are. He silently gripped the dagger in his hands, extremely vigilant. When the first wave of people reached the mountain of treasure, they began to madly take away the valuable treasures. Then, the second wave swarmed in, and the third wave, and the fourth wave...; Suo Fei’s vigilance seemed ridiculous. In just a short span of a few minutes, the mountain was no longer visible. It was covered by a dense crowd of people. Suo Fei stood from afar and could see them clearly. Words couldn’t describe how frightening the scene was. The mountain of treasure was like a huge cake that released an aroma that was beyond comparison, attracting countless ants. Each and everyone who crowded around the mountain were like ants, surrounding the mountain of treasure completely. The dense and numerous ants wriggled around, extremely revolting. Suo Fei stared straight at it. Samael, on the other hand, had fallen into silence. The coldness in his eyes had dropped to the freezing point. Immense wrath rose from the bottom of his heart, burning through the layers upon layers of ice within. The mountain of treasure stood unshakeable. The avaricious crowd was no longer satisfied with sharing the treasures with others and disputes gradually arose. Then, it abruptly changed when the first drop of blood was spilled. The pure sky, the beautiful landscape and the mountain of treasure that was as dazzling as a mirror, all of it were like glass that shattered with a crash at this moment. Black cracks appeared in the sky one after another. Sharp shattering sounds blared ceaselessly. There was a loud noise, and finally, everything shattered, like a beautiful dream. Absolute silence and endless darkness surrounded them. After everything came to a standstill for half a second, a faint trace of light emerged. Then, they were met with a bone-chilling scene. <strong>T/N</strong>: <strong>Moss Piggy</strong> on CG discord shared this amazing RSG fanart!♡ Such talent uwu Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>Anna H.</strong>  The emerging light was not too subdued, but it elicited a sense of eeriness. The mountain of treasure had been turned into ruins and the air had been tainted with the stench of blood. Suo Fei was too far away to see anything clearly. However, the overpowering smell of blood was sickening. Looks of bewilderment filled the faces of everyone surrounding the mountain of treasure. Then, a piercing shrill broke the silence. Suo Fei abruptly looked over and went rigid. A huge beast that was about ten metres high stood near the ruins. Its blood-red eyes were bloodthirsty and frenzied, dark blood dripping from its mouth. It had ripped a living human into two. It stared fixedly at the people surrounding the ruins, hungrily swallowing its saliva. Several people lost their lives due to this sudden onslaught, but after all, those who could enter the crack were not weaklings. They reacted quickly. Archers, warriors and mages sprang into action one after another. Numerous attacks struck its body and bursts of sparks erupted. Unfortunately, when the bright sparks faded, it steadfastly stood its ground. The attacks that were powerful enough to level a mountain seemed to hit a piece of cotton, without causing any real damage. Everyone was terrified. <i>It’s definitely a ninth-grade ferocious beast. Ah, no. Perhaps a rare tenth-grade ferocious beast!</i>  The sense of death hung in the air. The ear-splitting roars that followed sunk everyone deeper into despair. <i>There’s more than one ferocious beast here!</i>  The whole place that was in darkness suddenly lit up, as if it was daytime, clearly revealing the scene before them. There were countless ferocious beasts that surrounded the crowd. They had different forms, but their eyes were blood-red and slobber hung from their lips. They had huge bodies that were more than ten metres high, like a moving giant fortress that swallowed everything. The people surrounding the mountain of treasure were trapped with nowhere to escape, like a sweet dessert waiting to be eaten. The ferocious beasts gathered slowly and opened their mouths to take people’s life. The horrifying bloodshed was a stark contrast to the former peace and tranquility. Suo Fei turned pale. He was not afraid of blood. In fact, he had skinned so many ferocious beasts before thus his tolerance for gory scenes was much higher than ordinary people. But at this moment, chills spread throughout his whole body and he was left unable to move. He leaned against Samael, but he still felt cold all over. Suddenly, he heard a whisper in his ears, “They ought to die, don’t they?” The voice was familiar but strange. Suo Fei’s heart went ice-cold and he didn’t dare turn his head. He didn’t even know what he was afraid of. At this moment, a ray of Holy Light flashed. The leader of the Celestials, Lancelot Hill, released a buff magic that had a wide AoE, placating the people who had lost all their hopes due to fear. Lancelot was the only Sacred High Priest in the whole Yalance. His buff spell could reinvigorate a vast amount of people and help subside their fears and dreads. He was not capable of attacking, but he was like a real god with his support skills, making people want to bow down in worship. In such a scenario, where people were maddened with panic, his conduct, his voice, and his entire being seemed to be the best tranquiliser, regaining people’s sense of reason, arousing the fighting spirit of everyone, and rekindling the flames of hope through despair. The son of the Demon King, Abel Murphy, was the first to move. His bone wings spread across the sky. His long black hair danced behind him, like a ribbon in the wind. He lifted a huge death scythe with one hand. The sharp-edged blade left a pitch-black trail as it directly cut through a ferocious beast. The ferocious beast fell to the ground. His effortless action imbued the entire affair with a sense of beauty. He killed a tenth-grade ferocious beast in such a casual manner. This was the Demon King’s son! This was the strength of Abel Murphy! The Prince of Elves Manzy Argoux took action immediately afterward. He stood from afar, his silver hair swayed across his back. His robes that were a mix of blue and white outlined his slender figure. He held an ice-blue bow and arrow in his hands, which exuded a chill in the air. It was gleamingly translucent, extremely resplendent. It was a weapon renowned in the whole of Yalance — Icemourne. Manzy’s exquisite face displayed not the slightest bit of emotion as he slowly drew the bow. Then, seven Icebolts were released at the same time and pierced through the air with a swoosh. An ice fog formed after hitting the ferocious beasts. Then, two ferocious beasts became frozen. Although this freezing time only remained for tens of seconds, it was already a substantial buffer time. The King of the Beastkins, Harris Vargo raised his Heavy Hammer and smashed the head of the frozen stiff ferocious beast into half. The mages who had regained their strengths worked together to smash the other ferocious beast. They exterminated three tenth-grade ferocious beasts within just a few minutes. Such strength would be terrifying outside the crack. However, there were countless more ferocious beasts left. At this time, Lancelot once again released his buff spell. Enshrouded by the Holy Light, the calm voice he released was amplified, “Everyone, please move towards the exit.” The crowd who were still flustered due to fear immediately came to their senses upon hearing this sentence. Indeed, there’s an exit! At this time, those who were sharp-eyed discovered that the narrow crack was slowly closing. Then, everyone discovered it and began flying towards the exit like a swarm of bees. The people surrounding the ruins deduced that the ferocious beasts could not fly. All of them had flying mounts. Thus, they got on their mounts one after another and flew upwards. However, there were too many people. Even if Lancelot ceaselessly released the spell that could soothe minds, he couldn’t appease so many people. Due to the stampede, many people fell off their mounts straight into the mouth of the ferocious beasts. After flying for a period of time, those who thought that the ferocious beasts could not fly were proven wrong. Not all ferocious beasts could fly, but there were still a lot of winged ferocious beasts. Hence, they were engaged in a battle in the sky. Nevertheless, they had the protection of Abel and the others. Under Lancelot’s arrangements, most people were able to smoothly advance towards the exit. The periphery of the action where Suo Fei stood could no longer be regarded as the periphery. Due to the crowd’s running about, the ferocious beasts had also been led to his side. Amidst the chaos, Suo Fei’s eyes instantly caught sight of a tiny dwarf, startling him to wakefulness. It’s Tilly Lannis’ son! Dwarves were not good at fighting, but they had a lot of items. Obviously, this dwarf had already used up his items. A ferocious beast was chasing him from behind, but his flying mount was not fast. Hence, he was about to be swallowed any moment soon. Suo Fei quickly pulled out his dagger and jumped onto the dwarf’s mount, directly facing the flying beast. He took a deep breath before jumping onto the back of the ferocious beast. When he reached out to touch the ferocious beast, the appraisal technique took effect and a stream of information was generated in his mind. <i>Sure enough, it’s a tenth-grade ferocious beast.</i>  Suo Fei had yet to spare a thought when the dagger had already swiftly stabbed the weak points of the ferocious beast and the ferocious beast lost its strength. All of this happened in an instant. He handed over the beast core of the Frostflame Beast that he had kept all this while to the dwarf, using it to prop up an ice shield. Then he said to him, “Fly towards the exit and don’t turn back.” At this moment, the little cub flew over. Samael reached out to embrace Suo Fei. Suo Fei looked up at Samael. The demon in front of him possessed a terrifying aura that was unfamiliar to him. Suo Fei couldn’t help but inwardly tremble. He pulled Samael’s collar and forced himself to stare at him before he vehemently called out, “Samael...; Samael...;” He couldn’t say anything else. He could only stare at his dull purple eyes and repeatedly call out his name. Samael finally looked at him and vitality gradually seeped into his lifeless eyes. He fixedly stared at Suo Fei. He didn’t recognise the face of the elf in his arms, but he could easily recognise the emotions brewing in his eyes. There were worry, nervousness and slight fear. Samael closed his eyes, lowered his head and kissed Suo Fei’s pale lips. He then whispered, “Don’t be afraid. I’m here.” He settled Suo Fei in a safe place before he drew the Asura Blade from its sheath and activated it. The pitch-black sword emanated a dangerous aura. Samael one-handedly held the sword and jumped on top of a flying ferocious beast. The sword flashed in all directions. The ferocious beasts fell one after another wherever he went. He moved very fast, entering the vast stretch of tenth-grade ferocious beasts as if it was an uninhabited piece of land. The Asura Blade had been stained with plenty of blood but it remained a gloomy black. Even so, it was roiling with sword Qi as it glowed with an eye-catching radiance. He was alone, but he was like a nuclear bomb. Blood mists exploded in succession among the masses of ferocious beasts. It was frightening. His fighting strength was more terrifying than that of the demon king’s son, Abel. His agility was also greater than the Elven prince, Manzy. However, no one knew who he was. After being stunned for a moment, cheers sounded out. Whoever he was, such strength was enough for everyone to cheer with their hands up in the air. With the ferocious fighting strength on their side, the situation finally took a turn for the better. However, they were still pressed with time as the crack was gradually closing. Even if they managed to annihilate all the ferocious beasts, it didn’t mean that they would be safe from danger. Lancelot commanded the crowd to leave. They had already lost a third of their clan members, thus they must save as many people as they possibly could. Hundreds of ferocious beasts had been sliced into half and a lot of people had managed to escape. More or less everyone who participated in the battle had been injured. The demon who had slain ferocious beasts with his jet-black sword remained on the ground. He was bathed in blood, standing victorious with his sword. The crack’s opening had become smaller and smaller. Fortunately, more and more people had escaped. Although Suo Fei was able to fight on his own, his physical strength was unable to sustain him for too long. He could easily escape the attacks of the ferocious beasts thanks to the little cub, meanwhile using this opportunity to kill plenty of them. The little cub flew towards Samael while Suo Fei, who was slightly dizzy due to exhaustion, rested on its back. However, a door of light suddenly appeared behind Samael at this moment. It was a lofty arch, but nothing could be seen apart from the dazzling, bright light that shone from within it. He couldn’t see the expression of Samael who stood against the light, but fear rose from the bottom of his heart. Suo Fei turned pale with fright. He wanted to warn Samael, but his voice was stuck in his throat as Samael had already disappeared into the door of light. Suo Fei’s heart went cold seeing Samael disappear right in front of his eyes, chilling him down to his bones. He involuntarily cried out. The little cub reacted quickly, bringing Suo Fei straight to the ground. At this moment, a huge pulling force came from behind him and Suo Fei was unable to prevent himself from being dragged in. The author has something to say: Suo Fei: Many new characters appeared in this chapter. Western names are difficult to remember but babes, just remember that they’re all my lil’shous ~~ o (* ￣ ▽ ￣ *) ゞ Suo Fei abruptly opened his eyes and looked around, wondering where Samael was. However, his eyes were clearly open yet he could not see anything. All he could see was utter darkness, as if he was blind. Suo Fei groped around but felt nothing. The place was empty. He tried to walk but he couldn’t tell whether he was actually walking forward. This strange feeling that Suo Fei was unable to define made him unable to feel his own existence. Suo Fei had no way of judging the time. It seemed like a long time had passed, yet it also seemed to have only been a short while. His heart gradually calmed down from its deeply anxious state. He almost thought that there would be no end to this desolation when a trace of light suddenly flashed. As if he had grasped onto a life-saving straw, Suo Fei ran towards the light and he fell into it. The place was as bright as day. Suo Fei squinted as his eyes adjusted to the sudden brightness. Then, he slowly opened his eyes. It was astounding. There was a vast expanse of whiteness all around him that seemed like shrouds of fog or a massive white wall. He didn’t touch it as his attention had been drawn by the video playing beside him. That’s right, a video. It was just like watching a 3D movie. A surround sound was even used. Suo Fei watched intently. There was a little baby on the screen. Then, an old lady appeared and attentively took care of the baby. The child gradually grew up, evoking a smile from the old lady. Suo Fei’s eyes immediately reddened. The old lady turned out to be his grandmother. Suo Fei couldn’t remember how many years he had not seen his grandma thus his tears fell at the sight of her. The slowed-down clips were his memory. His past memories. Suo Fei watched them earnestly. There were some that he couldn’t remember while there were also some that seemed as if it had happened yesterday, immensely unforgettable. The video sped up. When Suo Fei saw his grandma’s last smile, the video became even faster. It reached the time when he lived alone and stayed cooped up inside his home playing games energetically until he played 《Yalance》. Then, the speed became faster. He saw Vixanne, Grantlyn, Manzy and then he met Samael in the Knuhl Forest. Like a bystander, he watched everything that happened over the past more than two years in Knuhl Forest, Mauer City, Dwarven Territory, Benesse City and Bois Canyon. He went to all of these places together with Samael. He suddenly realised that he had never separated from Samael ever since he met him. In his short life, apart from his grandma whom he had depended on when he was younger, it was Samael who had been with him for the longest time. And he only realised it at this moment. He saw Samael holding him at the waist. He lowered his head slightly and kissed him gently on his forehead. There was a trace of softness in his purple eyes as he moved carefully in fear of waking him up. Suo Fei fixedly looked on and felt himself blush up to his ears. He vaguely felt it for the past more than two years but he had never seen it as clear as it was at that moment. He and Samael are too intimate. Friends would not act this way...; The scene was still playing, but the speed became much faster. Suo Fei saw the two of them in Bois Canyon. He tried to kill a ferocious beast on his own but failed so he was rescued by Samael. He tried again and failed again. This cycle continued until he managed to kill a fifth-grade ferocious beast by himself. Rejoicing over his success, he happily hugged the little cub and jumped up and down. Samael smilingly looked on by the side. The smile was very faint, but for a person who did not like to smile, this smile came from the bottom of his heart, genuine and pure, filled with indulgence and pampering. If this was actually a video, Suo Fei would like to pause the screen on this smile. He looked at it dazedly. His heartbeat was extremely fast as if something couldn’t help but burst out. Taking a deep breath, he suppressed it down and continued watching. The scene played so fast that it was almost impossible for the human eye to see. However, since it was his own memory, Suo Fei was barely able to postulate where it was progressing. A crack appeared in the sky, they entered the crack...; Tenth-grade ferocious beasts...; Violent massacre...; ...;...; Wait. Suo Fei watched in shock. It had already reached the present time, but the video was still playing. It was just that it was too fast that it was impossible to see it clearly. It was as if a large number of pictures had been compiled together into an extremely fast slideshow. Suo Fei was shocked. If the previous scenes are my past, what is on the screen at this moment then? Is it my future? Suo Fei instantly became more alert because of this realisation. He desperately wanted to see the contents, but the speed was so fast that his eyes could not take it all in. He could not see anything else apart from the riot of colours. The more anxious he was, the more he was unable to see it clearly. He was given the opportunity to foresee the future but he couldn’t grasp it. Suo Fei was depressed. Just when he was about to give up, the video suddenly slowed down. Suo Fei was joyful, thinking about how much he’d be able to see and what he would be able to see. <i>Would Vixanne survive? Would Grantlyn get his retribution? Would he and Samael...; still be together?</i>  He watched with great interest. There was a black screen at first, then it suddenly lit up. Suo Fei’s eyes widened. He abruptly closed his eyes after the screen became a vast expanse of whiteness. He saw it. He saw his chest being pierced. The blood dyed his clothes red and painted the whole scene crimson. Then, the video that had been continuously playing stopped, plunging into darkness. Suo Fei stood in a daze, his eyes unblinking. He saw his own death. It was the Asura Blade that ended his life. The familiar pure black sword guzzled the blood pouring out from his chest, mercilessly robbing his life. He saw the arm of the swordsman. The sleeve was black and only the cuff was adorned with a silver pattern. The exposed hand was fair and slender. It held the sword in a casual yet elegant manner. He was very casual. It wasn’t as if he was killing someone, but as if he was only casually raising his hand. Suo Fei’s mind was in chaos. He would die, not in an accident, but because he would be killed. This was not impossible. But why would he be killed by the Asura Blade? Although he did not see the appearance of the swordsman, Asura Blade was a Divine Artifact that was bound by blood. No one except Samael could activate it. And he was killed by the activated Asura Blade. Isn’t it obvious what this means? He...; would be killed by Samael. <i>Why?</i>  <i>Why would Samael kill him...;</i>  The scene kept replaying in Suo Fei’s mind, like a curse that struck a chill into his heart, spreading fear within him. <i>Why...;</i>  <i>Did he do something wrong?</i>  The vast expanse of whiteness that surrounded him disappeared and returned to the boundless darkness he was initially in. Suo Fei couldn’t see himself or anyone else. He didn’t know where he was. There was only the last scene stuck in his mind. The bloodstains all over his clothes, the merciless blade, and the person’s cold and indifferent appearance. Pow...;...; A loud explosion sounded. The place filled with boundless darkness began to shatter. It was as if a gigantic black curtain was being torn apart. Light shone through the gaps, invading the darkness. He was not surrounded by nothingness any longer. Suo Fei slowly raised his head and caught sight of an extremely beautiful face. It was an appearance that could not be replicated by any craftsman. His slightly droopy eyes could send pulses racing out of control. It was Samael. Suo Fei blankly looked up. The next moment, he was tightly embraced by Samael. The hands around his waist were clasped extremely firmly, but Suo Fei did not sense any pain at all. He only sensed a familiar scent and a familiar warmth. Everything was familiar, so familiar that he could not be any more familiar with it. He also became so at ease that he could not be any more at ease. Samael’s voice was somewhat hoarse: “It’s okay. I’m here.” His voice was extremely low, but it rushed straight into Suo Fei’s heart, causing him to tremble ever so slightly. He hesitantly responded by reaching out to hug Samael. Samael stiffened but the hands holding onto Suo Fei’s became firmer, almost as if he wanted their flesh to melt into each other. He spoke softly, “There is a Magic Array of Time here where you will see many things. If you get absorbed in it, you may be thoroughly devoured.” Suo Fei was stunned. At this time, he finally got over the last scene he saw. He then smelled a faint trace of blood in the air. He broke free from Samael’s embrace and saw a long cut on his arm, straight from his shoulder to the wrist. The blood had already stopped flowing, but the tearing of the wound was bloodcurdling. He was caught in a daze earlier so he didn’t pay much attention. It was only at this moment that he discovered that Samael’s complexion was absurdly pale. It was apparent that he had lost a lot of blood. He didn’t know whether it was because Samael was dealing with the hordes of ferocious beasts or because he forcibly destroyed the magic array in front of him. Suo Fei didn’t dwell on it. Instead, he took out a large amount of beast blood from his interspatial bag and quickly handed it to Samael. Seeing Samael drinking it up, he subsequently raised Samael’s arm and gently kissed the wound. A short while later, Samael’s hideous wound recovered and Suo Fei was finally relieved. Suo Fei quickly transferred a large portion of the beast blood from his interspatial bag and stored it in Samael’s interspatial bag. The beast blood was neatly arranged by him using the sorting spell and they were stored in moderately-sized jars. These jars had been specifically ordered by Suo Fei. Although it was only the size of a beer glass, its actual capacity was as large as a water tank. Spatial magic had been installed inside it for it to be able to store more beast blood. Suo Fei busily supplied Samael’s beast blood. Once he had finished, he attached the interspatial bag back to Samael’s waist. Samael’s complexion had also regained some of its colour. Suo Fei saw the Asura Blade from the corner of his eyes and he couldn’t help but be startled, quickly shifting his eyes away. Without much thought, he asked, “What did you see?” He immediately regretted asking the question. It was difficult to talk about so why did he mention this? He knew Samael’s past better than anyone else, so why did he mention it again and expose his scars? Samael was undisturbed as he replied, “It’s just some illusions. It’s not real.” Suo Fei looked up at him. It wasn’t real? How come? Samael explained, “Except for the memories after meeting you, nothing else belongs to me.” Suo Fei was confounded by this sentence. He instinctively understood that Samael didn’t want to mention those past events. Indeed, nothing good happened in the past. Discarding those memories was the right thing to do. Thus, he stopped asking. However, Samael asked him in return, “You?” The scene where he was pierced by the Asura Blade instantly resurfaced in his mind. Suo Fei looked up at Samael who was also looking at him. His eyes were like a beautiful amethyst, but there was only his reflection in that crystal. The memory of the past two years lucidly rushed into his mind. This person had always been with him, guarding him, protecting him. How could he suspect him? Suo Fei stared into his eyes and asked upfront, “Will there ever be a day where you’ll point your sword towards me?” Samael straight-forwardly answered, “That would absolutely never happen.” I believe you. The gloom in Suo Fei’s heart completely dissipated and his eyes were filled with joy. Standing on tiptoe, he kissed those pale pink lips. Bonus chapter as thanks to <b>Anna H</b>~ Suo Fei was a typical example of someone who had the heart but not the guts. He had lived for so long yet apart from the wild and colourful imaginations floating in his mind, this was absolutely the first time he had taken the initiative to kiss someone, even more so on the lips. So when his lips touched Samael’s slightly cold lips, he panicked. Damn, what should I do now? How do the gongs in the movies and games do it? F**k, it seems that the skill came naturally to them! This should be an innate skill! Imploring this gong’s soul to awaken...; Suo Fei was standing on tiptoe and his lips were attached to Samael’s lips. He was frozen with his eyes wide open. Samael lightly brushed his lips against his and whispered, “Close your eyes.” Suo Fei immediately closed his eyes. With his eyes closed, his other senses were magnified infinitely. He felt Samael’s arms encircling his waist and pulling him closer. The two bodies were pressed tightly together. Every inch of his skin could feel Samael’s heat radiating through their soft silky clothes. Suo Fei slightly opened his mouth and their gentle kissing became more heated. His eyes were tightly shut. The elation he was feeling from their intertwined lips turned his mind into mush and he was unable to focus on anything else but the kiss. He indulged himself in his embrace, hesitantly responding, which was reciprocated with an even more passionate ravaging. Passion rose within him like an inferno, setting his body ablaze. He clung onto Samael as he deepened the kiss, his arms involuntarily hooking around Samael’s neck for support. The sense of breathlessness engulfed him, robbing him the ability to think clearly until Samael released him. The sudden presence of air made him gasp for breath. His legs were shaky from the kiss so he tightly leaned on Samael. Samael was still holding him at the waist, their noses nuzzling and their breath mingling with one another’s. “Liked it?” Suo Fei was still light-headed. He only felt that the person in front of him was good-looking. So good-looking that he would obey all of his orders and answer all of his questions. Thus, he replied loudly, “Like!” His answer was resolute without the slightest hesitation. As he had hoped, he caught sight of Samael’s eyes gleaming with joy. Foolish Fei was elated once again so he quickly repeated, “I liked it. I really really liked it.” Samael stared at him. Unlike Suo Fei’s muddled state, there was unconcealed fondness and indulgence in his eyes. His deep voice slowly uttered out words that seemed like an eternal vow, “Me too.” Suo Fei felt warm in his heart. He had never felt this way before. Really happy, really content and really want to...; kiss the person in front of him. So, he acted on instinct and leaned forward once again. He was inexperienced at first but learned quickly. Samael kissed him gently and tenderly at this moment. Suo Fei could finally keep up with his pace. He had learnt that they could kiss longer if he breathed in through his nose. “Crack...;” Suo Fei’s pointed ears twitched. It was followed by a loud bang. Suo Fei came to his senses and finally realized where they were at. Oh, I was too happy that I forgot that I’m still inside the dreadful treasury! Oh my, I actually ‘forcefully kissed’ Samael twice in a row in such a dangerous place. Oh my, ​​I’m truly a beast. Truly a beast gong! Come on, hurry and give yourself a like, Suo Fei. Foolish (in every sense of the word) Fei, whose head was extremely high up in the clouds, had sparkling eyes and flushed cheeks. He pecked Samael’s lips once again before turning his head to the source of the sound. They were inside a room that had no doors and windows. There was only a huge lamp on the ceiling that illuminated the entire room. Then, cracking sounds rang out. The black walls that surrounded them exploded one after another like a chain reaction. Suo Fei was startled. Immediately after seeing the cracked black walls exploding, those that were trapped behind the wall fell to the ground. Two, three, four, five...;...; There were four people and one beast. Suo Fei rushed over when he saw the little cub. This fellow was in a much worse condition than it initially was. Its ultimate form was extremely huge thus it fell to the ground with a deafening crash. Suo Fei examined its entire body and found that it had no external injuries and seemed to have only fainted. Suo Fei heaved a sigh of relief. Then, Samael’s voice sounded, “The magic array has been broken.” Suo Fei realised that these people must have been like him, trapped within the Magic Array of Time. Samael broke the balance when he rescued him, thus releasing all these people. Although Suo Fei had a low affinity for magic and was not efficient in practicing magic, he had vastly improved his healing ability during the past two years he had spent in Bois Canyon. On one hand, it could conceal the fact that he could heal others through a kiss. On the other hand, it improved his capability as he had mastered a lot of healing spells. It was just that there were only a few spellbooks in the whole Yalance that were related to healing. Nevertheless, these few spellbooks had been kept for him by Vixanne. He cast several healing spells to the little cub and observed that it had greatly recovered. It was only then that he felt disposed to look at the other four people. ...;All of them were acquaintances. Six enormous wings were encircled around the person right in front of him. He had dazzling golden hair and was clad in pure white robes that were embroidered with fine gold. Suspended on his forehead was an exquisite jeweled pendant. He was stunning as he lay unconscious on the ground, so beautiful that no one would dare to disturb him. It was his last lil’ shou, the Celestial’s belle that could only be admired from afar — Lancelot Hill. Seeing Lancelot at this moment, Suo Fei was completely overcome with emotions. Lancelot was in his adult form so his strength must be heaven-defying. In order to top him, Suo Fei first needed to find a lost forbidden technique that could seal Lancelot’s abilities and turn him into an extremely gentle and demure teenager. Only then would he be easy to sleep with. Well, he didn’t manage to sleep with him in the end. Suo Fei shifted his gaze to the left. The person’s short black hair was sticking up in all directions. He was wearing a shirt, pants and high leather boots. His legs were long and slender. Even though he was unconscious, he laid on his back with his legs closed and arms folded across his stomach. He appeared uncustomarily serious with his eyes closed. It was his next-to-last lil’ shou, the third prince of the Demons — Abel Murphy. The difficulty of conquering Abel was second only to Lancelot. Also, the two were extremely incompatible. If Lancelot was conquered before Abel, then Abel would go into a rage and the difficulty of the conquering him would increase by ten folds. It was simply fatally difficult. Moreover, this character was extremely abominable. Even after successfully conquering him, his monopolistic tendencies were so over-the-top that he often subdued the other lil’ shous with violence. Suo Fei thought that if it wasn’t for the last 10P feast, he would have kicked this thing out of the harem. Not wanting to look at him any longer, Suo Fei quickly shifted his gaze to the right. The man was lying on his side and his long, silky hair was scattered on the floor. He was wearing an elegant long robe. The exposed skin was fair and smooth. His unconscious appearance made him seem delicate. Although he had the body of an adult, every cut and curve of his body revealed the slenderness that only a youth would have. Such a frail scholarly appearance...; In Suo Fei’s eyes, he’s the epitome of a shou. Unfortunately, if you thought that he would be easy to sleep with, then you couldn’t be more wrong. The delicate and weak shou was actually the brutally violent King of the Beastkins who upheld the belief that physical strength is supreme. This stark contrast had once greatly surprised Suo Fei. His arms and legs might be slender but the strength within them was definitely inversely proportional to their size. He could even crash a mountain with his hammer. Suo Fei’s jaw almost hit the floor when he had chanced upon that sight. Suo Fei shifted his gaze to the last person and suddenly wanted to cover his eyes. It was his ‘old friend’ — Manzy Argoux. The lil’ shous he had once cherished actually appeared together in front of him. Suo Fei lamented: It’s truly unfortunate that this famed gong is already taken. Y’all should just give up, alright...; Suo Fei didn’t have the slightest intention of waking them up. They were currently in the treasury and he was set on obtaining the resurrection artifact. Should he wake them up just for them to compete with him? It was already righteous of him not to seize this opportunity to attack them. Five passages appeared after the destruction of the walls. If Samael and Suo Fei’s were added, then there were seven passages in total. The passages surrounded them in a circle. They were pitch-black, deeming it impossible for anyone to tell what’s beyond them. There weren’t any other prompts. Suo Fei ignored the four people who were ‘sleeping’ on the ground, pondering which passage he should enter. The first, second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth or seventh? It was too difficult to choose. Suo Fei wasn’t indecisive, but he completely had no idea where to go. Samael spoke at this time, “Here.” He was referring to the passage behind Suo Fei which was the passage ‘belonging’ to Suo Fei. Well, since Samael said so. The little cub was still unconscious. Suo Fei walked over and patted its head before shouting into his ears, “Chowhound, get up.” The little cub remained motionless, sleeping like a log. Suo Fei knitted his brows as his mind churned. He immediately got an idea. He took out a piece of warm, perfectly roasted meat from his interspatial bag and placed it near its nose. Its nose was like a radar that immediately recognised the aroma. Quivering, it opened its mouth to eat. Suo Fei quickly moved the barbecue away so the little cub ate nothing but air. Its teeth clashing together woke it up. It saw Suo Fei smilingly looking at him when it opened its eyes. Suo Fei clunked its head while holding the roasted meat on his other hand. He then said, “Follow me.” The little cub was still dazed, its big eyes spinning. It didn’t clearly hear what Suo Fei had said but its nose was facing the roasted meat. Suo Fei walked ahead and it followed the aroma of roasted meat that was in Suo Fei’s hand. They walked towards the passage. As there was no light, Suo Fei cast an illuminating spell, igniting a tiny source of light on his fingertip. Having magic is so convenient. They had just taken a few steps towards the passage when they heard rumbling sounds behind them. A rumbling sound had been always been a f**king ominous sign ever since they entered the treasury. Could it be that the passage is collapsing? Suo Fei turned around and was shocked. The room they were in was not small. It was at least twenty square metres. At this moment, the roof disappeared and was replaced by a vertically-pupilled gigantic eye that was looking down into the room. F**k. Its eye is already so big. Just how big could its body be? The author has something to say: I went to watch Star Trek, it was great! Curly Fu had already taken me captive with just his deep voice. Ahhhhh! So charming! By the way, a good friend recommended an English drama today. It’s called “Vicious” which is a story about two gays who had lived together for 48 years. It’s really funny 【Although I’ve only watched one episode】. Also, I don’t know how everyone who’s taking the gaokao faring! Long Qi is silently cheering for you. I wish you success! The gigantic eye that had suddenly appeared was extremely horrifying to look at from below. Suo Fei and Samael just happened to be inside the passage, giving them enough cover to escape the sight of the gigantic eye. The eye glanced around the room. Then, it stared at the unconscious Harris Vargo. After a while, the gigantic eye suddenly left, leaving a roofless ceiling. Suo Fei was perplexed. It just left? What the—? The eye had disappeared. Then, a large tree immediately came from above. That’s right...; It was a large tree that was no less than a person’s armspan. However, the tree had been cut horizontally, thus it was no longer a tree. It had become a large tree log. There seemed to be something holding the other end of the log. Suo Fei looked on as the log’s end landed on the ground and moved clumsily. It took a long time for it to reach Harris’ side. Suo Fei watched in fear as it grew closer to Harris. If such alarge log thumped Harris...; It would be fine if the bloke was awake as he could just break it with a slap. However, he was still unconscious. Suo Fei also wasn’t sure whether he had a self-defense shield or something. If he didn’t, then he would be crippled from that strike, if not dead. Suo Fei still had a favourable impression of Harris. Although this brat tended to act like a wolf in sheep’s clothing, he was not the least bit lacking in terms of the Beastkin’s straightforward and enthusiastic nature. It would be such a pity for him to be crushed to death. However, Suo Fei also wasn’t sure of the current situation, hence he dared not rashly go out. If he revealed himself, he would most likely implicate Samael and the little cub. He simply couldn’t come to a decision. At this time, the large log finally reached Harris’ side. Then, it clumsily yet very cautiously bumped into Harris. First bump, no response. Second bump, still no response. During the third time, it could be seen that the fellow ‘holding’ the log was becoming somewhat irritated. He used more strength, directly flipping Harris over. Suo Fei: How could you be so rough towards a beauty! Harris remained asleep despite the jolting, except that his position changed from lying on his side to lying prostrate on the ground. ⸺What a classic pose of a beauty lying prone like a dog! Seeing him this way, the log abruptly stopped. After a long while, he finally managed to restrain his temper and resumed on budging Harris. Suo Fei finally came to a realisation when he saw him tossing about. It seemed that the ‘log’ wanted to make Harris lie on his back. Unfortunately, the tree log was too large and Harris was too slim, making it hard for him to control his strength. Let’s put ourselves in his position. Imagine trying to flip an ant over using a chopstick. It would be really difficult, no? Fortunately, although he was moving the log somewhat rashly, he was still slightly cautious. He tossed about for a while before finally successfully turning Harris over, revealing his precious face. Then, the log withdrew away from the roof and, unsurprisingly, the gigantic eye appeared once again. Sure enough, this thing was the one who was budging Harris. The gigantic eye turned to carefully look at Harris. A trace of disappointment flashed in it when it saw him. After that, he seemed somewhat unreconciled. The gigantic eye strenuously observed him several times more. Unfortunately, the room was too small for him and he could only survey him for a long time. At last, the gigantic eye finally left. After a while, the roof that had disappeared was actually returned. Suo Fei, who watched the whole farce, only had this reaction: o (╯ □ ╰) o. Everything returned to the way it had been before. He initially thought that the gigantic eye was a murderous monster. Hence, he tried to think of a way to fight against it but it turned out to be just a false alarm. At this time, Samael quietly spoke, “He should be looking for someone.” Suo Fei came to the same conclusion as Samael. Thinking about it carefully, he indeed seemed to be looking for someone. Lancelot and Abel had been lying on their backs thus he could already see them clearly. Harris, who was lying on his side, was the only one whose face he could not see. Thus, the gigantic eye made a large log to move him. After seeing his face clearly, he discovered that Harris didn’t seem to be the person he was looking for. Hence, he disappointedly left. The farce boggled his mind but knowing that he was looking for someone was of no use to them. There were too many strange things in this treasury. They didn’t even get a single gold coin, let alone any artifact. It first deceived the people who entered the treasury before proceeding to kill them. Then now, it placed them in a maze game. In conclusion, they should act in a low-key manner since it would be better to court less disasters. Turning his mind to the situation at hand, Suo Fei refused to believe that Harris didn’t wake up from all that disturbance. With the large log budging him like that, he would have woken up from a shock, let alone a brief unconsciousness. Obviously, he was just pretending to be unconscious. If he had not covertly flipped himself over in the end, the large tree log would have fiddled with him for God knows how long just to see his face. Suo Fei quietly stayed inside the dark passage. After a while, he saw Harris opening his eyes and quickly jumping to his feet, his actions as nimble as a cheetah. After looking around to determine the situation he was in, Harris squinted his long and narrow eyes and relaxed his vigilance, accentuating his inherent fragility. He successively scrutinised the three unconscious people. He first stared at Abel in silence before walking towards Lancelot. The Beastkins were on friendly terms with the Demons whereas Celestials were on friendly terms with the Elves. Harris was in a good mood after seeing the unconscious Lancelot. He slightly bent forward and his gaze landed on his enormous wings. Then, he reached out to pull out a handful.. Suo Fei: Bro...; Do you think that’s chicken feathers? Also, what a shame that I actually forgot to pull out a handful. The feathers of the Celestials are very valuable. They could even be considered as rare material. Harris was too aggressive thus he directly plucked a big handful as if he was plucking sheep wool. The wings now had a small f**king patch of bald spot. After the assault, he quickly moved to Abel’s side and kicked him hard in the butt. His movements were quick and decisive. Obviously, he had thought of doing this a long time ago. After that, the brat ‘delicately’ 【fog】 cried out and fell down on his side. Then, he continued acting unconscious. A handful of feathers had been plucked out from Lancelot and Abel’s butt had been kicked fiercely. The two woke up almost simultaneously and the first thing they saw were each other’s faces. Their rage value immediately rose straight to its maximum value. Lancelot: F**k, dared to pluck Laozi’s wool, I mean, feathers?! Abel: F**k, dared to kick Laozi’s a**hole, I mean, butt?! Both, in unison: Bastard, Laozi will beat you up! As a result, the two paid no heed to their current location and impulsively started fighting each other. Suo Fei: ...; Y’all are blinding my delicate eyes. He held Samael’s hand and lead the little cub. Then, he hurriedly walked deep into the passage. <i>I must be far away from these two vermins or else I would definitely be f**king infected! </i>  It was pitch-black inside the passage. Even though Suo Fei used his illuminating spell, they still couldn’t see far ahead. Hence, they could only walk slowly. Nevertheless, Suo Fei didn’t have any sense of fear with Samael by his side. Instead, it felt rather wonderful as the two walked with their hands entwined deep into the mysterious passage. Therefore, don’t associate a normal person’s way of thinking with that of a person in love, especially if one of them was already not normal to begin with. Even though they walked slowly, they reached the end of the passage not a long while after. It was a wall, or rather, it was a tightly shut door. Suo Fei increased the intensity of the illuminating spell, exposing the whole door from the magic’s light. It was a jet-black door of unknown material that felt bone-piercingly cold to touch. Suo Fei, after all, was still an elf so he could still understand magic. He felt powerful magical fluctuations with just a slight touch. Obviously, there was a magic barrier on the door. Suo Fei initially wanted Samael to open the door with brute force, but ceased the thought after discovering the barrier’s presence. If it was rashly destroyed, it could lead to a powerful magic explosion. It was hard to say what would happen at that time. Suo Fei carefully studied the door. There wasn’t any keyhole or knob. It was only a smooth surface. “Here.” Samael prompted Suo Fei to move the illuminating spell upwards. At the uppermost corner, there was a round, palm-sized disc that was carved with an embossed symbol. Suo Fei keenly inspected it. After a while, he hesitantly asked, “Is it a flame symbol?” Samael nodded and placed his hand on top of the symbol. It lit up for a moment and then went dark again. He took his hand away and told Suo Fei after a thought, “Try it.” Suo Fei placed his hand and it immediately lit up. It didn’t turn dark but there also wasn’t any other changes. It merely glimmered a crimson glow like a blazing hot flame. There was only this change. They didn’t see any other change no matter how they examined it, let alone the opening of the door. But why did the flame light up after Suo Fei placed his hand on it? Puzzled, they could only forget about it for now. They walked back through the passage into the room. Lancelot and Abel had finished fighting each other. They were tiredly panting for breath, but they had already regained their rationality. Harris, who feigned unconsciousness, and Manzy had also woken up. When Suo Fei and Samael appeared, the four of them turned to look at them one after another. Samael and Suo Fei were still in disguise and seemed to be two ordinary demons. Suo Fei used his facial paralysis skill under their gazes, remaining still and impassive. Samael straightforwardly said, “We are trapped in here. It would be better for us to think of a way to go out together.” Lancelot vigilantly observed them. The Demons were never easy to deal with. He didn’t trust any Demon. “Who are you?” “Samael.” His voice was calm as he continued, “This is Suo Fei.” Hearing the name, Manzy’s gaze sharply landed at Suo Fei. Slight exhaustion could be seen in his silver eyes, but it now zealously stared at Suo Fei. Suo Fei didn’t expect Samael to directly reveal his real name. He could only continue to put on a stoic expression. He believed in his Disguise Spell. It wasn’t because he looked down on his lil’ shous, but because it was truly difficult for them to see through it with their current ability. Sure enough, after staring at him for a long time, the zeal in Manzy’s eyes was quashed and he resumed a cold and indifferent appearance. It’s only a Demon that has the same name...; The author has something to say: There are too many evil influences around me. There’s anime, novels, movies, TV dramas, WOW and all kinds of single-player games...; And then there’s the beautiful J3 characters who are ready to make trouble. My god, give me ten more hours in a day! Bonuus chapter as thanks to <strong>Anna H</strong>‘s kofis~ The six people revealed their names. The other four already knew each other beforehand thus they revealed their real names. However, they didn’t disclose their identities. Samael didn’t mention the Magic Array of Time from before. The others also didn’t mention it. Nevertheless, they seemed to not be affected in the slightest. Their eyes were bright, bodies brimming with strength. Samael briefly described what he and Suo Fei had seen inside the passage, causing everyone to be lost in thought. Evidently, it was a door. They didn’t know where it led to, but at least there’s an exit. However, they were unable to ascertain how exactly they could open the door. What’s the special meaning of the flame emblem? Lancelot spoke after pondering for a moment, “Could it be that it needs fire magic?” His speculation was reasonable, but unfortunately, no one out of the six people and one beast knew fire magic. Abel cast a sidelong glance at him and spoke in an unpleasant tone: “Suo Fei’s a demon yet he was able to light up the flame emblem. Are you saying that a demon knows fire magic? If us Demons had even a little bit of magic affinity, we wouldn’t have let your flock of chicken wings be so arrogant!” Chicken wings...; Suo Fei tried hard not to laugh. Those two words were clearly Lancelot’s sore spot. He didn’t bother with words and swiftly raised his magic staff. A light-type spell descended from above and directly hit Abel’s head. Abel was an S-tier assassin so he was proficient in physical attacks and agility. However, he didn’t expect Lancelot to lose his temper so easily thus wasn’t able to dodge him in time. After the light had dissipated, Abel’s shiny and dashing short jet-black hair time had been scorched into a ball of mess. Lancelot said coldly, “Someone who has a chicken nest on his head shouldn’t talk so much!” Suo Fei: ...;Don’t make this Laozi laugh! Abel became mad in an instant. He whizzed towards Lancelot, his mouth snarling with curses, “Laozi will stab you to death, you birdman! Seeing that they were about to start fighting once again, Harris hurried forward and restrained Abel with his thin and delicate arms. To be honest, apart from Samael, only this Berserker could hold back Abel. Abel didn’t have the power to stop him. He tried to struggle free as his mouth rambled on, “Harris, are you a Beastkin or a birdman? If you’re a Beastkin, then let go of me. I must fight him to the death today. Harris was well aware that when dealing with someone bristling with anger, one had to softly pet their fur. He heard Manzy reasoning out with Lancelot without offending either of the two. He didn’t praise him but merely implored him to calm down. He, on the other hand, used his might to restrain Abel so that he couldn’t move. Naturally, he also calmed down after some time. This was the difference between the King of Beastkins and a prince. Manzy was the only one among them who knew magic. Although he was always cold-faced, he had the highest chance of resolving their dispute. He cast a Cleanse spell, successfully returning our king’s chicken nest hair back to its charming and elegant appearance. They finally calmed down after much tossing about. Suo Fei watched with a blazing headache when he thought of teaming up with this group of people who would definitely be honoured to betray their teammates. In order to not repeat the earlier incident, Samael gave them no chance to speak and immediately spoke, “There are six other channels apart from the one we’ve been in. We should check them one by one to see if there’s any connection to one another. “Let’s not split up,” Harris said. Samael assented, “Alright.” The six people and one beast began exploring the place. They first went inside the passage that was initially behind Samael, which was also pitch-dark. Manzy was the one to cast an illuminating spell this time. The group reached the end of the passage not long after. There was also a door that was exactly the same as the previous passage, except that the emblem had changed. Manzy released an intense light on the emblem and it became more visible. It was a disc that had lines intersecting in the middle. Harris looked at it for a while before expressing, “What is this? It’s so abstract.” The others didn’t know how to describe what they were seeing, hence they remained silent. The irritable Abel grunted and said, “Isn’t it just a wheel?” Uh...; After he said that, they looked at the emblem again and felt that he could be right. The previous one was a fire symbol while this one was a wheel. Could there be a connection between these trivialities? Furthermore, Lancelot previously surmised that the flame was related to fire-type magic. According to this idea, this emblem should also be related to a certain magic type. However, what magic type could the wheel represent? It just doesn’t make sense. He couldn’t help but suspect that Abel’s casual remark was in hopes of proving Lancelot wrong. Abel felt magnanimous at the moment so he shrugged indifferently before saying, “This is definitely not related to some kind of magic type. It doesn’t matter whether you believe it or not. We’ve only been to two passages. There’s still five more. Let’s go have a look at each of them to find out what actually is going on.” This was indeed the case. Just when everyone was about to leave, Samael suddenly said, “Wait a moment.” Then he turned to look at Suo Fei and told him, “Try placing your hand on it.” Suo Fei understood his intentions. He placed his hands on top of it. The emblem lit up briefly and then darkened, just like what had happened when Samael placed his hands on top of the previous emblem. It was a rejection. Samael placed his hand right after Suo Fei took away his. The emblem lit up and remained that way. The base colour of the emblem had become pure white whereas the lines were pure black. With this appearance, it really looked like a wheel. Abel “tch”ed and turned his head away, acting as if it would be their loss if they didn’t believe him. They could not fathom the connection between the flames and the wheel. Thus, they could only proceed to the next passage. Before leaving, Samael asked each of them to place their hand on the emblem. The ‘wheel’ emblem only remained lit up for Samael. For the others, it only flashed briefly. There were no other changes. At least two conclusions could be drawn from these attempts. The flame emblem belonged to Suo Fei whereas the wheel emblem belonged to Samael. Could it be that the remaining five emblems belonged to the five people present? Thought without action is useless. They could only determine the truth by trying it one by one. The next one was Lancelot’s passage. This time, everyone directly went straight to the door at the end of the passage. After casting the illuminating spell, Lancelot placed his hand on the emblem and a glimmering snowflake was revealed. Abel coldly “hmph”ed with his arms crossed. Then he jeered, “I thought it would be chicken wings.” Lancelot was mad! However, when he saw Abel’s face that was asking for a beating, he quelled his anger. Then, he merely narrowed his eyes at him before turning around to leave. The fourth passage was Abel’s. They walked to the end of the passage and was stunned. There was actually no emblem this time. The door was completely blank. <i>What’s the meaning of this? There were flames, a wheel and a snowflake, yet there’s nothing in the fourth one? </i>The regular pattern had been broken. Or is there something unique about this door? Everyone carefully observed the door but couldn’t find any difference. While everyone was at a loss, Suo Fei suddenly had an idea. He touched the door at the same location of the previous emblems but felt nothing. He touched it again and there still wasn’t any response. Hmm, was I mistaken? He was just about to take away his hand when Samael suddenly held it and slightly moved it to the left. Then, a faint light flashed briefly. Sure enough. There’s an emblem. It’s just that it’s invisible! Abel placed his hand on the earlier position and a round disc appeared. After that, a cloud of smoke rose from the bright disc. So, Abel’s emblem is smoke? At this moment, Suo Fei really wanted to lash out curses. <i>What the f**k is this? Flames, wheel, snowflake, and now smoke?!</i>  Is there any connection between them? It seemed that they could only find out after going through the last three doors. The next they went to was Harris’ passage. The emblem this time was very eye-catching. It was a snake with its tongue out. When Suo Fei saw it, he mused in his mind that it matched Harris’ black-bellied character extremely well. After that, they went to Manzy’s passage. The emblem had an elliptical shape. Everyone couldn’t determine what it was despite looking at it for a long time. The Emperor of Truth Abel made a comeback once again, “It’s a wok.” Everyone: ...; Oh, it’s as ordinary as the wheel. But when he said that, they thought that it really looked like a wok. There was only the last passage left, the passage of the only non-humanoid fellow in this group, the little cub. The illuminating spell was cast and Suo Fei expectantly looked at the last passage’s emblem but was nothing controversial, just a tiny mouse. The little cub pressed his paw on the emblem but it didn’t light up. The little cub was in disbelief. He used his front paw instead but it also didn’t light up. What is going on? Little cub: This damned emblem is actually looking down on this divine beast. Hence, it turned around and, under the gaze of everyone, it stomped the ground, struck a graceful pose and kicked the emblem. Suo Fei: I don’t know this thing. I definitely don’t. Unfortunately, the emblem refused to cooperate and remained unresponsive despite the little cub’s gracefulness. As the King of Beastkins, Harris considered himself to be extremely knowledgeable in this area so he spoke up, “Actually, why are you in your beast form? Try transforming into your human form.” Little cub: “Laozi isn’t human. Transform into my human form, your a**!” Harris was slightly surprised, “You have never transformed into your human form?” “I just said that Laozi is not human!” Harris smiled faintly. His smile looked as pure as a white lotus, but Suo Fei felt that this brat didn’t have good intentions. Harris approached the little cub and gently said, “Don’t be afraid. It wouldn’t hurt.” The little cub was startled, “What are you up to?!” Harris petted its head and held it in place. Then, facing its nose, he...; Shocked Suo Fei: Are they acting out a bestiality scene?! He...; bit it down. The little cub screamed and a layer of white mist rose. When the white mist had disappeared, Suo Fei’s jaw almost hit the floor when he saw it clearly. F**k, who’s that?! A blond, golden-eyed, fair-skinned, slim youth appeared naked in front of him. That’s right, naked, in the most literal sense of the word. He wore not even a single piece of clothing! If that was only the case, Suo Fei wouldn’t have been so astounded. The most important thing was that on top of his golden locks were two fluffy ears and behind him was a long, raised tail. Suo Fei’s titanium alloy dog ​​eyes had been blinded several times. I’m quickly running out of money to buy for a replacement, alright! The youth’s eyes were round, his face naive and innocent. Harris’ long and narrow eyes were sparkling, definitely harbouring evil intentions. He stepped forward, held the youth’s right hand and pressed it onto the emblem. The emblem’s little mouse instantly lit up. Then, under everyone’s eyes, Harris ambiguously leaned towards the youth’s small nose and bit it down with more force. With a yell, a layer of white mist rose once again and the divine beast returned to its domineering appearance. Suo Fei took a long time to recover from his daze. This is a magical world, a world that has nine great races. T-transforming and t-the likes is n-not a big deal...; Right? No! It’s strange! Even if they could transform, why does it have to be through biting the nose? Doesn’t it hurt? What kind of setting is this! Game developers, what the hell was going on in your heads?! When the little cub came to its senses, it yelled at Harris, “Y-you actually bit me! You’re a beast!” Suo Fei: Kid, is that the point? The little cub was furious. It stretched its paw out as it pounced onto Harris. Harris had a petite figure. He was the epitome of a weak and delicate shou. Wouldn’t it be miserable for him to be pounced on by the little cub? Unfortunately, Harris dotingly and gently received the little cub in his embrace. He used his frail arms to securely carry the little cub. Then, he petted its head as he coaxed, “Good boy.” Little cub: “Good boy, your—” Harris took a piece of roasted meat from out of nowhere, like magic. Little cub: “Awoo..” Suo Fei: F**k...; Blinding my fragile eyes. The author has something to say: I haven’t written any smut as of late. It’s a shame but look forward to my next chapter! The seven emblems of the seven passages had all been activated: flames, wheel, snowflakes, smoke, snake, pot and mouse. They still couldn’t see any connection between them. Nevertheless, they were certain that each channel belonged to one of them. Under the circumstances, there’s one way that might work which is by pressing the emblems all at the same time and see if something would happen. However, it would also be difficult to execute. For instance, they would have to ensure that everyone presses the emblem at the same time. After all, there’s seven of them and they would all be in different passages. There was a considerable distance between the passages, hence they wouldn’t be able to see each other. It wouldn’t be easy for them to grasp the correct timing. Wait, there’s already a phone in this era. Suo Fei suddenly remembered the two heart beads and reflexively directed his gaze towards Manzy. Unfortunately, even though there’s a heart bead, it’s still useless. The heart bead only allowed communication between two people. A communicator that allowed seven people to communicate at the same time was simply unheard of. Suo Fei contemplated with a frown. Samael spoke at this time, “Does anyone have something to measure time?” Lancelot replied, “I have, but not seven of them.” Abel gruntingly said, “I have three of them.” Harris and Manzy both had a timer, so there was enough. At this moment, Suo Fei realised that his previous way of thinking was wrong. He blindly considered the matter with the perspective of a modern-age person, instinctively thinking that they would need a phone, or rather a communicator, to act in unison. But in fact, it wasn’t that troublesome. As long as they set a fixed time and press the timer at the same time, they would be able to achieve the same desired effect. How could that be troublesome? Since they had come up with a workable plan, then it was time to execute it. Harris first helped the little cub to transform into its human form. Suo Fei saw that the little cub was stark-naked, without any sense of self-consciousness. He couldn’t refrain from stroking his head before taking out a piece of beast fur from his interspatial bag. He cut it here and there until he managed to transform it into something wearable. Then, he put it on the little cub. Everyone agreed on a time before dispersing. It wouldn’t take much time to walk from the room to the end of the passage. Moreover, their agility wasn’t low. Suo Fei arrived a minute before the appointed time. He silently waited and immediately pressed the emblem once the time was up. The flame emblem lit up. He kept his hand on the emblem, somewhat worried about the others’ situation. His worries were relieved immediately after when the colour of the emblem changed from crimson to green. This at least proved that there was a difference. He continued to wait silently. Eventually, the green flames were stirred up into a blaze, adding to the eeriness of the darkness. Then, there was a ‘click’, like the sound of something being opened. Suo Fei was delighted, knowing that the door had been opened. The huge stone door slowly opened, spilling white light from within. Suo Fei recovered his senses when he felt the door drawing him in. He ran towards the opposite direction the fastest he could. F**k, it wouldn’t be good to be dragged inside. Laozi won’t fall into your trap! The agility of the Elves was fully exhibited at this moment as he forcibly pulled himself out of the force’s range. The suction force only disappeared when he reached the room. Suo Fei, who was still in shock, gasped for air with his hands on his knees. He had yet to look up when he saw Samael coming out of his passage. The fear in his purple eyes subsided upon seeing Suo Fei. It seemed like Samael was the same as him. No, rather, all seven of them had encountered the same thing but only he and Samael had escaped. The others were only nodding acquaintances so Suo Fei didn’t really care but the little cub also didn’t come out! Seeing Suo Fei’s rather worried appearance, Samael held his hand and appeased him, “Let’s go and have a look.” Suo Fei felt relieved with Samael by his side. The two walked towards the little cub’s passage. There wasn’t any suction force, just like an ordinary passage. Their steps were hurried so it didn’t take much time for them to reach the end of the passage. However, there weren’t any signs of the little cub. The door was closed shut as before, except that the emblem had disappeared. It seemed that the little cub had been pulled inside the door. Worried, Suo Fei banged the door loudly but nothing happened. Suo Fei’s keen senses felt the magic fluctuations change. He wasn’t sure what would happen if he recklessly destroyed the door. What if it ended up causing more harm to the little cub? Suo Fei was weighing his options when Samael persuaded him, “It would be better for us to see where the remaining two doors would lead us. Perhaps, we’d be able to find him there.” At the moment, that was their only way. However, which of the remaining two doors should they enter? Also, would it allow two people to enter? They could only find out by trying. Samael tightly held Suo Fei’s hand along the way. With the demon’s strength, he would never lose Suo Fei as long as he held on to him. This set Suo Fei’s heart at ease. The two walked towards Suo Fei’s passage. As soon as they reached the passage, an overwhelming suction dragged them in. No longer resisting this time, the two walked along the direction of the suction force which became stronger the closer they got to the door. Samael took Suo Fei into his arms as this way was much more secure. Rays of light streamed through the wide-open door. Nothing could be seen. The two were drawn in not long after. It seemed that it didn’t limit the number of people entering. Suo Fei inadvertently closed his eyes due to the bright light. After a while, he slowly opened his eyes and found himself in a room. It was extremely small and narrow, with only the size of about one metre square. This godforsaken is not as good as the previous room, huh. In addition, the door had also disappeared. Could it be that we’re trapped again? Are you kidding me? Suddenly, a painting as well as some unrecognisable words appeared on the originally blank wall. The text looked like meaningless gibberish in Suo Fei’s eyes. He couldn’t recognise them at all. However, he could see the painting clearly. It was extremely simple. If one looked closely, one could see that it was a landscape painting. In the sky, there were many flying...; birds? Suo Fei couldn’t see it clearly but their huge wings looked like that of birds. However, they were not as small as birds. On land, there are mountains, rivers and towering trees; the houses were orderly distributed. The huge flower bed made Suo Fei realise that this was the scene he saw upon entering the crack. The difference was that there were more birds flying in the sky and there were inhabitants. It was difficult to see the inhabitants clearly due to the simplicity of the painting. Nevertheless, it could be seen that their physiques were relatively petite, somewhat like the Dwarves? Suo Fei was not certain. Maybe they’re introduced in the text? He shared his speculation but Samael dismissed it, “The text shouldn’t have any relation to the painting.” Suo Fei looked at him and asked, “Can you understand it?” “Yes.” Then, he slowly read out the ancient writing line by line: “Abandon all hope, ye who invade this place. Enter the city of endless suffering. Fall into the pit of eternal sorrow. Plunge into the valley of the forsaken.” This really had no relation to the warm picture. Instead, it seemed to be a curse. Samael paused before he read out the last line of the text, “Sin of Lust, punished with flames.” This line of text doesn’t seem to have much connection with the above text...; Wait. Suo Fei’s attention was drawn by the word ‘flame’. Could it be referring to the flame emblem? Sin of Lust...; Suo Fei couldn’t help but associate it with a trope. As a recluse who had read a lot of novels and had played many single-player games, how could Suo Fei not know this popular trope? A trope that was used in almost everything that has a western fantasy setting — The Seven Deadly Sins. Now, the Sin of Lust had outrightly presented itself. In addition, the punishment for this sin had been used as the door’s emblem. Following this line of thought, the other six doors should represent Pride, Envy, Wrath, Sloth, Greed and Gluttony. Hmm, this seems likely. But which emblem represents which door? I completely have no idea. Suo Fei expressed that he had overused his brain too much that it badly wanted to shut down. ——This is what you get for thinking too much despite having insufficient IQ. Suo Fei bitterly thought, You’re a slash game! Directly stripping naked and having s*x should be the norm yet you actually let me play this problem-solving game. Unravel problems, my a**! Players only like to unravel buttons, alright! He was really annoyed so he punched the wall in frustration. A crash sounded, breaking down the wall of the ‘problem-solving game’ and creating an entrance into the ‘danmei masterpiece game’. The punch actually easily opened a narrow passage that could fit one person. Above the passage were big, striking words that were written in Yalance’s common language which Suo Fei could understand clearly. “Trial Grounds.” Suo Fei’s mouth twitched slightly as he suddenly had a bad hunch. Since the door represented the Sin of Lust, then what would the trial be about? The answer is extremely obvious, alright! However, there’s already no turning back. They couldn’t possibly stay in the empty room forever. Samael didn’t seem to realise anything. He merely held Suo Fei’s hand and whispered, “Let’s go.” Hence, Suo Fei walked with him side by side. Before entering the passage, Samael warned him, “Don’t touch or respond to whatever you see. Everything is an illusion. We can leave this place after passing through this.” Seeing Samael being so calm, Suo Fei earnestly nodded, “I understand.” They walked into the passage side by side. As soon as they entered, the two sides flashed for a moment and then a group of blonde, blue-eyed big-busted ladies sashayed over. Every gesture of the big-busted ladies was imbued with charm. Their clothes were made of see-through muslin, completely exposing their private parts. However, in Suo Fei’s pure gay eyes, it was no different from seeing a lump of wriggling white meat. Suo Fei was dumbfounded. If the whole trial is like this, then I can reach the end without much effort. Asking two gays to look at women? What kind of logic is this?! Suo Fei walked forward without casting a look around him. He badly wanted to quicken his footsteps. My hairs are standing on end, alright! After a while, the big-busted ladies vanished. Suo Fei was relieved. Is it finally over? Trial Grounds: Kid, you’re too young, too simple. Then...; the ladies that had disappeared were replaced by a group of men. A real group of men! The previous ladies, although there were many kinds, be it lolis or mature women, in Suo Fei’s eyes, they’re just that — ladies. On the other hand, this group of men were more distinguishable from one another for Suo Fei. Each of them were naked above the waist. Only a rather small, flimsy piece of clothing was covering their jewels. Some had healthy wheat-coloured skin while some had porcelain white skin. There were strong, burly men as well as delicate men who were thin in every aspect. All of them were attractive, their eyes gleaming a seductive hue, their every movement alluring. If it was Suo Fei who had just transmigrated into Yalance, he would have long thrown himself onto them. But now, Suo Fei had become more immune to beauty after being together with Samael for such a long time. Although he still couldn’t stop himself from fantasizing Samael with his clothes off, it was still enough to divert his attention from those men. Samael and Suo Fei ignored the group of men, but it was still not over. The fighting power of the guys was much higher than that of the ladies. The ladies left without much ado, but the guys actually...; started having s*x. That’s right...; they blatantly started to perform a live-action gay film! Suo Fei’s gaze was locked onto Samael but sounds ceaselessly entered his ears. The sound of kissing filled the air, followed by the sound of skin slapping skin and the wet squelching of their bodies going in and out. Deep moans and obscene cries spewed out from their lips. F**k, must everyone be so dedicated?! Although Suo Fei could still stop himself from looking around, he couldn’t stop the passion surging within him. Nevertheless, they continued moving forward. After a while, the damn moans finally disappeared. The group of men also left. Suo Fei heaved a deep sigh. It should be about time for it to end. Trial Grounds: Kid, we’re just getting started. The surroundings suddenly dimmed then there was a flash. This time there were no groups of men or women, only two figures. Suo Fei inwardly thought, this Laozi can get through all those hardcore stuff. There shouldn’t be a problem this time. However, he was astonished after seeing the two figures clearly. That’s...; Samael and him. Although he knew that it was only an illusion, it looked too similar. Instead of looking at ‘himself’, Suo Fei fixedly stared at ‘Samael’. The two illusions wore the same exact clothes as them. There was not even the slightest difference in their appearances and physiques. He saw ‘Samael’ looping his arms around ‘Suo Fei’’s waist before kissing him gently. ‘Suo Fei’ meekly raised his head to meet his kiss. After a bout of gentleness, their kiss became much more heated and passionate. ‘Samael’ slid his hands into Suo Fei’s clothes. With just a little bit of force, Suo Fei’s silk top was torn to shreds, laying his thin body bare before Samael, trembling slightly due to the chill in the air. The demon stared at the elf’s body, his purple eyes scorching with desire. He moved his hand to the elf’s back to support him and forced him to arch back, as if he was offering the elf up for sacrifice. ‘Samael’ then lowered his head to kiss the elf’s pink dots. Seeing this, Suo Fei was stunned stupid. The scene was too mind-blowing. The illusionary Samael seemed too real. Seeing him wallowing in the muck of desires caused Suo Fei to uncontrollably grow hotter. The foreplay was long and sensuous. When ‘Samael’ held ‘Suo Fei’’s thing, Suo Fei could no longer hold himself in check so he quickened his pace, but was abruptly held back. Samael stopped him, his purple eyes staring at the illusion. Suo Fei froze. He quickly diverted his gaze before persuading Samael, “It’s all hallucinations. L-let’s quickly leave.” Samael tightly grasped his hand and, throwing a faint smile at him, he whispered, “I won’t touch or respond to it.” After a pause, he continued in a low voice, “I just want to have a look.” Suo Fei’s face turned bright red. At this time, the illusionary Suo Fei let go of the soft moans that he’d been trying to hold back. The author has something to say: Cough...; Just to be clear, there shouldn’t be any side CPs in this novel, at least not in the literal sense. <strong>T/N:</strong> The passage Samael read is an altered text from Dante’s Inferno Canto III. Also, Moss Piggy drew another amazing RSG fanart!~ thank you very much ♥ Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>Anna</strong><strong>H</strong>‘s kofis~ <i>What do you mean by ‘just want to have a look’?!</i>  <i>What ‘just’? What else could you possibly want to do?!</i>  Suo Fei didn’t dare ask it out loud. However, he couldn’t abandon Samael and leave by himself. Since Samael didn’t leave, he could only stand still like a block of wood. Then, he used a clever trick to calm his excitement, which was to not cast any glance at Samael’s body and to only look at his illusionary self. How could Laozi’s skin be so fair? How could Laozi’s waist be so thin? How could Laozi be so debauched? How could Laozi have such a loud voice? The ceiling almost collapsed because of those f**king moans. Illusion, you are too unqualified! Laozi is clearly a gong. Why are you passively being tossed about? You did nothing apart from groaning and moaning! Weak! You’re too weak! 【stoic face】 The more he looked at it, the more he felt that the illusion was too effeminate and too much like a shou. It was truly unlike his real disposition. What should he do if Samael actually believed that he’s like that? It would be too shameful for him to explain. Thus, he tugged Samael and spoke with great solemnity, “I’m not like that.” “Huh?” Suo Fei thought that Samael didn’t understand so he earnestly reflected for a while before saying, “I- I wouldn’t be that loud.” He was looking at Samael from the side as he said this. With the sensual atmosphere permeating the air, Suo Fei’s voice unknowingly rose slightly at the end of his sentence, extremely different from his usual tone. Samael turned to look at him, his purple eyes outrageously bright. He forced calmness into his voice before speaking, “Suo Fei, who am I? The stunned Suo Fei instinctively answered, “Samael.” As soon as he spoke, the illusionary Suo Fei also spoke out, “...; I want...;” When joined together, they happened to be, “Samael...; I want ...;” The shameless Suo Fei’s face immediately blushed with shame. Samael smiled at him and whispered, “Very well.” In the illusion, Samael slammed himself into Suo Fei. His tempo was fast and relentless, eliciting high-pitched moans from Suo Fei. They were consumed in their intense lovemaking, letting out cries of pleasure, gradually clouding the real Suo Fei’s sense of reason which he had been trying to maintain. Suo Fei could only empty his mind. He tried not to look at anything and think about anything. Ignoring his body’s reaction, he began chanting mantras in his head. After god knows how long, the two finally climaxed at the same time. Their surroundings finally calmed down. Suo Fei was greatly relieved. We should have passed the trial by now. However, Samael remained motionless. Suo Fei opened his eyes. He almost spat out a mouthful of blood upon seeing the scene in front of him. <i>This damned Trial Grounds’ bottom line keeps on getting lower and lower. It has reached a terrifying low, alright.</i>  The illusions had not disappeared. The stark-naked illusionary Suo Fei actually stood up and swayed as he slowly walked towards Samael, doing his utmost to seduce the real Samael. Suo Fei badly wanted to hack someone with a knife, but unfortunately, he was soon occupied as the fake Samael also started walking towards him, staring at him with a lustful gaze. Suo Fei unconsciously swallowed his saliva. At this time, Samael took his hand and said, “Let’s go.” Suo Fei absentmindedly followed Samael. This scene was strange in a way that words couldn’t describe. They walked hand in hand while their illusions tried their best to entice them. Suo Fei thought that if he entered this Trial Grounds on his own, he would have failed long ago. He could easily go through the first level’s ladies. He could also persevere through the group of men in the second level. When it came to the third level’s live-action gay film, he would probably pass despite having an unsteady conviction. The fourth level, however...; With Samael enticing him...; Even though it was only an illusion, he absolutely wouldn’t be able to endure it. Fortunately, their real bodies were here, so the allure of the illusions had been greatly reduced. As long as it continued this way, they would be able to leave this place. Endure. The exit is within reach. The two remained unaffected until the illusion finally disappeared. The surroundings became dark once again, giving prominence to the light at the exit. Is the trial finally over? He dared not speak affirmatively. This wretched place is too damn unpredictable...; But, there shouldn’t be any more surprises this time, right? It should have already used up all its tricks. Then, the surrounding lit up again and sure enough...; It’s still not over? The exit was already near and they could surely go out without difficulty. However, the sight in front of Suo Fei made him dumbstruck. This time, there were also two people. One was Suo Fei, and the other...; was actually Manzy. Suo Fei had an extremely bad hunch in his heart. At this moment, Samael’s footsteps stopped abruptly. In the illusion, Manzy gently caressed Suo Fei’s back. Suo Fei leaned on him with a loving expression that couldn’t be concealed. Like an obedient kitten, he looked up slightly and parted his lips, silently waiting for a kiss. Manzy’s hand slowly caressed him up and down. Then, he lowered his head and their lips were about to touch. A sharp sword Qi swept past and the illusionary Manzy instantly vanished without a trace. Suo Fei was startled and turned around to see Samael who was surrounded by a murderous aura. His fingertips were dripping with blood, the Asura Blade’s pitch-black blade drawing in the lustre around it. This...; This...; Suo Fei’s brain crashed. Is this considered a response? They were only one step away from the exit but they actually failed? I’ve endured past the previous levels and there’s only one level left but we actually...; actually...; The illusionary Suo Fei also disappeared not long after and the whole place began to collapse. Suo Fei had not lost his mind. Seeing the exit right in front of him, he dragged Samael as he ran towards the exit, but it was too late. The exit disappeared and the place plunged into darkness. Their bodies also began to plummet. Samael managed to pull Suo Fei into his embrace in time, hugging him with one hand. Unfortunately, neither of them could fly so they could only wait for them to reach the ground. After landing, an ancient and profound voice sounded in their ears, “Invader, enter the city of endless suffering. Sin of Lust, punished with flames.” Countless thoughts flashed in Suo Fei’s mind. Listening to these words, would they be burned with fire? Fire Magic was one of Yalance’s elemental magic. Ordinary flames wouldn’t be able to harm them if they had fire-resistant equipment. Before leaving, Eugene had crafted equipments that had extremely high defensive power for them. Therefore, he wasn’t that worried despite knowing that he would be caught in a raging fire. Not to mention, he had countless beast furs in his interspatial bag. Thus, he was extremely assured. However, it definitely wouldn’t be that simple. Their surroundings were still in utter darkness, but only for a moment. A fire suddenly sprang to life. Whoomph! The flames shot higher and higher, surrounding them in an instant. Then, a revolving ball of flame that was no less than five metres appeared in front of them. Suo Fei looked at it and was shocked. This is...; a Fire Elemental. Their presence served as an indication that they were in a perilous situation. The primal elemental magic types in Yalance were Metal, Wood, Water, Fire and Earth. There were Elementals for each of the five elemental magic types. They were born from the essence of one of the elemental magic. Their powers were one of the best in Yalance. Samael placed Suo Fei in a corner before he drove his sword towards the Fire Elemental. Samael’s physical attack was tyrannical and the Asura Blade’s bonus AD was terrifying. Samael had been suppressing a great deal of anger so his attack brought a calamitous momentum. With just one strike, the Fire Elemental’s physical defenses immediately became zero, its body receiving serious damage. However, this was just the beginning. Suo Fei was on pins and needles after recollecting the information he knew about Fire Elementals. This thing is really troublesome. Samael wielded his Asura Blade to attack once again with even greater ferocity, directly slicing the Fire Elemental into half. It exploded with a loud bang. Suo Fei’s pupils constricted as he shouted to Samael, “Be careful! It’s now formless!” As soon as his voice fell, the flames that had scattered quickly fused and resumed its original appearance. Its physical defense also returned to its full value. It shot out a huge fireball from its gaping mouth. Samael luckily had Suo Fei’s physique so he merely jumped to dodge the fireball. However, countless fireballs fell from the sky like a meteor shower. Even Archmages had difficulty casting this horrifying fire-type attack spell. For the Elementals, however, it was as easy as pie. There was simply no end to them. Samael and Suo Fei could do nothing but dodge, especially since there were too many of them. Suo Fei had difficulty evading so Samael had to carry him while dodging. As such, their agility was greatly lowered. Samael was hit several times in order to protect Suo Fei. The situation would have been more dreadful if not for the equipments that Eugene had given them. The situation was too static. Suo Fei gritted his teeth and said to Samael, “Let me down.” Samael spared him no glance. While dodging the rain of fire, the Asura Blade dealt another fatal blow to the Fire Elemental. However, the Elemental respawned with full HP and stats at the same location within a few seconds. F**k! This f**ker is like a cockroach that can’t be killed! This Elemental simply couldn’t be depleted unless there were no more fire elements in Yalance. Besides, the Elemental could reabsorb the fire elements that had been sliced off by Samael. On the contrary, he and Samael were constantly depleting their energy. Samael was a heaven-defying existence, but since he’s ceaselessly exerting himself in battle, his power and HP were constantly being consumed. Thus, there would be a time that he would run out of power. At that time, they could only wait for their deaths. Especially since Samael’s strength had been greatly reduced with him as a burden. How could they win in such a situation? Suo Fei hollered out once again, “Trust me. I can protect myself. You should just focus on attacking it! This thing must have a weakness. It’s just that we haven’t discovered it!” His words made perfect sense. Anything that existed in this world couldn’t possibly be perfect. The Elemental certainly must have a weakness. They were uncertain as to where it was, but as long as they paid close attention, it’s impossible for them not to discover it. Thus, Samael let Suo Fei down during a respite from the oncoming attacks and hurriedly reminded, “Remember your promise.” Suo Fei froze slightly, then nodded solemnly, “I won’t die.” After he spoke, the damned undying Elemental f**king respawned once again. The rain of fire’s AoE was too large. At first glance, there seemed to be no blind-spots but one would be able to find them if they paid more attention. Suo Fei had enough agility but not enough stamina. He gritted his teeth and endured with all his might. At this moment, he remembered the potions that Antonio had previously given him. He looked for potions that could temporarily increase one’s agility and drank them all at once. It didn’t have much effect, but something was still better than nothing. It could at least buy him some time. Suo Fei didn’t need to attack the Elemental, merely focusing on evading. He could hold out for a short time, especially since Samael launched a full-scale attack whenever there’s an opportunity, earning them some time to rest during the Elemental’s respawn time. These brief, few seconds only allowed them to take a short breather. They sustained themselves in such a manner for a long time until Suo Fei had consumed all the potions that he could consume. He had already over-exerted himself, thus affecting his ability to respond. His eyes were also aching with exhaustion. As such, Suo Fei’s eyes widened in shock and couldn’t react when he saw a fireball heading towards his head at a high speed. Samael teleported and appeared in front of him in an instant, blocking the fireball in time. However, it had made a hole in his clothes near his chest. Although Eugene’s equipment wasn’t at the same level as a divine artifact, it could still be considered as a treasure. However, it was currently riddled with holes. It could be seen how fierce the battle had been. Suo Fei’s mind was buzzing. He could only quickly heal Samael and feed him some beast blood when the Elemental was respawning. However, it only granted them temporary relief as the Elemental’s respawn time became shorter and shorter. Suo Fei was left incomparably exhausted due to the unending battle. At the same time, a faint sense of despair rose within him. Samael suddenly told him, “Suo Fei, give me a piece of Frostflame Beast’s fur.” Suo Fei had more than two thousand beast furs in his interspatial bag which he had collected during his time in Bois Canyon, which included several FrostFlame Beast’s furs. Suo Fei immediately took out a beast fur without thinking after hearing Samael’s words. Frostflame Beasts were huge in size and had amazing fur. In addition, their furs were high-grade materials that were extremely fire-resistant. Samael held the beast fur and moved swiftly while using the beast fur as protection. Then, under Suo Fei’s astonished gaze, he used the beast fur like a burlap sack and confined the Elemental in it. T-this...; This is such a stroke of genius! Elementals could only deal magic damage and not physical damage. Hence, it wouldn’t be able to break free if trapped. Moreover, all of the fireballs it released would be blocked by the beast fur. As long as the beast fur wasn’t damaged, this chump could only fight with itself! Oh my, ​​that’s great! Suo Fei jumped up and down in excitement and gave Samael a kiss. Samael was startled but a faint smile appeared on his pale face. However, his attention was drawn to the left ahead of him, his voice dropping an octave, “It’s time to end this.” Suo Fei was confused so he followed his gaze and shockingly discovered a figure in the dark corner. Black hair and purple eyes...; It’s a primeval demon! What’s going on?! Suo Fei was still confounded when Samael rushed over at breakneck speed. The Asura Blade’s sword Qi shot out, brimming with suppressed fury. The demon tried to ward off Samael’s aggressive advances, but his defense was instantly breached and he was pierced by the Asura Blade. The next moment, the primeval demon vanished, turning into ashes. Suo Fei realised that the Elemental should have been the demon’s summoned beast. Wait, how could a demon control an Elemental? He had yet to figure out the relation between the two when the beast fur confining the Elemental finally couldn’t bear the damage. The Elemental that ought to die but wouldn’t die made its appearance once again. The extremely vigilant Suo Fei wanted to take out another beast fur from his interspatial bag but was stopped by Samael. The Elemental was actually a huge ball of flame, it didn’t have any facial features or a particular form. At this moment in time, however, at the place where its head should be, a sparkling pair of eyes appeared. It no longer released its rain of fire. Instead, its huge body wandered, looking around with a foolish expression. It searched the place all over and found nothing. So, its big eyes landed on Samael and Suo Fei. It blinked its eyes repeatedly and, after a while, sobbingly ran over. The fatty fireball wildly dashed over, giving Suo Fei a fright. This oaf was too big and its body was covered with flames. Even if he didn’t get burned, it would still be terribly hot. Samael responded quickly, swiftly moving Suo Fei to another corner. The fatty fireball pounced onto nothing but air. It blinked its big eyes and still didn’t see anyone so it turned around. When his gaze locked onto Samael and Suo Fei once again, it cried more aggrievedly and ran over. Where did this grievance come from? Samael and Suo Fei finally discovered that something was not right. According to reason, it should go berserk after its master’s death. How did it become a fool all of a sudden? Wait, could it have been forcibly suppressed? Samael didn’t dodge again. He only activated the Asura Blade and pointed his sword at the fatty fireball. The petrified fatty fireball stopped immediately, staring at the Asura Blade with fear in its big eyes. It didn’t retreat backwards, but it also didn’t dare to move forward. It merely stood on its spot, miserably staring at them with its sparkling big eyes. Suo Fei quietly asked Samael, “What’s wrong with him?” Before Samael could reply, the fatty fireball’s voice boomed across the room, “Wu wu wu, so scared.” Suo Fei was mortified. This oaf could actually speak! It’s actually fluent in Yalance’s common language! Since it could speak, Suo Fei decided to communicate with it, “Why are you afraid? Obviously, it was you who first attacked us!” As the oaf was too tall, Suo Fei subconsciously raised his voice, causing the fatty fireball to tremble in fear. Then, like a spineless wife, it said, “Y-you’re so fierce...;” Suo Fei: Somebody please save my delicate eyes! Then, an even more eye-damaging scene appeared. The damned fatty fireball’s whimpers actually turned to loud wailing. It’s not a thunderstorm. It’s only the downpour of tears from its big eyes. However, its tears were rather peculiar: it was flaming red. This is obviously lava! It’s simply like forcing a volcanic eruption! Suo Fei hurriedly consoled him, “Hey, don’t cry.” It cried even louder. Suo Fei was terrified and quickly spoke in a hushed tone, “There, there. Don’t cry, don’t cry. I’m not fierce. I was just afraid you wouldn’t hear me.” The flow of lava became lighter. The fatty fireball spoke between sobs, “I’m not deaf.” Suo Fei: Indeed, you aren’t. You’re just a cry-baby, that’s all. Suo Fei cleared his throat and diverted the topic in a gentle tone, “Do you know where we are?” Seeing Suo Fei’s pleasant attitude, the fatty fireball’s lava stopped flowing, recollecting itself extraordinarily fast. It shook its big head and said, “I don’t know where this is...; When I woke up, I’m already in this place.” When it said that, it silently glanced at Samael and grievedly complained, “I saw both of you when I woke up and you.. You.. wanted to hit me.” Why on earth does it feel like we’re coaxing a kid? Kid, you’re ten metres tall. Can you not make that face? You’re losing your imposing air, alright! Suo Fei patiently conversed with the fatty fireball and understood the situation after quite a while. Most probably, this fellow had been forcibly sealed by the primeval demon from before. It had lost its control over its mind. As for how long it had been in that state, the fatty fireball itself didn’t know, so it was even more unlikely for Suo Fei to know. It wasn’t until the primeval demon was hacked to death by Samael that the fatty fireball regained its consciousness. It was frightened of the unfamiliar place so when it saw the two of them after much difficulty, it sobbingly ran over to ask for help. When the fatty fireball finished speaking, it warily looked at them and even more warily spoke, “I want to go home. Can you take me home?” Suo Fei wanted to say ‘who knows where your home is’, Samael directly accepted his request, “Can.” The fatty fireball’s eyes narrowed into a smile, bashfully saying, “Demon, you’re so kind.” Suo Fei: F**ker, Laozi has conversed with you for so long, why didn’t I hear you say that Laozi is kind?! Samael spoke again, “Can you make yourself smaller? It’d be too inconvenient this way.” The fatty fireball thought for a while and replied, “Mm, I should be able to.” It took a deep breath and there was a flash of fire. Then, four small fatty fireballs that were only half a metre tall appeared out of thin air. This isn’t becoming smaller. This is just splitting! The four fatty fireballs asked at the same time, “Do I need to make myself even smaller?” Suo Fei actually wanted to ask him to become even smaller, but decided against it when he imagined a train of a dozen or more small fatty fireballs following behind him. “That should be fine.” Samael just acquiesced with a nod. The fatty fireball followed them from behind and the space began collapsing. It was only when they had returned to the previous room that Suo Fei had a realisation. No wonder Samael accepted the fatty fireball’s request so happily. It turned out that the passage and the so-called Trial Grounds were merely illusions. Accepting the fireball’s request was tantamount to breaking the illusion, hence they could leave the place. One of the seven passages was gone, but the other six still remained. There were still no other exits in the room. A long time had passed but only them had come out. The others were still in their own passages. Recalling what they had encountered, he believed that the others would not be better off. They would be subject to punishment if they failed and the punishments could be awfully terrifying. Suo Fei was worried. How can the little cub handle it by himself? If his door represents Gluttony, wouldn’t that be a big problem for that chowhound? With such thoughts, he increasingly felt that it was too dangerous. However, they simply couldn’t open the doors. He related his concerns to Samael. Samael pondered for a while before saying, “I’ll try and see if I could destroy it.” This was the worst-case scenario. They didn’t know what would happen after destroying it, but this would be the least of their concerns if the little cub was already in extreme danger inside. They had to try. Thus, they took the fatty fireball to the passage with a mouse emblem. Samael activated the Asura Blade by slicing his wrist. Wanting to activate his ultimate skill, he let a large amount of blood flow out. However, before he could even release it, a ray of white light suddenly flashed and they couldn’t see anything. The place trembled violently. The white light receded after a while. Suo Fei squinted his eyes and saw the little cub. However, the divine beast was twice as big as before! Suo Fei had to raise his head to look at it. The little cub rumbled out a contented belch, filled with satisfaction after eating to its heart’s content. An upsetting hunch rose in Suo Fei’s mind. Suo Fei had yet to say anything when the little cub saw them and energetically recounted, “Aoooo, I’m so satisfied! I’ve never felt so satisfied in my whole life!” Suo Fei’s previous worry was true. The little cub’s door truly represented Gluttony and the little cub went through the trial. The trial might be horrifying for others, but for the Devourer, it was all he could ever ask for. For the trial of Gluttony, there were rows and rows of innumerable delicious foods. One could pass the trial just by resisting the temptation of the delicious foods. But who’s the little cub? It didn’t even realize that it was a trial. It already became dazed upon entering at the sight of roasted meat. Without even taking a single step, the little cub swallowed the roasted meat whole. The trial was a complete failure. After failure came the punishment. The punishment would be extremely harsh for normal people. They wouldn’t be able to move a single inch and their mouths would be wide-open. Then, they would be forced to eat the innumerable delicious foods. It was a sweet but terrifying torture. They were forced to die from overeating. Unfortunately, the hapless Trial Grounds encountered the little cub. The little cub found that he couldn’t move after eating the roasted meat and was scared, thinking that he was out of luck. However, it thoroughly enjoyed what followed next. Its stomach was simply a bottomless pit. The little cub had to eat more than two thousand ferocious beasts to become full. The food in the Trial Grounds would only help him grow. So, it obediently ate and ate with its mouth wide open until it had eaten up everything inside the trial. Not only did it not die, it even evolved. Suo Fei only had one sentence in mind: Fortune favours the foolish. Although the course of events was deadly embarrassing, at least the little cub wasn’t in danger. Suo Fei’s anxiety had abated to a great extent. The little cub had not the slightest interest in the fireball fatty who had appeared out of nowhere. The Fire Elemental didn’t have a body. Although it was extremely large, it couldn’t be eaten so it’s worthless to the little cub. There were five out of the seven doors left. There still weren’t any changes in the room. It seemed that they would have to settle all of the five remaining doors. The other four doors were still closed, and they didn’t know what was happening behind them. At the moment, Samael’s door was still open. Thus, they decided to first go to his door. After entering, as before, they heard the invaders’ curse. However, the last line was different, “Sin of Pride, punished with dismemberment.” It turned out that the wheel was referring to this. They were more knowledgeable after their first experience so they directly went into the Trial Grounds. Suo Fei was slightly curious. What will the trial be? It was still a narrow passage. Samael went first, followed by Suo Fei, then the little cub, and finally the fireball fatty. Suo Fei paused after taking a step forward. A person appeared in front of him, extremely familiar but yet so foreign. However, the illusions were shattered in an instant. The stunned Suo Fei was already in Samael’s embrace. Then, they began to plummet. The trial had just started but Samael already broke the illusion. So we’re subject to punishment? There were roaring screams from the little cub and the fireball fatty as well as the whistling of the wind in his ears. Suo Fei was in Samael’s embrace but a bone-piercing chill slowly rose within him. He only had a swift glance, but he saw it clearly, the sight deeply etched in his mind. There was a figure. It was Samael. A fully grown-up Samael. He had long, black hair. His robe was pure black and only the cuff was adorned with a silver pattern. He was looking at Suo Fei with a completely unfamiliar expression. It was brimming with bone-piercing coldness and indifference to all living things. Suo Fei suddenly recalled the hand that moved the Asura Blade in an elegant but ruthless manner. Piercing his chest with apparent ease, the blood staining the man’s Asura Blade red. The scene lingered in Suo Fei’s mind, silently mocking him. The author has something to say: Sisters, don’t be afraid. This isn’t an angsty novel. I’m a mom that wouldn’t write angst. If you don’t believe me, come and look at my sincere eyes O.O Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>uhimgood</strong> and <strong>Lenette</strong>‘s kofis! (*⌒▽⌒*)θ～♪ Suo Fei closed his eyes, pushing the thoughts out of his mind. Instead, he focused all of his attention on the upcoming ‘punishment’. Punishment of Dismemberment...; It should only be a metaphor. After all, with their ability, they could destroy a cart with just a flick of their finger. Suo Fei was right. Upon landing on the ground, countless vines rushed towards them. The little cub was relatively large thus was at an extreme disadvantage. Fortunately, it had high agility and could fly so it was able to dodge easily. The fireball fatty was even more skilled, turning into hundreds upon hundreds of tiny fireball fatties. It didn’t even need to dodge as the vines couldn’t take aim properly. Instead, it was somewhat more troublesome for Samael to dodge while carrying Suo Fei. Moreover, Suo Fei also keenly discovered that the vine was highly corrosive, dissolving anything that it hit. Suo Fei jumped down and pulled out his dagger, cutting off the oncoming vines with a swish. However, the vines immediately grew out at an astonishing speed. Samael was in no better condition. He cut a larger number of vines compared to Suo Fei but his speed could not compare to the vines’ growth speed. The situation was similar to their earlier fight with the fireball fatty. An idea suddenly flashed in Suo Fei’s mind and he shouted towards the scattered fireball fatties, “Fireball fatty, stop splitting yourself! If you want to go home, quickly attack!” It took a long time for the fireball fatty to realise that Suo Fei had been talking about him. Its fragile heart was wounded once again, mumbling, “I’m not fat...;” Nevertheless, it obediently assembled its split-up bodies together and returned to its original ten-metres-high huge body. The vine noticed the big target and whizzed towards the fireball. Seeing the countless vines rushing towards him, the fireball fatty felt cold down to his marrows. Then, the fireball fatty screamed due to pain. The chagrined Suo Fei helped in slashing the vines off its body and urged the fireball fatty, “Attack.” The fireball fatty took a deep breath. Then, it collided with the vine straight on...; Suo Fei: ...; Bro, what are you doing?! Stop horsing around, will you?!! The fireball fatty was oblivious, happily bumping with the vines and regarding himself as a new-generation bumper car. The impact of the fireball fatty’s collision was high, thus inflicting considerable damage to the vines. But he obviously has a stronger fire-type attack spell that has a wide AoE! Wouldn’t these damn vines be wiped out if he used that? Suo Fei could only patiently remind him, “Fatty, use your skills. Your skills!” Fatty was stunned: “Skills?” A look of realisation dawned across his face, “Wait, let me check what skills I have.” Then, it actually looked down and began rummaging. After a short while, it raised its head, eyes brimming with confidence, “I’m ready. Watch me.” Then it shouted, “Set the prairie ablaze, flames scattering in rage. Unstoppable like a wildfire, bottomless sea of flames. Play and get burned, add fuel to fire. Watch the inferno’s display, soaring through the skies.” The fireball fatty drawled out a long string of words, then a rain of fire began falling from the sky, the whole place becoming a sea of fire. Suo Fei failed to dodge in time and was scalded. F**k, it’s actually an indiscriminate attack. You should have counted one to three! Fortunately, Samael pulled him, or else he would have been swallowed whole by the fire. Samael and Suo Fei sat on the little cub while looking down from above. The fireball fatty had invincible might. No matter how alarmingly fast the vines’ growth speed was, it was still unable to do anything facing the tempestuous fire. On the contrary, its rapid growth only fuelled the flames. In addition, the person behind the scenes had no choice but to come out due to this wildfire. The ground was thoroughly engulfed in flames. There was simply no place to stand on so the person could only fly up into the air using his mount. Suo Fei clearly saw his mighty and imposing physique as well as his dark green skin. It’s a beastkin! The beastkin wasn’t holding a heavy hammer in his hand but a long staff instead. The staff was more than two metres long. The staff’s shaft was a shade of green so dark it seemed almost black. It looked like some kind of tree branch whereas its head resembled a flower blooming on a treetop. In the middle of the flower, there was a huge emerald green gem. At its tail, there was also a smaller gem of the same colour. Suo Fei wasn’t familiar with it, but judging by its appearance, he knew that it was a treasure. The beastkin caught sight of them and raised his staff. He didn’t chant but directly uttered, “Wood Serpent Encirclement.” It moved towards Samael and his group, wanting to twine around them. Looking at its manner, it was a high-level wood magic spell. Suo Fei knew from their earlier entanglement with the vines that the beastkin was a wood-class mage. Moreover, his ability was certainly above an Archmage. Ranged attacks were more convenient than melee attacks when fighting in mid-air. The beastkin only needed to utter his magic spell and aim his attack. They, on the other hand, were disadvantaged. There was simply no way of killing him if they couldn’t get near him. Suo Fei was anxious while the little cub didn’t have combat experience. It was already admirable for the little cub to be able to evade the onslaught of magic attacks. The little cub was also extremely unsteady. Suo Fei could only hold the little cub tight to stabilise his own body. They simply had no power to fight back. Samael was a demon but he had lost his bone wings and could never fly again. Suo Fei felt gloomy. This is the price, the price Samael had to pay to obtain his terrifying strength. On land, the sea of fire was suppressing the vines that were crazily multiplying. In the sky, ceaseless wood-type magic spells kept on pouring down on them. The beastkin’s mana was immense beyond measure. Moreover, his chanting time was simply nil. Suo Fei had finished the whole game before but even the Elven King, who had the highest magic affinity, wasn’t as powerful. On top of that, the person in front of him was a beastkin. Beastkins’ comprehension of magic was tremendously substandard, only slightly better than the Demons. This wood-class mage simply overturned Suo Fei’s worldviews. Passively receiving his attacks made them choke with resentment. Samael attentively watched the beastkin and instructed the little cub in a low voice. The little cub hesitated for a while before it resolutely nodded in assent. Suo Fei didn’t hear what Samael had said and didn’t know what they were going to do. The wood serpent happened to attack and the little cub actually didn’t evade. It directly opened its mouth wide and ate the wooden serpent. Suo Fei distinctly felt the little cub’s body tremble. It was evident that that thing wasn’t particularly easy to digest. The little cub completely gave up dodging. It locked his gaze onto the beastkin and rushed over like a bullet. Its fast speed simply gave the beastkin no leeway to dodge. Wanting to resist the little cub who was rushing over, the beastkin cast the Wood Release technique in a flurry. However, just as they were about to meet, the little cub rapidly steered away and brushed past. At this time, Samael jumped up directly onto the beastkin’s flying mount. The Asura Blade’s sword Qi was horrifyingly cold. The beastkin’s back felt cold. He turned around and met the demon’s calm appearance. His eyes were immeasurably dark and profound. The sense of impending doom permeated the place. It was as if time stood still. Samael lashed out the Asura Blade and the beastkin vanished completely. The vines on the ground immediately disappeared. The battle was over. The space began collapsing and they soon returned to the room. Suo Fei saw Samael holding the beastkin’s wand. <i>It actually stayed behind.</i>  Seeing Suo Fei’s unbridled stare, Samael handed the staff to him, “Keep it.” Suo Fei smiled at him and took it, not polite in the slightest. He immediately used the appraisal technique but it actually failed. Suo Fei successively used the appraisal technique multiple times before it released its information: Darkwood Staff, artifact. It turned out to be an artifact. Suo Fei was surprised and elated at the same time. The value of such an artifact was simply unimaginable. He affectionately caressed it over and over before carefully placing it inside his interspatial bag. Speaking of which, although these passages were dangerous, it had been rewarding so far. The first one gave them the fireball fatty. The second one made the little cub who had not grown for ten thousand years change in size. For the third one, they actually obtained an artifact! Wait. Suo Fei suddenly had a thought. Since the Darkwood Staff is an artifact, could it be that the resurrection artifact that they were looking for is also in one of these passages? Considering the current course of events, this was highly likely. Moreover, they must not pass the trial. They had to undergo punishment in order to enter the space below the passage. Then, they would have to defeat the boss for it to drop equipment. The more he thought about it, the more certain he became of his conjecture. Suo Fei could hardly restrain his restlessness towards the remaining for passages. Well, he was in fact somewhat worried about his lil’ shous who were still trapped inside. He had no idea how they were faring. Although all of them were elites, the punishments were truly heaven-defying. The difficulty of fighting on their own and coming out alive was not small. Even if this was not the case, they would still have to get rid of the four doors in order to get out of the place. With these considerations in mind, they let go of their misgivings and decided to settle the remaining doors in order, one by one. They first decided to go to Abel’s door. Samael wielded the Asura blade and activated it with his heart’s blood. It was inevitable for Suo Fei and the others to be accidentally injured so they retreated to the middle of the room and waited. Suo Fei was still slightly uneasy. What if it caused any repercussions? It turned out that his worries were all for naught. The power of the fully-activated Asura Blade was beyond their imagination. Its formidable attack wholly exhibited the prowess of the one and only attack-type Divine Artifact in the whole continent of Yalance. It could startle the heavens and shake the earth. One attack immediately flattened the whole place. The four doors disappeared without a trace and the four unknown spaces mixed together. Suo Fei was outside Samael’s attack range. Hence, they witnessed the attack’s ferocious explosive force but were not injured in the slightest. Samael’s attack wreaked too much havoc. Except for the places that were being protected by some kind of enchantment, everything else had been reduced to rubbles. Perhaps because of Samael’s conspicuous actions, Suo Fei had yet to look at the situation at the four doors when light coming from above dazzled his eyes. He looked up and found that the roof...; had disappeared once again. His heart jolted. The next moment, as expected, he saw a vertically-pupilled gigantic eye move closer. The eye shifted its gaze directly onto them. Subsequently, Suo Fei heard a loud roar that seemed to come from deep underground. The voice was deep and resounding, revealing a faint trace of concealed joy. After that, the walls in front of Suo Fei collapsed and his field of view broadened. He was stunned by the scene he saw. It was incomparably vast, as if they were standing on a cloud and looking down on the world. Outside of the small room, there was actually such a vast place. In addition, he was finally able to see the whole figure of the owner of the gigantic eye. It’s a...; dragon. An enormous red dragon that was no less than a hundred metres long. In the game overview of 《Yalance》, it was stated that there were nine great races and nine lil’ shous that could be conquered. In the end, one could smoothly realise their 10P feast. However, among these nine great races, there was a race whose fame could not be compared with the other races. Although this race was the most powerful race in Yalance, it was only in the past. They had a huge physique and all parts of their body were treasures. In regards to their abilities, they had fifty percent absolute defence against magical and physical attacks. Not only did they have a high affinity for magic, but they also had remarkably powerful physical attacks due to their enormous physique as well as their skins that were as hard as iron. This race which had almost no weakness had been reduced to the point of near extinction. When Suo Fei was playing the game, he only encountered one dragon. It was said that in the whole of Yalance, it was the only one that remained. It was a jadeite green dragon with an enormous body that was more than seventy metres high. His figure was graceful and beautiful. Its pair of huge jadeite green eyes were as gentle and warm as water. However, he was seriously injured and was unable to fly. He spent hundreds of years alone several hundreds of metres underground. Until...; Suo Fei found him. His name was Hull, Suo Fei’s lil’ shou from the Dragon race. Dragons had no human form. From ancient times until now, they had never transformed into their human form. Suo Fei could vaguely remember that it seemed that Dragons’ energy was so strong that the humans’ delicate physique was unable to bear the Dragons’ rampaging power. Capturing the Dragon race’s lil’ shou seemed to be simple. One only needed to find something that could transform him, turn him into his human form, heal his injuries and rescue him out of the abyss. However, the thing that could transform him was extremely precious. It was an artifact of the Trolls. The trolls were huge in size so they relied on this artifact to transform their bodies according to their wishes. It wasn’t easy to obtain this artifact. Suo Fei had almost wiped out the whole Troll race for it to land in his hands. Therefore, although there was only one task issued to capture the Dragons’ lil’ shou, this task was extremely troublesome and time-consuming. In fact, Suo Fei really wanted to rescue Hull, regardless whether he’s a shou or not. Suo Fei felt sad when he recalled Hull staying inside the abyss by himself, bruised and unable to see the light of day. It’s unbearable to be lonely. However, Suo Fei didn’t have the capability of doing so at this point in time. Not to mention that he simply had no way of entering the abyss. Even if he received the help of Samael and the little cub, he still was unable to obtain the artifact from the Trolls. He was incapable of even rescuing Hull. In fact, he only needed to borrow the Trolls’ artifact. The tragedy was that the King of Trolls, Balnor, abhorred him to death. When he was playing the game, Suo Fei felt that Balnor was making trouble without reason and that the game had made false charges against the players, causing them to gain a powerful enemy. However, after the Aryan incident, Suo Fei became aware that Balnor hated him for seizing his lil’ shou. Now, Samael did not take Aryan away, but even more terribly, they directly took away his life. The past cannot be changed. Suo Fei could only lament that he’s unable to load the game files. Suo Fei shook his head and directed his line of sight towards the red dragon in front of him. He didn’t expect that he would come across a living dragon that was healthy and full of vitality in this place. It turned out that Hull still had a compatriot. Due to the prior forceful opening of the doors, the scene inside the four doors had been revealed. Suo Fei took a rough glance and felt that it was too disastrous Apart from the heavily panting Abel who was propped up using his word, Lancelot, Harris and Manzy had been rendered unconscious. He was unsure if they’re dead or alive. It seemed that they failed to pass the trial and underwent punishment. Although Abel was standing, he was in an extremely miserable state. There was a huge wound from his shoulder to his hips. Blood was flowing out, his face was pallid. He had not lost consciousness but he was already struggling to keep himself awake. Nevertheless, he still had the energy to be foul-mouthed, “F**k, that damn demon could actually use black magic!” A thought struck Suo Fei after hearing his words. His head was up in the clouds as he earnestly pondered when something else caught his attention. Abel had succeeded whereas the other three had failed. As a result, their enemies revealed themselves at this moment. Suo Fei swept a glance and was surprised. There was a human, a celestial, and an elf. What surprised Suo Fei the most was that a human archmage actually left Lancelot in such a tragic state! It’s too inconceivable. In addition, the elf was unusually strange. He didn’t hold a staff or a bow and arrow. Instead, he had a dagger. Looking at the magnificent dagger, it could be seen that its value was considerably high. Is this elf an S-tier assassin? The celestial was even more outrageous. He was holding a shield on his left hand and a greatsword on his right. This posture, is it a Berserker? No, it’s a Paladin! At this moment, the vague thought in his mind became clear. In Yalance, the shortcomings of each race were obvious. The magic affinity of the Demons and Beastkins were practically nil. At the same time, the Celestials had exceedingly low physical strength. The elves had high agility but their explosive strength was low. The humans were good in building relationships but were extremely weak. But now, they had encountered an S-tier wood-class mage beastkin, a primeval demon that could summon beasts, a paladin celestial, an S-tier assassin elf, and a human archmage who could defeat a celestial! Moreover, according to what he had heard from Abel, he had come across a demon that used black magic! Strengthening their weaknesses in such a manner, this was practically slapping the face of Yalance’s setting. If this was in the game, it would have brought about earth-shattering changes. However, an even more shocking scene appeared. The elf and the celestials vanished out of thin air, disappearing in exactly the same way as the demon and beastkin they had previously gotten rid of. What’s going on? Why did they vanish after seeing them? The red dragon seemed very excited to see them. His big wings were fluttering and his enormous body was twisting and turning. Then, he chatted in dialect with Samael. Why is it chatting in dialect? Because he started talking using the Dragons’ language. Suo Fei knew that the two were communicating. As for what they were talking about, he completely had no idea. The red dragon seemed to be only interested in Samael. He talked a lot and Samael also responded a few times. Suo Fei could not guess what they were talking about judging by their expressions alone, but the red dragon definitely spoke a lot. He couldn’t understand them but Suo Fei had no worries. Afterall, Samael would still share it to him afterwards, What he needed to do was to see the conditions of those who had lost consciousness and one who was about to lose consciousness. Suo Fei thought about it and went to Abel first. He wasn’t being biased or anything. It was because the other three were unconscious while Abel was still awake. Being awake meant that at least, he’s still alive. By increasing his energy, Suo Fei could increase his chances of survival. Suo Fei approached him but Abel didn’t have any response. In fact, his consciousness had drifted away. He was merely straining himself to hold onto his remaining consciousness. If he hadn’t been in a perilous situation, he would have passed out long ago. Suo Fei didn’t dare to delay any longer. He raised his hand and Healing Light descended onto Abel’s body. The blood flowing out from the huge wound on Abel’s back flowed at a much slower rate. However, it didn’t stop. Suo Fei frowned. He dared not reveal his unusual ability, but the healing spell was truly insufficient. Unfortunately, because of his ability, he never thought of preparing a bandage that could stop bleeding. With just the Healing Light alone to stop the bleeding, his MP would definitely be used up. After thinking about it, he had no other choice but to ask Abel, “Do you have a bandage on you? I’ll help you treat your wound.” Abel nodded, his voice weak, “Interspatial bag is at my waist. Have bandages inside.” Suo Fei knew that Abel couldn’t move, so he took the interspatial bag from his waist. He didn’t open it without permission but gave it to Abel. The interspatial bag was something very private for the people in Yalance. Even in such special circumstances, it would still be disrespectful to open it without the owner’s permission. Abel’s vigilance had abated due to Suo Fei’s actions. He tremblingly reached out his hand and took out all the bandages in his interspatial bag. There were a lot of bandages and their quality was high since they were made by renowned masters. After all, Abel was the Demon Prince so his life-saving things certainly must be of the highest quality. Suo Fei had a lot of potions in his interspatial bag. Previously, he had drunk some buff potions, but he still had a lot of potions that could disinfect, stop bleeding, and cure wounds. Suo Fei first cleaned up the blood that had oozed out as well as the dirt that had entered through the tears of his clothes. Then, he took out three potions and was just about to apply it onto Abel when he paused. In front of Abel, he didn’t use his appraisal technique but instead used the material appraiser that he had bought from Benesse City on the potions. It identified them as a disinfectant, a hemostatic potion as well as a healing potion. Abel didn’t look at the appraiser but instead profoundly stared at him. Then, he closed his eyes and softly said, “Elf, I believe you.” Given the situation, you have no choice but to believe me even if you don’t. Suo Fei’s mouth inwardly twitched. He paid no heed to his words, applying the potions one after another. He reassessed his condition and found that although the results were not obvious, it was still better than nothing. After applying the potions, Abel seemed unable to support himself any longer and fainted. Suo Fei thought, Everyone has lost consciousness apart from the unfamiliar dragon. Perhaps he could stealthily use his ability? The thought had just flashed in his mind when Samael, who had been talking with the red dragon, suddenly looked over and said, “Not allowed.” Suo Fei paused and finally abandoned the thought. It’s true that he’s too selfish. It’s true that he thinks that people are too sinister. His ability was truly somewhat heaven-defying in Yalance. People could fight to the death just to obtain an artifact, let alone such an ability that could essentially grant someone eternal life. Suo Fei also comforted himself that he had done everything he could. He applied the potions and wrapped the bandage. Abel’s wound had already stopped bleeding. Its recovery was slightly slow but it was no longer life-threatening. With a sigh of relief, Suo Fei stopped thinking about it and went to check on Harris’ condition. Harris’ clothes had been torn to pieces, but there were no obvious wounds on his body. Suo Fei leaned in near his nose and found that he’s still breathing. Suo Fei was unsure if he had exhausted his powers or what, but at least, he was still alive. He let out another sigh of relief. He was just about to walk towards Lancelot, but suddenly paused. A figure appeared out of nowhere. He was garbed in a black robe with only a rim of black and shiny fur on its collar. Suo Fei gnashed his teeth in anger upon seeing his clothing. The figure gradually became clearer, then there was another figure followed by another...; Suo Fei’s eyes constricted. More than forty people appeared out of nowhere! One of them had long silver hair and crimson red eyes. Who is this, if not Grantlyn Evans? Suo Fei narrowed his eyes. Are they the oriole behind the mantis stalking the cicada? The author has something to say: Cough cough, the people in black who only had had brief appearances until now are finally saying hello to everyone. This troop was truly not small. Suo Fei had no idea what they wanted to do, but when Grantlyn hacked the Holy Tree, there were only seven of them helping him. Now, however, there were many black-robed men. Suo Fei roughly estimated that there were at least forty of them. At this moment, the black-robed men dispersed and surrounded them in a semi-circle. The red dragon was too huge, thus they could only enclose Suo Fei and his group while facing the dragon. The troop had come prepared, and certainly with a purpose. As for what their purpose was, Suo Fei pursed his lips. He and Samael didn’t have anything worth being attracted to. They probably came for the treasury’s hidden treasure, or perhaps for this red dragon. At present, apart from the black-robed men, the only people who remained conscious were Suo Fei and his group as well as the red dragon. The red dragon flew into a rage and bellowed, “Intruders! ” The sound was blaring, and was completely spoken in Yalance’s common language. Suo Fei stared blankly, This red dragon could actually speak the common language. When the red dragon finished roaring, Samael proceeded to say, “Carry me on your back and let me obstruct these invaders.” The dragon lowered his head, motioning for Samael to come up. Without any hesitation, Samael quickly moved towards Suo Fei, picked him up, and then lightly jumped, leaping more than ten metres high and effortlessly landing on the red dragon’s wide back. Suo Fei only reacted after realising that he was on the red dragon’s firm back. Then, he was somewhat worried about the four still-unconscious people below. He didn’t know how they would fare in this situation. His worries were immediately dispelled. Four black-robed men appeared next to Abel, Lancelot, Harris and Manzy, who were lying unconscious on the ground and carried them. Suo Fei wrinkled his brows with slight distrust. Looking at the situation, the black-robed men didn’t intend to treat them as cannon fodders. It was only that he didn’t know if they had other uses. Suo Fei sighed, At least their lives are not in danger. Grantlyn’s gaze had not moved away from Suo Fei ever since he appeared. Suo Fei had previously consumed too much energy when fighting with the fireball fatty. Although the Disguise Spell didn’t use up much energy, it still needed to use energy at all times to maintain the disguise. During the fight with the fireball fatty, Suo Fei wholeheartedly defended himself. Naturally, he didn’t have the mental capacity to continue maintaining the Disguise Spell. After over-consuming his energy, he also dared not cast another Disguise Spell. Thus, he had already resumed his original appearance. In fact, it was easy for his Disguise Spell to deceive Manzy and the others. However, it was most likely useless for people at Grantlyn’s level, hence he didn’t bother wasting any more of his remaining energy. The dragon’s back was wide, providing a broad range of vision. Looking down from up above, it made Suo Fei feel as if he was condescendingly looking down at Grantlyn. However, even though Grantlyn was looking up at Suo Fei, his imposing manner was not reduced in the slightest. He stared at Suo Fei, the emotion in his crimson eyes indiscernible. When Abel and the others had been taken away, Grantlyn looked at Suo Fei and slowly spoke, “Fey, come here.” Suo Fei wanted to laugh at what he said. Grantlyn is taking me for a fool, huh. He’s definitely thinking that I’m a fool! Although the two were father and son in name, hadn’t they severed this relationship a long time ago? They could not even be considered as mere strangers, they were enemies! When he thought of Vixanne’s death, more blood rushed into Suo Fei’s head in anger. Fey, your a**! Come here, your a**!You really think you’re all that. Suo Fei was unable to speak it out, but it showed in his actions. He tightly clasped Samael’s hand and stayed still. He did nothing else, acting as if he was deaf. Grantlyn frowned. He was just about to say something when the demon beside him spoke, “Lil’ elf, quickly come here. It would be bad if you get accidentally injured in a while.” Suo Fei remained indifferent. He had no trust in Grantlyn. This person didn’t deserve his trust. Grantlyn’s sight landed on Suo Fei’s hand that was tightly gripping Samael’s. He was silent for a while before he spoke in a much softer tone, “Fey, come here. Don’t be willful. I don’t want to hurt you.” What are you pretending for? Why are you showing concern for your son at this moment?Don’t you remember what you did? Moreover, Suo Fei perceptively caught the hidden meaning of his words. Once he had come over, Grantlyn would kill Samael. This recognition made Suo Fei completely enraged. First, he caused Vixanne’s death and now, he even planned to kill Samael. Grantlyn really regarded him as a pushover that could be easily controlled as he wished. It was true that Suo Fei was not good at interacting with people, but it didn’t mean that he was a fool. Squinting his eyes, Suo Fei suppressed his anger and, as if he was finally afraid, he softly spoke with a slight tremor in his voice, “Father...; You...; I...;” His voice was very soft and his words were extremely unclear. He discreetly glanced at Samael, looking as if he was afraid to speak out. Grantlyn had been staring at Suo Fei thus he caught the subtle expression on his face. He pondered then told the black-robed man beside him, “Go and take him here.” The black-robed men paused but eventually stepped forward. Suo Fei sneered in his heart. Truly a coward. If you have the guts, you should come over yourself. However, he also surmised that Grantlyn would not take the risk. Wounding one of them is already good enough, as long as they are able to escape! As soon as the black-robed man was near, Suo Fei leapt up, brandished his dagger and struck into the man’s vital part. The black-robed man was on guard. He immediately blocked Suo Fei’s attack, but was unable to defend against the oncoming sharp, black blade. His chest was pierced and he collapsed to the ground. It all happened in an instant, with Suo Fei and Samuel tacitly cooperating with each other, followed with the bellow of the red dragon. The father and son’s nonsense time was cruelly interrupted. Grantlyn’s eyes were raging with fury. He unsheathed his longsword, ready for battle at any moment. The red dragon was massive. Hence, when it spewed out fire, it was more than ten metres high. The fire surged towards the black-robed men. The black-robed men were a force to be reckoned with. They instantly assembled into a formation and cast a huge ice shield, reflecting the fire back. Then, a volley of arrows fell from the sky. The red dragon spread open its enormous wings, covering the horizon and protecting Samael and the others. The arrows that landed on its sturdy wings didn’t break but dissolved instead. Suo Fei’s eyes narrowed slightly. The arrows are poisoned! But the red dragon’s skin was not merely for show. Not only was it impervious to swords and spears, it was even unaffected by poison or fire! It was truly too awesome. Seeing that the red dragon was unscathed, Suo Fei breathed a sigh of relief. He and Samael simply didn’t need to take any action. The red dragon’s fighting capability alone was already heaven-defying. The strength of the black-robed men was absolutely at the top in Yalance. Even so, they were still helpless when facing the red dragon even after exerting all their strength. They could only passively receive a beating. The red dragon not only released fire-type magic attacks. It also unleashed a powerful physical attack by waving its tail. Suo Fei thought to himself that if this was a game, he would definitely see the black-robed men’s HP dropping like crazy while the red dragon’s outrageous HP was only dropping bit by bit. Its defense simply couldn’t be broken, alright! The sense of superiority from being the ultimate big boss in a game is too awesome! Suo Fei wanted to cheer for the red dragon. You can do this! Torture them to death! Who asked them to bully us? This is definitely their retribution! Muahaha! In particular, when Suo Fei saw Grantlyn’s clothes being burned to ashes, he felt extremely refreshed. This is revenge for Vixanne! This is revenge for the dead Sofey Evans! Have a taste of what karma feels like! Wait. Suo Fei who was feeling complacent suddenly saw a familiar face in the group of black-robed men. His physique gradually turned into a huge body with sturdy arms. His bell-like eyes were ferocious. Suo Fei’s heart thumped. It was the King of Trolls — Balnor. Others don’t understand, but when Suo Fei caught sight of Balnor, he felt a burst of coldness. Balnor had previously reduced his size and concealed himself within the crowd. At this time, Suo Fei recalled Grantlyn’s words and came to a realisation. Earlier, he wondered how could Grantlyn be so kind. When he was in Valinor, he already wasn’t concerned about the fate of his wife and child so how could he show concern now? Suo Fei deliberately pretended to lead him to take the bait and Grantlyn actually asked someone to take him. Such an obvious trap, yet Grantlyn actually easily entered it. He thought that Grantlyn had gone nuts but as it turned out, they were only stalling for time! The Trolls’ artifact was called the Transmogrifier. As its name implied, it could transform the body or object’s shape. It could be used on both living and non-living objects. In the game, Suo Fei had obtained the Transmogrifier. He had to engage in a life-and-death battle with the Trolls. He managed to win with difficulty but he suffered heavy losses. Then, he used the Transmogrifier to reduce Hull’s size and brought him away from the abyss. Suo Fei had used the Transmogrifier before thus he knew that this thing had an activating time. Moreover, the user had to remain motionless. The artifact also had a cooldown time. If it was used by someone like Balnor, the cooldown might only take a few seconds, but if it was used by the red dragon who was around a hundred metres tall, the cooldown would be much longer. Suo Fei had used it on Hull before thus he had a deep understanding of it. As soon as the black-robed men arrived, the Transmogrifier was already on cooldown. Killing the huge dragon had never been their purpose. They were stalling for time, that’s all. Grantlyn discovering him and persuading him were nothing but him merely stalling for time. Suo Fei had quickly ended their conversation and started their fight due to his anger but even an insignificant fraction of a second could decide the outcome of their battle. Suo Fei was extremely upset. He had been too confident of the power of Samael, the huge dragon and the fireball fatty. In addition, he had never expected that Balnor would appear in this place. Why did Balnor get mixed up with the black-robed men? What do they want to achieve? Suo Fei didn’t have the time to think of it. At this moment, he was determined to prevent the Transmogrifier from successfully activating. The reason why it’s so precious was not because of its ability to transform shapes. More importantly, it could be used to suppress other people’s power. That was the reason it had a cooldown town. It needed to lock on the target and determine how much space it required to store the target’s power. If they succeed, the huge dragon’s fighting strength would disappear. By then, there would only be Samael and the fireball fatty left to face the more than forty black-robed men. Suo Fei felt cold deep inside. This group of people absolutely had the ability to force Samael to go out of control. The author has something to say: I read a novel last night until the wee hours of the morning. It was so good...; But when I thought about it again, I felt frustrated. How could others write so well? The plot is coherent, the writing is well-organised and the characters are outstanding! I really need to redouble my efforts ahhhh! Uh, I guess y’all might want to ask which novel is it. I wouldn’t say the name la but it’s BG. The novels I read are quite random. Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>Alejandra M.</strong>‘s kofis~ F**k, I definitely can’t let them have their way! Suo Fei fiercely stared at Balnor. Time doesn’t wait for anyone. Although he didn’t discover it early, it also wasn’t late. Balnor’s artifact was still on cooldown. If he used this time to interrupt him, it would waste all the black-robed men’s efforts of bearing the dragon’s wrath. Suo Fei didn’t bother wasting time pondering how to interrupt him as he was aware that he didn’t have the capability of doing so. Instesd, he hurriedly told Samael what he knew of this matter. After Samael finished listening, his eyes flashed and he whispered, “Leave it to me. Don’t leave, just stay on the dragon’s back. ” Suo Fei nodded, fully aware that he would only be a hindrance if he went. Samael spoke towards the red dragon, “Nael, attack with all your strength. Don’t hold back. ” Then he turned towards the fireball fatty, “Don’t use AOE attacks, use single-target spells and coordinate with me.” Samael didn’t explain it clearly but Suo Fei had a rough idea. The current situation was that Suo Fei knew the existence of the Transmogrifier but the red dragon didn’t. Hence, the dragon didn’t take the black-robed men seriously. He had not used all his strength as he felt that it was unnecessary. Grantlyn and his group also understood this. So to say, the attacks that they had to withstand weren’t that excessive. However, the situation was actually the opposite. With the persuasion of Samael and him, the red dragon would certainly listen and stop playing with the black-robed men. He would surely go all out, magnifying the pressure on the black-robed men. For Samael and the fireball fatty, whose attack powers were only second to the red dragon, one would concentrate on dealing physical attacks while the other would cast magic attacks. By coordinating their attacks to some point, the chances of hitting their target would greatly increase. This was the best strategy they could employ at this moment. Suo Fei felt a momentary sense of loss. In this fight, his power level was a puny level 5. He could barely protect himself without being a burden on everyone. So frustrating...; This was not the time to be full of remorse. Suo Fei cleared the haze in his mind. As expected, Samael directly used his heart blood to activate the Asura Blade as he needed to quickly attack. After the beginning of the battle, when they were being protected by the red dragon’s huge wings, Suo Fei looked for a blind spot so that he could kiss Samael’s chest. Suo Fei was gratified to see the wound heal as Samael had to maintain his peak condition. The black-robed men were briefly flustered when the red dragon’s attack force suddenly increased. However, they were truly well-coordinated, immediately changing their formation. Their ice shield that was as hard as iron turned into a water shield which lessened the impact of the dragon’s attack, making the shield much stronger. They had truly come prepared. The red dragon was a fire-type dragon thus his attacks were fire-type. To counter it, they used a water-type defense. They used the law that water restrains fire superbly. Suo Fei pursed his lips, knowing that the fireball fatty’s attack power would also be reduced. It seemed that they could only depend on Samael. The timing of Samael’s attack was extremely accurate, precisely at the time of the red dragon’s full-on attack, catching the black-robed men unprepared. His target was apparent as he charged straight towards Balnor. It had to be said that Samael’s explosive power was truly astonishing. He had not received even one skill up to this date but with just the aid of the divine artifact, he could already regard the whole Yalance with disdain with his power. If the red dragon’s attack was like being hit with a heavy hammer, then Samael’s attack was as sharp as a dagger, forcibly creating a hole in the formation’s absolute defense! Suo Fei was able to see clearly from high above and couldn’t help but want to cheer. Too awesome! His figure was as swift as lightning and his attack was as powerful as thunder. The attack created a gap in the black-robed men’s defense. A bitter shriek sounded and a black-robed man lay in a pool of blood. They were one person less so the defensive formation’s resistive ability decreased. Suo Fei urged the red dragon, “Attack! Don’t waste such a good opportunity!” The red dragon lived up to his expectations. He took a deep breath and released a Fire Missile 【named by Suo Fei】which resonantly smashed onto the shield. The black-robed men were even more flustered, throwing their formation into disarray, forming a hundred more loopholes in their defense. Suo Fei was feeling proud of his group when he suddenly saw Grantlyn silently uttering something. Suo Fei stared at him and caught sight of what was in his hand. Cold sweat instantly ran down his back. They actually had this thing! Yalance only had three divine artifacts. One of them was the Asura Blade in Samael’s hand which was the only one that had the ability to attack. Suo Fei had been unable to find one of the remaining two even until he completed the game. The last one, however, was currently in Grantlyn’s hand. It’s called Shadow Shifter. It was only the size of a palm, but its ability defied the law of nature. Simply put, it’s a large teleportation array that could be used anytime and anywhere. As long as the destination had been specified in advance, the holder would be able to teleport as they wished. Grantlyn brandished this object when a black-robed man had dropped dead. What he wanted to do was extremely obvious. Suo Fei really didn’t expect that they were still hiding this trick up their sleeves. These thoughts flashed quickly across Suo Fei’s mind when Grantlyn successfully activated the Shadow Shifter. There was a flash of light. A new person replaced the black-robed man lying on the ground. There was not the slightest change in position hence the formation that was in utter disarray resumed its original appearance. Moreover, the formation’s strength greatly increased due to the abundant power of the new person. Suo Fei apprehensively looked on and he almost shouted when his gaze landed onto Samael. Samael was already deep inside the formation, so even though the formation had been mended, he was unable to do anything to stop it. However, a shadow flashed quickly and pierced Samael’s back. Suo Fei only saw that it was a black-haired, robust man. His face that was slightly leaning towards the side was cold as ice, he held a dagger in an extremely unusual manner, but his speed was extremely quick. Samael’s heart had been precisely pierced through. Suo Fei’s eyes turned red. Samael was near invincible and only had one weakness, which was his heart. His blood could be converted as he wished, but his heart blood could not. The condition of Samael’s so-called berserk state was that his HP should be near zero but in fact, there should only be his heart blood remaining. This would forcefully activate his self-defense system and drive him into an uncontrollable state where he indiscriminately attacks people. However, if his heart blood flowed ceaselessly, even if Samael still had a large amount of blood left in his body, he would eventually lose his life. Samael will die...; This sudden realisation exploded in Suo Fei’s head. As if all the blood in his veins became frozen, he went rigid, without any signs of consciousness. Even though he had been pierced, Samael’s expression remained the same. He paid no heed to the situation behind him. As if he had no injuries, he charged towards Balnor as he initially intended. The attacker saw that Samael had been so badly injured but was still able to remain unmoved. He was slightly startled but shortly launched a stronger attack. But it was too late. Samael’s speed was so fast that in the blink of an eye, he was already near Balnor who was in the middle of cooling down the Transmogrifier. Balnor was unable to move so he could only look on helplessly. The blood on the black-haired primeval demon’s chest bloomed like the most enchanting Devil’s snare, his calm purple eyes were like a bottomless abyss. Balnor was extremely shocked when he felt a sharp pain in his body. His arms had been cut off. The King of Trolls let out a wrathful roar but was unable to stop the Transmogrifier from being taken away. The cooldown was forcibly interrupted. Samael managed to seize the Transmogrifier but he was deep inside the enemy camp. Suo Fei returned to his senses. His face was deathly pale and he was unable to take a single step forward. He was afraid, extremely afraid. He had never felt death as distinctly as now. Not his own death, but Samael’s. No, it won’t! Suo Fei’s lips trembled unconsciously but he forced himself to calm down. <i>There’s still a way. He could still save Samael.</i>  There was not enough time for him to think it clearly. Suo Fei beckoned the little cub and hurriedly urged it. The little cub solemnly nodded. Then, he sat on the little cub who rushed out of the protection of the dragon’s wings and flew straight down. As Samael had obtained the Transmogrifier, the black-robed men surrounding Balnor ceased their defense and started attacking. They wanted to regain the Transmogrifier hence they turned all of their defensive power into attack power with the intention of killing Samael. This gave Suo Fei the chance. Without the obstruction of the water shield, he, who was riding the little cub, was able to approach Samael quickly. It wasn’t easy but fortunately, the little cub’s fur was greatly impermeable hence it could pass through countless violent magic attacks and rush into the area of battle. The blood in Samael’s chest was flowing incessantly but he was also moving incessantly, the Asura Blade devouring lives wherever it went. The black-robed men were somewhat fearful of his ferocious fighting strength but Suo Fei knew that Samael was at the end of his tether. He could not delay any longer, he must help him stop the bleeding. When he reached Samael, Suo Fei jumped off the little cub, pulled out a dagger to protect himself, and approached Samael. He then saw it vividly. Although Samael’s imposing manner still remained, his face was so pale that it was almost transparent and his purple eyes were nearly black, so dark that there was not even a hint of lustre in them. Suo Fei jumped several times, passing through the black-robed men blocking his way and arriving next to Samael. Seeing him approach, fluctuations could be seen in Samael’s calm eyes. His voice was fierce unlike before, “You can’t!” He knew what Suo Fei was planning to do. It reached the point where he was so worried and anxious that he would rather die this way. He didn’t want Suo Fei to reveal his ability in this situation. Suo Fei didn’t respond. He’s extremely selfish. For his own sake, he didn’t save Abel and Harris. He was so selfish that if Eugene was in trouble, he wouldn’t use his ability to save him. However, he couldn’t, absolutely couldn’t, not save Samael. Even if he had to exchange a life for a life if he exposed his ability, what of it? In this world, he only had Samael. He was the only person that he would never forsake. Suo Fei closed his eyes and almost devoutly kissed Samael’s wound. A ray of dazzling Holy Light flashed, enshrouding the two of them. <i>Willing devotion accords divine power for an unexpected recovery.</i>  The author has something to say: I saw everyone’s messages today and suddenly felt that this author was quite miserable yesterday. I was filled with self-reproach, as if I was blatantly asking for consolation and praise. /Covers face/ Could it be that I really think so deep inside? So shy 【That’s enough!】 The Holy Light faded, gradually exposing the two people within it. The people that surrounded them stared in disbelief. The demon who was severely injured actually recovered instantaneously. What kind of terrifying healing ability is this?!Even the Celestials’ Priest of God didn’t have such ability! In a split second, all of their gazes locked on to Suo Fei. This elf unexpectedly had such a powerful healing ability! Grantlyn, who was standing at a distance, narrowed his eyes, an indistinguishable emotion flashing within them. Meanwhile, the man who had seriously injured Samael stared at Suo Fei with an unfathomable expression. Suo Fei didn’t pay attention to any of these. Instead, he was gulping in big lungfuls of air, feeling that he would suffocate to death if he didn’t do so. When he previously saved Eugene, he merely consumed all his strength. This time, however, he most probably consumed his strength past his limits. His head was befuddled and his body had not even the slightest bit of strength remaining. If he wasn’t in a perilous situation, he would have passed out long ago. At the moment, he was merely relying on his willpower to force himself to remain conscious. The ultimate gong-kun who had recovered from the brink of death completely went berserk. He held Suo Fei on one hand while his other hand gripped the Asura Blade. He was the embodiment of an Asura, reaping the lives of everyone he came across. Wherever the sword went, the defenses were as weak as paper, allowing the sword to effortlessly pierce through them. The Asura Blade darted like the tongue of a viper, spilling blood and claiming lives. The Transmogrifier had been snatched and the demon had terrifying strength. Hence, the formation of the black-robed men was thrown in complete disarray. They were unable to use the Transmogrifier to suppress the red dragon. At the same time, they had to deal with Samael’s deranged carnage. Facing the attack of both of them, they wouldn’t be able to last for a long time despite having the aid of the Shadow Shifter. Their losses were too great yet they were unable to obtain what they wanted. Grantlyn’s eyes sparked with fury. How could he be willing to retreat this way! The unfamiliar man who inflicted heavy injuries on Samael surveyed the situation, his eyes narrowing as he spoke, “Grantlyn, teleport my guards over.” Grantlyn was slightly startled and looked up at him. Shortly after, he lowered his eyes and began activating the Shadow Shifter. During this time, the unfamiliar man entered the battle. He held an extremely unusual dagger. Its blade was silver-white while its tip was sharply hooked, resembling a tooth of a beast. This kind of dagger could easily slash someone’s throat and take their life. The manner he held the dagger was also extremely unusual. He didn’t seem to be holding it, instead, he was so familiar with it that the sword seemed to be an extension of his hand. He blocked the Asura Blade’s attack and rescued a black-robed man. Samael’s speed was extremely fast, his explosive force was extremely powerful and his strength was extremely outstanding. His superiority was particularly obvious when he was facing the black-robed men. Thus, even if he fought using only one hand, it would still be as easy as cutting cabbages. However, when the unfamiliar man joined the battle, Samael didn’t have an overwhelming advantage any longer. The man was equally matched with Samael, whether it be his speed or skills. At this moment, Samael was still holding Suo Fei, so he was obviously at a disadvantage. Suo Fei was slowly recovering some of his strength. Samael had indeed recovered all of his strength, but there was only a slight chance of winning against the unfamiliar man if Samael were to continue protecting him. This won’t do. He couldn’t be a burden to Samael. If he continued encumbering Samael this way, he would only give the stranger a chance to attack Samael. By then, Samael could only wait for his impending death. Suo Fei wasn’t sure whether he could heal Samael once more at that time. He took a deep breath. His hands were weak but he tremblingly fished out all the potions in his interspatial bag and drank all of them. He could only pray that it wouldn’t have any side effects. Suo Fei clenched his fists and felt him slightly recovering his strength. He was still stuck onto Samael’s body. Even though he was in such a chaotic and dangerous situation, he still felt at ease as he leaned onto Samael. This person’s warmth...; This person’s heartbeat...; This person’s scent...; Everything about him gave him the power to live. I must live. I must. He leaned close to Samael and softly uttered, “I’ve slightly recovered. In a while, I’ll jump on to the little cub and break out of the enclosure.” Samael paused with a rare hesitation. He knew what Suo Fei was worried about. In the current situation, this was the best plan for them to fight back. The man in front of him was extremely strong. If he insisted on protecting Suo Fei while fighting the man, the chances of being defeated was high. On the other hand, if he was able to fight with all his might, he would definitely be able to kill the enemy. He understood this clearly but he still didn’t want to let go. There had always been an unpredictable sense of danger hanging over his head, leaving him uneasy. The unfamiliar man was as strong as him. Although he had the aid of a divine artifact, the Asura Blade, the unfamiliar man’s dagger was also not ordinary. Most importantly, this unfamiliar man was experienced and had all sorts of unique skills. If he carelessly fought with the enemy, he might not be able to protect Suo Fe. As such, it would be better to break out of the encirclement and deliver Suo Fei to where the red dragon was. After coming up with a plan, Samael still didn’t have the slightest intention of letting go of Suo Fei but, at the same time, he also ceased fighting. Samael turned a blind eye to the unfamiliar man’s provocation. With his current strength, not meeting force with force but only looking for an opening to reach the red dragon was not difficult. Although he wouldn’t be able to attack with the red dragon from two sides, it would at least ensure Suo Fei’s safety. Victory was only a matter of time. They need not act impetuously. Naturally, the unfamiliar man saw his actions. A hint of surprise flashed in his eyes and the corner of his eyes hooked up into a sneer. He attacked using more strength as he ridiculed, “Unable to defeat me so you want to escape?” Samael was unmoved. He dodged the attack. His gaze was calm as it remained locked on to a certain spot, gathering momentum to spring into action. Seeing Samael acting this way, the unfamiliar man was somewhat anxious in his heart but it didn’t show on his face. He turned to look at his Grantlyn and his heart regained its calm. In a flash, seven figures surrounded Samael. All of them held daggers. Their speed was so fast that they could not be seen by the naked eye. Suo Fei was startled. This is Stealth!<i>There are</i> actually so many S-tier assassins that could use Stealth! The target of their attacks was the same, charging straight towards Samael’s chest, their accuracies not lacking in the slightest. The speed of S-tier assassins was top-notch, but they could not inflict any harm to Samael. The discrepancy in their strength was too great. Samael blocked all of the attacks with his Asura Blade and reflected it back. However, this was not the end. When Samael was blocking the blows with all his strength, the unfamiliar man suddenly appeared at his side, his dagger directly stabbing towards Samael’s left arm. That was the arm that was holding Suo Fei. At this time, the unfamiliar man’s intentions were already especially obvious. He wanted to take Suo Fei away! Samael could either let go of the elf or bear the brunt of the attack. If he took on the attack, his arm would likely be impaired. The corner of the unfamiliar man’s mouth turned up into a smile. Demon, what would you choose? It all happened in a flash. Although Samael had high agility, he simply couldn’t think of a third possibility in this situation. He could release Suo Fei so that his arms would not be harmed, but Suo Fei would be taken away. If he didn’t let go, it’s extremely probable that his arm would be crippled by the sharp dagger, but he would at least still be able to protect Suo Fei with his other hand. In fact, this simply wasn’t a multiple-choice question for Samael. He wouldn’t let go. He couldn’t let go. Looking at the dagger that was about to pierce Samael’s arm, the Suo Fei who had been silent all this while suddenly exerted himself to pull Samael’s arm away and blocked the attack with his own body. The dagger’s speed didn’t diminish as it penetrated Suo Fei’s back. A burst of pain came through Suo Fei and cold sweat instantly ran out of his forehead. However, the unfamiliar man didn’t stop there. He held the dagger and asked with a slight smile, “You let him go, or I kill him?” Samael let go. The unfamiliar man smiled victoriously. He took Suo Fei and loudly shouted, “Grantlyn!” However, at the next moment, his voice came to a sudden halt. Samael disregarded the oncoming attacks of the seven S-tier assassins and pierced the Asura Blade into the unfamiliar man’s chest. He had never seen such dark eyes before. It was like the depths of hell. The purple hue had been obscured by a jet-black colour. At that moment, he recalled the Demon God in the legends. This was the last thought that crossed the mind of Linde, the Demon King, before he lost consciousness. However, he had succeeded so even if he died, the elf had already fallen into his hands and the Shadow Shifter had been activated. Thus, they were teleported back to the demon’s territory. Suo Fei was awakened by a sharp pain in his back which made him nearly scream in pain. He didn’t feel much pain when he had been stabbed. Now, however, it seemed like someone poured some kind of liquid onto his wound. The pain which was as if someone sprinkled salt onto his wound made him feel disoriented. He vaguely heard someone say, “Hold him down, don’t let him rupture the wound.” The completely unfamiliar voice wasn’t enough to make him sober. His body was devoid of strength, but he couldn’t help but tremble due to the extreme pain. He didn’t know how long it lasted when the severe pain finally subsided and Suo Fei fell unconscious. When he woke up, his back was only slightly itchy. The unbearable pain had disappeared. Suo Fei was still befuddled. He opened his eyes and was greeted by a thoroughly unfamiliar sight. It was a big and luxurious bedroom. Purple curtains draped atop the bed, like layers upon layers of smoke, enshrouding the place with mystery. Suo Fei was struggling to prop himself into a sitting position with his arms when he heard a familiar voice, “Be careful of the wound.” The sound was familiar, but it was a sound he detested. He turned his head and, sure enough, it was Grantlyn. He stared at Grantlyn with unconcealed loathing and resentment. Grantlyn acted as if he didn’t see it. Although he was still stone-faced, he carefully placed a pillow behind Suo Fei so that he wouldn’t strain himself so much. Grantlyn’s action didn’t make Suo Fei’s expression look any better. On the contrary, it was filled with even more loathing. Still being a hypocrite and pretending to be compassionate? In this situation, what are you still acting for?! Grantlyn left and came back after a while, holding a cup in his hand which he handed to Suo Fei, “Drink it so that you can recover faster.” Suo Fei remained still. Grantlyn frowned slightly before finally placing the cup on the small table at the side of his bed. He sat down, looked at Suo Fei and gently spoke, “Fey, I’ll tell you what you’ve always wanted to know, is that okay?” The author has something to say: Suo Fei: //loudly sobbing// Stepmother! You actually threw me into the enemy camp! Mom: Be well-behaved, son. Your husband will immediately come to pick you up. Restrain yourself a little. Suo Fei: Husband, your a**! It should be wife! Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>A.M</strong>‘s kofis~ This sentence caused Suo Fei to bite back the words that sprang to his lips. He wanted to hear what Grantlyn wanted to say. What could he possibly say? Suo Fei shifted his gaze to Grantlyn with a calm expression. Even though he was slightly curious, he didn’t show it. He looked at Grantlyn without saying anything. His expression indicated that if he wanted to say something, then just say it and if he didn’t, then quickly get out of here. Grantlyn stared at Suo Fei and was somewhat at a loss seeing Suo Fei’s expression. To be honest, Grantlyn had a remarkable appearance. Being a Pureblood elf, having a beautiful face was a given. Unlike Manzy’s gorgeous and somewhat fierce beauty, people often overlook his appearance due to his age and temperament. But when he hid his indifference and softened his expression, one would discover that he had an extremely exquisite appearance. His voice was gentle but solemn, “Fey, I didn’t betray the Elven race. It’s impossible for me to betray my own race. I will always be proud of being a Pureblood elf. Our honour and our lineage would never change. ” If these words were to be told to Sofey Evans, he might have been moved, but for Suo Fei, he simply didn’t care. What Elven race? What lineage? I’m so sorry. I’m someone from Earth so that just can’t stir me up. In Grantlyn’s eyes, however, he was Sofey Evans, so he had to act as if he was moved. Suo Fei opened his mouth and said, “But you cut down the Holy Tree. That was the glory that God had bestowed upon us. ” Hearing this, Grantlyn’s expression dimmed and his gentle tone became ice-cold, “Glory? No, that’s our disgrace!” Suo Fei stared at him. Grantlyn calmed himself down before he bluntly diverted the topic, “How’s the recovery of your wound? Is it still painful?” Suo Fei was stunned by the sudden change in topic, but he still instinctively replied, “It doesn’t hurt anymore. It’s just a little itchy.” “Turn around and let me have a look. ” Suo Fei was unable to make sense of the matter. He almost thought that he had missed something that Grantlyn had said. We were initially talking about the Holy Tree so why does he want to look at his wound now? While Suo Fei was stunned, Grantlyn leaned over and turned Suo Fei’s back to him, exposing his wound. Suo Fei was stunned. He didn’t notice it when he was inside the quilt but when his body was exposed, he realised that he actually wasn’t wearing any clothes! The cold fingers that touched his back snapped him out of his daze. He instantly turned around and glared at Grantlyn. Grantlyn only smiled and said, “It’s recovered well. Come, I’ll bring you somewhere.” Suo Fei slightly calmed down. Alright. He could understand that perhaps Grantlyn had something to say in that particular place. So the reason he inspected his wounds was to determine if he was able to move? Although Suo Fei felt resentful towards Grantlyn, leaving the room was exactly what he wanted. If the wound hadn’t recovered, he would have pretended that it already was. Suo Fei dressed himself neatly after grabbing clothes from the bedside. Watching him move so nimbly, the corner of Grantlyn’s mouth hooked up slightly, “Fey, you’ve grown up.” Suo Fei looked up and sneered, “This is all thanks to you.” Grantlyn paused slightly before pretending that he didn’t hear it. In fact, when they were inside the room, Suo Fei vaguely felt that the decorations of the room were archetypal of a certain race. At the very least, they were definitely not in the territory of the Elves nor the Celestials. This was because the territories of these two were bright. On the contrary, this bedroom was decorated mostly of black and purple hues. In Yalance, the only race who normally used these two colours was the Demons. Moreover, Grantlyn had such a close relationship with the Demons hence it was extremely likely that they were in the Demon territory. Even so, he still had to confirm it with his own eyes. Suo Fei followed Grantlyn in leaving the room and his conjecture was almost certainly sure. Celestials didn’t have night-time while Demons didn’t have daytime. This was certainly the capital city of the Demons that was filled with boundless darkness —— the Demon Realm. When Suo Fei recalled Grantlyn telling him that he didn’t betray his race or something, he simply wanted to laugh. The Elves and the Celestials were close so although Elves were not arch-enemies with the Demons, they had drawn clear boundaries between them. Grantlyn was not only close with the Demons, he could even freely enter the Demon Realm as he wished! Tsk tsk. Saying that you’re not a betrayer and what nots, stop covering up the truth alright! Grantlyn led the way while Suo Fei followed from behind. Although he kept looking straight ahead, it didn’t stop him from looking around. The scene was not entirely unfamiliar to him. Although the Demon Realm was also known as the City of Darkness, it only had no daylight. As the sky was dark purple, no matter what the colour of the ground was, it would always be enveloped by a dark purple hue, so dark that it almost seemed black. Nevertheless, this didn’t affect the people’s vision in any way. The two had not walked for a long time when Grantlyn stopped in front of a towering building. It was a black building that seemed to be built using only one huge material which was then transformed by a craftsman into a pointed, Gothic-style building. Suo Fei felt terrified looking at it from afar. The place was like the entrance of a bottomless abyss and like a mouth of a ferocious beast, causing people to tremble in fear. However, their destination was evidently that fearsome place. Since Grantlyn walked in, Suo Fei could only summon up his courage and follow him. He was already inside the enemy camp so he might as well throw away his fears. If Grantlyn wanted to kill him, he didn’t need to go through all this trouble. The building was unexpectedly narrow. The passageway could barely allow two people to walk side by side. Suo Fei didn’t want to walk side by side with Grantlyn at all, so he followed him from behind. Grantlyn didn’t have any opinion on this matter. He walked ahead of Suo Fei. After passing through the extremely narrow path, the two came across a wide open space. Suo Fei was quite astonished to discover that the building was completely hollow. Moreover, it was extremely bright inside. This brightness in the Demon Realm that was in utter darkness was too out of the blue. Grantlyn stared at a certain spot as he said to Suo Fei, “Follow me. ” As he spoke, he walked towards that direction. Suo Fei followed. As he neared, he discovered an emerald green mist fluttering in the wind. When Grantlyn approached, the mist suddenly dissipated, revealing the sight behind it. Suo Fei saw several picture scrolls that were hung side by side. The picture scrolls were portraits of Elves. There was nothing remarkable about them...; Wait. Suo Fei squinted his eyes when he felt that some of them seemed out of place. In Yalance, the Elves had the highest magic affinity. Hence, nearly seventy percent of their population were mages. In addition, the Elves had high agility. As such, the remaining thirty percent of their population were archers. To put it simply, the Elves only had mages and archers. In the portraits in front of him, the first one was an archmage wearing a robe and holding a staff. The second portrait was an archer in an equestrian outfit who was drawing his bow. These two portraits were within his expectations. However, the person in the third picture was an assassin wearing an assassin robe and holding a dagger. The fourth portrait was even more outrageous. It was actually a berserker wielding a two-handed sword. While the fifth portrait...; was a paladin wearing armour, holding a greatsword on one hand and a shield on the other. In the last portrait, Suo Fei was unable to determine whether the elf was a man or a woman. The person’s long hair was verdant green. The person was wearing a flimsy white robe. Floating in the air, the person’s palms were pressed together and eyes were tightly shut. Holy Light that was the same colour as jade surrounded the entire person. Below was an endless ocean of flowers. Grantlyn was fixedly staring at the portraits as his mind seemed to be lost in a memory from a long time ago. “They are the ancestors of us Elves. ” Suo Fei frowned. He had almost cleared the game of Yalance so how could he had not heard of these people? “But, they’ve already disappeared. They’ve been swallowed up by this world.” Grantlyn turned to look at Suo Fei. Although his voice was gentle, Suo Fei could still hear the fury that he was trying to conceal within him, “Once, us Elves had been prosperous. We had been so formidable. But now, we are being trapped in this place, unable to return to our homeland. In this place, we’re being worn down little by little. Then, it will swallow us and exterminate our race.” “And our foolish king in Valinor actually immersed himself in this tranquility that was fabricated by the Devil, comfortably waiting for death without the slightest bit of resistance. God-bestowed Holy Tree?” Grantlyn sneered as he continued, “What a joke. The God of us Elves had never been here. That so-called Holy Tree is a shackle, a shackle that traps us!” “He had already devoured our explosive power, our strength, our robust bodies as well as our ability to communicate with nature, only leaving us with a little bit of magic affinity and that ridiculous agility. And those stupid Elves still think that our race is superior?” Suo Fei calmly listened. Then he asked, “Because of this, you can wordlessly forsake your wife and only son who had always accompanied you?” Grantlyn was caught in a daze and didn’t utter a word. Suo Fei stared at him unblinkingly as he asked, “Did you know? Vixanne is dead.” Despite asking, Suo Fei was already clearly aware that Grantlyn knew of this matter. It wasn’t a secret, nor was it something that could be concealed. Perhaps Grantlyn knew this earlier than Suo Fei did. “In order to save me, Vixanne used a forbidden technique and died of over-exhaustion. Are you satisfied?” Grantlyn didn’t look at Suo Fei but merely frowned. After a period of silence, he said, “She knew about everything.” Suo Fei was stunned. Grantlyn’s voice was so faint that he nearly didn’t hear it. Grantlyn raised his head, his line of sight landing on the last portrait. The elf had his eyes closed. His long green hair fluttered in the wind. His hands were pressed together in a beautiful and devout manner. Countless beautiful flowers crowded beneath his feet. “Your mother’s full name is Vixanne Cindy. She was the only daughter of the God of Nature, Cindy, who had long disappeared.” Grantlyn pointed at the elf who had long, verdant green hair. “This, is her father.” The author has something to say: Cough, don’t worry. Ultimate gong is already on the way. “Your mother.. is a god.” Suo Fei was shocked by what Grantlyn said. The information was too much for him to handle. God of Nature, Cindy? Vixanne is the daughter of a god?So, Vixanne is also a god? Wait. Suo Fei sorted out the chaos in his mind with difficulty. From what he remembered, a god had never appeared in Yalance. The god that everyone talked about was the same as the god that the people on earth talked about. Nobody was capable of determining whether they existed or not. Just like the god-bestowed Holy Tree and the artifacts of each race. All of them had a word related to ‘god’ but nobody truly knew their real origin. They seemed to have been around ever since Yalance existed but nobody knew how it came to be. The Celestials and the Demons were not the same as the commonly known Gods and Devils. In fact, they only represented a race. They were no different from the Humans, the Beastkins and the Dwarves. It was just that their fighting abilities were slightly stronger. They weren’t even as good as humans in other aspects. For example, the Demons never had a sense of teamwork. Although the Celestials had unity, their total population was pitifully small. Moreover, they couldn’t reproduce. If one died, they would be one person less. It was only a matter of time for them to die out. Such obvious advantages and disadvantages made it possible for several great races to live with them harmoniously. Although minor conflicts constantly occurred, it was difficult to wage large-scale wars that lead to the extermination of a race. Not only because they had too many apprehensions about each other, but also because they were all evenly matched. But now, Grantlyn was telling him that not only was there a god, but also that his mother was one. His mother’s father was also one...; After calming down a little, Suo Fei recalled what Grantlyn had said. At first, he thought that due to Grantlyn’s dissatisfaction with the Elven King and anger towards his own race, he said those words as a metaphor. But now, he suddenly felt that Grantlyn meant his words literally. The Elves had lost their explosive power, their strength, their robust body and their ability to communicate with nature. Grantlyn used the word ‘devour’. Could it be that they truly had been devoured? Suo Fei calmed himself down and he turned towards Grantlyn as he spoke, “Even if Vixanne was a God, so what? She’s still dead. She left this world forever, and this is all caused by you.” “No! It’s impossible for her to die from over-exhaustion from only using a teleportation array. You’re underestimating her too much!” This didn’t come across Suo Fei’s mind. All of a sudden, the words that Manzy told him at the border of Valinor sounded clearly in his mind, ‘She was already seriously injured before using the forbidden technique...;’ At that time, he was still reeling from the news of Vixanne’s death so he didn’t pay much heed to the words Manzy had said. After that, he also forgot about the matter. But now, it abruptly appeared in his mind. Indeed. If Vixanne was truly a god, she couldn’t have over-exhausted herself just because of a forbidden technique...; But was she seriously injured? Suo Fei tried hard to recall the time when he had just transmigrated into this world. The first thing he saw was Vixanne. At that time, he couldn’t tell anything strange about her. What did Vixanne tell him then? Grantlyn’s voice suddenly woke him out of his trance, “Even if she didn’t use the forbidden technique, Vixanne would only have one month remaining...;” It was as if a thunder split his muddled memories open. He remembered Vixanne once saying to him, ‘Mother doesn’t want to confine you forever, I just hope that you don’t leave Valinor for a month after you reach adulthood, just one month.’ When he tried to remember Vixanne’s appearance at that time, he recalled her gentle smile, her silver eyes that were as soft as water...; as well as the faint, well-concealed grief within them. At that time, Vixanne already knew that she only had one month left, so she wanted Suo Fei to stay by her side. Despite this, Suo Fei still glowered at Grantlyn, “Just because Vixanne didn’t have long to live, you could do as you please? Cut down the Holy Tree, forsake her, and leave her alone to bear the wrath of the whole Elven race? You knew that she was going to die but you still did that? Why didn’t you just kill her directly?” Grantlyn was about to speak when Suo Fei interrupted him, “No matter what, it was you who drew her last straw. It was only a month. Why couldn’t you accompany her for just one month? Just because my rite of passage was a good opportunity? A good opportunity that you couldn’t miss?” Suo Fei coldly snorted, “These are the gifts that you gave to your only son’s rite of passage: a mother’s death, a father’s betrayal, and a whole race to hunt him down.” “Have you ever thought that your son might die?! Ah, of course you’ve thought about it. But so what if he died, right? You never cared, did you?” After a bout of scornful rebuke, Suo Fei managed to vent out all of his pent-up anger towards Grantlyn, but in fact, he didn’t hate Grantlyn that much since he wasn’t related to Grantlyn in any way. Grantlyn could do anything to him. He merely felt disappointed at Grantlyn’s actions. What kind of person would do those things, all the more in such a self-righteous manner? Grantlyn’s face became cold after being rebuked. He stepped forward and grabbed Suo Fei’s collar. His eyes were red as he spoke, “What do you know?” Suo Fei didn’t cower. He directly looked at him face to face with unblinking eyes. He felt unreconciled for Vixanne and pity towards Sofey Evans. Such a selfish father! The father and son confronted each other this way. After a long while, Grantlyn spoke, “If I didn’t do this, it’s not only her that would die. You will die, I will die, our entire Elven race will eventually die!” Suo Fei didn’t utter a word but his eyes were filled with distrust. “I’ve already said it. We’re in extreme danger. Don’t be deceived by the current fake tranquility,” He then pointed towards the picture scrolls, “How do you think they died? How do you think Cindy died? And your mother!” “When Cindy died, you had just been born. Your mother and I searched all over Yalance but we were still unable to bring him back to life. He is the God of Nature, the god who represented us Elves. But he was unable to stop his life from being worn away. Gods should have eternal life but his vitality ran out!” “I did all I could, but in the end, your mother and I could only watch him die! Then, these most powerful warriors who represented our race. Their powers dissipated and they deteriorated with age. They closely followed Cindy’s footsteps!” “I watched all of this happen, but I was unable to do anything. These events didn’t take a mere short period of time. It took thousands of years! In the eyes of the Elven King, this was a matter of course. That they died a natural death. But that’s impossible! Us Elves could live for thousands of years. Those who are more powerful that managed to cultivate into a Demigod could even live forever. But now? Our strength is waning and our life span is being compressed!” “Vixanne was our last god...;” Grantlyn’s expression turned gloomy, “and her life also came to an end.” “And all of this,” Grantlyn’s eyes sparked with boundless fury, “All of this is because of this cursed place! This cursed place that’s called Yalance! It is slowly devouring us, taking a long time to completely consume us!” These words shocked Suo Fei. Grantlyn waved his hand and the whole hall lit up. Suo Fei realised that they had only been in a small corner. The ring-shaped hall was surrounded by countless picture scrolls. There were not only the Elves. There were also Demons, Celestials, Humans, Beastkins...; and many more. Suo Fei had yet to look at each of them when Grantlyn’s voice rang out once again, “You’ve seen them before. In Salvag’s treasury, the imprisoned people are exactly these people who had disappeared. All of them were the souls of the deceased!” Suo Fei suddenly thought of the seven people they met in the seven trials: a primeval demon that could summon beasts, an S-tier wood-class mage beastkin, a demon that used black magic, an S-tier assassin elf...; They were existences that didn’t conform with Yalance’s setting...; “It’s not only our race that’s dying out. The Demons had lost their black magic. The beastkins had lost their magic powers. The Celestials had even lost their ability to reproduce...;” Grantlyn seemed to have finally calmed down as his voice became softer. He looked at Suo Fei and said, “Fey, we don’t belong here. I only want to return to our homeland.” Then, he spoke firmly, “We must leave this place.” Suo Fei was stunned and was unable to collect his thoughts. Grantlyn saw the confusion in Suo Fei’s eyes so he came closer and softly whispered, “Fey, I dare not say it for all the lives in this place, but I am devoted towards the Elven race. I can’t watch those who are important to me...;.” “Why didn’t you tell me earlier?” Grantlyn was slightly startled by the interruption. He looked at Suo Fei and discovered that the initially confused gaze had become clear. Suo Fei took a step back and calmly asked, “You had countless chances to tell me this and you had many more ways to stop me from ‘misunderstanding’ you.” “But, you didn’t.” Suo Fei narrowed his eyes as he continued, “You only told me this after I revealed my unique ability.” “Father,” Suo Fei’s tone was filled with sarcasm, “What’s your intention?” “Tsk tsk...; Grantlyn, your son is truly impressive.” A frivolous voice sounded in the air. Suo Fei looked at the source of the sound, anger instantly bubbling up inside him upon seeing the person. It was the unfamiliar man who had severely injured Samael. The author has something to say: Cough, there’s no possibility of the scum dad being whitewashed. The ultimate gong-daren is still on the way. 【Enough, you】 That...; //smoothes hair// Since the ultimate gong is coming, will the smut be far behind...; Bonus chapter thanks to <strong>uhimgood </strong>and <strong>maddie</strong>‘s kofis~ “Hello, Sofey. ” With a faint smile, the unfamiliar man reached out his hand to Suo Fei, “I believe this is the first time we’ve met each other. I’m Linde. ” Linde...; Suo Fei’s expression changed slightly, but he immediately calmed himself down. It turned out to be him. Oh right, there’s only a few people in Yalance who could contend with Samael’s strength. Linde Murphy was absolutely one of them. He was the King of the Demon Realm, the leader of the Demons, and the father of Abel Murphy. It wasn’t that Suo Fei had not seen the Demon King in the Game. He had seen Linde before but not in this state. Nevertheless, his reputation had been widely spread all over Yalance. He was strong and powerful. Most importantly, his character was cunning and unfathomable. Demons are innately vicious. Thus, more often than not, they were brash and lack rationality. Even most Primevals demons are bloodthirsty creatures. The arrogant and obstinate nature that was deep-rooted in their blood made it even more difficult for them to control their own powers. And Linde, this Demon King, was an extremely unusual existence. Or rather...; If Suo Fei were to say it in modern terms, he could say that this person had dissociative identity disorder...; He had two entirely different personalities: One was incomparably rational while the other was extraordinarily crazy. The rational personality was courteous, had extremely high IQ and could devise plans slowly but surely. However, his fighting strength was greatly reduced. The crazy personality was so crazy that real lunatics would be deeply ashamed. He was temperamental, severely unreasonable and bloodthirsty. His fighting strength was similar to an atomic bomb. The Demon King that Suo Fei had met in the game was the latter. The Linde in his crazy state was vastly different from his current image, be it his appearance or his temperament. This was exactly why Suo Fei didn’t recognize who he was. Suo Fei’s heart started to race upon this realisation. F**k, Linde was actually in his rational state when he was fighting with Samael. He was actually able to reach a draw with Samael while his fighting strength was greatly reduced.Sure enough, Samael’s strength still needs to be improved. Samael only met Linde at a much later time in the game. At that time, he killed Linde and became the new king of the Demon Realm. Then, he attacked the Celestials and brought his belle back. To have a 10P feast on the Demon Realm’s throne...; Well, thinking about it now, it’s merely a thing of the past. Suo Fei withdrew his thoughts. He ignored the olive branch that Linde had offered and calmly said, “This isn’t the first time we met each other. You nearly killed me. This is a matter that I dare not forget. ” Linde didn’t mind being so bluntly affronted. He withdrew his hand with a self-composed expression as if he didn’t hear what Suo Fei had said. Then, he diverted the topic. “Your father wasn’t lying to you. Everything he said was true. ” Suo Fei silently added another note on the rational Linde’s description: shameless. Fortunately, Linde had not learned the mind-reading technique. Seeing Suo Fei being silent, he continued to say, “All of us had lost our abilities to varying degrees. Whether it’s strength, explosive power, magic power or physique, all of it had deteriorated. If this is only the case, then it’s still not horrible. What’s horrible is that Yalance is too insatiable. The Celestials completely lost their ability to reproduce. The Elves’ lifespan had been reduced. The Demons’ rationality, the humans’ faith and the beastkins’ intelligence...; All of it had been taken away. His goal is to devour us, but we must not sit still and wait for our deaths. ” Compared to Grantlyn’s words, his words were more organised and even more rousing. He was a Demon. Demons, unlike Elves, weren’t bothered about things like glory, race and lineage. They were unrestrained, living as they wished. However, they valued their lives greatly. His approach was even more direct and straightforward. Either resist, or die. Which one would you choose? Suo Fei shut his eyes for a while, paying no heed to Linde. Then, he turned to Grantlyn. Staring at Grantlyn, he asked, stressing each word, “So, what do you want me to do? ” His question was extremely blunt. Thus, the atmosphere abruptly became tense. After a long while, Linde spread his hands wide open and helplessly replied to Suo Fei, “Child, you need to learn how to be allusive. This uncle is too old to bear such bluntness. ” Suo Fei: F**k...; Who’s this fool! Nevertheless, his simple words dispelled the tension from before. Grantlyn looked at Linde. He seemed to have already spent all of his lifetime’s patience today as he spoke in an ill manner, “I’ve already told you that this is just a waste of my time. ” Linde appeased Grantlyn by saying, “You still had to try nonetheless. No matter what, it’s your son. But, who would have imagined that you had offended him so badly that there’s no way to vindicate yourself. ” Then, he turned to Suo Fei and spoke with a faint smile, “Child, there shouldn’t be enmity between a father and son. Don’t hold grudges too long. ” Suo Fei’s mouth twitched. He forcefully swallowed back the words ‘You’re the child! Your whole family are children...;.!’ Linde said with a sigh, “Since you can’t be persuaded using family affection, I’ll get right to the point. ” We’re finally getting straight to the point. Suo Fei was inevitably disdainful in his heart. If Grantlyn truly cared about Sofey Evans, he wouldn’t be indifferent towards him up until now. Above all, Suo Fei also knew the original fate of Sofey Evans. He had been toyed with until the end. He was miserably toyed with until he was half-dead. In such circumstances, where was his father, Grantlyn? Suo Fei didn’t know. So, when Grantlyn went to talk about his difficulties, Suo Fei nearly burst into laughter. Even if he had difficulties, even if he did it for the Elven race, for a virtuous cause, it was still an undeniable fact that he was heartless towards his son! Dropping his pretense, Grantlyn directly asked Suo Fei, “What did Vixanne leave you? ” Suo Fei was stunned for a while. Then, he understood. It turned out to be this matter. Sofey Evans was Grantlyn’s son. Although Grantlyn didn’t hold his son dearly, it was evident that he was well-aware of Sofey Evans’ past and had a clear idea about his situation. Hence, when Suo Fei revealed his unordinary healing ability, he naturally associated it with Vixanne, thinking that Vixanne had left him something. Suo Fei replied, “Mother had left me a lot of things. Haven’t you already taken them away?” He hadn’t seen his interspatial bag ever since he woke up. It was evident where it had gone to. Grantlyn narrowed his eyes, “Don’t anger me. ” Laozi isn’t scared! Suo Fei faced him without a trace of politeness, “Do you think you can get something from me with that attitude? In your dreams! ” Seeing that the father and son were about to quarrel again, Linde quickly intervened, “Stop. ” Grantlyn coldly grunted but remained silent. Suo Fei restrained himself, knowing that he was still inside the enemy camp. Linde looked at Suo Fei and said, “Why don’t we go to my palace and have a seat? ” Suo Fei decisively refused, “No. ” Linde frowned but still spoke courteously, “Let’s stay here then” Before Linde could speak once again, Suo Fei already spoke, “I want to get my things back. ” He continued, “Return my interspatial bag to me. Then, I would also give you what you want. ” Seeing Linde remain silent, Suo Fei clearly stated his views, “Regardless of whether what you’ve said is true or false, I don’t care. Whether it affects the Elves, the Demons, your group, or even me, it doesn’t matter. ” For such words to come out of a Pureblood elf, saying that he had committed high treason was an understatement. Therefore, anger emerged in Grantlyn’s eyes once again. He was extremely enraged to have raised such a son. However, Linde smiled meaningfully, “Child, you are very clever, and very fascinating...;” The rational Linde truly had a high IQ. He actually understood the implied meaning of Suo Fei’s words. Suo Fei didn’t want to talk too much with them, nor did he want to know too much. Grantlyn and Linde had spoken a lot. But in fact, they had not talked about the root of the matter. Moreover, they spoke of those things with a strong sense of righteousness, making it seem like they were only doing this for the benefit of all races and that it wouldn’t cause anyone any harm. Hence, it didn’t matter if Suo Fei knew of those things. Regarding the detailed information, however, he couldn’t know about them even if he wanted to. If Suo Fei knew, he only had two courses of action— either join Linde and Grantlyn’s group, or die. The reason was simple. It was obvious what would happen if someone not on their side knew of their secret. Hence, Suo Fei quickly interrupted what Linde was going to say and clearly stated his views. He was creating a new possibility for himself. Since Linde had discovered his intentions, Suo Fei hurriedly said, “Give me back my things. I will recite the magic spell God’s Healing for you. After that, please let me leave. ” His words covertly admitted that he had what they wanted. Forgive me. But that God’s Healing...; I hope that it’s not some kind of famous magic spell...; His words held great allure for Linde. The ability that Suo Fei had revealed was undoubtedly a powerful, instantaneous healing technique. And Suo Fei was now claiming that he owned this kind of spellbook. In this way, Suo Fei first confirmed that he was not a unique existence, thus lowering his appeal towards Linde and the others. Then, he threw out this kind of bait. Just think of this. Linde and the rest were a group, an organisation. If they had someone like Suo Fei who had a powerful healing technique, how formidable would they be? They would simply be unrivaled. This was simply too tempting for a leader like Linde. While Linde was pondering, Suo Fei pretended to casually say, “My magic affinity and magic power aren’t high so I can’t show the full power of this magic spell...;” The implication was that if the spell was used by a Celestial, who had the assistance of Holy Light, the ability would be even more outstanding. A weakling like Suo Fei could completely heal Samael who was on the brink of death in an instant. How powerful would it be if it was used by a Celestial who was way stronger than him? Suo Fei continued to persuade them by putting on a sad expression and saying, “That interspatial bag was given to me by mother. I can give you the spellbook, but please return to me my interspatial bag. That was the last thing my mother had given me. ” His voice choked up slightly as he continued, “I understand everything that you’ve told me, but I can’t let go of the past. Grantlyn, towards me...;. was too much. I can’t work together with him. He is my father, but he had never regarded me as his son. I don’t trust him. I would never be able to trust him. So, please let me leave. ” Suo Fei lowered his head, his posture making him seem more pitiful. He had already said this much. This was already his limit. His attitude was already extremely clear. Moreover, it was specifically aimed at Linde, this kind of schemeful exalted person. They were silent for a long time. Linde walked towards Suo Fei and raised his chin. His voice wasn’t as frivolous and relaxed as before, but was deep and resounding instead, “Sofey, you’re too clever. Therefore, I can’t believe you. ” Suo Fei’s heart thumped. He had underestimated Linde. This guy is too intelligent! He was actually able to restrain himself facing such a huge temptation. At this moment, Suo Fei had somewhat lost his calm. Linde moved closer to him, his breath warm against his face as he vaguely said, “Child, you’re really fascinating. ” The unfamiliar scent made Suo Fei feel terrified. Then, a loud sound filled the air. Panic spread and screams rang out one after another. The black building was actually being cleaved open. Dazzling rays of light streamed from above. It was bright, which was never seen before in the Demon Realm. Suo Fei looked up and saw flames. Within the flames was a figure holding a sword, so dazzling that people were unable to move their eyes away. The author has something to say: Lil’ Fei, your husband has come to pick you up~~~ Um...; My son is a hundred days old tomorrow. I want to prepare a party, so...; I might be very busy the whole day. I don’t know if I could update. So shameful but I want to request a leave...; I’m sorry sisters //bows down// <b>T/N:</b> TMI the author posted this on 23rd June 2013, so her son’s birthday should be 16th March 2013, huh. The black-haired and purple-eyed primeval demon looked down from up above. His appearance could not be seen clearly, but his imposing momentum was like the divine artifact he was holding, extremely sharp and incomparably mighty. Samael had come! The joy in Suo Fei’s heart nearly burst out, but he calmed himself down in an instant. He was not surprised that Samael rushed to save him. It could even be said that he had been waiting for this moment ever since he woke up. During the two years he spent in Bois Canyon, he had gained two thousand beast skins and had fed the little cub until it was satiated. At the same time, he had also studied countless ferocious beasts’ beast cores. Although the great majority of those beast cores had been fed to the little cub for it to grow healthy and strong, he had kept some of the beast cores that had special abilities. Especially the amazing heart bead that Manzy had given him previously. Suo Fei had returned it to Manzy, but he desperately wanted a pair for himself. Thus, he paid more attention while he was in Bois Canyon and was actually able to find two heart beads. However, after obtaining the heart beads, he discovered this item’s shortcomings. Firstly, the heart beads were extremely fragile. They could be broken by just a slight squeeze of the palm, but they must be held in the hands in order to use it to communicate. The distance was even more frustrating. It would only light up when the two people were close to each other. If they were far from one another, it simply won’t do anything. It could only reveal whether the other person was close or not, which was of little use. Suo Fei was quite disappointed with the heart bead’s function, but this event enlightened Suo Fei to pay more attention to this kind of beast core. In the end, he actually found a beast core that was even more outstanding. This beast core was unusual as it was a beast core that had two colours, blue and red. If two people each took half of it, it would have a wonderful function. Although it didn’t allow communication, it would allow the two to discern the location of each other using the beast core’s exterior. It was accurate to a fault. The beast core’s exterior was the size of an eggshell. It was smooth and transparent. It didn’t have any magic power so people would usually regard it as trash that could be easily discarded. Even the appraisal skill would identify it as a discardable beast core’s exterior. Thus, it was extremely inconspicuous and few people would care about it. Suo Fei and Samael split the beast core and each of them kept half of the exterior, which would only exhibit its search function when in their possession. Suo Fei’s interspatial bag had been taken away so he didn’t know where Samael was, but Samael certainly knew where he was. Thus, it was of no surprise to him that Samael had come. He had estimated that Samael would take several days to come out of the treasury and arrive at the Demon Realm. Seeing Samael now was within his expectations. However, he didn’t want to see Samael at this moment...; Linde was right in front of him and they were still in the Demon Realm, which was Linde’s territory. Samael had arrived, but escaping unscathed was a huge problem. If they ended up in the same situation as they had been inside the treasury, wouldn’t they be screwed up?! These thoughts crossed his mind in the blink of an eye, but Samael had already appeared before him. Everyone but Suo Fei had moved. Grantlyn immediately activated the Shadow Shifter to summon his forces. Linde charged straight towards Suo Fei and Samael rushed towards Linde, his Asura Blade bursting out majestic sword Qi. Suo Fei also reacted at this time. Linde wanted to restrain Suo Fei but Suo Fei wasn’t a fool. His abilities couldn’t compare to the people present but he took the opportunity to evade Linde while Samael’s attack was about to hit Linde. Swift response and accurate judgment were the most crucial factors! A slight mishap or distraction could completely change the outcome of the battle. Everything happened within the span of a few seconds. The situation became certain after this short exchange. The Asura Blade pierced straight into Linde’s back and blood rushed out like a gushing spring. He was wearing black, thus the blood that was flowing out wasn’t that obvious, but it had already soaked his clothes, dripping on the ground with a pitter-patter. He didn’t evade, receiving the attack with his body, choosing to hold Suo Fei hostage. Suo Fei didn’t expect that Linde would be so ruthless, risking his life just to capture him. Being hugged by Linde in such a manner, Suo Fei felt uncomfortable all over. The smell of blood lingered on every breath he drew. At this time Grantlyn managed to successfully summon a large group of black-robed men. Suo Fei went stiff. He heard a burst of slow, deep laughter in his ears. His heart thumped for he understood. The crazy Linde had appeared. Linde was suffering from DID, but he didn’t have two completely separate personalities. Specifically, Suo Fei was unable to clearly explain it, but whether it was the rational Linde or the crazy Linde, their memories were shared with one another. They were part of a whole person, except that their temperament and behaviour were vastly different. If the situation required it, Linde’s rational personality would bring the crazy Linde to front To visualise it better, it could be said that Linde had two different forms: the first form’s abilities were focused on intelligence while the second form’s abilities were focused on strength. This limitlessly amplified his advantages. Linde had his arm across Suo Fei’s neck, effortlessly confining him with his undermined strength. He turned to face Suo Fei, his eyes dark and calm. The corner of his mouth turned up slightly as he spoke in a flamboyant and unbridled manner, “Child, where were you going?” Suo Fei was completely shocked by the boldly unrestrained and evilly charming Demon King in front of him. F**k, who wants to deal with this madman! Without even looking at the huge wound on Linde’s back, Suo Fei could already tell just from the smell of blood that it must be extremely painful. However, the Demon King was acting as if it was a trifling matter. His arm was extremely powerful, like a block of iron! Suo Fei was left unable to move. Linde didn’t wait for Suo Fei to answer his question. Instead, he cupped Suo Fei’s chin with his other hand and smilingly said, “Come, let me see your ability.” Suo Fei instantly understood. He didn’t even have the time to curse out as he struggled to get free with all his might, but it was simply impossible. Linde firmly held Suo Fei’s chin and pressed him towards the bleeding wound. Suo Fei’s lips touched the wound and he felt a wave of dizziness, feeling as if all the power in his body was continuously being sapped away, flowing out through his lips. This feeling of not having control made him gnash his teeth in anger. This kind of fatal wound is almost the same as Eugene’s wound back then! He’s actually healing this madman! Damn it, this awful ability can’t distinguish between friend and foe! Linde used Suo Fei as a bandage and a shield, truly making full use of him. Who was it that said that the crazy Linde had insufficient IQ? Suo Fei badly wanted to hack the game developers to death at this moment. After a few seconds, Linde’s wound healed. He hugged Suo Fei, gaze falling on his face. His words were loving but his voice was tyrannical, “Such a sweetheart“ Samael stared at him, his purple eyes so dark that it was nearly black. He spoke in an extremely calm voice, “I will kill you.” His words were an affirmation, as if what he had declared was an established fact. Linde looked at him. Facing the demon again, his eyes narrowed slightly. His instincts were particularly sharp while in the crazy state thus he could distinctly gauge the strength of this demon. He was still very young but was already extraordinarily powerful. Such an existence must be nipped in the bud. When Grantlyn first saw Samael, he didn’t dare underestimate him and directly summoned the elite troops of their organisation, which had a powerful formation that was capable of killing dragons. Suo Fei’s limbs were weak, but his heart was very anxious. This situation was too unfavorable to them, even more than it was in the treasury. At that time, the rational Linde alone was able to severely injure Samael. Now, there were so many black-robed men present. In addition, Linde was in his crazy state and had just been completely healed. Their fighting strength was simply countless times greater. In the treasury, he was able to heal Samael from the brink of death right there and then. Now, however, his body was powerless. Perhaps he could disregard his condition and heal Samael, but the outcome was still precarious. Therefore, their situation was extremely unpromising! Linde wouldn’t be willing to kill him, but he would definitely not show mercy towards Samael. Upon this realisation, Suo Fei felt more fearful. Suo Fei was certain that Linde wouldn’t let Samael go. The Demon race that placed power above everything else. They had a skewed perception of right and wrong. One had to rely on their own strength in order to sit on the throne. Linde killed the previous Demon King and succeeded the throne. Likewise, if a more powerful existence appeared in the Demon race, he would also be pushed off the throne. To him, Samael was such an existence. He was a real threat. Killing him before he could spread his wings was the best choice. Linde was just about to command his group to jointly attack Samael when the ground shook. The ground was shaking and incessant rumbling filled the air. Everyone was stunned. Suo Fei couldn’t understand. What’s happening? There’s an earthquake? Linde’s gaze swiftly turned towards Samael. His red eyes were sinister and vicious as he thundered, “You actually dared to destroy the Demon Tower!” Samael unflinchingly stared back at him, “Give him to me.” Linde’s eyes flashed. Suo Fei realised what was happening when he heard the words ‘Demon Tower’. The Demon Realm was an extremely unique place in Yalance. It was located at the Sea of Chaos and was being supported by the Demon Tower. If the Demon Tower was destroyed, the whole city of the Demon Realm would collapse and everyone would fall into the Sea of Chaos. There was no living thing in the Sea of Chaos. Linde’s voice was brimming with anger, “By doing this, he will also die!” Samael calmly replied, “It doesn’t matter. Everyone can go down with him.” Suo Fei looked at Samael but Samael did not return his gaze. He didn’t know why but he had this feeling that Samael was crazier than the crazy Linde. However, he felt so distressed for Samael in this state. His heart was hurting for him. He badly wanted to come over and hug him. He could even clearly feel the paranoia and despair beneath his calm exterior. Linde let go of the hand that was restraining Suo Fei. As soon as his body was released, Suo Fei fell into an extremely familiar embrace. He was completely weak at this moment, but he compelled himself to raise his arms, using up his remaining strength to hug Samael. The author has something to say: Cough, there will definitely be sisters wondering what Samael did. Don’t worry, it will be explained in the next chapter. Bonus chapter as thanks to <strong>uhimgood</strong>‘s kofis~ Yalance didn’t have an ocean in the traditional sense of the word, but the composition of its surface was extremely similar to the Earth, having a small piece of land and a vast expanse of ocean. It was just that the ocean was not the cradle of living creatures, but was a death trap. It was known as the Sea of Chaos. Suo Fei thought that it would be more suitable for it to be named Sea of Despair instead, as there was absolutely no hope in that place. If one fell into it, one could only wait in despair for their death. Incapable of escaping, incapable of breaking free, one could only die. However, in this Sea of Chaos, there was an island. This island was the City of Darkness —— the Demon Realm. Only a few people in Yalance knew why the Demon Realm was located in the Sea of Chaos. It was only vaguely mentioned in the introduction that Suo Fei had read that during the creation of the world, the god bestowed the territory to the Demons. As the Demons were perverse, ruthless and fond of killing, god bestowed this island to be their territory. It seemed as if he wanted to isolate them, or even imprison them, but that was not the case. Yalance was fair. It wasn’t partial to any race, neither did it exclude any race. Hence, it was highly unlikely for it to be so cruel to the Demons alone. As such, there was a teleportation array on the island, which could transport them to other places. In this way, they could easily leave the Sea of Chaos. Because of this, the Demons only needed to guard the teleportation array’s portal. If a war broke out, it would be difficult for others to enter their territory. To a certain extent, it might not necessarily be a bad thing for the proud and unsociable Demons who were few in numbers. However, the Demon Realm had a fatal weak point. It was obvious but they weren’t worried about this matter. That was the Demon Tower. It was the pillar of the Demon Realm. If the Demon Tower was destroyed, the Demon Realm would fall into the Sea of Chaos, the sea of death that all living things could not escape from. The reason why they weren’t worried was that the Demon Tower was extremely difficult to destroy. It was located in the Sea of Chaos so it didn’t have anything to support it from sinking. It could only be located on the air. The magic tower had full defense against physical attacks and eighty percent defense against magic attacks. Thus, it would only receive a pathetic twenty percent of any magic attack. In Yalance, among the races that could fly, only the dragon race could rival the strength of the Demons’ elite troop. However, the Dragons were either dead or imprisoned. Therefore, even though everyone knew that the Demon Tower was a fatal weakness of the Demons, they could do nothing about it. When Samael appeared, Suo Fei thought, <i>Where is the red dragon? Is it still in the treasury?</i>  As it turned out, Samael had rushed to where Suo Fei was but he had already entrusted the red dragon to observe the Demon Tower. He had already prepared carefully ever since he knew that Suo Fei was in the Demon Realm. If they stormed through the place, they would only end up in the same situation as they did in the treasury. They would probably be subdued. On the other hand, if they threatened Linde using the Demon Realm and the entire demon race, they would certainly succeed. There is a saying that those who are barefoot are not afraid of those who are wearing shoes. Samael and Suo Fei only had to worry about themselves whereas the Demon King had too many things to worry about. It wasn’t that the Demon King cared about the life of the Demons. What he cared about was the Demon Realm, which was his territory. If the Demon Realm disappeared, would he still be the Demon King? This represented his power, status as well as...; too many things that he could not lose. So, even though Suo Fei was precious, Linde was unable to take the risk. He will not risk it as long as there was at least one percent danger. This was the way of thinking of a high-ranking person. Samael thought of this. Thus, he seemed to have impulsively charged into the Demon Realm. But in fact, he had made enough preparations to cut off the Demon King’s lifeline so that he could effortlessly escape unscathed. Samael’s surprise attack was definitely the greatest humiliation in Linde’s whole life. It was also the first time for the rational Linde to expose his real emotions. He was almost unable to restrain his desire to kill the demon. I would never forget this once-in-a-lifetime humiliation! When Suo Fei fell into Samael’s embrace, he was already muddle-headed. He exerted himself to hug him and instantly felt perfectly satisfied. Then, he completely lost consciousness. He was unable to steady his nerves during the past few days. It stood to reason that he shouldn’t be relaxed under the current tense situation. But he was at ease, extremely at ease. Samael was by his side so he didn’t need to worry about anything. He believed him and had the utmost trust in him. Samael was with him. This was enough. Suo Fei was very dizzy. This was not the first time since he had also felt this way after treating Eugene. Perhaps he had become used to it as he recovered more quickly than last time. When he opened his eyes, he was no longer in the dark world. The scene that greeted his eyes was bright but not glaring. It was a soft hue, like a mixture of emerald green and light yellow, extremely warm and comfortable. Suo Fei propped himself up and faintly smelled the scent of flowers. He was unable to tell what flower it was, but the scent was calming and made him feel comfortable. When he touched the bed, he was shocked to discover that the bed was bouncy and that the scent was coming from it. It turned out that he was actually sleeping on a huge flower bed. The heart of the flower was a light yellow and the petals were bright pink. Suo Fei was somewhat embarrassed by the girlish colour. However, he couldn’t deny that it felt extremely cozy and moderately soft. Moreover, it was extremely wide. It was king-sized. He could roll three times to the left and three times to the right. It didn’t matter if he turned and turned. Such a nice place. He looked around wondering where Samael was when he heard the door opening. Suo Fei looked at the source of the sound. When the door opened, blinding light poured in. The figure standing behind the light was tall, slender and extraordinarily beautiful. It was as if the person was shining, bringing softness to his delicate and somewhat unreal face. Staring at Samael in a dazed manner, Suo Fei’s eyes curved as he smiled happily. Samael’s gaze did not leave Suo Fei ever since he opened the room. He walked towards Suo Fei. Seeing Suo Fei smilingly staring at him, Samael slightly leaned down, wrapped his arms around Suo Fei and raised his chin. His worried gaze landed on Suo Fei’s pale lips but he didn’t lean any closer. “Do you remember what you’ve promised me? ” Suo Fei had long become dizzy due to his staring. His lips trembled slightly as he instinctively responded, “I remember. ” Samael’s expression remained the same as he said, “Add one more thing. ” Suo Fei motionlessly stared at him as a desire that he couldn’t explain rose from deep within him. He faintly knew what Samael was about to say. He was even somewhat looking forward to it. “Don’t leave me. ” “Okay. ” Suo Fei smiled broadly, agreeing almost as soon as he finished speaking. In fact, he would agree to anything that Samael wanted. The word rejection was simply not in his vocabulary. Samael smiled. Suo Fei was left unable to look away. He had never seen such a good-looking person. He couldn’t see enough of him. No words could describe the mood at this moment. His heart was pounding in his chest and his feelings rushed straight to his brain. Suo Fei was never a person who could contain himself. In this situation, it was even more unlikely for him to contain himself. Samael’s gaze remained locked on to him but he remained motionless. Suo Fei’s longing became stronger and stronger until he finally couldn’t stop himself from moving closer. When their lips met, he vaguely saw the smile in Samael’s eyes but he couldn’t pay any heed to it at the moment. He only felt all of his senses focusing on their touching lips. He was extremely unsatisfied. He wanted more. The desire surging in his heart surprised him. Samael was still motionless, his arms remaining on Suo Fei’s waist, but his eyes were fervent, as if he had already stripped Suo Fei of his clothes long ago. Suo Fei had no choice but to take the initiative to lightly press himself against Samael. His head was giddy, clumsily unsure of how to kiss him. Samael pulled away slightly and looked at Suo Fei. The elf’s silver eyes had an extremely beautiful luster. His watery eyes made people’s heart race. Samael suppressed the desire that was rushing forth as he spoke in a deep voice, “Sofey. ” Suo Fei nodded. “Stay by my side. ” Suo Fei continued to nod, unblinkingly staring at his lips as he tried to come closer. Samael held him at the waist, preventing him from moving forward. Then, he continued, “You belong to me. ” Suo Fei replied, “En. ” Samael smiled with satisfaction and finally drew closer. He pressed his lips onto Suo Fei’s, brushing his lips in an achingly slow manner, “I want you. ” The impact of his words was immense. Suo Fei’s face turned beet red, but he straight-forwardly nodded. Samael slipped his hand into his clothes and gently stroked his waist. When he felt him tremble slightly, he said, “Say it, say that you want me. ” His warm hands gently caressed Suo Fei’s waist, making him feel weak. The sense of itchiness rushed to Suo Fei’s mind, this combined with Samael’s words made Suo Fei feel even more disorientated. He spoke softly, “Samael, I want you. ” With his words, Samael bent forward and kissed him deeply. Finally getting what he wanted, Suo Fei subconsciously gripped Samael’s clothes tightly and raised his head to return his kiss that was filled with fervent desire. Suo Fei felt the lust that Samael had forcibly suppressed through the heated exchange of their lips and tongues. His passionate need was completely laid bare right at this moment. He was needed, wanted. Suo Fei felt soft deep inside. He tried to respond back, revealing his emotions to Samael. He felt it. He felt the restlessness under Samael’s intense desire. Thus, to ease Samael’s mood, he nodded, responded and took the initiative to express his own emotions. Because he knew that this would make Samael be at ease, that this would allow him to let go of the paranoia that he had concealed underneath his rationality. Samael had a shadow in his heart, because he had been taken away, because Samael nearly lost him, because they had separated...; He would probably never say it out loud, but Suo Fei knew. He knew his real emotions underneath his calm exterior, knew the madness underneath his pretense of rationality, and knew the frustration underneath his dominance. Suo Fei distinctly felt it. That this person needed him, wanted him, just like he did. Suo Fei’s body relaxed as he immersed himself in the kiss. When they stopped, he was gasping for air, his cheeks slightly red. His eyes were somewhat dazed due to the lack of oxygen, but his voice was exceptionally clear, “Samael, I love you. ” The author has something to say: (^o^)/ A confession! Look at our lil’ Fei taking more initiative, learning more skills and being more of a gong! 【What...;】 <strong>Smut Warning. Read at your own discretion. </strong>To read, please press the dropdown at the [The Birds and The Bees] “Samael, I love you.” The words came out of his mouth with clarity, without the slightest hesitation. This feeling had already sprouted in his heart, merely waiting for the right moment to break through. Suo Fei looked at Samael with sparkling eyes, revealing all the emotions within them. He had lived a simple life. He never had this kind of feeling for anyone, nor had he ever said these words to anyone. His non-existent affections had been filled and enriched after encountering Samael. Samael was the first person that he fell in love with, and he firmly believed that he would be the only one. Compared to the carefree feeling in his heart after confessing, Samael was slightly dazed. Samael rarely made such an expression. He was always calm and collected. He never showed it even if his heart was a raging ocean. He was good at hiding his feelings and was even more used to restraining himself. But now, when faced with Suo Fei’s direct and matter-of-course confession, Samael finally showed an expression that befitted his age. His purple eyes had become brighter, its lustre was beautiful and enchanting. He revealed a faint smile that came from the bottom of his heart. He was extremely happy. He had never been this happy in his whole life. This youthful, genuine and undisguised smile befitted a young man. For such an expression to appear on a person who was used to restraining himself, it was extremely precious and also extremely enchanting. Especially for Suo Fei. He felt his heart melting until it became so soft that it was a total mess, unable to suppress his love for him. His cheeks were red as he uttered loudly, “Samael, I love you!” It seemed as if only these three words could calm his racing heart and quell his turbulent feelings. Samael smilingly stared at him, as if he was unwilling to put an end to this beautiful moment. He listened to Suo Fei’s voice. The elf’s voice was melodious and sweet. His words were the most marvellous symphony in this world. The most beautiful music that belonged to him. This thought made him even happier. At last, he leaned down and deeply kissed those lips that were unceasingly confessing to him. It was soft and had a slight hint of coldness, but it was exceptionally sweet. It wasn’t his first taste, but every touch was extremely delicious. Samael pressed on to Suo Fei’s lips and gently said, “Close your eyes. ” Suo Fei’s big eyes blinked before it obediently shut close. They were curved into crescents, making him more adorable. As soon as he closed his eyes, his jaws slackened as he felt Samael deepening the kiss. At first, he tried to match his kisses but not long after, he was completely being led along, like a parched fish that had entered a spring after a long time, greedily indulging in the pleasure. ...; Their kiss didn’t end. Samael sat on the flower bed, picked Suo Fei up and placed him on his lap. This position made Suo Fei who was shorter be at a greater height. Suo Fei finally didn’t have to strain himself to look upwards and could just focus all of his attention on the kiss. It also became more convenient for Samael. The hand that had been caressing Suo Fei’s waist moved slightly upwards, slowly raising Suo Fei’s thin garments as if he was peeling a fruit’s skin little by little, revealing a small part of the delicious fruit. It wasn’t until the shirt had been raised above Suo Fei’s chest that Samael ceased the entanglement of their lips and fixedly looked at the elf. His silver hair was scattered behind his shoulders. A few strands of hair were hanging over his slender neck, falling across his chest. The hair on his pale skin was shiny, as if it was glowing. The elf’s body was slender. As such, the exposed waist was all the more moving. Samael couldn’t stop himself from lightly caressing Suo Fei’s waist, feeling the skin slightly tremble due to his touch. Samael smiled. His gaze landed on the pink dots on Suo Fei’s chest. The two things stood erect, hardened by the cool air, waiting for someone to pluck it. The scene in front of him was truly alluring. The purple eyes darkened and Samael propped Suo Fei up by the waist and softly sucked the pink dot on the right. His tongue twirled and lapped, teasing Suo Fei. He quickly felt the elf shudder with unstoppable desire. Suo Fei’s mind was already in chaos. He had lived up to about twenty-seven to twenty-eight years in his last life, but he had never kissed before. In this life, the number of times that he and Samael had kissed could be counted by hand and he had not mastered the basic skill of kissing and breathing at the same time. Thus, he would always be in a daze after their kiss due to the lack of oxygen. Although he knew what was about to happen between them, he only had a lot of theoretical knowledge but didn’t have any hands-on experience. His mind had long been affected by Samael as he felt Samael’s caresses. The sensation was like a current that flowed across every inch of his body to his brain. All of his desires concentrated on a certain place made him ache with need. Samael incessantly fondled his chest. Suo Fei squinted his eyes and subconsciously pressed himself forward. Contrary to his expectations, the longing became more and more intense. He urgently needed to alleviate the aching of his body. However, Samael refused to pay him any heed, as if he didn’t notice it at all. Suo Fei became impatient. He sat on Samael’s legs and restlessly ground his hips against Samael. The thin garments were unable to stop the warmth from spreading to his body, but it wasn’t enough to dull his aching. Thus, he pressed himself even closer, presenting his chest to Samael. He shifted himself forward until he was sitting on another scorching-hot thing. Samael lightly bit Suo Fei and his voice was husky, “Don’t move.” Suo Fei paused for a while but was unable to resist the spurring of his desire. He moved again as he muttered with discontentment, “Uncomfortable...;” His voice was soft and weak. It was not as sharp and clear as usual, but was unconsciously coquettish. Samael’s heart thumped and he bit the pink dot even harder. Then, he pinched it before responding, “En? Where are you uncomfortable? ” Suo Fei’s hand was about to touch his little brother when Samael stopped him. Suo Fei could only then continue grinding himself against Samael. Samael was enjoying it but at the same time, it was also torturing. He let go of Suo Fei’s ravaged pink spots and kissed his lips. Then, he huskily asked, “Here?” Suo Fei’s eyes were watery as he shook his head. Samael kissed his fair neck and asked, “Is it here?” Suo Fei continued to shake his head. Samael raised Suo Fei’s body and continued kissing down his collarbone and chest, but he suddenly stopped when he reached Suo Fei’s navel. Suo Fei was extremely impatient, but this was out of his hands and he also felt embarrassed to say it out loud. The pants he was wearing were extremely thin so his erect desire was already exceptionally obvious. Samael’s gaze finally landed on the little tent that was sticking up. He suddenly gripped it with his hand and spoke with realisation, “It turned out to be here!” The smile in his eyes became even more apparent. Unfortunately, Suo Fei was already unable to pay too much attention to this. His little brother was suddenly held and he groaned a few times due to the comfort it brought. However, when Samael remained motionless, he became unsatisfied once again. This time, Samael didn’t continue tormenting him. He unfastened Suo Fei’s pants and wrapped his hand around a certain someone’s little brother that was in dire need of attention. Then, he began stroking it up and down. Suo Fei was still sitting on Samael’s lap. He became even dizzier because of Samael’s stroking. He encircled both of his hands around Samael’s neck to prop himself up, bringing himself closer. This was simply delivering himself to Samael’s hands. Samael played with him using one hand while his other hand stroked his back. At the same time, he sealed Suo Fei’s lips with his. Under these three attacks, Suo Fei was unable to hold it. His brain had a burst of lightheadedness and he released. After his climax, Suo Fei’s brain that had turned into mush finally calmed down slightly. He glanced at the scene in front of him, and suddenly became embarrassed. While he was lasciviously sitting on Samael’s lap, Samael was still neatly dressed. The most frustrating thing was that the sticky white liquid had landed all over Samael. <i>Crap...; This is too embarrassing!</i>  His cheeks were flushed red and his vision was still swaying. While he was zoning out, he felt his body fall backward. When he returned to his senses, he was already lying on the flower bed. Samael stood up, looking at him from top to bottom. Suo Fei stared blankly. Then, he saw Samael unbuttoning the silver button on his collar, revealing his collarbone, his chest, and then his well-defined waistline and abdomen. Suo Fei watched unblinkingly. The explosive power of the Demons was extremely high. In order to bear this explosive power, their bodies were also filled with power. It couldn’t be seen while Samael was wearing clothes, but when he took off his clothes, his figure...; could really make people’s nose bleed. Suo Fei was captivated. He admired Samael’s body without realising what it implied, only thinking that he would definitely regret it if he didn’t admire such beautiful scenery. In order to see it more clearly, he supported himself to sit up. Samael took off his shirt. Then, he stopped and leaned down towards Suo Fei, took Suo Fei’s hand and placed it on his belt. In a bewitching voice, he ordered, “Come, help me unfasten it. ” Suo Fei gulped and moved to help him. The belt’s button had a common design so Suo Fei managed to unfasten it without much effort. The scene that greeted him made his face burn up. Wide-eyed, he saw Samael looking down at him. After being dumbfounded for a while, he comforted himself, R-racial difference!It must be a racial difference! He quickly moved his stupefied gaze away, but was unsure of where to look. Samael lowered his body slightly, leaned in towards Suo Fei’s ear and whispered, “Sofey, help me.” His words that were accompanied by his warm breath, how could Suo Fei not comprehend them? He reached out his hand and held Samael’s thing that was as hard as an iron, trembling unconsciously. So hot...; This scalding touch made him feel somewhat strange. The fire that had quieted down re-ignited, different from before. It felt as if it was scratching his heart deep inside. It made him feel somewhat soft and somewhat empty. He felt longing, but he didn’t know what he was longing for. Samael moved closer, his lips brushing against Suo Fei’s. He softly said, “Move. ” Suo Fei obliged and stroked him up and down. He felt it become bigger and harder. Samael kissed him and caressed him, throwing Suo Fei into confusion. His movements slowed down subconsciously, then he finally let go. Samael smiled, not forcing him to continue. While he was kissing Suo Fei, his hands explored his body. Suo Fei unknowingly sank into the abyss of his desires, until a hard object entered him from behind. T-there seems to be something wrong with this! Alarm bells started ringing in Suo Fei’s head. He’s a gong. <i>A gong shouldn’t be like this, right?</i>Oh...; Mmn...; His mouth became entangled with Samael’s, easily diverting his attention. Samael reached in with his finger and it was instantly wrapped by the warm and soft place. He pressed it deeper and he found Suo Fei resisting it slightly so he quickly appeased him with his kisses and fondling. Then, he inserted another finger. The width of the two fingers wasn’t small. Thus, it felt tight as it moved inside the unexplored place. Suo Fei frowned slightly. Although he was immersed in his desires, he still felt some discomfort. Samael didn’t stop. He kissed Suo Fei and, using his other hand, held Suo Fei’s little thing that had risen up again. Suo Fei was completely entranced by the pleasure as Samael rubbed his rock-hard thing up and down. His body relaxed and Samael keenly felt the place that his fingers were penetrating quietly secreting liquid. His hands kept sliding back and forth and the exploration of his fingers increasingly became easier. The deeper he reached, the hotter and moister it became. He suddenly yanked his fingers out, eliciting a moan from Suo Fei. His stroking also slowed down. Samael leaned close to Suo Fei and asked in a low voice, “Do you want it? ” Suo Fei had never felt this way before. The itching in his heart was too uncomfortable, that unspeakable place was extremely empty, and the desire was aching through him. It felt too unfamiliar but extremely intense. He looked at Samael, mind clouded by desire, “Want...; I want to...;.” Samael stopped his stroking and pressed his hard object against the soft and warm entrance. He lightly asked, “What do you want? ” Suo Fei clenched his teeth. He felt somewhat scared and nervous but he couldn’t resist it. His voice was soft but clear, “I want you...; really want you...;” Samael pushed his object further, “Is that so?” ” Suo Fei closed his eyes and bit his lips as he nodded. His appearance was too alluring. Samael stared at him unwaveringly and no longer endured it. He finally thrust deep inside him. His object was instantly wrapped by the warm and moist walls. Words could not describe the pleasure he was feeling. He tried to maintain his rationality but was unable to. He badly wanted to thrust faster within him and let his desires take control. The sudden penetration caused Suo Fei to tremble violently. He had seen the size of Samael’s object so he was extremely afraid. At the same time, he also longed for it. He didn’t feel any pain apart from the initial pain. Only a wave of numbness swept across his body. He distinctly felt Samael’s scorching hot and rock-hard object. It was extremely hot, but he was satisfied. So satisfied that he was unable to stop himself from moaning. This was countless times more pleasurable than when Samael played him with his fingers. He felt Samael’s rhythm, slowly penetrating and swiftly withdrawing, followed by an even more intense penetration. He helplessly clung onto Samael with both arms. Like a small piece of wood drifting across a vast ocean, he rose and fell on top of Samael, undulating beyond his control. Suo Fei didn’t know what he was saying. He let out intermittent moans, shouted Samael’s name and uttered those three words that he couldn’t say enough. Suo Fei couldn’t hold himself back. His heart and body were clamouring for Samael, being torn apart by him, and welcoming him. He was being wanted and needed, completely filling the gap in his heart. Time seemed to stand still. When he climaxed, Suo Fei almost thought that he would die. This climax was longer and more intense than the last. His body didn’t seem to belong to him. Hot, white liquid gushed out of his little thing that no one had touched from beginning to end. Because of his climax, Suo Fei’s behind contracted violently. Samael thrust rapidly and finally was unable to resist and reached the peak. ...; Samael leaned close to Suo Fei’s ear and whispered, “Sofey, I love you. ” Suo Fei was startled. He opened his eyes and was greeted by a dream-like sight. The two embraced each other. Then, huge wings on Samael’s back unfolded themselves, spreading out behind him as if it could cover the whole horizon. It was stunning. When Suo Fei woke up, the sky was already bright and the sunlight coming from the window was warm, enshrouding the flower bed like a thin transparent quilt, soft, delicate and extremely comfortable. He had just moved slightly when he felt the arms wrapped around his waist move. Suo Fei didn’t dare to move anymore. He turned his head cautiously and saw Samael. Samael was still fast asleep. He looked extremely peaceful with his eyes closed. Suo Fei stared at him unblinkingly and thought that he was already exceedingly beautiful with his eyes closed. It was a little regretful to be unable to see his beautiful eyes, but because they were closed, he could see his eyelashes distinctly. They weren’t too thick and each strand were defined and separated from one another. They were curled upwards, casting a shadow on his eyelids. It seemed particularly serene. Suo Fei discovered that the outer corner of Samael’s eyes were slightly upturned, so subtle that it was hardly perceptible. However, he could see it clearly when looking at it at such a close distance. Suo Fei stared at him for a long time, perfectly content. Then, he remembered that he seemed to have seen Samael’s wings before he fell asleep. Excited, he swiftly shifted his gaze but, unfortunately, he didn’t see the beautiful pair of bone wings. <i>Was it an illusion?</i>  Suo Fei sighed with disappointment. Seeing that Samael had not woken up yet, Suo Fei’s curiosity was piqued. He had not seen the wound on Samael’s back apart from the first time he met him. Thus, he quietly shifted Samael’s arm and gulped upon seeing Samael’s bare chest. Then somehow, he managed to crawl out and sneak up behind him. He was stunned by what he saw. <i>T-this...; This...;!</i>  <i>Oh my goodness! So cute!!</i>  Suo Fei had always claimed himself to not have a girlish heart. For him, a cute pet like the little cub was nothing special. However, the tiny wings in front of him were too adorable. They were very small, only about the size of a palm, but still extremely exquisite. They were pure-black bone wings, except that they were a super-shrunk miniature version. All of the Demons in Yalance had bone wings, but not in the literal sense of the word. It was not actually made of bones. In fact, Suo Fei couldn’t discern what kind of material it was. It wasn’t like the feather wings of the Celestials nor was it like the transparent wings of the Sylphs. The Demons’ bone wings were very hard, but they were shaped like feathers. It was just that they were much longer than feathers. It didn’t have fine hairs and didn’t seem to be soft, but they were beautiful. Only Demons had these enchanting bone wings. However, the miniature bone wings in front of him was only...; too adorable! After restraining himself for a long while, Suo Fei finally couldn’t hold it back. He reached out to touch it and the tiny bone wings shook. Suo Fei giggled as he touched it again. This time, the tiny bone wings fluttered. Suo Fei wasn’t satisfied with just a light touch. He became more courageous. He pinched it and the tiny bone wings became motionless. Suo Fei blinked. Then, he felt a pulling force and fell on the bed. Lying on his back, he looked back at the person looking down at him. There was laughter in Samael’s eyes as he asked, “Is it amusing? ” Suo Fei was stunned. Then, he replied with a smile, “It is. ” After saying this, Suo Fei personally experienced what playing with fire meant. The cute and tiny bone wings suddenly unfolded, like pure-black fireworks that burst into the sunlit sky. The unusual colour was dazzling and spectacular. How could it still be called cute? The hard, bone wings flickered with a faint lustre. It seemed particularly sharp. The Demons’ bone wings were used for flying. At the same time, they could also be used as sharp weapons. They were definitely unlike those soft, feather wings of the Celestials. However, Suo Fei was not the least bit afraid of such a dangerous thing. Because it was Samael. The black, bone wings slowly folded back. At an even slower pace, the elf carefully and cautiously approached him. The pure-black wings came into contact with his delicate, fair skin. The stark contrast was visually striking. Samael’s eyes turned a few shades darker as they sparked ablaze. The bone wings held up the elf, as if it was offering a sacrifice, but its manner was filled with adoration. Samael’s gaze fell on Suo Fei’s body. There were no words or unnecessary actions, but the elf slightly trembled from his gaze alone. Last night’s passion was instantly rekindled. Samael kissed Suo Fei and lifted him by the waist. In this position, he thrust into that wonderful, warm and tight place. Suo Fei let out a moan from the sudden pleasure. This sound was like the igniting of a fuse. The lust that had been extinguished lit up once again and they indulged themselves in another bout of steamy romping. It was difficult to stop once started. Their bout of lovemaking only stopped after Suo Fei passed out from exhaustion. However, Samael was not the least bit exhausted. On the contrary, he had an abundance of energy. Not only was his physical strength abundant, but it had also undergone a surprising transformation. Previously, his power was like sand particles that were scattered around his body. Now, however, he could perceive that his power had gathered, or rather, had become condensed. Metaphorically speaking, his body was like a glass bottle. The liquid’s density that it could bear had greatly increased, thus its quality had also shot up. Moreover, its growth rate had not reached its peak. Samael could clearly sense that he still had a lot of room for improvement. This was something that he had never felt before. When he related this improvement to Suo Fei’s healing ability, his eyes narrowed and he immediately inspected Suo Fei’s condition. Suo Fei’s kisses could consume his physical strength. A lot of physical strength. He could even over-exhaust himself. He examined Suo Fei’s body carefully and found that Suo Fei was no different from before. Although he had passed out, his cheeks still had a healthy glow. It seemed like he was only sound asleep. After examining him, Samael breathed a sigh of relief. He carried Suo Fei up and carefully cleaned his body with warm water. Samael’s heart jolted when he touched Suo Fei’s tiny hole but he immediately restrained himself. He cleaned Suo Fei with a wooden expression, his eyes not daring to dart around. After finishing cleaning up Suo Fei, Samael placed him on the flower bed, covered him with a thin quilt, then went to the bathroom to splash himself with cold water. When Suo Fei woke up again, he was alone. Suo Fei’s brain could function well without Samael around. He sat cross-legged on the flower bed. He thought of his beastliness (Are you sure it isn’t submissiveness?) and suddenly felt embarrassed. He consoled himself after being embarrassed for a while. I’m a man, a twenty-four carat pure man. A pure man must be loyal to his desires! With this thought, he jumped off the bed. When he landed, he screamed out in pain and rolled back into the bed. <i>F**k. My waist! My legs!</i>  <i>Pure man, my ass! Loyal to desires, my ass! Laozi is clearly about to die from exhaustion!</i>  Suo Fei rolled on the bed while pressing his waist and massaging his thighs. Apart from these two spots being sore, there seemed to be nothing different in his body. His state of mind was also good, like he had a long, dreamless sleep. <i>Wait...;</i> Suo Fei suddenly thought of something. He’s a gong, but he was regarded as a shou. He didn’t haggle over it and merely accepted the situation. Lovemaking, this matter, the distinction isn’t that clear between being a gong and being a shou. This time, he was the one under. The next time, he could be the one above. It’s not a big deal...; He could just discuss it with Samael. 【——Such embarrassing naivety.】 <i>Most importantly, why doesn’t it hurt at that place?</i> Although he had been a virgin for ages, his thinking wasn’t that pure. He had played so many highly-erotic slash games before. Even if he hadn’t eaten pork before, he had still seen pigs run. It would be reasonable to say that in his first sexual experience, as the receiver, shouldn’t it be extremely painful? He could have even shed so much blood and end up losing his life. But...; his condition wasn’t that serious. It didn’t even hurt! Although he passed out, it was...; it was...; because of pleasure. <i>T-this is unimaginable!</i>  He was entangled with this matter for quite a while to no avail. Suo Fei frowned. Once again, he thought of the wings on Samael’s back and suddenly came across an idea. Samael was a primeval demon. Naturally, he had bone wings. In the game’s description, it was said that Samael’s bone wings were extraordinarily beautiful, enchanting and strong. Unfortunately, Suo Fei had not seen Samael’s wings when he was playing the games because he chopped it off. Throughout Yalance, there was no other person apart from Samael who would be so cruel to themselves. The price that he had to pay in order to subdue that Asura Blade was truly not small. Suo Fei felt pain when he recalled the scene. Nevertheless, Samael’s wings had grown anew after making love with him. It wasn’t that his way of thinking was too melodramatic. It was just that he didn’t dare to forget this body’s unreliable setting. After associating his ideas together, Suo Fei finally comprehended it. There was a reason why Sofey Evans was the ultimate shou. It definitely wasn’t because of his earth-shaking appearance or his alluring figure. It was because of his damn physique. His kiss could heal people, and surprisingly, even making love with him had benefits! <i>Isn’t he just like a delicious cake, waiting to be devoured?!</i>  <i>The game developers truly spared no effort to create a reasonable plot for this ultimate shou, huh! Even the golden finger that came with it was designed for porn!</i>  <i>It truly is a highly-erotic slash game masterpiece.</i>  Suo Fei sighed. When he saw that Samael had not returned, he felt a little anxious. He fumblingly put on his clothes, supported himself with his soft legs and walked towards the door. He was already in this room when he woke up and hadn’t had the time to go out. Until now, he still didn’t know where he was. With this thought, Suo Fei moved towards the door. When he opened the door, he was slightly startled by the scene that greeted him. The place wasn’t unfamiliar. The sky was a beautiful azure blue; it was spotless. There weren’t other sources of light, but a warm and gentle radiance enshrouded the place. The mountains were high, and the peaks were lofty. The air was filled with the smell of spring. This was what he had seen when he entered Salvag’s treasury. <i>Just where is this place?</i> Suo Fei looked around and discovered something different. He had previously seen this scene in the treasury, but back then, it gave off a sense of unreality. As if he was looking at an illusion from a distance. Now, however, he felt that he was truly in this place. This place was extremely calm and beautiful. It had green hills, tall trees as well as the smell of spring in the air. However, there’s less activity and more desolation. Right...; Suo Fei realised that it was too empty, like a bustling city that had no people, giving him this sense of disharmony. Where are the people? Suo Fei suddenly remembered that when he first entered the treasury, everyone saw the illusion. Back then, Samael said that he had been here. After that, a lot of things happened so Suo Fei didn’t get the chance to ask Samael what he meant. He almost nearly threw it at the back of his mind. He only remembered it after seeing this place. So to say, Samael had really been here before?Just where is this place? In a sense, Suo Fei knew Samael extremely well. After all, he almost finished the game and had gone through most of Samael’s past and future. In the game, he had never gone to this place and didn’t have any recollection of it. Could it be that it isn’t related that this plotline isn’t related to the game? Speaking of which, Salvag’s Treasury wasn’t mentioned in the game. Suo Fei didn’t ponder about it too much. He could just ask Samael these things. It’s useless to mull it over by himself. Just when he was wondering where Samael had gone, Suo Fei saw a huge, red figure flying in the horizon which approached him not long after. It was the red dragon. The red dragon was huge, nearly a hundred metres long. Thus, the image of its huge head approaching him was startling. The red dragon stared at Suo Fei with its big eyes and said something in a rumbling manner. Suo Fei couldn’t understand him. Then, he heard a familiar voice, “Elves can’t understand dragon language, you lazy dragon. Speak the common language!” This roar...; It’s the little cub? Suo Fei raised his head and saw two familiar figures sitting on top of the dragon’s head. One was the little cub who was sitting on the dragon’s head with his wings folded behind him while holding something with his claws. Next to him was a bunch of tiny fireball fatties. Suo Fei felt exceedingly warm upon seeing them. He badly wanted to pet them. The little cub unfolded its wings and flew down from the dragon’s head. Suo Fei found out that he was holding a big pot with his claws. The pot was brimming with porridge, steaming and emitting a tantalising aroma. “Come on, quickly eat something to fill you up.” Suo Fei was startled. The little cub was unable to reach the ground as he was holding the pot. He could only flap his wings and urgently said, “Fireball fatty and I simmered this porridge the whole night. Come and try it. It’s extremely delicious. This is definitely enough for you to eat.” Suo Fei still remained motionless. The little cub was somewhat concerned. Then, he suddenly remembered that Samael had fed Suo Fei spoon after spoon in the dwarven village. He helplessly complained, “Don’t make things difficult for me. Cooking porridge for you is already my limit. My claws can’t hold a spoon to go and feed you.” Hearing this, the emotions that were bursting in Suo Fei’s heart were instantly reduced. He took the pot and mumblingly said, “F-feed, your ass. Quickly come inside so we can eat together.” After he spoke, the little cub entered the house, followed by the fireball fatty. The red dragon who had been watching the whole time with his huge eyes started protesting at this moment, “You- You guys ignored me!” Suo Fei: ...;...; Big bro, with your size, nobody can ignore you unless they’re blind, alright! However, the red dragon obviously didn’t think this way. He stared at them with his big eyes and burst into tears. Suo Fei was dumbfounded. The little cub anxiously said, “Lazy dragon! Don’t cry! Do you want to drown someone?!” The red dragon stifled his tears and fewer tears flowed out. Suo Fei reacted and hurriedly asked, “Do you want to eat too?” The tears completely stopped. The red dragon blinked its eyes and Suo Fei face-palmed. F**k, what a big idiot. However, the little cub refused, “This meagre amount of porridge isn’t even enough to fill the gaps between your teeth. You still have the nerve to eat it. Won’t you be ashamed?” Red dragon: (*￣︿￣)。 The two bickered until the red dragon finally gave up on eating the porridge. Suo Fei, the little cub and the fireball fatty chose not to eat inside. They brought out a table and four chairs. Suo Fei, the little cub and the fireball fatty occupied three of them. As for the remaining one, Mr. Red Dragon placed his head on top of the chair and could barely be considered as sitting on it. Looking at this scene, Suo Fei was somewhat unable to eat the porridge. He was afraid that he would choke himself laughing if he took a sip. Thus, when Samael came back, this was the scene that he saw. The little cub was giving the red dragon the cold shoulder. The red dragon was feeling wronged. The fireball fatty was busy serving Suo Fei porridge while using his body to keep it warm and, at the same time, sneakily eating a bit of porridge. Lastly, Suo Fei’s eyes were filled with laughter as he peacefully ate porridge. The scene seemed incongruous but was unexpectedly harmonious. The corner of Samael’s raised into a faint smile. Suo Fei was the first to discover Samael. His silver eyes immediately lit up. The red dragon was the second. He instantly rushed towards Samael. Samael patted his head to appease him and said something to him. The red dragon bid goodbye towards Suo Fei and the others, flapped his wings and flew away. Without the colossus, the place instantly became spacious. Samael took over the fireball fatty’s job and served a bowl of porridge to Suo Fei. He softly asked, “How are you feeling?” When he heard Samael’s voice, Suo Fei was slightly jittery but only for a while. He replied, “Very good.” Samael smiled. Suo Fei coughed and felt that the atmosphere was a little awkward. He hurriedly changed the topic and asked Samael, “Where are we? Isn’t this the treasury?” “We’re not in the treasury. Salvag’s treasury disappeared after we left.” Suo Fei was stunned when he heard this. He quickly asked, “What about the artifact?” He was talking about the resurrection artifact. Samael replied, “I’ve asked Nael. Nael is the red dragon’s name. The resurrection artifact wasn’t in the treasury.” Suo Fei was dumbfounded. He asked, “Where is it now?” He had left his interspatial bag in the Demon Realm and now, the resurrection artifact was missing. Samael pacified him, “Don’t worry. Nael told me that the resurrection artifact had been taken by his brother.” Samael paused and continued with a frown, “It’s just that Nael doesn’t know where his brother is.” Suo Fei was stunned. The red dragon’s brother? Suo Fei, who had finished the game of Yalance, had only encountered one dragon in the game. It was Hull who was imprisoned in the bottomless abyss. The jadeite green dragon who had spent thousands of years in solitary confinement. Could it be that the resurrection artifact is with Hull? Suo Fei quickly asked Samael, “Is the red dragon’s brother an jadeite green dragon?” “Wait, I’ll call him over.” After a while, the red dragon came back. Without haste, Suo Fei described Hull’s appearance, causing the red dragon to be dumbfounded. He shouted, “That’s Hull! It must be Hull, elf! Where did you see him? My brother...; He had been gone for a long time. He told me that he would come back, but he didn’t return after such a long time.” The red dragon burst into tears. Suo Fei felt his heart ache. Hull should still be trapped inside the bottomless abyss. He was just about to speak when he paused and ended up not saying anything, only holding Samael’s hand. Samael knew that Suo Fei didn’t want to say it so he comforted the red dragon, “We’ll find Hull and you’ll be reunited with him.” The red dragon was appeased. After sending away the red dragon and the little cub, Samael and Suo Fei entered the house. Suo Fei told him about Hull’s situation. Samael frowned, “Bottomless abyss?” Suo Fei nodded and added, “It’s in the Sea of Chaos.” Samael fell into deep thought. Suo Fei knew what Samael was pondering about. There weren’t any living creatures in the Sea of Chaos. Thus, it could be said that no one in Yalance had heard of the bottomless abyss. Naturally, Samael was also unaware of it. However, Hull was definitely in that place. He was still alive, relying on his immense vitality to live in desolation. Samael didn’t doubt Suo Fei’s words. He pondered for a while before asking, “Is there any way to enter the Sea of Chaos?” There really is a way...; Suo Fei turned to Samael and solemnly replied, “We’d need to pass through the Demon Realm.” Upon hearing this, a fierce look flashed in Samael’s eyes and said in a low voice, “I understand.” In the game, Samael had entered the Sea of Chaos twice. The first time was in the first half of the game. It was a turning point. Samael had been tricked and fell into the Sea of Chaos. He thought that he would die, but he entered the bottomless abyss and saw the jadeite green dragon, Hull. This was a hidden game route. At that time, Hull had fully exhausted his strength and couldn’t even speak, but he used his remaining strength to send Samael out of the Sea of Chaos. Without even saying a word, the jadeite green dragon gave up his life to save Samael, whom he had met for the first time. Samael was extremely touched by this incident. Therefore, he had never forgotten about Hull. When he obtained the ‘Transmogrifier’, he found that this artifact could save Hull. In order to rescue Hull, he attacked the Demons, broke through the Demon Tower and entered the Sea of Chaos by force. Speaking of which, it wasn’t difficult to conquer Hull’s feelings. However, this course of events happened throughout the entire game, with one thing leading to another. He met Hull in the beginning but only successfully conquered him in the latter half of the game. It was just that after rescuing Hull, Hull became increasingly reticent. He also treated Samael indifferently. He no longer had his initial dedication where he would rather lose his life in order to save Samael. Suo Fei had never been able to understand him. For instance, why did Hull save Samael? Also, why was he so cold towards Samael afterward? Suo Fei was unable to figure it out even until the game was about to end. Well, the 10P feast hadn’t even started so how could he say that it was truly over? And now, because of his involvement, Samael missed his first opportunity to meet Hull. Hull didn’t save him, so Samael would not want to save Hull. However, Samael met the red dragon. Samael seemed to have a very good impression of the red dragon and was extremely close to him. Suo Fei was deep in his thoughts when he was interrupted by Samael’s words. “Nael told me...; That this is my home.” Home? Suo Fei frowned. How could that be possible? Although Samael’s parents hadn’t been mentioned in the game, Samael still had some recollection of his childhood. That world that was filled with endless darkness could only be the Demon Realm. Samael was born in the Demon Realm but grew up in the territory of the Humans. The territory of the Humans was an ordinary village that belonged to one of the three major cities, Carter City. It was an under-developed mountain village. Suo Fei had seen that place. There was not any similarity between that place and this place in front of him. Moreover, Suo Fei didn’t feel that Samael would still regard that place as his home. Suo Fei asked Samael, “Have you been here before?” Samael replied, “No.” Suo Fei was stunned. He clearly remembered that Samael told him that he had been here when they first entered the treasury. He asked Samael about this. Samael frowned and asked, “Did I say that?” The two were puzzled. They both knew that they wouldn’t lie to each other. However, Suo Fei truly heard it yet Samael didn’t have any impression of him saying it. What is going on? Suo Fei couldn’t help but wonder if he had misheard it. That could be possible...; It had been a long time so there might be discrepancies in his memories. He might have heard it wrongly or remembered it wrongly. However, Suo Fei always felt that there was something fishy. He thought and thought about it but was unable to figure it out. At that time, he had just entered the treasury and everything was chaotic. He remembered thinking that there seemed to be something wrong with Samael at that time but he was distracted by the ensuing attack of the ferocious beasts. After that, he paid little attention to it. Thinking about it now, it was already hard to tell. He thought about it for quite a while and came up with nothing so Suo Fei gave up and said, “I probably remembered it wrongly.” Then he asked, “Where is this place?” Seeing Suo Fei diverting the topic, Samael didn’t pursue the matter and replied, “Dragon Valley.” Dragon Valley? Although he had not heard of it before, it was evident from the literal meaning of the name. It must be the Dragons’ territory. Oh...; Suo Fei recalled that in Yalance, although there were Dragons, apart from the red dragon, the only dragon that actually existed was Hull. So to say, the Dragons had almost been annihilated. As for the Dragons’ territory, Suo Fei completely had no idea. Samael continued, “Nael doesn’t know much. He had been trapped inside Salvag’s Treasury ever since he was young. After his brother left, he waited inside the treasury until we found him.” This meant that they wouldn’t be able to get any information from Nael about that place. Looking at the red dragon’s behaviour, it did seem like he didn’t understand anything. But, why was he trapped inside the treasury? Moreover, what was the matter in the treasury all about? This...; is really a mess. Suo Fei felt that his brain cells weren’t enough to comprehend the matter. In the end, he gave up thinking about it. He might as well save Hull first. What’s the use of thinking so much? To save Hull, they must go to the Sea of Chaos and there was a safe route to do so. In the whole of Yalance, nobody else apart from Suo Fei knew of this route. The location of this route’s entrance...; was not the regular bad news. It was in the Demon Realm, inside the Demon Palace, directly beneath the Demon King’s throne! This was why Samael only entered the Sea of Chaos to save Hull after conquering the Demon Realm. Suo Fei unblinkingly stared at Samael after telling him about this requirement. His cautiousness was too obvious so Samael asked him, “You don’t want me to sit on that position?” Suo Fei nodded without hesitation. Samael smilingly said, “I’m not interested.” Suo Fei heaved a sigh of relief and quickly explained for himself, “I’m afraid that it’ll be troublesome for you. If you sit on the throne, you will be trapped in the Demon Realm all the time and you can’t go anywhere. It’d be too boring. Moreover, the Demons are not easy to manage. Everything is a chaotic mess. People would be challenging you all day. It’s too troublesome.” Samael was still smiling. Suo Fei was a little uncomfortable. “I believe you. It’s definitely not because of the legendary Demon Palace.” The laughter in Samael’s eyes became brighter. Suo Fei was embarrassed. Samael was a Demon. Although he didn’t grow up in the Demon Realm, the social customs and living habits of the Demons were still well-known throughout Yalance. It was impossible for Samael not to know. Thus, Suo Fei’s small discretion couldn’t be concealed from Samael. Since he couldn’t hide it, Suo Fei flew into a range out of humiliation. He went closer and spoke with a fierce expression, “What?! Samael, do you really want to experience that so-called banquet? I heard that all the former Demon Kings would be dragged into a night of revelry...;” Samael smiled faintly and pulled him into his arms. He leaned in close to his ears and whispered. Suo Fei’s face flushed red. S-Samael had been led astray! H-he can’t take this lying down! Thus, Suo Fei braced himself and said, “Accompanying you for a night of revelry is nothing. I can even accompany you for three days and three nights straight!” Samael kissed him and said, “Good, I’ll bear it in mind.” Wait...; Bear what in mind?! He was just about to retort when he heard a knock on the door. Samael went to open a door and Suo Fei followed him. When the door was opened, Suo Fei was stunned. The red dragon had huge luggage on his head. He flashed his enormous wings and said, “I’ve already packed up my luggage. Let’s go and find Hull!” Suo Fei’s gaze landed on the huge, pink and flowery luggage on top of its head and wanted to cover his eyes. Idiot, can you not be so foolish? Samael was in a good mood so it patted the foolish dragon’s head and the foolish dragon became even prouder of himself. Suo Fei had no choice but to explain to him, “Nael, you’d have to become smaller in this trip. We have to be inconspicuous.” The red dragon was puzzled, “Become smaller? How can I become smaller?” Suo Fei coughed and spoke to Samael, “We need to use the Transmogrifier.” Samael handed it to him. Suo Fei studied it for quite a while and handed it back to Samael in the end, “This...; It seems like I can’t use it.” Samael took it and demonstrated how to use it. Suo Fei learned it quickly. He said to the red dragon, “Don’t move. It’ll only take a short while.” The red dragon’s interest had been piqued so it nodded earnestly. Suo Fei held the Transmogrifier, pointed it towards the red dragon and activated it. As the red dragon was enormous, the activation time wasn’t brief. Fortunately, the red dragon didn’t move so it was easy for Suo Fei to point at him. Suo Fei only had to keep still in order to successfully activate it. After half an hour, a ray of light shot out and enveloped the red dragon. Then, he began shrinking from his enormous size. It seemed that it had been successfully activated. Then, a high-pitched scream sounded. Suo Fei watched wide-eyed in shock. Oh my...; I forgot to ask the red dragon to put down his huge, pink flowery luggage. The red dragon had become small so he couldn’t bear the heavy load. He was instantly pushed down by his huge luggage. Suo Fei was mortified. What should we do if he becomes crushed to death?! He hurriedly rushed forward to examine his situation. Under the huge luggage, he saw a tiny dragon cub that was dazedly spitting out flames. So...; so cute! Suo Fei quickly moved the luggage aside and placed the red dragon cub on his hand. His wings were shaking. His eyes were swirly, like mosquito coils, due to being pressed down. His mouth was wide open, spitting out flames as he coughed out. The dragon cub was only the size of a palm. He lied on Suo Fei’s hands spread-eagled. Samael also came over. He expressionlessly poked the red dragon with his hand and the dragon cub turned over, revealing his soft belly. Suo Fei thought of the tough and large red dragon from before and then looked at the little cub in front of him now. The stark contrast made him smile so broadly that his eyes narrowed into a line. Looking at the dragon cub, Suo Fei suddenly felt that the Transmogrifier was truly a good thing. His brain, which was more active than ordinary people, instantly began fantasizing. If...; If I secretly used the Transmogrifier on Samael...; When he imagined the cute and tiny black-haired demon, Suo Fei’s heart immediately sped up. He stared at Samael overtly while he was immersed in his imagination. Samael, who was being intently stared at, raised his eyebrows and seized the Transmogrifier, “I’ll keep this.” “Ah, hey...;” Suo Fei, who was imagining the lil’ black-haired demon in his mind instinctively reached out for the Transmogrifier like Erkang. My lil’ Samael...; Transmogrifier...; Samael looked at Suo Fei and his eyes narrowed as he smilingly asked, “Want to try it?” Suo Fei was familiar with all of Samael’s expressions. At this moment, his smile was definitely harbouring malicious intentions. Suo Fei hurriedly waved his hand in denial, “No...; No need.” He wanted to tease the lil’ Samael but he didn’t want himself to become small and be teased. The lil’ dragon cub recovered his senses and loudly cried out. His voice was clear and sharp, without any trace of the red dragon’s deep and resounding bass, “You guys! You’re all so big!” Suo Fei was appalled. He flicked the dragon’s small head and explained, “You’ve become smaller.” The lil’ Nael was bewildered. After processing the information for a while, he animatedly flapped his wings and started flying around like a fly, extremely curious. At this time, the little cub and the fireball fatty also arrived. When the two saw the lil’ dragon cub, they were first stunned. Then, they laughingly rushed over and blissfully played together with him. It seemed that they were very pleased with Nael’s new physique. Since Samael could also fly now, the little cub had also been reduced in size. The fireball fatty insisted that he could shrink by himself. Suo Fei contemplated for a while before finally disagreeing. The fireball fatty’s “shrinking” was only dividing himself into a large group of lil’ fireball fatties, which would be awfully conspicuous. Thus, he used the Transmogrifier to change the group of lil’ fireball fatties into one lil’ fireball fatty. At last, on Suo Fei’s left shoulder was the lil’ dragon cub, on his right shoulder was the little cub, and on his palm was the fireball fatty who was sulkily drawing circles. Finally done, but unfortunately...; Suo Fei grudgingly looked at the Transmogrifier in Samael’s hands. He badly wanted to see the lil’ Samael! Fine, I mustn’t be anxious. There’d always be an opportunity. Once they were fully prepared, Samael embraced Suo Fei, unfolded his bone wings and flew to the sky. Suo Fei’s plan was extremely simple. In the game, Samael directly killed Linde and seized the Demon King’s throne. After that, he openly entered the Sea of Chaos and saved Hull. However, they didn’t have to go through so much trouble. It wouldn’t be easy to kill Linde. At that time, the game had directed him to conquer Abel. This time, they didn’t have such worries and they didn’t need to waste this effort. The entrance to the Sea of Chaos was under the Demon King’s throne. They only had to furtively sneak into the Demon Palace and sneakily go under the King’s throne. At that time, they would be able to smoothly enter the Sea of Chaos. Of course, this was a simple thing to say, but a complicated thing to implement. Firstly, Suo Fei had to have the ability to sneak into the Demon Palace without being noticed. Secondly, although the Sea of Chaos’ entrance was truly below the throne, one needed a trigger to open it. At present, only Suo Fei knew the trigger was. Therefore, in the entire Yalance, the only people who could enter the bottom of the Sea of Chaos were only Samael and Suo Fei. When they arrived at the Demon Realm, Suo Fei also heard great news. Linde was not in the Demon Realm. He went to the Beastkins’ territory. This was simply a heaven-sent opportunity. They effortlessly sneaked into the Demon Palace. The Demon King’s throne was also known as the Throne of Blood, meaning that a great deal of blood had been spilled on the king’s throne. This was sufficient to see the price that one had to pay to ascend to this position. Even Suo Fei could easily hide from the guards outside the palace, let alone Samael. In fact, there was not much defense in the Demon Palace since the fighting strength of each of the Demons was already super strong. Linde was the most important person in the Demon Realm so his imperial guards were the elite of the elites. There was simply no one who would dare to sneak in. Moreover, there wasn’t any treasure in the Demon Palace. The Throne of Blood was a symbol of one’s strength, but it wasn’t a treasure. Thus, it was not necessary to employ some expensive defense mechanism. Suo Fei used to be a Demon King (using the ultimate gong’s body). Hence, he knew the Demon Palace’s plan view like the palm of his hand. This helped them greatly. As they were gradually approaching the Demon King’s great hall, Suo Fei keenly discovered that someone was also sneaking into the place. He took a close look and discovered that...; It was actually Abel. Currently, Abel was the sole prince of the Demon race. It wasn’t strange for him to be in the Demon Realm, but it was somewhat strange for him to be in the Demon Palace. Abel had a f**king miserable setting in the game. He was the son of the previous Demon King, however the previous Demon King had been killed by Linde, naturally in a fair and aboveboard manner. Because of this, Linde ascended to the Throne of Blood. If we were to base it on the Human race’s way of thinking, Linde should have gotten rid of Abel, this future trouble, a long time ago. However, for the Demons, leaving him alive was the greatest honour for Linde. It served as a constant reminder to everyone that he killed Abel’s father. He became the new Demon King and Abel could only watch on helplessly. That’s right. In this race where strength reigned supreme, only those who had the ability were able to sit in a high position. There’s absolutely no hatred between them. This was a unique characteristic of the Demons. Thus, although Abel was the sole prince of the Demon race, he had an extremely awkward identity in the Demon Realm. Fortunately, this young fellow had the vitality of a cockroach. In addition, he inherited his father’s formidable fighting strength. Thus, he could speak with his fists to earn his own dignity. However, it was impossible for him to gain permission into the Demon Palace. So, by appearing in this place, what is he planning to do? Suo Fei pulled Samael to quietly hide their figures, deciding to find out his motives. Abel sneakily entered. His figure was strong and healthy while his movements were light and graceful. If Suo Fei wasn’t together with Samael, he might have not discovered Abel. After all, an S-tier assassin was extremely powerful. Abel was very cautious. He knew the Demon Palace’s layout extremely well so he cleverly avoided a lot of the patrol guards as well as some of the defensive enchantments. This made it a lot easier for Suo Fei and Samael who were following him from behind. Abel’s destination was obvious. It was also the Demon King’s Great Hall. He first glanced around before he entered and Suo Fei followed him in. The Great Hall had been decorated according to the Demon race’s tastes, mainly using black and purple. Although everything had dark colours, the place was spacious and had high ceilings. Its grandeur was intimidating. Suo Fei glanced at the Throne of Blood. It was an utterly lavish chair that had an imposing atmosphere to it. It vividly and thoroughly displayed the blatant arrogance of the Demons. Most importantly, this chair was so huge that ten people could sit on it at the same time. Moreover, this place was one of his options to hold his final 10P feast. Tsktsk...; Whatever. Suo Fei sighed but in fact, he didn’t have much thoughts on this matter. Abel’s objective was clearly not the Throne of Blood. It could be said that he didn’t even spare it a glance. He walked directly towards the left side of the room’s partition. What on earth is he planning?Could it be that he’s planning to hide there and wait for Linde’s return so that he could mount a sneak attack?He shouldn’t be that stupid. Suo Fei pondered. Regardless of what Abel was planning, he had to get him out of the hall. He couldn’t let others know that there’s an entrance under the Demon King’s throne. Abel pushed the partition, revealing the black wall behind it. Then, his hands felt around the wall until his fingers hit something protruding from the wall and pushed it down. It seemed to have triggered some kind of mechanism as the wall started retracting, revealing a dark hole. Abel stared at it for a while before he reached in and fumbled around. Suo Fei frowned as he watched. What is he looking for? After a while, Abel took out his hand while holding something that was made of cloth. It had tiger patterns on it. Abel was somewhat confused. He unfurled the cloth to have a look and was immediately shocked. W-what the f**k is t-this?!Are these clothes? It was extremely small and close-fitting. The crucial point was that there were two holes on the chest and a hole at the bottom. The clothes simply revealed the three private parts, alright! The most frightening thing was that it came with a tail. One end of the tail was made of fur while the other end was made of smooth jade. It was easy to see what it was used for. Suo Fei also saw it clearly and was suddenly dumbfounded. Boy, what do you want to do with that thing! Abel threw the sultry clothing onto the floor in disgust. He had a mental struggle before he reached his hand into the hole once again. After a while, he took out another thing. This time, it was a wooden box that was exquisitely carved on top. It could be seen that it was valuable with just a glance. Abel frowned in thought and finally decided to look inside the box. After taking a glance, he closed it back at lightning speed. Then, his fair cheeks instantly turned red. Although Abel closed it quickly, Suo Fei managed to see it...; There was a whole row of dildos inside the box, orderly arranged from biggest to smallest. The smallest had the girth of a pinkie finger while the biggest had the girth of an adult’s arm. Abel swiftly threw away the wooden box like it was a hot potato but it just so happened that the wooden box’s latch was very loose. Thus, when he threw it, the wooden box opened and the things inside rolled on the ground. Abel was struck dumb. After all, he sneaked into the place so leaving it this way would be rather conspicuous. Thus, his eyebrows knitted into a frown but had no choice but to crouch down and put the things back inside the wooden box. Suo Fei who had seen the whole incident looked at Abel’s pitiful appearance and immediately turned around to bury his face in Samael’s embrace, struggling to stifle his laughter. I really can’t bear to look at you, kid! After that, Abel took out a box filled with vibrators, then a set of purple whips. There were also several scrolls of extremely well-drawn cut-sleeve illustrations as well as several outrageous candy underwear and cumbersome women’s clothing. On one hand, he kept on taking out things. On the other hand, he kept on cursing in anger saying things like, “Rogue! Shameless! Vulgar! Gross!” and so on. Suo Fei badly wanted to correct him. In this situation, it would be more accurate to use the word ‘pervert’! Besides, Abel, what exactly are you looking for? Is there anything that you could possibly want from this sex toy storage? As Suo Fei was criticising him in his mind, Abel took out a light pink object. Suo Fei inwardly thought that it would probably be another piece of sultry lingerie when Abel unfolded it. Suo Fei’s eyes contracted. T-this is my interspatial bag! It was his interspatial bag that was previously taken away by Linde and his group. Abel scrutinised it and mumbled something. Then, he stopped fumbling inside the black hole, as if he had already found what he was looking for. Could it be that Abel came to find his interspatial bag?What does he want to do? Suo Fei was anxious. It went without saying that he wanted to retrieve his interspatial bag, but he initially didn’t know where Linde had kept it. He was very worried since he had no idea how to go about finding it, but now, it surprisingly landed on Abel’s hands. This was an extremely rare opportunity. If he missed this, he truly wouldn’t know how to get his interspatial bag back. Samael could figure out Suo Fei’s thoughts even without saying it out. It was no longer necessary to hide so Suo Fei emerged from their hiding place. Abel was startled when the two suddenly appeared. He responded quickly and got into a fighting stance. Suo Fei was wondering how to obtain the interspatial bag from Abel. The interspatial bag was too important for him. It was still undamaged which showed that Linde and the others didn’t forcibly break the interspatial bag’s restrictions. Thus, the things inside it must still be in good condition. Vixanne’s memory orb was still inside so he had to take it back no matter what. Even if he had to take it by force. Upon seeing Suo Fei, Abel was momentarily surprised but immediately restored his previous arrogant attitude after coldly grunting. However, his following action shocked Suo Fei. Abel threw the pink interspatial bag towards Suo Fei and said, “A grown man is actually using a pink thing. Tch!” As Suo Fei held the interspatial bag, he felt a sense of unreality. He only needed to touch it to know that it was the interspatial bag that Vixanne had given him. There was absolutely nothing wrong with it. But it was actually returned to him so easily? To think that he was thinking of a bunch of countermeasures to deal with Abel...; He even thought of using violence. Seeing Suo Fei standing in a daze, Abel seemed to be a little uncomfortable so he looked away and stiffly said, “I don’t like owing others. We’re even now!” After saying this, his figure disappeared, wanting to leave the Demon Palace. Suo Fei came out of his trance. After understanding the ins and outs of the matter, he suddenly didn’t know what to say. Abel risked his life to specially come to this place just to help him find his interspatial bag. As for him owing Suo Fei, he should be referring to what happened in the treasury where Suo Fei immediately treated Abel’s wounds after coming out of the room. In fact, Suo Fei didn’t take that matter to heart but Abel actually kept it in mind. So much so that he risked his life sneaking into the Demon Palace just to help him retrieve his interspatial bag. Suo Fei thought that it would be a lie if he said that he wasn’t grateful, but Abel left so quickly that he disappeared right after saying that sentence. Samael appeased him, “Rest assured, I’ve granted him stealth.” Suo Fei heaved a sigh of relief. In this case, Abel definitely wouldn’t be discovered by someone. As long as he and Samael left some evidence that they came, Linde would not suspect Abel. After keeping the interspatial bag, Suo Fei returned to his previous train of thought. Samael checked the place once more, ensuring that there was no one else. Suo Fei walked towards the Throne of Blood and laboriously moved the throne away. Underneath was a flat and smooth purple jade. The entrance couldn’t be seen. One needed a trigger to open it. Back then, Suo Fei racked his brains for a long time before he figured out that the trigger was actually Samael’s blood. He didn’t figure out the reason at that time but he might find the answer this time. Samael cut his fingertip and bright red blood dripped onto the jade stone. The purple jade stone became transparent and gradually disappeared, revealing a dark hole before their eyes. Back then, Samael had not recovered his wings so he dived straight inside. However, Samael could fly now, hence the two didn’t have to enter in such a discomfiting manner. Samael unfolded his wings, held Suo Fei in his arms and jumped into the dark hole. After that, the Throne of Blood returned to its original position. The entrance was only visible for a brief few minutes before it disappeared. One needed Samael’s blood to open it again. They were falling for a very long time. The gusts of wind hitting them were penetratingly cold so Suo Fei couldn’t help but shiver. In the end, Samael used his wings to enclose Suo Fei, making it much better than earlier. This passage was the only way to pass through the Sea of Chaos. Beneath the Sea of Chaos was a bottomless abyss, which was a deep canyon. It was like diving to the bottom of the sea and entering a remote and terrifying crevice whose end could not be seen. Hull was terribly massive so he got stuck in the bottomless abyss. He couldn’t break free for thousands of years. With the passage of time, his physical strength was incessantly being used up, making it harder for him to fly out of the place. He was trapped in this manner, lonely and desolately waiting for death. This was truly miserable. When Samael and Suo Fei reached the bottomless abyss, they immediately saw the huge, jadeite green dragon. He had an extremely elegant figure. One could imagine how graceful and beautiful he would be if he flew across the horizon. However, he had been trapped in this place of endless darkness with no one to accompany him. Samael walked to his side. Those huge, dark green eyes that were momentarily blank instantly brightened and a feeble voice rang out, “Launay, you...;” “...;...;You came.” The voice was weak but it could not hide its melodiousness and sweetness. It was extremely pleasant to hear. Moreover, it also contained boundless joy now that what he had been hoping and yearning for a long time had finally come. His beautiful, jadeite eyes looked at Samael with a gentle and soft expression. They were brimming with suppressed emotions, as if those emotions had been bottled for thousands and thousands of years, embedding them deep into his marrows, so concentrated that it could never subside. However, Suo Fei felt immensely uneasy, extremely uneasy! In the game, when he saw Hull for the first time, he clearly didn’t say a word. Now however, Hull called out Samael’s surname in a very intimate manner. Suo Fei was still in Samael’s embrace, only revealing his eyes as he silently sized up Hull. Perhaps Samael had come at a much earlier time than before so Hull’s mental state was also much better. Unlike his disoriented manner when he was close to dying in the game, although he was weak, he still had power and vitality left. Samael looked at Hull and briefly stood motionless from surprise, which rarely happened to Samael. Suo Fei noticed this and inexplicably felt uneasy. He was clearly in Samael’s arms, but he felt a strange feeling of alienation. Suo Fei moved uncomfortably which brought Samael back to his senses. Then, the strange feeling disappeared. Samael thought that Suo Fei was uncomfortable so he folded his wings and placed Suo Fei on the ground. The jadeite green dragon was evidently startled when Suo Fei appeared. It seemed like he wanted to say something, but he didn’t speak it out. Suo Fei released Nael. When lil’ Nael saw Hull as soon as he flew out, he was so shocked that he forgot to flap his wings. Seeing that he was about to fall onto the ground, Suo Fei hurriedly caught him onto his palm. As he lay on Suo Fei’s palm, lil’ Nael raised his head to look at Hull. Tears streamed down like a waterfall. Fortunately, his size had been reduced. If not, the place would definitely be flooded. He not only cried terribly, he also cried extremely loudly. He was full of grievances so he didn’t say anything and just kept crying, as if he wanted to pour out all the grievances in his heart. The dragon’s body had become much smaller so his voice also became like that of a cub. So when he cried in such a manner, Suo Fei felt exceedingly distressed. He knew that Nael was very aggrieved. He had been trapped inside the treasury without anyone else ever since he was a child, waiting for Hull to come pick him up. As he didn’t have any contact with others, he was still as simple as a child. As soon as he saw his brother, he started crying furiously. Suo Fei patted his head and softly comforted him. After seeing the tiny dragon, Hull was somewhat surprised but extremely happy. Seeing the dragon cry in this manner, his voice choked with emotion as he spoke with remorse, “Nael, I’m sorry.” He wanted to pet Nael but unfortunately, his body couldn’t move an inch. So, he could only look at Nael and awkwardly coax him. Nevertheless, his feelings were sincere. Suo Fei felt touched and the strange mood he had towards Hull also subsided by a great deal. He brought Nael close to Hull and let the two brothers who had been separated for a long time show affections to one another. When lil’ Nael had finished venting out his grievances, he lied on the bridge of the green dragon’s nose and whiningly said, “Brother, come with us. Let’s go home.” Everyone became silent because of this sentence. Hull spoke with some discomfort, “Brother can’t leave now. Nael, follow...;” He paused and shot a glance at Samael but didn’t say anything. Samael didn’t respond. Suo Fei thought about it and eventually stepped forward and said to Hull, “Hello, I’m Sofey.” Hull looked at Suo Fei with indifference. Suo Fei was unsure if it was his illusion but he felt that Hull seemed hostile towards him. They were meeting for the first time so it stood to reason that he shouldn’t have offended him, right? At this time, Nael also came over and told Hull, “Brother, the elf is a good person. He treats me well.” Because of Nael’s words, Hull replied to Suo Fei, “Elf, hello. I’m a jadeite green dragon, Hull.” He spoke in a low voice that had a trace of alienation but Suo Fei suppressed the discomfort in his heart. He came here to request for something, not to play. Moreover, even if he didn’t have a request, he still had to save Hull for Nael’s sake. After all, when he was in the Demon Realm, he wouldn’t have been able to escape unscathed so effortlessly if Nael didn’t attack the Demon Tower. “I brought the Transmogrifier so I can rescue you.” Suo Fei got right to the point. Upon hearing this, Hull’s cold and indifferent attitude towards Suo Fei lessened. He stared hard at Suo Fei, as if he was re-evaluating him with some doubt in his eyes. After a while, he asked, “You’re a pureblood Elf?” It was a question but his tone had certainty. Suo Fei answered, “Yes.” Hull continued staring at him, “You must be an adult.” Suo Fei frowned, uncertain of what Hull was trying to imply. He could only nod and reply, “Yes.” “You’ve held your rite of passage so why don’t you know that we’re mortal enemies?” Sophie was stunned. What did he say?How could I not know of this?Oh, but it’s true that I haven’t had my rite of passage ceremony. After thinking about it, he felt that he had nothing to hide about this matter so Suo Fei directly said, “You may not know this but on my rite of passage, my father betrayed the Elves and cut down the god-bestowed Holy Tree. Naturally, I couldn’t go through my rite of passage.” After a pause, Suo Fei continued, “This matter isn’t a secret in Yalance. Nearly everyone knows of it.” This covertly ensured that he wasn’t lying. “What’s your surname?” Suo Fei answered, “Evans.” “Your father is Grantlyn Evans?” Suo Fei nodded and said, “Yes.” Hull’s eyes narrowed and he didn’t continue the topic. Instead, he asked Suo Fei, “We don’t know each other so you’re saving me under what condition?” Seeing Hull’s bluntness, Suo Fei didn’t cover up the truth but said, “I want to use the resurrection artifact.” Suo Fei also wanted to say that he would save him even if Hull didn’t give him the resurrection artifact since he was saving him because of Nael but chose not to say it out after thinking about it. It would only sound too pretentious if he did. Hearing this, Hull didn’t seem to be surprised. He stared straight at Suo Fei and asked, “Who is it that you want to ressurect?” Suo Fei replied, “My mother, Vixanne Cindy.” “There’s not much energy left in the resurrection artifact and it could only be used on one person. I can give it to you.” He didn’t expect Hull to be so forthright. Suo Fei was overjoyed at the unexpected good news and hurriedly said, “Thank you!” Hull didn’t say anything else. Suo Fei happily took out the Transmogrifier and began activating it. Samael stood aside during the whole exchange. Compared to his friendliness towards Nael, he seemed to be more indifferent towards Hull. Suo Fei didn’t notice this. He was focused on activating the Transmogrifier. It took longer than the time it took for Nael. After an hour, it was fully activated and white light enveloped the jadeite green dragon. When the dazzling light faded, a figure jumped out and landed in front of Suo Fei. Suo Fei inwardly thought that Hull’s appearance wasn’t that outstanding, but it was elegant and delicate. The man in front of him...; was completely different from his initial impression of Hull. However, Suo Fei felt a strong feeling of familiarity with his current appearance. The man before his eyes wore light green clothing. It was simple but it couldn’t conceal the magnificence of his body. This was an extremely beautiful man. He had long, slightly curly, emerald green hair that draped over his shoulders. His eyes and brows were slightly raised. Even without any expression, his appearance gave an inexplicable itching in other peoples’ hearts. What shocked Suo Fei the most was that he bore a striking resemblance to someone. The Seer of the Sylphs, Emia that cheating scum. Apart from having a different hair colour and their faces giving a different impression, their facial features were nearly identical. No...; they were slightly different. Emia’s looks could already be considered as first-class in the Sylph race. His beauty was already outstanding in the whole of Yalance. However, Hull seemed to be several times more beautiful than he was. His cold and indifferent expression combined with his world-shaking appearance was just right. But, why does Hull look so similar to Emia?One is a dragon while the other is a sylph. What do they have to do with each other? Also, why is Hull’s appearance vastly different from what I’d seen in the game? What the hell is going on? Suo Fei stared at Hull with a surprised expression as he pondered. It was impossible for Hull not to discover it. With a slight frown, Hull asked, “What’s the matter?” Suo Fei didn’t know whether he should say it or not so he unconsciously looked at Samael. Samael nodded at him so Suo Fei proceeded to ask, “Do you know Emia?” “Emia? No.” From Hull’s expression, it didn’t seem like he was lying. It appeared like this was the first time that he heard the name. He didn’t know Emia? Could it be that the two didn’t have any relation with each other?But why do they resemble each other? One was a dragon, the other was a sylph. They were two different races, so they couldn’t be twins. On the contrary, Hull’s biological younger brother Nael, although his body had become smaller, was a dragon. Suo Fei couldn’t help but continue saying, “You look like him, but he’s a Sylph.” “Oh...;” Hull seemed to think of something at this time, “Is he the Seer of the Sylphs?” Huh...;? He doesn’t know Emia but he knows the Seer of the Sylphs?What kind of logic is that? Hull explained, “The Seer of the Sylphs is my diplomatic envoy. His previous reincarnations looked exactly like me. But their names would be different.” “Diplomatic envoy?” Suo Fei felt even more confused. <i>How could the Dragons’ envoy be a sylph?</i>  Instead of directly answering Suo Fei’s question, Hull glanced at Samael but immediately retracted his gaze. He turned his gaze to Suo Fei and asked, “Emia...; didn’t say anything to you?” “Uh...; No.” Suo Fei racked his brains thinking about it. Emia had said a lot to them but he didn’t seem to have mentioned Hull at all. Wait...; Suo Fei suddenly recalled something. Emia seemed to have known Samael for a long time. Suo Fei wondered at that time why Emia was acting so familiar with Samael. Also...; Emia always addressed Samael as Launay. Hull also addressed Samael this way. Instead of calling him by his first name, they called him by his surname. The more he thought about it, the clearer Suo Fei felt that his brain cells weren’t enough to comprehend this matter. Hull obviously didn’t want to share any more information. Suo Fei mulled it over and felt that this matter shouldn’t have much of an effect on him so he didn’t feel like asking for an explanation. Curiosity kills the cat. It would be better if he asked less. Getting the resurrection artifact in his hand was a more pressing matter. Without waiting for Suo Fei to raise it, Hull told him, “Come with me. I’ll take you to where the resurrection artifact is.” After saying this, he unfolded his wings. Suo Fei wasn’t surprised. In the game, Hull also had huge wings that belonged to the Dragon race after he turned into his human form. Hull held Nael and led them flying towards the bottomless abyss. Suo Fei was still distracted when Samael carried him in his arms and spread his wings to follow Hull. The resurrection artifact turned out to be in the bottomless abyss?Was it originally here or did Hull accidentally drop it inside? Also, why was Hull trapped in this place? Suo Fei had a lot of questions in his mind but he wasn’t familiar with Hull and Hull’s attitude towards him had always been lukewarm. Thus, he didn’t ask. Nevertheless, he wasn’t the only one who was incessantly curious. Nael also was. He asked Hull, “Brother, what is this place? How did you get stuck in here?” Hull didn’t speak. Just when Suo Fei thought that Hull wouldn’t answer, he said, “Nael, remember. This is the Dragons’ tomb.” “Dragons’ tomb?” It was obvious that Nael didn’t know the word so Hull explained it, “It is the final resting place for us Dragons.” “Ah...;” Nael seemed to understand this so he fretfully asked, “Why is brother here?” His concern was easy to see. He thought that Hull was going to die thus he was in this place. Hull dropped a kiss on his little forehead before he continued, “I just wanted to confirm something. Afterwards, I got schemed by others and was ambushed. Then I ended up being trapped in this place.” Nael became even more fretful. Although he was fretful, his voice was resolute, “Brother, who dared to bully you?! Nael will beat him up!” Hull smiled faintly and responded, “Mn, I believe in Nael’s ability.” Nael became happy because of this praise, making it hard for him to think clearly. Thus, the topic ended this way. They flew down for a long time. Nael stopped asking questions. Hull deliberately spoke to Suo Fei and only threw seemingly inadvertent glances at Samael from time to time. “Elf, you’re really lucky. You’ve seen it, throughout Yalance, there’s only us two brothers left.” Suo Fei didn’t know what to say he merely grunted in agreement. Hull continued, “Do you know why there’s a Dragons’ tomb? Although there were only a few of us Dragons, the Dragons’ lifespans were almost as long as demigods. Thus, it would be difficult for us to die. This final resting place...;. had been given to us by you.” He paused at this point. His voice was calm but Suo Fei could see the hatred in his eyes that couldn’t be concealed, “You’re weak but numerous. You’re not united but could cooperate if it benefited you. There were a lot of misgivings and wars that arose between you, but you can confront the enemy together when faced with treasures and riches. You could unreasonably massacre people and bring a glorious race to the verge of extinction!” He uttered the last sentence with grave seriousness. After that, the scene before their eyes became an open space. Suo Fei’s heart thumped violently upon the sight that greeted him. How could this place be called a tomb? It was obviously a sea of treasure. There were sparkling jewelries everywhere as well as countless silk fabrics and golden armour. All these priceless things had been thrown like its garbage in this place. They were riches that could clearly make a person go crazy, but when it fell in Suo Fei’s eyes, he somehow had the feeling that it was a garbage dump. Why didn’t this tomb have any dead bodies, but these things? Hull saw Suo Fei’s reaction. His eyes narrowed slightly as his mouth rose into an indecipherable faint smile. He stared at Suo Fei and Samael looked at him. His purple eyes betrayed not a trace of emotion, but he was on the alert, constantly vigilant of something. Hull keenly sensed his gaze so he turned to look at Samael. Warmth and gentleness could be seen beneath the indifference in his eyes that were as beautiful as jadeite. The gentleness was very faint, but it was definitely not a gaze that someone would have when looking at a stranger. Samael turned away and Hull calmly stared at him for a while before looking away. He then said to Suo Fei, “Are you wondering why there aren’t any dead bodies in this tomb?” Suo Fei nodded. Hull smiled. His smile was filled with sorrow that couldn’t be explained in words, “Every part of a dragon’s body is a treasure. How could you possibly let them go? It is simply a supreme treasure that is thousands of times more valuable than these things in front of you.” “You draped your bodies with dragon skin and turned dragon bones into a sharp blade. Equipped with these two things, you continued slaughtering the dragons.” “How could there be a body left in this Dragons’ tomb?” Suo Fei didn’t utter a word and Hull also didn’t continue speaking. He stooped down and picked up a dark blue object from the pile of treasures. It was an oval, palm-sized gem that was a beautiful shade of dark blue. It didn’t seem like a lifeless object, but a liquid seemed to be slowly revolving inside it. Hull handed the gem to Suo Fei and said, “Since I’ve given it to you, we don’t owe each other anymore.” This is the resurrection artifact. As soon as Suo Fei held it, a gentle coolness spread through the palm of his hand which felt extremely wonderful. It felt so wonderful that he didn’t want to give it to Samael. Ever since his interspatial bag had been snatched away by someone, he no longer kept their stuff and handed it all to Samael. It was evident that between the two of them, Samael had greater fighting strength. Although they already had the resurrection artifact, the place they were currently in was clearly not a good place to resurrect Vixanne. The first place that came into his mind was the Dwarven Territory, but he dismissed the idea. There were too many residents in the Dwarven Territory so it wouldn’t be suitable. Hull suggested, “Go back to the Dragon Valley. You probably can’t use the resurrection artifact so I can help you.” This...; Suo Fei looked at Hull and then threw a questioning glance at Samael. This time, Samael who had never spoken a word looked back at Suo Fei and softly said, “Go to the Dragon Valley.” Even though he only said these five words, Suo Fei heard his unspoken words, ‘You have me. Don’t worry.’ Thus, the group of people left the bottomless abyss and returned to the Dragon Valley together. At the same time, there were also unexpected guests waiting at the Dragon Valley. One of them was a man who had a tall stature. His body was fully wrapped by a black robe and not even a single strand of hair could be seen. The person behind him, however, revealed his identity. It was an extremely beautiful blue-haired sylph. The sylph didn’t reveal any expression as he followed closely behind the black-robed man. The black-robed man looked at Dragon Valley’s scenery and wryly said, “Summer, we’ve been gone for a long time.” The sylph called Summer responded in a low voice, “Yes, master.” The black-robed man took a few steps forward. Although his appearance could not be seen, one could tell that he’s in a cheerful mood, “Come, let’s go and see our old friends.” The night was falling when they returned to the Dragon Valley, but this didn’t hinder Suo Fei’s eager desire to resurrect Vixanne back to life. As soon as they reached the ground, Suo Fei was already eager to use the artifact. Hull looked at the sky and persuaded, “The resurrection artifact doesn’t have much energy left. If it doesn’t work this time, there wouldn’t be another opportunity. It’s best if we prepare well. Have a good rest tonight and do it tomorrow.” Listening to Hull say this, Suo Fei was anxious beyond comparison. Crap, there’s still a success rate and failure rate?Don’t be so delusive! However, he didn’t dare to say much as his fear of offending Hull was increasing by the minute. Since Hull told him to have a good rest, Suo Fei didn’t voice out any objections. Lil’ Nael’s tummy grumbled and he whispered, “Hungry.” Hull wanted to prepare a meal for Nael. Suo Fei thought that he should help Hull, especially since Hull had been trapped inside the abyss for such a long time. He had consumed too much physical strength. To let him cook was rather too inhumane. And Samael...; This ultimate gong-daren might be skilled at a lot of things, but when it came to cooking, he’s truly helpless. When they were in the Bois Canyon, Suo Fei had killed ferocious beasts with all his might in order to improve his power. As a result, he exhausted all his strength and couldn’t move an inch. It just so happened that there wasn’t any food available. At that time, Samael still had an expressionless face, but he knew that it was a golden opportunity to show off his talents so he appeased Suo Fei to have a rest and he went to prepare a meal. Samael asked him what he wanted to eat. At that time, they just happened to have caught a gigantic whale so Suo Fei suggested that they eat fish. The little cub madly nodded in agreement, expressing that he couldn’t swallow raw food at that time and wanted to eat cooked food. Thus, Samael busily prepared the food for them. At that time, Suo Fei was moved. He thought, Look, our ultimate gong-daren is so excellent and so outstanding. He can ward off enemies and is also a good cook. Suo Fei somewhat felt inferior. Not long after that, Suo Fei discovered that he wasn’t a good cook at all! He was simply good at lighting up fires! Suo Fei was dazedly woken up by a soaring blaze. Before he could even react, Samael had already carried him and swiftly escaped the place. After escaping, Suo Fei looked at the forest fire from a distance and then looked at the little cub who was covered in dirt and the ultimate gong-daren who still had a graceful bearing but was evading his gaze. Suo Fei was rendered speechless. Since then, Suo Fei had to take on the heavy responsibility of cooking by himself. Cough...; Nobody is perfect. Having a shortcoming is endearing, isn’t it? I’ll leave it up to your imagination how Suo Fei managed to hide in a corner to secretly laugh at Samael. Thus, at this very moment, Suo Fei took the initiative to stop Hull and hurried to the kitchen with the fireball fatty. It didn’t take him long to cook a soup and three dishes. Considering Hull’s condition, he only prepared light food. The little cub was dissatisfied because of this. Hence, Suo Fei had no choice but to roast a wild boar especially for him. While Suo Fei was bustling about, Samael looked through a book in the living room. This was a habit that he had formed while in the Bois Canyon. One time, when Suo Fei was cooking, Samael asked if he could look through the books in his interspatial bag. Suo Fei naturally didn’t refuse. He had a large number of books in his interspatial bag, all left by Vixanne. Suo Fei previously thought that they were rare spellbooks so he flipped through them with interest. It was true that there were a lot of rare spellbooks, but unfortunately, Suo Fei looked through them for nothing. There was not one that he could practice. If he put up these books for auction in Benesse City, he might be able to exchange it for a large number of gold coins. However, these things had been given to him by Vixanne so he didn’t want to sell them. Besides, he wasn’t so poor that he’d need to go to that extent. Thus, if Samael wanted to read them, he was simply willing to let him read. If Samael could practice them, their fighting strength would increase by leaps and bounds, which was a good thing. Thus, when Suo Fei carried out the food (the roasted wild boar had already been swallowed whole by the little cub), what he saw was Samael sitting on a chair by the window, flipping over a thin book. His slender fingers were on the paper that had yellowed with age and he had a relaxed expression. As night was falling, he was enshrouded with golden sunlight, making the scene seem more serene. Suo Fei felt warm inside. He shifted his gaze and saw Hull at the other end of the room in the shadows. He was resting with his eyes closed as he leaned against a spacious wooden chair. His body seemed thin and weak. As he wasn’t as tense as before, his beautiful face was somewhat wan and sallow. It hadn’t been obvious, but now Suo Fei thought that he must be extremely exhausted and tired. Lil’ Nael lay sprawled across his lap, already asleep and snoring. When Suo Fei came out, Samael looked up and threw a faint smile at him. Suo Fei winked at him and placed the food on the table. Hull had not fallen asleep. When he heard the movement, he opened his eyes a little and saw the intimate interaction between Samael and Suo Fei. He stared blankly and then closed his eyes again. His body’s exhaustion seemed to have amplified. During the two years they had spent in Bois Canyon, it was needless to say that Suo Fei’s cooking skills had improved by a lot. His reference material was Yalance’s specialties. It seemed delicious just by looking at its yellow-green appearance. Upon tasting it, Hull flashed a rare smile and said to Suo Fei, “Tastes delicious.” Although Suo Fei always felt that Hull was aloof and unapproachable, at this moment he felt that Hull wasn’t that bad. Anyone who had been praised would be in a good mood, not to mention that he would be able to resurrect Vixanne tomorrow and fulfill his much-awaited wish. Thus, Suo Fei was in the state that he would feel happy at looking at anyone. After finishing the dinner, Hull said, “I’ll bring Nael to our old home to rest. We’ll come here early in the morning tomorrow.” Suo Fei agreed and Hull left. After leaving the house, Hull carried Nael and flew. Not long after, they reached an extremely tall wooden house. The house had been carved from a huge tree. It looked very impressive from afar, but looking at it closely, one would discover that the carvings were extremely meticulous, especially the relief sculptures that were simply vivid and lifelike. Hull quietly looked at it for a while before entering the house. He went up to the second floor and put down the sleeping Nael. Then, he went to the second room on the right. He had yet to open the door when he abruptly stopped. A deep and low sound came from inside the room, “Hull, you’ve returned.” This voice was too familiar. Hull narrowed his eyes and stood in silence for a moment before he pushed the door open. A man was sitting on the sofa at the center of the room. The hood of his black robes was pulled away, revealing the long, straight golden hair that hung right down to his waist. His skin was fair and glowing while his face was extraordinarily handsome. The corners of his mouth were raised slightly and a smile could be seen in his golden eyes. Behind him, a blue-haired sylph stood quietly. He was extremely beautiful but not a hint of expression could be seen on his face and his blue eyes had always been blank. Hull looked at him and said, “Salvag Bran.” The blonde-haired man smilingly asked, “Why are you acting so unfamiliar? “Just call me Sal.” Hull furrowed his brows as his initially relaxed mood became tense. He didn’t respond nor did he refuse. He merely sat on the other edge of the sofa, leaning backward and closing his eyes. Sal didn’t get angry because of his dismissive behaviour. He spoke, “I’ve already told you before to stay in the treasury, but you refused to listen. You insisted on doing things your way. You didn’t know the situation outside at that time. Things had reached a dead end when Launay and his imperial guards disappeared but you still went out by yourself. Wasn’t that exactly what they wanted? To only be stuck in the bottomless abyss is already extremely fortunate.” Hull remained as silent as before. Sal continued, “I know that you were worried about him, but you can see that he’s still alive...; You should know that he can’t die...;” As he said this, Hull suddenly turned to look at Sal. His emerald green eyes were fuming with anger, “You didn’t see anything, so shut your mouth!” Sal’s eyes narrowed. A spurt of anger bubbled forth which he tried to suppress. He forced himself to remain calm as he said, “Hull, all of us have lived through it. There’s only us left in the once numerous Dragon race. I don’t want to be angry with you. I also don’t want to lose any more compatriots.” As he said this, Hull’s expression became gloomy. A course of excruciating exhaustion coursed through him. He closed his eyes and quietly said, “Sal, I want to rest.” Sal halted and he silently looked at Hull before he said in a deep voice, “You must wake him up!” Hull suddenly opened his eyes and unwaveringly stared at Sal. Sal didn’t cower back, “Hull, we need him!” “No, he’s already done enough.” Hull paused before continuing to say, “He’s good now, a lot better than I thought he would be, so that’s enough.” Sal sneered, “Good? How could he be good? He was born in the Demon Realm and was subjected to all kinds of bullying, humiliation and oppression. If someone else was subject to what he had experienced, they would have died hundreds and thousands of times. He escaped the Demon Realm and wandered to the Human territory where he was endlessly betrayed and incessantly abandoned. Could this still be called ‘good’?” Hull was stunned. He didn’t know of these things. Sal continued, “Do you really think that the elf is sincere towards him? Don’t make a joke. You still actually naively believed that intruder? They are greedy, self-indulgent and only do things that benefit them. Moreover, they have deep-rooted hostility towards us. Despite this, you actually thought that the elf really likes him? It’s nothing more than making use of him! Only a greater betrayal awaits him!” As he continued, Sal spoke softly, “Hull, he belongs to you. You’ve been with him for so long. As long as he remembers the truth, how could he still like that elf? Could it be that the thousand years’ worth of affection between you two can’t even compare to that intruder that he had known for only a couple of years?” These words were like sharp blades that pierced Hull straight in the heart. Griping pain assaulted his stomach as he barely suppressed the endless memories and yearning to see him. But...; Hull closed his eyes as the scene of Samael interacting with the elf resurfaced in his mind. His facial expression, the expression in his eyes, those were things that Hull had never seen before. He had always believed that Samael was unsentimental. Thus, even though his hints had always been met with disregard, Hull optimistically believed that he was already special in Samael’s heart, so he didn’t pursue him aggressively. But now...; He saw a different kind of Launay, a completely different kind of him. He discovered how much he had deceived himself back then. Emotions that were hard to put into words surged into his heart. Hull felt weak all over. He covered his eyes as he indistinctly spoke with difficulty, “Sal, he’s in love with that elf.” When he said this, he struggled to hold back his tears but was unable to stop the rim of his eyes from reddening. It was as if a sharp sword pierced his heart, puncturing all his self-consolation and was left powerless to face the reality that was revealed before him. He clearly realised that the affections between them that he had silently protected for thousands of years and which had already penetrated deep into his marrows were nothing but his wishful thinking. A trace of impatience flashed in Sal’s eyes but it wasn’t revealed in his tone as he softly said, “Hull, you should think clearly. So what if he’s in love with that elf? That elf doesn’t deserve his feelings. You think that you’re helping him by letting him go, but in fact, you’re only harming him!” Sal paused for a while before he emphasised, “The nature of those intruders is something that you should know better than anyone. He only covets his power, his wealth, or perhaps...; his appearance. If something that’s more valuable to him shows up, he will abandon and betray him without the slightest hesitation. Think about it. If Samael’s really betrayed after investing his feelings, how much pain would he be in? Isn’t it easy to see?” Sal spoke a lot. Hull listened intently and he recalled Suo Fei’s appearance. He pondered about it carefully and suddenly thought of a matter. He turned to Sal and asked, “How could you know that he was born in the Demon Realm, that he wandered to the Human territory and that he had a bitter experience?” Sal was somewhat stunned. He didn’t expect that Hull could still think so clearly in this situation. Hull stared at him and asked, “Since you knew where he was, why did you let him go through these sufferings? Even if you couldn’t make him remember, you could still stop these things from happening! But you only watched on coldly! Sal, what do you mean by this?” Being exposed in such a straightforward manner, Sal who was initially leaning backward became more indolent and wilful, “You should know why.” Hull’s face became more freezing. Sal coldly snorted and penetrating hostility could be seen in his golden eyes, “It’s true that I didn’t give him unnecessary care. The intruders can’t be forgiven for what they had done. I knew that Launay had been reborn, but I can’t make him remember the past, so I at least wanted him to remember his hatred! He must hate them, he has to!” Hull retorted, “So you just looked on coldly? You watched him suffer desolation, bullying and betrayals? Sal, did you forget how you managed to survive?” “I remember everything! But I couldn’t find you! I thought you were dead! If you were dead, no one could make him remember. I couldn’t let him forget our hatred, and I believe that if he woke up, he will definitely understand me.” Sal replied. Hull stared at him for a long time before he turned his eyes away and said, “I’m not going to awaken him. He doesn’t have to bear this burden. He’s suffered enough.” Sal suddenly stood up, “Hull, don’t let me force you!” Hull recalled the little details of their journey as well as the Launay who leisurely flipped a book as the setting sunlight fell on him. He recalled the simple dinner and the affections between the two that he had accidentally witnessed. Lastly, he recalled Samael’s expression as he looked at the elf. He knew him too well, thus it was clear for him to see. This made his stomach churn in knots. At the same time, he felt it more clearly than anyone else could. Hull’s eyes drooped and his voice was low but resolute, “He’s good now, that’s enough.” He had just spoken when Sal moved forward and grabbed Hull’s neck with one hand. A hint of ruthlessness flashed through his eyes, “You coward!” Hull stared on calmly. He didn’t resist nor did he respond. He wasn’t Sal’s opponent in his best state, let alone now that he’s weak. Moreover, he couldn’t attack Sal...; It was his clansman...; Sal fixed his gaze at Hull and sternly spoke, “Do you really think that I can’t awaken him without your acquiescence?” Hull was stunned and felt it unbelievable. “Hull, you know that I’m not going to kill you, but since you won’t acquiesce, you’ll inevitably suffer a bit.” Sal glanced back to his left and called out in a low voice, “Summer!” “Yes, master.” Summer immediately approached and held Hull. Surprise could still be seen in Hull’s eyes when he felt a force that he couldn’t reject invading his body. Not long after, Hull disappeared without a trace. The ruthlessness in Sal’s eyes faded. He sighed and closed his eyes. When he opened his eyes again, he already had jadeite green hair and emerald eyes. His appearance actually changed into Hull’s appearance. During dinner, Suo Fei had eaten until he was rather full. Thus when he returned to his room, he lay on the bed for quite a while but was still unable to sleep. The little cub never had this worry as it could eat with relish and sleep with satisfaction right after. Hence, it was already sleeping soundly in its room. Suo Fei walked back and forth several times inside the room but was still uncomfortable so Samael closed the book he was reading and suggested, “Let’s go out and take a walk.” Suo Fei was already thinking of this. As such, he gladly went out with Samael. He had only been in the Dragon Valley for two days. He had not had the chance to take a walk and had merely looked at it from afar. The houses in the Dragon Valley were mostly treehouses. They were extremely tall and had no stairs. In fact, Suo Fei found it incomprehensible. The Dragons were enormous. Although the treehouses were extremely huge, it was impossible for a dragon to sleep inside it. This was truly strange. Moreover, in Yalance’s setting, the Dragons were the only race that found it difficult turning into their human form. Their power was so great that it was hard to compress all of their power into a tiny human body. As such, they would have to spend a lot of their power to control their strength. Based on this principle, it wasn’t impossible for them to turn into their human form. It was just too troublesome and difficult to accomplish. For this reason, the dragons who could turn into their human form were the most distinguished in their race. Not only did they have formidable strength, they were also very adept at controlling their power. The power of the dragons who were in their human form was compressed so they were able to launch more powerful attacks. Nael couldn’t turn himself into his human form but Hull could. It was just that he got into an exceptionally intense fight when he was trapped in the bottomless abyss, so he could no longer control his power and he turned into his dragon form. He was unable to recover after thousands of years so his determination waned and he was unable to break free. Suo Fei didn’t know of this so he was puzzled about the treehouses. As they walked across the Dragon Valley, Suo Fei felt a sense of familiarity with Earth. In Suo Fei’s knowledge, Yalance was a completely different world. The territories of all races had a different style and there was not one similarity between them which was quite bizarre. There was no doubt that they were living on a large continent. It wasn’t strange that each territory was different, but there were too many differences. It was truly somewhat strange. Suo Fei didn’t think much of it before but he couldn’t help but think about it now. He recalled the conversation he had with Grantlyn and Linde in the Demon Realm. Suo Fei thought about it and decided to tell Samael what Grantlyn had said. “Each race is deteriorating. A lot had completely lost their abilities. Not only that, but the Celestials lost their ability to produce, the Elves’ lifespan had been reduced. In addition, Demons’ rationality, the Humans’ faith and the Beastkins’ intelligence had all been taken away. Grantlyn claimed that ‘Yalance’ was devouring them and that all races would eventually die.” Suo Fei related Grantlyn and Linde’s remarks from what he could remember. Samael listened quietly. Afterwards he said, “Not all races.” Suo Fei looked at Samael in confusion and Samael said, “They didn’t mention the Dragons, the Sylphs and the Dwarves.” Suo Fei was stunned. His logical thinking skills weren’t great, but he had a very good memory. If he didn’t, he wouldn’t have been able to learn the game’s numerous plotlines by heart. Thus, he was certain that he could remember everything that Grantlyn and Linde had told him without leaving out anything by mistake. As such, it must be true that they had not mentioned these three races. It wasn’t strange that they didn’t mention the Dragons. After all, the Dragons had nearly gone extinct. In comparison, the Sylphs shunned other races. They didn’t have much contact with other races. The same could be said for the Dwarves. It was in their nature to reject other races. Although they wouldn’t go so far as to be completely isolated from other races, they would never take the initiative to get in touch with the other races. But what does this have to do with this matter? “I saw a memory in Salvag’s treasury,” Samael quietly said. Suo Fei looked at Samael and remembered the memory that he saw. At the end of that memory, he was pierced straight through the chest by the Asura Blade. Even now, Suo Fei still felt some fear when he recalled it. He hurriedly threw this terrible feeling aside and asked Samael, “What memory? I remember you telling me that it wasn’t real. It’s not your real memory?” Samael nodded and said, “I certainly haven’t experienced them.” “It was an extremely beautiful memory in the beginning...;” Samael’s lips pursed into a self-deriding smile. He didn’t go into detail but Suo Fei’s heart thumped. He knew Samael’s past. From beginning to the end, it couldn’t be related to the word ‘beautiful’. Samael continued, “A married couple who loved each other had a son and the couple was extremely happy. They treated this son as their treasure.” He paused for a while before continuing, “ After that, they had a second child, it was a girl. The third child was a boy. The home that had three children, was somewhat...; too lively, but very...;” As he said this, Samael paused and frowned slightly. He seemed unable to describe the scene. Suo Fei looked at him and felt a pain that couldn’t be described in his heart. He held Samael’s hand and supplied, “Happy?” Samael was startled. He gripped Suo Fei’s hand and nodded, “Yes, it’s very...; happy.” “After that, the children grew up. The pace of the memory started speeding up. I wasn’t able to see it clearly anymore. But, there were some places that I noticed. The scenery in that memory was the Dragon Valley and the first child greatly resembled me. I could feel that it was me, but I definitely hadn’t experienced those memories.” As he reached this point, he paused and then said, “I haven’t experienced that kind of indescribable familiarity.” Suo Fei’s brows furrowed. He didn’t know the truth of the matter but he was certain that these memories shouldn’t belong to Samael who had never seen his parents and who had been born in the Demon Realm. He should have never set foot in the Dragon Valley. When he said this, Samael didn’t wait for Suo Fei’s response but merely continued, “Initially, I threw these false memories to the back of my mind, but it resurfaced when I heard what you said.” He looked at Suo Fei and slowly said, “The first thing that left a distinct impression in my mind was that in that world, there were only Dragons and Sylphs.” The Dragons and the Sylphs were races that hadn’t been mentioned by Grantlyn, but what about the Dwarves? Suo Fei voiced his doubts and Samael supplemented, “The Dwarves is a sub-race of the Sylphs.” It turned out to be like this. At that time, he heard Grantlyn and others say, implicitly and explicitly, that their races were being persecuted and being devoured. Their voices were filled with loathing towards Yalance. What they’ve said was very one-sided. They blindly emphasised their grievances but didn’t mention the cause of their suffering. At that time, the situation was too chaotic so Suo Fei was unable to respond quickly since he had just received too much information. Now, after discussing it with Samael, he heard the other side of the story. Coupled with his conversation with Hull, Suo Fei had a vague idea of what actually happened. Every action has consequences. Grantlyn and his group were dreadful of Yalance’s power and were scared that they would disappear, but they didn’t want to seek the root of the matter. They vehemently wanted to leave this place...; Wait, how can they leave this place?Where would they go once they leave this place? Samael said, “It’s true that they want to leave. They want to return to their true home.” Suo Fei understood in an instant. Grantlyn had clearly told him, ‘Fey, we don’t belong here. I only want to return to our homeland.’ At that time, he only thought that he was speaking in metaphors. Now, however, it seemed that he meant it literally. Grantlyn and his group knew much more than Suo Fei had imagined, and their objective was extremely clear. “But how are they planning to leave?” Samael looked at him and guided his train of thoughts, “Think from the beginning. What did Grantlyn do?” “He cut down the Elves’ Holy Tree.” “And what is that?” “The glory that God had bestowed to the Elves.” “And...; who is this God?” Suo Fei’s somewhat muddled brain was suddenly enlightened, “God...; is Yalance! It was Yalance who bestowed the Holy Tree to the Elves! The Holy Tree was the artifact of the Elves!” Everything became clear in an instant. Suo Fei knew Yalance’s settings. Each race had their own unique artifact. They weren’t weapons but instead were items that had been bestowed by God. Some artifacts had functions while others didn’t. Suo Fei remembered that when they were in Benesse City, Grantlyn spared no effort to obtain the artifact of the Humans. Then, he thought of the artifacts of the Trolls, the ‘Transmogrifier’ and the ‘Shadow Shifter’. They really had an objective. “Their objective is to collect the artifacts of all the races?” “No,” Samael had a different opinion, “Their ultimate goal is to destroy everything that had been bestowed by God.” That was true. First, they destroyed the Holy Tree. They had not destroyed the artifacts in their hand maybe because those artifacts still had other uses or perhaps the right opportunity to destroy hadn’t arrived. Nevertheless, their ultimate goal must be to destroy all of them. If not, they wouldn’t have destroyed the Elves’ artifact at the beginning. “But why destroy them?” As soon as he asked, Suo Fei thought of the answer. What happened to the Elves when their Holy Tree was cut down? Half of Valinor fell into the abyss. If the other Holy Tree was also destroyed, the whole Valinor would disappear. The artifacts are the pillars of Yalance. Destroying these artifacts...; was just like chopping off Yalance’s arms. If Yalance didn’t have enough power to entrap them, they would be able to leave this place. But...; it would come with devastating consequences! Moreover, how many people could leave in the end? What about those people who had already lost their power and couldn’t leave? Would they disappear together with Yalance? In an instant, Suo Fei felt a chill run down his back. “Are they mad?” Suo Fei couldn’t understand their behaviour. Must they be so outrageous? Samael narrowed his eyes and quietly spoke, “They have guilty consciences. They are afraid...;” His voice was so low that Suo Fei couldn’t hear it clearly. He was just about to ask him when Samael suddenly looked at Suo Fei, held his hand and said, “How are you feeling? Much better? Should we go back and rest?” Suo Fei wanted to ask more questions but he clearly saw that Samael didn’t want to continue the topic. After thinking about it, Suo Fei chose not to ask him further. The two had unconsciously walked for an hour. The sky was already dark and the leaves of some trees in the surroundings were surprisingly fluorescent. They twinkled with all kinds of radiance, like stars falling into the earth. It was extremely beautiful. The two didn’t return using the previous route. Samael unfolded his wings and Suo Fei understood. His eyes curved into a smile and he willingly hugged Samael. His position truly couldn’t be described as good-looking. He was like a koala bear. Samael hooked his arm around his waist and changed his position. Suo Fei was somewhat dissatisfied. Princess carry is not better than a koala bear hug, okay? However, before he could even complain, Samael already flew to the horizon. The sudden feeling of weightlessness made Suo Fei feel dazed, but his eyes widened at the beautiful scene that greeted his eyes. Looking from up above, the night scenery of the Dragon Valley came into view. The fluorescent leaves swayed lightly, rippling slightly like an ocean of stars. It could easily relax someone’s soul. Suo Fei stared at it in a daze. He suddenly raised his head slightly and happened to meet Samael’s gaze. Under the glow of the vast expanse of fluorescence below, Samael’s appearance had a gentleness that he didn’t usually have. His pair of eyes had deep affection that was not the least bit concealed. Suo Fei silently stared back at him. This feeling that the other person only had him in his eyes was extremely heartwarming. He grinned and leaned closer to kiss Samael. Then, he foolishly said, “Samael, you’re so good-looking. You’re the most good-looking person I’ve ever seen. No matter how much I look, I can’t look enough...;” He had yet to finish speaking when his mouth was blocked. Suo Fei’s eyes squinted and he climbed onto Samael, enjoying the kiss that turned his mind into mush. *** Inside a treehouse. Hull had disappeared and Salvag had turned into Hull’s appearance. He looked at the beautiful man who had jadeite green hair and emerald green eyes in the mirror and smiled faintly. His expression was flamboyant and wilful, which was an expression that wholly belonged to Sal. He frowned and said to the blue-haired man beside him, “Summer, adjust the expression.” “Yes, master.” After a while, Sal smiled again, but it was very different. It was a very soft smile. His jadeite eyes were gentle but there was a slight melancholy between his eyebrows. “There’s really nothing to be said about Hull’s face.” He was thinking out loud and wasn’t asking for a response. He tried on many more expressions in the mirror and found that he was able to copy him exactly. Then, he turned to the blue-haired man and asked, “How can I completely occupy his consciousness?” Summer answered calmly, “The host’s resistance is extremely strong. It would be difficult to occupy it within a short period of time. However, if you proceed without taking the host’s mentality into consideration, we could speed up the process.” This would cause great damage to Hull’s brain. Sal frowned and said “Nevermind. Slow down. I forbid you from causing any harm to Hull.” “Yes, master.” “How long would it take in this case?” “It should be done by tomorrow morning.” “Tomorrow morning?” Sal muttered to himself before saying, “Alright, the timing is just right.” “First, tell me about the memories that you’ve already obtained.” “Yes, master.” After a while, Sal narrowed his eyes, “Resurrection artifact? He wants to resurrect Vixanne Evans, Grantlyn’s wife? He’s really restless, huh.” He didn’t continue talking to Summer but took out a crystal ball from his interspatial bag instead. He stored a short piece of information in it, pasted a teleportation talisman on it and threw it out. He watched as the crystal ball disappeared into the night sky then his mouth hooked up into a smile, “I’ll wait for the good show.” When the crystal ball disappeared in the Dragon Valley, it appeared in the Demon Realm not long after. Grantlyn stretched out his hand to catch the crystal ball and the information within it was instantly transmitted to him. His eyes narrowed briefly then he headed towards the Demon Palace. Linde had just returned from the Beastkins’ territory. His negotiation with Harris had not gone smoothly. The King of the Beastkins was still very young but his IQ was extremely high. Moreover, others would be at a loss as to what to do because of his tactfulness. His obstinate nature was truly not a Beastkin’s trait. When Grantlyn showed up, Linde was talking to someone else. When he saw Grantlyn, he waved his hand and the person got up and left. There was no one else in the great hall so Linde asked, “What is it?” Grantlyn directly threw the crystal ball, “I’ve received news from Bran. He had found the whereabouts of the resurrection artifact and the Transmogrifier.” When Linde heard this, his eyes lit up as he asked, “Where is it?” Grantlyn answered, “Dragon Valley.” “Dragon Valley? Isn’t that place...;” “It had been unsealed.” “Your precious son is truly remarkable.” Grantlyn didn’t speak, but Linde smilingly continued, “Since the seal had been lifted, what else are we waiting for?” “Summon all troops! We must obtain both artifacts this time!” After having a good night’s sleep, Suo Fei woke up early the next day, but Hull had yet to come over. He anxiously wanted to pound on their door, but he didn’t dare. What should he do if he offended him by chance? He had already waited for a long time so such a short time wouldn’t make much difference. Suo Fei consoled himself in this manner. He would definitely resurrect Vixanne today no matter what! As he thought of this, he ran to the kitchen and prepared a sumptuous breakfast. Then, he waited for Hull to wake up. He had discovered Hull’s preferences yesterday, so he poured all his heart cooking breakfast. He roasted tender and crispy mushrooms and made a vegetable omelette. He also prepared warm and steaming berry sago dessert. The dishes looked utterly heartwarming and delightful. When he finished preparing, Hull finally arrived. Hull seemed to be much better after having a night’s rest, but was still a little tired. He had consumed too much so how could he completely recover from just a night’s sleep? Hull greeted Samael and Suo Fei. When he saw the breakfast, a faint smile crossed his face and he said to Suo Fei, “Thank you.” Suo Fei waved his hand. He waited for Hull to eat to his satisfaction so that they could begin resurrecting Vixanne. Hull didn’t say much and went straight to the point after having his meal. “Do you have a medium to resurrect Vixanne?” Suo Fei nodded and took the memory orb from Samael, “This memory orb is the last thing that she had left behind.” Hull looked at it and nodded as he said, “This is the best medium we could use.” Suo Fei had carefully kept this memory orb all this time. He didn’t pass it to Hull. Although he believed that Hull wanted to help him, he still wished to do the matter himself as he didn’t want any accident. “What else do I need to prepare?” Hull said, “That’s all. Come, give me the resurrection artifact.” Suo Fei refused and said, “Tell me the method and I will do it.” Hull’s eyes narrowed, “You don’t believe me? I already gave you the artifact so how could I still go back on my words?” Suo Fei was surprised that Hull would say such a thing. He frowned and was slightly uneasy. He couldn’t point out what exactly was making him feel uneasy, but in any case, he felt that something was wrong. Suo Fei believed in his intuition to a certain extent so he explained, “It doesn’t matter whether I believe you or not. You’ve told me that there isn’t much energy left in the resurrection artifact and that it could only be used once. Hence, I hope that I’ll be the one to do it while you instruct me. If it failed, I wouldn’t have any complaints.” “It’s precisely because it could only be used once that I want to help you. You’ve never used it before so can you be sure that you’ll use the correct technique? Moreover, you need to have enough power to use the resurrection artifact. The stronger the power, the greater the chance of success. So, it’d be better to let me do it.” Hull made sense. Although Suo Fei felt that something was wrong, he couldn’t figure out what was. Moreover, since Hull had given him the artifact, it wasn’t possible for him to go back on his words. If Hull was to do it, the chances of success would definitely be much greater. So why didn’t he want to give it to him? “Let me do it.” Samael, who had kept his silence all this while, suddenly spoke. The two turned to look at him at the same time. Samael continued, “If the chances of success would be greater the greater the power, then it’d be best for me to do it.” Suo Fei was instantly happy when he heard his suggestion. It was true, he was much more at ease if he let Samael do it. He believed in Samael, even more than he believed himself! It seemed like Hull wanted to say something but it was indeed what he had said. No matter what, Samael was the most suitable. It’d do him no good to say more. Also, he looked down at the time, it’s already not necessary to continue this argument. Suo Fei didn’t understand how the resurrection artifact worked. Such an unscientific matter was rather troublesome for a philosophical materialist like him to understand. Not understanding didn’t mean that he would not believe it. In fact, he himself had transmigrated into this bizarre world so what else could he not believe in? It was just that when Hull recounted how to operate the artifact to Samael, Suo Fei was bewildered when he listened in. After that, he thought that it’s fine as long as Samael could understand it so he listened less attentively. After a short while, Samael got the gist of how to use it so Suo Fei passed the memory orb to Samael and fixedly stared at him with all his attention. Samael placed the resurrection artifact and the memory orb together, closed his eyes and quietly chanted an incantation. Suo Fei saw that the liquid inside the resurrection artifact was slowly flowing out and covered the entire memory orb starting from the bottom. A white light slowly gathered in Samael’s palm which fell onto the memory orb. Suo Fei was near him so he could see that the white light and the liquid inside the artifact began intertwining with each other and merged inside the memory orb bit by bit. Suo Fei was slightly nervous. He wasn’t certain if what was happening was right or not. He could only hope that it was right and that it would be successful. When the white light and the liquid completely merged inside the memory orb, Samael’s eyes opened. Suo Fei anxiously asked, “How is it?” Samael smiled at him, “What do you think?” Suo Fei cheered. If the memory orb wasn’t in Samael’s hand, he would have directly thrown himself to hug him. “It went smoothly without any rejection. Now, you just need to wait. You should be able to see Vixanne again in around twenty-four hours.” Suo Fei heaved a sigh of relief and then became slightly worried. There were still twenty-four hours. He had to protect the memory orb well and not go anywhere! Samael was about to speak when he abruptly stopped. His eyes fiercely swept towards the window beside him. Suo Fei also looked over and didn’t see anything different. However, he was vaguely able to tell from Samael’s expression that something was wrong. So he asked, “What’s the matter?” Samael didn’t speak. He first looked at Hull before looking away. Hull choked back the sentence ‘Why don’t you go out and have a look?’ that was about to come out of his lips. He knew that Samael was suspicious of him at the moment. If he deliberately sent him away, he would definitely be exposed. Thus, he wisely chose to not speak. Samael approached Suo Fei and gently told him, “Don’t leave me.” Suo Fei nodded. He was already on guard. He looked at the memory orb he was holding and handed it to Samael, “Keep it inside the interspatial bag.” Something flashed in Hull’s eyes but he didn’t say a word, merely watching Samael keep the memory orb. After keeping the memory orb, Samael activated his Asura Blade and passed the Transmogrifier to Suo Fei. Suo Fei was fully on guard and dared not be careless. In nearly an instant, all the windows shattered simultaneously with a thunderous noise. Four agile S-tier assassins appeared and rushed towards them. They all used a strangling killer move and they moved extremely swiftly. Their movements were not the least bit restrained. It was only because Samael had perceived the danger beforehand that Suo Fei became vigilant and was prepared. If not, he would definitely be unable to dodge. Even if he could dodge it, his counterattack would be extremely weak for an S-tier assassin. Nevertheless, as long as he wasn’t killed by a single blow, that was enough. The Asura Blade was unsheathed. Sword Qi swept across the room and blood splattered all over the place. Three S-tier assassins wordlessly fell to the ground and died. The one who attacked Hull was also dead. Suo Fei was slightly out of sorts. It wasn’t the first time he had seen this kind of scene but he would still feel uncomfortable seeing a bloody death scene. However, he tried his best to adjust his mentality. In the earlier situation, the other party was already brimming with killing intent. A little bit of leniency would only bring them harm. Suo Fei knew this very well. The four S-tier assassins had been wiped out in an instant. Moreover, three of them had been killed by Samael with just one strike. Hull was surprised because of this and the gleam in his eyes that he strived to conceal became even brighter. He already had such strength even before his awakening. Once he awakened, these scums could all die today! In fact, even Suo Fei was surprised. He knew that Samael’s strength was greater than anyone else, but his strength today had more than doubled from the last time when they were inside the treasury. From what he had observed, his current strength was greater than his strength when he was already an adult in the game. After a brief silence, laughter sounded, “Children, we meet again.” As soon as the voice fell, the walls of the wooden house collapsed and their field of view broadened. Suo Fei was alarmed when he saw the scene in front of him. They had been surrounded. Surrounded in the most literal sense. They were surrounded from all directions. Not only were they surrounded on the ground, there were even troops in the vast horizon. They had come fully prepared. Suo Fei’s eyes narrowed as he glanced around. Everyone was cloaked in the damned black robes, but they weren’t as luxurious as Grantlyn. There weren’t any fur on their collars. No one concealed their faces. Suo Fei saw a lot of Demons, Elves, Celestials, Trolls, Humans and a few Beastkins. They had truly put great effort into this battle formation. If the formation in Salvag’s Treasury could be described as a platoon, it could be said that all the elite troops had been gathered at this moment. It could be seen how much importance they’ve attached to this battle. The person who spoke earlier was Linde, but Suo Fei didn’t see his figure at all. Suo Fei gloomily cursed in his heart, Coward, but he couldn’t do anything about it. In this state, even if Samael’s abilities had improved countless times, it wouldn’t be advantageous for them to fight head on. They must come up with a surprise attack. The simplest way to do this was to capture their leader first. If they could capture Linde, they would definitely ensure that they could escape. Unfortunately, since he could think of it, Linde must have also thought of it. In addition, Linde must be in his rational state. He simply didn’t want to personally participate in the battle and only appeared to act as the military advisor. He certainly wouldn’t let himself get caught. Suo Fei’s mind turned quickly when Linde’s voice rang out, “Samael, if you hand over the two artifacts and the precious elf, we will retreat and I promise you that we will never invade the Dragon Valley during my reign.” Now, they actually directly stated their intentions. It was rare for Linde to be so direct, but Suo Fei knew that even if they knew their intentions, it was useless. If they really needed the artifact, then they could threaten them with the artifact. However, their purpose was to destroy the artifact. If Suo Fei came out and said ‘If you don’t let us go, I will destroy the artifact’, he reckoned that Linde would only smile to his heart’s content. Thus, Linde dared to expose his intentions directly at this moment because he was completely confident, so much so that he surrounded Suo Fei and his group. Moreover, his words had several possible meanings. It only indicated that he would retreat and not invade the Dragon Valley. However, he didn’t promise that he would let Samael and the others go. Thus, he could still kill Samael without breaking his promise. Suo Fei was still mulling it over when Samael had already responded, “Linde, I’ve told you. I will kill you.” Samael did not deliberately raise or lower his voice. He merely declared it calmly, as if what he was saying was already a predetermined fact. This gave people an increasing sense of dread. After a momentary silence, Linde smiled, “Since you refuse to drink a toast and insist on drinking a forfeit, then I can’t do anything about it.” The battle was on the verge of breaking out. Samael had given him the Transmogrifier and Suo Fei knew what Samael wanted him to do. Thus, when he got the Transmogrifier, he focused on undoing the seal. He first undid Lil’ Nael’s seal. Although Hull was much stronger, Hull had been seriously injured. His human form would consume less energy and he was small so he would not be the focus of the attacks. Lil’ Nael was different. His fighting strength was nil in his current but would be utterly dangerous if his seal had been undone. Linde’s attacks were aimed at Samael so it shouldn’t be a problem for Nael to kill his way out and escape. Samael had already brandished his sword to kill the enemies. On the other hand, Suo Fei had his full concentration on the Transmogrifier. His thoughts were well-founded but Linde was not a fool. He had come prepared and naturally knew of Nael’s existence. However, Nael was currently nowhere to be seen. He only had to think about it for a moment before deducing that he had been shrunken. Thus, he immediately arranged a squad to search for Nael. Although he couldn’t stop Suo Fei, it would be too late for Suo Fei to undo the seal if he captured the shrunken Nael and killed him in time. As a matter of fact, it was truly a coincidence. Under normal circumstances, ninety percent of those who had been sealed by the Transmogrifier would transform into a human form, whether it be large or small. The situation of the lil’ Nael where he transformed into a tiny palm-sized dragon was extremely rare. The searching squad naturally didn’t expect this. They were looking for a human figure and they only looked at large places. For instance, they wouldn’t browse through places like drawers. Therefore, although lil’ Nael was only in the next room, no one noticed. Who would have thought that a dragon that was a hundred metres big would become palm-sized? Who would have thought that a mighty and majestic dragon would actually sleep in a drawer? Hence, when the Transmogrifier undid his seal and the red dragon suddenly appeared, a blood-curdling scream sounded. That’s right, they had been miserably crushed by the fat dragon. The situation sank into chaos, which was a delight for Suo Fei and his group. The little cub and the fireball fatty took advantage of the chaos to come over. With the two guys, Suo Fei’s confidence was greatly increased. He became more assured that they could escape. Suo Fei didn’t climb onto the red dragon’s back. He still couldn’t fly away at this moment. They still had to kill their way out. Since Nael was responsible for throwing powerful attacks, Suo Fei had to let him have free rein. If Nael still needed to protect him, he would only constrain him which was unacceptable. The current situation was countless times more dangerous than it had been in the treasury. They weren’t joking around. Thus, Samael led the front while Nael brought up the rear. Suo Fei, the little cub and the fireball fatty were in the middle. The formation was like a sharp weapon, piercing the enemy and forcibly cutting down a path for them. If they continued this way, they would definitely be able to break out of the encirclement. However, Linde wouldn’t let them rush out just like this. His eyes narrowed as he analysed the situation. If he were to be honest, he was shocked. He tried to predict the worst that could happen, but he didn’t expect that they would suffer such a huge loss. The cause of this was that demon. In just a matter of a few days, Samael’s ability had improved in such a terrifying manner. It had simply improved by countless times. What did he encounter? Linde didn’t know, but he knew that he couldn’t tolerate his existence that was already threatening his position. Previously, Linde had still been confident that he could defeat Samael by himself, but he didn’t have that confidence right now! Linde took a deep breath before he instructed his underlings one after another. They must be killed in this place no matter what. There’s no way that he could leave this future trouble alive. Although the situation was currently to Suo Fei’s advantage, Suo Fei knew that Linde was far more able than this, so his mind had always been tense and he didn’t dare to be careless. Sure enough, after a few seconds, the formation of the black-robed men changed and those at the forefront had been replaced by melee Paladins. Those who excelled in ranged attacks retreated to the rear. The attack strength of the Paladins was low but they had a strong defense. They had tough skin so it might not be possible to penetrate their defenses with a single blow. The Archmages formation had terrifying attack strength. One after another, impressive magic attacks were casted. Even with the dragon’s protection, it was still extremely toiling to march forward. All of a sudden, the situation was reversed and they couldn’t move a single step. Samael quickly whispered to Nael. Suo Fei heard it and nodded urgently. Then, he jumped onto Nael’s back. Nael stopped attacking and folded his wings together to form a protective shield that could withstand most of the magic attacks. When Linde saw this situation, his mouth twitched and mockingly smiled. Samael could only fight at a close distance. Initially, the dragon could release magic spells to attack the Archmages from a distance, but now the dragon switched to a full defense. How could Samael deal damage to the Archmages who were of utmost importance by himself? This thought had just flashed through his mind when his eyes widened from surprise when he saw the next scene. Samael unfolded his wings! Linde had launched a sneak attack on Samael before so he knew better than anyone that the wings of this demon had been cut off. In addition, it had been seriously injured and could never be recovered. So how could it be healed?! He was still in a state of shock when he saw Samael rapidly flying to the sky and brandished his swords and swept it across the Archers in the sky. Then, he turned around at great speed and charged straight towards the Archmages who were at the rear. Linde raised his eyebrows in fright. It would truly be a bad thing if Samael charged straight in. With his fighting power, if he could get close to the mages who had nearly zero defense, wouldn’t it be as easy as cutting cabbages?! He quickly issued another command and a squad of primeval demons rushed towards Samael. Unfortunately, they weren’t as fast as Samael so they could only look on helplessly as Samael charged in like a cheetah pouncing on a flock of chickens. A lot of them had been eliminated instantly. Samael didn’t continue fighting zealously. After successfully launching an attack, he speedily retreated to where the red dragon was. The small group of Demons who arrived in a hurry attacked nothing but air. This sense of defeat due to the difference in their speed caused them to grit their teeth in anger. However, they could do nothing about it. Regardless of their classes, if they confronted Samael alone, only death awaited them. The only chance that they could successfully mount a sneak attack was if they went together. Now, however, the formation of the Archmages was already in disorder. The few who managed to survive were still frightened out of their wits. Although they tried to force themselves to continue chanting incantations, their accuracy rate had gone down, with eight out of ten attacks missing their target. It would have been fine if they only hit the air, but they happened to hit those on their side! The Paladins at the forefront took the brunt of their attacks. Linde cursed angrily and immediately asked them to stop. When they stopped the formidable attacks, their situation became passive once again. They had so many people but they actually couldn’t deal with merely one demon. They would probably be a laughing stock if this were to be spread around. After losing so many of his underlings, Linde finally couldn’t press down the anger rushing forth in his heart. He looked at Grantlyn who was controlling the Shadow Shifter to continuously summon troops to replace the people that they had lost. “How many squads have we lost?” Grantlyn shut his eyes. Although his mind was concentrating on the Shadow Shifter, he still managed to reply. After all, no one else apart from him knew the figures, “20th Paladin squad, 12th Mage squad, 5th Assassin squad and 3rd Archer squad...;” As Grantlyn reported the figures one after another, Linde clearly felt the veins in his forehead throbbing furiously. Grantlyn was relaying the squad number that was currently being teleported, which meant that all the squads before that number had been killed. They had actually lost so many people! Linde had not expected this, especially the Mages! Eleven squads? Almost half of their troop had been killed! Most of the Mages were Celestials. If one died, they would be one person less. So they were exceptionally precious! But now...; Linde rubbed his forehead in worry. He asked the black-haired man next to him, “Ned, how is the situation at Bran’s side? Wasn’t he already hiding in the Dragon Valley?” The black-haired man replied, “I’ve been trying to contact him ever since we entered Dragon Valley.” “You can’t reach him?” Ned was silent for a while before answering, “Yes.” Linde was mad, “What the hell is going on with him?” Ned hastily explained, “It might be inconvenient for him to contact us, but he surely must be here. The seal on the Dragon Valley’s entrance had been undone from the inside. The Teleportation Restriction Array had also been destroyed by him.” “Why can’t we reach him then?” Linde glanced at the red dragon’s side and whispered, “Could it be that he’s with Samael and his group?” Ned was stunned and said, “That’s possible.” Linde commanded at once, “More reinforcement! Stop them! We must kill all of them today!” Sal was also surprised that the situation would come to this. He had joined their group ‘Heaven Defier’. He was appointed to a high position after years of painstaking efforts and learnt some of their core secrets. At the same time, he also used the information he got from Heaven Defier to search for the dragons that were lost. Then, he found the Launay who had been reborn. The reason why he brought Linde and his group to this place was that he wanted to completely get rid of them in one go. He believed in Launay’s abilities. As long as Summer could succeed occupying his consciousness and he could obtain the key to awaken Launay, these people would definitely not be his opponents. All the opponents who could contend with Launay had already died! However, he didn’t expect that Samael, who had not yet awakened, already had such ability. He felt great satisfaction when he saw him beating and killing the Heaven Defiers into such a miserable state. The debts that they owed were long overdue. Sal was in high spirits. His only dissatisfaction was the elf by his side. It would be better if he died here. When this thought crossed his mind, Sal could hardly restrain himself. He wanted to take advantage of the moment when Samael was not paying attention to push Suo Fei out of Nael’s protection so that this weak elf could be blasted into pieces. This way, he would be accidentally killed and this matter would have nothing to do with him. Even if Samael would feel sad because of it, there’d be nothing that he could do about it, isn’t that so? He had already used the resurrection artifact to resurrect his mother. Thus, there’d be no possibility of the elf being resurrected again. Sal increasingly felt that this idea was feasible. He carefully thought about it and ensured that there was nothing that he had overlooked. Thus, he quietly approached Suo Fei. Suo Fei had always been vigilant so he keenly felt Hull’s approach. However, he didn’t think much of it at this moment and only assumed that there was too much pressure on Hull’s side and that Hull approached him to ask him for help. Speaking of which, although Suo Fei didn’t have high fighting strength, defending himself was not a problem. With the help of the little cub and the fireball fatty, the three of them formed a steady triangle formation and were able to strongly resist the onslaught of attacks. Sal was just about to carry out his plan when he suddenly halted. He received a message from Summer. Summer had succeeded! Summer could finally occupy Hull’s consciousness for a short period of time. It was difficult for Sal to hide his excitement. He only wanted the most crucial information, he didn’t care about anything else. It was only a very brief moment but it was enough for Summer to obtain the information he wanted. At this time, Sal received the information. He suddenly looked at Suo Fei and was somewhat glad that he hadn’t acted out of impulse earlier. It turned out that he would have to play a key role. “The key to awakening Samael is to be betrayed by his true love.” Although Sal didn’t want to admit it, he believed in Hull’s discernment. Samael had fallen in love with the elf. This was a fact. So to say, the elf only needed to betray him? This might be difficult for others to accomplish, but it was really too easy for Sal. So easy that it couldn’t be any easier! Sal smiled faintly and asked Summer to return. He needed to distract Samael. He would need time to prepare so he stealthily contacted Linde. Immediately after Ned received the response from Bran, he passed on the information to Linde. Linde looked at it and immediately carried out the order. Suo Fei had always been behind Samael so he could accurately sense that Samael was consuming his strength so he could promptly heal him. Although there was an unending stream of enemies, Suo Fei was not afraid in the slightest. He knew that they would definitely be able to escape. He believed in Samael and also believed in himself! The Paladins at the forefront unexpectedly retreated several steps all at once. Suo Fei narrowed his eyes, Linde must be playing tricks again. Suo Fei’s eyes widened at the next scene. It wasn’t unusual for a whole line of elves to appear out of nowhere. What was unusual, however, was that these elves looked exactly the same. Long, silver hair draped behind them. They were wearing white and blue cavalry attire and their silver eyes were big and round. All of them looked exactly like Suo Fei. Suo Fei felt that he was looking at a mirror’s reflection. What is happening?! Why do they all look like me?Do they want to immobilise Samael?Please! Stop the nonsense. The original is here so how could Samael believe it? He hurried forward, wanting to tell Samael not to be fooled by these illusions. However, he suddenly had a feeling that his body didn’t belong to him. He tried to approach Samael and was actually able to. He saw Samael looking at him. He wanted to speak, but couldn’t speak. Then, he watched in surprise as the dagger in his hand pierced Samael’s chest. Suo Fei was utterly stunned. He didn’t know what had happened. Why did I attack Samael?Why can’t I control my body? The feeling of helplessness as he watched his body move on its own made him panic. His own hand, with the dagger that he commonly used, pierced the chest of Samael, the person he loved and trusted the most. No!This can’t be! Seeing that Samael’s clothes were stained red with blood, Suo Fei’s eyes ached at the sight. He couldn’t control his body, but he could clearly feel his heart aching as if the sword had pierced his own heart instead. No!No matter what had happened, it shouldn’t be this way! He wanted to take control of his body, he wanted to resist! This thought emerged abruptly and Suo Fei unyieldingly began resisting the strange force. He focused on taking control and felt that he was competing with a stranger, crazily competing for control of this body. At this time, although Suo Fei still couldn’t comprehend it fully, he vaguely understood that he had fallen into someone’s trap and was being controlled by someone who had a high mental strength. Such a thing was completely strange to Suo Fei. He had never encountered it before but it was not unheard of. It was a puppeteer, a hidden class in Yalance. There was actually a puppeteer here. Suo Fei felt chills straight to his core and he didn’t dare think too much about it. He knew that he must be strong-minded this time. He must not show the slightest weakness otherwise, he wouldn’t be able to resist the person intruding his body. Suo Fei didn’t dare to look at Samael. He didn’t dare to look at him straight in the eyes. He was afraid to look at Samael’s expression. No matter what his expression was, it would be enough to make him fall apart in an instant. He believed in Samael and he knew that Samael believed in him. However, it was because of this trust that he became increasingly afraid. How would Samael understand his situation? If the situation was calm or if he was a bystander, Samael might be able to accurately determine that he was being controlled. However, Suo Fei didn’t have confidence even though it was Samael. At this moment, in this kind of situation, could Samael still make a calm judgment? He was afraid, afraid that he’d see even a tiny bit of disappointment in Samael’s eyes. Such an emotion would distract him and make him unable to continue taking control of his body. Thus, he dared not look at Samael. But in fact, his mind was already weak just by having these thoughts. The opponent he was resisting was astute and instantly felt Suo Fei’s fear. The one in control of the body was still not Suo Fei but because of Suo Fei’s resolve, the body had stiffened. Nevertheless, the man was still able to control it. Suo Fei was forced to raise his head and look at Samael. He nearly wanted to scream out due to the fear in his heart. But he couldn’t stop it. A flood of emotions accumulated deep inside him and he didn’t have any way to vent it out. He could only remain suffocated, making it all the more unbearable. He looked at Samael with his heart filled with fear. As he looked straight into those beautiful purple eyes, he finally saw Samael clearly and the fear and worry in his heart vanished. Samael was looking at him without a trace of doubt in his purple eyes. Instead, it was gentler than usual. He saw Suo Fei looking at him and he lightly opened his lips and said, “Don’t be afraid. Hang in there.” At this moment, if Suo Fei had control of his body, he would have definitely cried out loudly. Samael knew. Even in this situation, Samael still knew. He knew that he would never hurt him. That he was being controlled. Blood kept pouring out of his chest, but even so, Samael still cared about him, encouraged him and believed in him! All of his fear vanished like smoke in thin air. He had received the most powerful support. Samael believed in him and he believed in himself. He definitely could do it, he could regain control of his own body! His strong willpower came back after a defeat and actually allowed him to seize control of the body. Pulling out the dagger and speedily healing Samael were matters of vital importance. However, the moment he pulled out the dagger, the scene that was playing in front of him made him absent-minded. Those ‘Suo Fei’s attacked Samael together. When faced with such attacks from all directions at such a close distance, Samael didn’t have enough time to dodge, but...; he could strike back! These ‘Suo Fei’s could die instantly with just a wave of his hand. Moreover, with Samael’s ability, he could still dodge all of the attacks. But...; Samael didn’t strike back. He didn’t even move. He rigidly withstood all the attacks. At this time, Suo Fei realised that perhaps Samael wasn’t able to ascertain which was the real him. Such a top-level puppet technique could completely copy him and make clones of him. Because his consciousness had been occupied, the manners and behaviours of those puppets were exactly like him. It was simply impossible to distinguish which was the real Suo Fei. It was like a mirror’s reflection...; Apart from him, no one else could tell. However, he couldn’t speak. He couldn’t tell Samael. Suo Fei was exceedingly distressed because of Samael’s behaviour. The puppeteer gained the upper hand because of his momentary inattentiveness and Suo Fei lost the initiative that he had gained. He was unable to heal Samael...; Suo Fei tried his best to gain back the initiative, but the wretched puppeteer had already grasped his weakness. Those Suo Fei puppets’ attacks weren’t strong, but they took turns to attack Samael ceaselessly. Suo Fei himself had already joined the group of puppets long ago. He managed to stop himself from attacking, but his eyes were firmly nailed on that spot. He couldn’t control his body to look away. He could only look on helplessly, look on as Samael became riddled with bruises, look on as Samael motionlessly withstood the attacks despite clearly being able to fight back effortlessly and look on as this powerful and prideful man was put in such a difficult situation just because of him. How could he still be able to focus while watching this scene? No!This can’t go on! Suo Fei kept telling himself, Why is this happening to Samael?It’s because of my incompetence! Because of my incompetence, I got controlled. I got threatened!I still let my defenses down despite the situation! If this continued, Samael would have withstood more attacks. How could I let this happen?!All of my reasons are just excuses. Compared to Samael, I’m nothing but scum.How could I be worthy of Samael?! No!I must be strong. I must let my mind focus. As long as I could gain control of this body, as long as I could defeat this wretched puppeteer, I would be able to save Samael. This is my own battle, so only I could fight it. I can’t be dependent on Samael. I must save Samael. I can do this! These thoughts ran through his head in circles and Suo Fei pulled himself together once more. Then, he began resisting the puppeteer stronger than before. Sal had never been in such a miserable state. He had never found himself in this kind of challenging situation. Summer was his medium, the most outstanding puppet in the entire Yalance, a puppet that solely belonged to him. However, he had never tried occupying two people at the same time. Hull was a green dragon who had lived for thousands of years. If Hull had not trusted Sal, had not been severely injured, had not lost a large amount of his mental strength after being trapped in the bottomless abyss, Sal would not have been able to control Hull’s consciousness so easily. However, even though Sal occupied Hull’s body, Hull had always been resisting. Nevertheless, Sal was confident that as long as Summer existed, it wouldn’t be a problem for him to slowly gobble up Hull’s consciousness little by little. Although it needed some time, it could be done. In the end, he truly succeeded. He occupied Hull’s consciousness and found out how to awaken Launay. His joy made him somewhat complacent and his behaviour became heedless which was unlike him. He never had high regard for Suo Fei, this weak elf. He believed that the elf would not be able to survive if he wasn’t relying on Samael. This elf had just been after Launay’s, hoping to receive his protection. Such a weak creature must have an extremely weak mental strength. Thus, he had no doubt that it would work on Suo Fei. He was still assured that he could control two people at the same time. In the beginning, it was exactly like what he had thought. The foolish elf had been occupied by him so effortlessly and he successfully commanded the elf to betray Samael. What could be more ruthless than such a fatal attack? Sal was extremely pleased with himself. He could practically imagine the look of despair on Samael’s face. Then, he would awaken and become that grim, strong, and unfeeling Dragon God. But...; what happened was beyond his expectation. Samael didn’t awaken. His expression had remained unchanged. What went wrong? Could it be that Samael wasn’t genuinely in love with that elf? No, that couldn’t be. Sal had the utmost belief in Hull. Hull knew Samael extremely well so what he had said must be the truth. So why exactly did it not work? Could it be that...; Samael had actually seen through his scheme?He actually knew that Suo Fei was being controlled?How could that be?How could he not have any doubts in this kind of situation?How could he believe that despicable elf so much? The anger in Sal’s heart burst into a blaze. In addition, at this moment, he actually sensed that damned elf resisting with all his might. That cowardly and despicable thing actually wanted to fight over control over his body! He couldn’t let him succeed. He immediately commanded Summer to transfer the mental strength that was suppressing Hull to Suo Fei. He wanted to completely occupy the damned elf. Even if it completely destroyed his mind and turned him into an idiot! Suddenly, Suo Fei felt even greater pressure, so much so that he even experienced a heavy tearing force and a severe headache. This time, however, he didn’t retreat. He had been watching Samael all this while. The scene initially made him afraid, terrified and distracted, but when he saw Samael enduring until he was covered with cuts and bruises, his motivation to fight had been bolstered. He was the only that could save Samael. He had to be strong to be worthy of Samael’s feelings for him! With this conviction, Suo Fei’s mental strength reached its peak. Sal had no choice but to transfer the mental strength he was using to suppress Hull to contend against Suo Fei. He ruthlessly wanted to destroy Suo Fei completely, but he heard Summer’s ice-cold voice, “Master, because of the transferring of mental strength, I’m unable to suppress Hull any longer.” Sal was slightly startled before he finally gnashed his teeth and said, “Give up on suppressing Hull. I want to completely ruin this elf.” “Yes, Master.” Suo Fei, who held the upper hand, suddenly felt greater pressure than before. It was only then that he realised that the puppeteer hadn’t been using his full strength. He had actually been holding back! Why was he holding back?Could it be that he had been looking down on him from the beginning? Because of this thought, Suo Fei began fiercely resisting. He already had no worries. Everyone who was important to him was in this place. He only needed to go all out, he only needed to win! With a focused mind and high fighting spirits, strong power surged up from within his soul. He was strong, brave and fearless! He wouldn’t give up. He would never give up. He focused his mind on contending against the enemy. This was a battle where no blood was spilled, but it was a hundred times more dangerous than any blood-soaked battlefield. They were fighting for his consciousness and his thoughts. A person’s mind was somewhat fragile. A little bit of cowering or a little carelessness might cause him to lose the game. Sal was extremely confident in himself. He believed that he was at a disadvantage beforehand because he had been suppressing Hull at the same time. It was indeed true that he looked down on Suo Fei, this degenerate elf. How could he possibly have strong mental power? He was the only existing puppeteer in Yalance. The most fundamental requirement for a puppeteer was the ability to achieve a state of total concentration. They could only achieve this not with empty words, but with a thousand years worth of training. Sal believed that no one in Yalance had stronger mental power than him. Even before the downfall of the gods, there had only been a handful of people who could suppress him, let alone this elf who was a degenerate beyond comparison. Thus, he was confident. Although he tried not to underestimate the enemy, he could not let go of the disdain he had deep inside his heart. He looked down on him and held him in contempt. This race liked pretending having high morals and acting noble and virtuous. Their despicable appearance when they do malicious deeds was so hateful. The deep-rooted enmity between them and this rarely seen competition incessantly stirred up the emotions that were locked deep inside his heart. His rationality was dissipating and madness was bursting out to the surface. Sal had long forgotten that Suo Fei was the key to awakening Samael. He only had one thought at this moment. He must defeat him, occupy his consciousness, let this nauseating man’s mental power thoroughly fall apart, let him kneel on the ground and bitterly weep as he humbly begs for forgiveness and let him be violated. In fact, his mental state had been teetering on the brink of collapse. Compared to his extreme ruthlessness, Suo Fei’s mental state was much more positive. To save Samael, he refused to admit defeat and he resisted. His conviction caused his mental power to increase. With his incessant perseverance and effort, he obtained longer-lasting power. He was positive so he could improve himself, but Sal had been blinded by hatred and arrogance. The most important thing when fighting for consciousness was that the mind must be clear-headed. When rationality was completely lost and only madness remained, his wall of conviction would instantly collapse, fully revealing himself to the other party. Sal was destined to lose right from the beginning. He was conceited and underestimated the enemy. His heart was filled with revenge and hatred. These feelings accumulated more and more until it made him lose his rationality. In the end, the glass-like walls that he had built completely shattered and he was thoroughly conquered by Suo Fei. Since Suo Fei had never used it, he had not known his own strength until it had been brought out at this moment. He was like a soldier seizing a territory, wilfully galloping inside Sal’s consciousness. He wasn’t aware that he could choose what memories he’s absorbing. He entirely had no idea how to restrict the flow of information, so he could only accept all of it. Sal thoroughly lost. He had spent a very long time learning how to control others, how to occupy others, and how to make puppets, but he had never imagined that one day, he would be the one who was being controlled and being swallowed whole. He was scared, horrified, but he couldn’t resist. Facing Suo Fei’s astonishing mental power, he was as weak as a newborn baby. He could clearly perceive that everything in his consciousness was being transferred. Once all of it had been swallowed whole, he would lose everything and become a useless person! No...; This shouldn’t be the case! This is impossible! Everything’s wrong! It’s impossible for me to lose!I can’t lose to that weak, degenerate elf who will sooner or later be swallowed by the curse! As long as I can kill him, everything will return to him. Kill him. Yes, I can kill him. I still have Summer. My consciousness is still connected with Summer. I can transmit a command to Summer, to let him kill Suo Fei. As long as the elf’s physical body died, no matter how strong his mental power is, he could only wait for his death.That’s right, why didn’t I think of such a simple method earlier? The excited Sal instructed Summer, but he didn’t receive the emotionless response just like before. His heart thumped, Why didn’t he respond?Had Summer broken out of his control? No, it cannot be. Sal nearly used up his remaining power as he shouted in his mind, “Kill him! I’m commanding you to kill him!” After a long time, he finally heard the familiar voice, “Yes, Master.” Sal was filled with immense relief. But then, he suddenly felt unbearable pain. The acrid smell of blood filled the air and Sal’s mind went blank from the strong sense of suffocation. This momentary period of blankness allowed him to briefly break free from the battle of mental powers. He blankly stared at the sword piercing his chest as well as the person holding the sword. Why?Why did you do this? Summer, why are you facing me with a sword? Looking at the vacant eyes of the blue-haired man, Sal instantly knew that he had lost. He had thoroughly lost. When his consciousness was being eroded, Suo Fei had snatched away his contract with Summer. Summer no longer belonged to him. His puppet was no longer his. He blankly stared at the sylph whose blue hair was fluttering in the wind. He was expressionless just as before. He only knew how to be obedient, to blindly listen to his commands. Regardless of whether it was right or wrong, he would carry it out. But now, he actually lost his puppet. Sal gave up on resisting upon this realisation. The pain in his chest became less intense as his consciousness dissipated. In the end, with his eyes wide open, his body tumbled backward. His face was pale because of the large amount of blood loss and the collapse of his mind. His initially beautiful face became extremely old. As the body had lost its soul, it was like a candle flickering in the wind; A slight gust of wind could extinguish it. Suo Fei abruptly opened his eyes. He endured the severe headache and swiftly looked at Samael. His chest felt a sharp, piercing pain at the sight. Without even needing to think, he mouthed the incantation that he had memorized by heart. The memory didn’t belong to him, but at this very moment, it had already fused together with his own. His mouth slowly spilled out the ancient spell. His heart was pounding heavily, then the people witnessed an astonishing scene. Because of the desperate battle, there were countless corpses on the ground. At this moment, however, they slowly stood on their foot because of the spell that he had chanted. Their eyes were vacant and blood was still pouring out of their body, like ghosts that climbed out of hell to reap lives. They crazily rushed to the battlefield. There was no pattern to their brutal violence, but they had extraordinary strength and were fearless. Those fake ‘Suo Fei’s were attacked, bitten and gnawed. They were killed in an incomparably cruel and frightening manner. After dying, the corpses stood up again and rushed towards the battlefield. It was an exceptionally strange and terrifying battle. The bloody scene was revolting. The mages who were casting spells, the fighters who were resisting the attacks and the assassins who were mounting a sneak attack were all stupefied. They halted and dazedly watched the scene. When they recovered their senses, a frantic chorus of screams rang out. The scene went completely out of control. Fear rose from the bottom of their hearts, causing their fighting spirit to be non-existent. They couldn’t fight and only wanted to escape. Escape from this endless hell. The only thing that Suo Fei knew about the spell was that it was a forbidden spell that Sal was unable to cast. He wasn’t sure what it was, but when he saw Samael’s appearance, the deep anger he felt made him choose this spell. Why? Why must they trouble us ceaselessly?We didn’t do anything wrong. We didn’t interfere with anyone. So why can’t they leave us alone? He quietly walked towards Samael. Samael was riddled with wounds, but the most serious one was the fatal wound on his chest that he had dealt himself. Samael’s weakness was his heart. Samael would die if it bled constantly. Suo Fei knew this better than anyone, but he still pierced Samael’s chest with a sword. With this thought, Suo Fei simply felt as if his own heart had been pierced by this sword, so painful that it could not be any more painful. He lowered his head, closed his eyes and kissed the wound. In the cruel hell where mangled corpses were everywhere and anguished wailing sounded in the air, he tightly closed his eyes. His expression was undefiled and divine. A dazzling Holy Light enshrouded the two of them, as pure and bright as the beautiful sun. When the light faded, not a single wound remained on the black-haired man’s body. His unique purple eyes were deep and distant, but it only had one person in it, the elf who was already sleeping in his arms. Samael unfolded his wings and huge, pure-black bone wings covered the horizon, like a Devil who had awakened from the abyss. He gently kissed the elf’s forehead, whispered something, and then placed him on the red dragon’s back. When he flew to the sky, the corner of his mouth rose into a smile filled with ridicule towards the massacre, towards the fighting, and towards their selfish desire. It’s time to end this ludicrous bloodbath. Because of this terrifying battle, the troops of the Heaven Defiers had already been utterly defeated. Even Linde had been frightened speechless by the scene. When Samael rushed out and landed in front of him, Linde felt intense fear. A cold chill ran down his back as he felt an unprecedented sense of death. He had provoked someone that he shouldn’t provoke. Someone that he couldn’t afford offending. No. It’s not over yet. This isn’t the end. How could they lose here? They had spent thousands of years to reach this point, so how could they die now? They were not at fault. They were doing this for their own race. For their own people. To survive. To keep on living! Suo Fei fainted. He seemed to have lost consciousness, but his mind was incomparably awake at this very moment. However, he was unable to sense what was happening around him despite his clear-headedness. He seemed to be in another place, a place that was unfamiliar yet also familiar. A thick, black mist surrounded him. It seemed like he would be able to see light if the mist parted, that he would be able to see something. With this thought, the black mist seemed to have its own consciousness as it gradually became lighter and began dissipating until he could finally see everything around him. The sky was a beautiful colour. It was very light but bright powder blue. Under such mellow colours, the whole word was full of dream-like colours. There was a forest of treehouses and wide streets. The flowers were beautiful and the greeneries were lush. The place was like utopia. Suo Fei knew that this place was the Dragon Valley, but it was vastly different from the Dragon Valley he knew. Although there wasn’t much noise from the people coming and going, the place was brimming with people. It was extremely harmonious. It was no longer like a painting, like a desolate beautiful scenery. Suo Fei watched the passersby and noticed that there were the beautiful and alluring Sylphs, the short but robust Dwarves and the green-skinned, crafty Goblins. The Dwarves were hammering in their homes, making everything that could be made. The Goblins were hawking and peddling their goods. The walking Sylphs would stop once in a while to bargain with the Goblins. However, the next moment, the sky suddenly went dark. Everyone looked up and saw a huge silhouette gliding over the horizon. It was a dragon whose body was more than ten metres long. Its appearance was majestic as it spread its wings and soared to the sky. The curves of its body were smooth and beautiful. The pedestrians didn’t seem surprised by the sight. They even greeted the dragon. The dragon lowered its eyes slightly and winked towards them. Everyone below burst into uproarious laughter. The Sylphs could fly. They had thin wings, beautiful and graceful. With a slight flutter, they rose to the sky, surrounded the dragon and chattered about something. The dragon raised its head with a very proud appearance. The scene was warm and beautiful. A trace of warmth lingered in Suo Fei’s heart. Then, the scene changed. Suo Fei seemed to move to another place. He seemed to be inside a room. It was an extremely large room. It was so high that the ceiling couldn’t be seen. The furnishings were exquisite, but the style was simple. The door was pushed open and Suo Fei saw a black dragon poking his head in. His whole body was pure black, but his eyes were a deep purple, as deep as the beautiful violets. He seemed solemn and his body was emitting a majestic and imposing aura. He flew towards the door, then a black mist suddenly appeared. When it dissipated, the black dragon was gone and was replaced by a flying human figure. He had long black hair, purple eyes, and an extremely exquisite face. If Suo Fei could emit a sound, he definitely would have cried out in surprise. It was Samael. No, not Samael. He seemed to be more mature and calmer. Although he had a young appearance, it could be seen that he was someone who had experienced many vicissitudes of life. Suo Fei felt that he had learnt of something. He couldn’t help but follow Mr. Black Dragon. He saw the black dragon walking towards a room and pushing the door open. Then, he saw the black dragon’s stoic appearance becoming much softer and his eyes becoming gentle and doting. Suo Fei followed him without hindrance and saw an extremely beautiful woman behind the door. She had long, slightly curled, silver hair that reached the ground. She was wearing a black clothing which formed a stark contrast against her skin that was as white as snow. When she saw Mr. Black Dragon, a smile blossomed on her face and the deep affection in her eyes was not the least bit concealed. The black dragon lowered his head and kissed her on the forehead. Her cheeks turned slightly red as she playfully pushed him away with a whisper. This piqued Suo Fei’s curiosity. Then, he saw a sight that surprised him even more. Following the black dragon’s gaze, he saw three small beds that were placed side by side on the left side of the room. There were two, light blue, wooden beds in front and a light pink flower bed at the back. They were small, exquisite and extremely beautiful. The black dragon walked over. Suo Fei followed him and saw a cute little thing sleeping on the bed. With just a glance, Suo Fei was unable to look away as he felt his heart melting. The short, messy black hair stood in all directions. A few unruly strands fell on his forehead. His skin was so fair it seemed almost translucent. His eyes were closed as he slept soundly. The miniature version of Samael was so adorable that Suo Fei’s heart nearly let out pink bubbles. His little cheeks looked so soft that people couldn’t help but want to poke it. He wasn’t the only one who had this thought as it was evident that Mr. Black Dragon also thought of this. He actually reached out and poked the baby’s soft little cheek. Suo Fei was extremely envious. Why can’t I touch it...; The black dragon seemed to have used too much force as the lil’ Samael woke up. When his purple eyes came into view, Suo Fei felt that his heart nearly stopped beating. This must be Samael. The little Samael. The Samael that I have never seen before...; The little Samael’s eyes were slightly dazed and when he saw the black dragon, he called out in a sleepy voice, “Dad.” The stoic Mr. Black Dragon was unable to maintain his stoic face. A loving smile could be seen in his eyes and he broke into a smile that he couldn’t contain. He was just like a foolish father who was unable to conceal his joy after being called by his child no matter how hard he tried. He whispered, “Sleep.” Then, he patted Samael’s head, patted him lightly and awkwardly coaxed him to sleep. The little Samael seemed to want to say something, but looking at the black dragon’s appearance, he pursed up his lips and didn’t say anything. Instead, he closed his eyes and went to sleep. The tiny corner of his mouth rose into a faint smile. Then, the black dragon went to look at the two beds beside it. There were two little buns who were just as adorable, one boy and one girl. The boy looked like the black dragon while the girl looked like the mother. It truly wouldn’t be wrong to say that the members of this family were all attractive. After that, the couple left and the scene around Suo Fei became black. After a while, his surroundings brightened once again and Suo Fei discovered that he was still in the Dragon Valley. He saw the adolescent Samael walking ahead followed by a round-eyed little boy who shouted, “Brother! Brother! Slow down!!” Samael’s footsteps slowed down by a lot but the little girl walking beside him turned around and pulled a face at the little boy, “Dum-dum.” Tears immediately welled up in the boy’s eyes and he wailed unceremoniously, “S-sister, you bullied me...;” The girl became anxious when she saw him cry. She hurried over and coaxed him, “Don’t cry. Don’t cry or else mommy will scold me again...;” Is this coaxing or grumbling...; Suo Fei was caught in between laughter and tears at the sight. Then, he saw many more clips about this family. In fact, Suo Fei didn’t want to watch anything else. He watched Samael slowly grow from a child who had just learned how to walk to a tall and slim youth. He became more and more mature and more and more dignified until he became an outstanding dragon. The two little buns also grew up. Although the girl followed her mother’s appearance, her temperament was quite different from her gentle mother. She was quite aggressive. She handled matters in a quick and efficient manner. Also, she strived to be the best in everything. Compared to his two older siblings, the youngest child inherited his mother’s personality. He was easy to be tenderhearted and had a meek personality, perhaps because he had been pampered too much by his brother and sister. Suo Fei quietly watched them. He didn’t know how long he had watched them. It could have been a very very long time, it could have been just a brief few minutes. However, he wasn’t tired of watching them. He even felt that he couldn’t get enough watching them. Suo Fei was perfectly content watching them grow. The scene changed once again. Suo Fei had already become used to this. He already figured out that he could only watch and could not intervene. Nobody could sense his presence. A crack suddenly appeared in the sky that had always been a beautiful light blue. The crack was black. It was so deep that it was terrifying. The Sylphs who saw it were extremely astonished. The Dragons rushed forward and they surrounded the crack. There was no sign of activity for a long time. When everyone thought that nothing could possibly happen, a huge sphere fell out of the crack and tumbled onto the ground. The crowd surrounded the sphere and stared at the strange thing. After a while, a small hole appeared on the sphere and a group of people walked out. Suo Fei’s eyes widened. To be precise, there weren’t only Humans, there were also Demons, Elves, Celestials and Trolls. Upon seeing their faces, Suo Fei had an inexplicable sense of familiarity. That’s right, they were in the portraits that Suo Fei had seen in the Demon Realm. They were the people that Grantlyn and Linde had shown him. The gods who, according to them, had disappeared. The only one whose name he knew was Cindy, the God of Nature. What is going on? As soon as these people appeared, the Sylphs surrounded them with curiosity. Then, the Dragons kept them in close confinement. They couldn’t speak their language so they couldn’t communicate. They didn’t know how they came, where they came from and what they wanted to do. Vague, ominous thoughts flashed in Suo Fei’s mind. Then, he saw the Dragons negotiating with them and they finally understood their purpose by communicating via body language. The outsiders explained that they were met with a mishap so they wandered about in destitute up until now. Thus, they wished that they could continue staying in this place. As they didn’t seem to have strong powers and the Dragons had been getting along well with the Sylphs who also had a human form for a long time, they agreed to let them stay. The Dragons treated them kindly. They helped them set up their homes, taught them skills they needed to survive in Yalance, and even bestowed them formidable strength to guarantee the continuation of their races. The Dragons had also taught the Sylphs previously, but the Sylphs had not dedicated their efforts to these things. They were indifferent towards the pursuit of power. Instead, they prefer having a peaceful life. Making things and selling them was far more attractive than those strange spells. However, the outsiders were extremely captivated by those spells. They were like sponges that had come across water, absorbing these heaven-sent secret spells. Their initially weak bodies gradually became stronger. They concentrated their efforts on mastering them and they were incomparably dedicated to pursuing strength. As such, after a hundred years, they reproduced quickly and matured extremely quickly. After absorbing and assimilating everything that the Dragons had given them, their inherent nature of not knowing how to be content was gradually revealed. Suo Fei didn’t want to look at the next scene, but he was unable to shift his eyes away no matter what. There was one conspiracy after another, combined with countless scheming, wholly revealing their greedy nature through these revolting conducts. The things that these so-called gods did was terrifyingly brutal. It was rare for Dragons to turn to their human form. Thus, because of this trait, the conscience of the outsiders was fed to the dogs. Their rationale was that if they weren’t in human form, then they weren’t people. They were just animals. Moreover, every part of these animals was a treasure. Beneath their sycophantic flattering was contempt. They had never looked up to the Dragons, even though the Dragons had given them a place to stay and even though the Dragons had given them formidable strength. The dragons’ acts of kindness would never compare to the outsiders’ intense desire to completely conquer the place. Suo Fei’s eyes turned red as he watched the massacre. His wrath peaked when he saw their revolting faces. When the black dragon died in battle, the meek boy who was doted on by his parents and was dearly loved by his brother and sister died without an intact body. Then, Suo Fei saw Samael completely lose his sense of reason. <strong>Smut Warning. Read at your own discretion. </strong>To read, please press the dropdown at the [The Birds and The Bees] The Dragons had no king, but a god would be born every ten thousand years. They would either be born as a god or would be awakened due to some kind of event. When Samael’s father, Saldor the Black Dragon, died under the joint attack of the Demons that he had taught, the corpse of Samael’s younger brother, Till, had been dismembered. Thus, the only God of Destruction had been awakened. The black dragon Launay, because of death, betrayal, and vengeance, became the Dragon God of Destruction. With overwhelming strength, a cold-blooded mind and ruthless means that the previous gods had never had, he instigated a cruel and vicious war of vengeance. The battle lasted for ten thousand years. The invaders reproduced rapidly, faster than everyone had imagined. Their strong learning ability and rapid growth allowed them to incessantly have fresh blood joining the battle, thus their vanguard were long and endless. In comparison, the Sylphs’ military power was unable to stand a single blow. The Dragons’ military power was extraordinary but there were too little of them. Facing the invaders who could rapidly reproduce, it required a long time for them to give birth and reach maturity. Although they had a strong fighting ability, their population was slowly dwindling without end no matter how they resisted. Under these circumstances, Dragons were constantly dying, but there was no fresh blood to make up for the fighting strength of their lost compatriots. The longer the war dragged on, the more disadvantageous it became for them. The final battle took place in the bottomless abyss. It was a battle that words couldn’t describe. Both sides suffered heavy casualties. There was no room for negotiation between the two parties. They had dropped all pretense and all that remained was a life-and-death battle. Suo Fei was looking at the bottomless abyss from above. He saw Samael, a completely unfamiliar Samael. He was an exceptionally unfeeling man. His purple eyes had become thoroughly dark, without a hint of brightness. His face was ice-cold. The Asura Blade was dispersing an intense red mist due to the blood that it was crazily absorbing. The bright red blood mist was like a heat of fury rising in the air, so intense that it could not be dispelled. Suo Fei dazedly watched him. At this very moment, he discovered the origin of the Asura Blade. It was Samael’s weapon, only Samael’s. The pure black blade was formed from countless dragon bones. All the dragons that had been killed...; Samael’s family, friends and clansmen...; It was a Blade of Vengeance that served as a reminder of the deep-seated hatred caused by this debt of blood for Samael. Watching the last scene, Suo Fei’s face turned deathly pale. He saw the last god use his godhood to cast a curse to the entire Yalance, cursing all of his enemies to be trapped in this place until death. His gaze remained on those purple eyes that were filled with boundless darkness. Then, everything became dark. It was all over. Suo Fei stood in a daze, unable to collect his thoughts for a very long time. After a period of time, his surroundings became bright once again. Suo Fei’s eyes were lacklustre. He merely followed his instinct to look at the source of light where he saw a very beautiful woman. She had silver hair, silver eyes, and skin as white as now. Her mouth was hooked up into a soft and gentle smile. Suo Fei couldn’t see it clearly so he didn’t know whether what he was seeing was real or just a figment of his imagination. Vixanne...; Is it Vixanne? Suo Fei’s mouth moved as he uttered something softly, “Vi-Vixanne?” The woman walked over, took Suo Fei’s hands and gently said, “Fey, mother is here.” Suo Fei could not even sense his own body beforehand, but now, he could clearly feel Vixanne clutching his hands. The soft and warm sensation spread through his palms and flowed straight to his heart, making him move closer to the source of warmth. Vixanne looked at him with penitence in her eyes, “Fey, the scenes earlier, I’ve also seen them.” Suo Fei was still somewhat absent-minded so he unconsciously asked, “What were they? Why did I see them?” Vixanne was silent for a while before she replied, “They were memories, memories of many people. You might have received them indirectly from Sal. There were Sal’s memories, Hull’s memories and the memories of many dragons.” “The reason why this golden dragon learned to be a puppeteer was to preserve these memories. He had devoted himself to searching for these lost memories, searching for these fragments and saving them in his consciousness. Of course,” Vixanne paused before she continued with great difficulty, “There were also memories that belonged to you.” Suo Fei was startled. A trace of distress flashed in Vixanne’s eyes as she whispered, “Fey, I’m sorry.” Suo Fei was taken aback for a moment. His body went stiff and his voice became tense, “You...; You...;” Suo Fei was unable to speak out. In those memories, he had seen Vixanne. He had seen her more than once. She was the daughter of Cindy, a powerful Archmage who had extraordinary healing abilities. Vixanne didn’t avoid the topic. She softly said, “What I’ve been taught and the ideas that had been instilled in me were completely different from what you’ve seen. Most of our clansmen didn’t know the truth. We have been compelled by our own sense of justice. We didn’t see how the Dragons treated the gods at the very beginning. Ever since we were born, we only saw the Dragons attacking us again and again. It was a vicious cycle. For this reason, we’ve paid a disastrous price.” Suo Fei could mentally understand what Vixanne had said, but he couldn’t accept it emotionally. When the war had just begun, it was still possible to distinguish right from wrong. However, in the endless chaos of war, countless innocent lives would always be implicated from both sides. The sins that the invader gods had committed were devoid of conscience. They ruthlessly dismembered the benefactors who had saved them and drove the once warm and kind-hearted race to a corner. Then, they received their retribution. The Dragons’ God of Destruction was awakened and carried out a crazy massacre, causing the invaders who didn’t know the truth of the matter to be filled with fear, fear of the Dragons’ ruthlessness and fear of dying. Thus, they picked up their weapons and started the never-ending war. This eternal hatred was deeply rooted within them. In the end, all gods perished, the Dragons were nearly annihilated, and Yalance was almost gripped with deathly silence. And that curse...; When he recalled it, Suo Fei’s mind buzzed, as if it wanted to split open. He endured the pain as he asked, “The last scene...; Was it true?” Vixanne looked at him in the eyes. There was a hint of conflict in her eyes and she whispered after a while, “Yes.” Suo Fei lightly hummed in response. The two were silent for a long time. Suo Fei didn’t speak and Vixanne only stared at him. After a while, she softly said, “Fey, the gods of Yalance had disappeared a long long time ago. Those who fought the final battle had left me forever. I already knew a long time ago that I would also die. I’m unable to stop and I didn’t want to stop it. After having you, I wanted to finally end it all.” “I’m not a qualified mother. I don’t deserve to be one. Fey, I’m really sorry.” Suo Fei remained silent. Vixanne paused before she resolutely said, “Fey, you don’t have to do this. You don’t have to worry about this. In fact, all this time, I’ve been in despair. I wanted to make a final attempt, but it wasn’t necessary. There’s no need to...;” Before she could finish speaking, Suo Fei interrupted her, “Mother, live well. I’m well aware of the situation.” Vixanne swallowed the words that had reached her lips. Suo Fei took a deep breath and said to Vixanne, “It’s about time. I should go back. Mother, have a quick recovery. I’m waiting for your return.” There was a flicker in Vixanne’s eyes as she lightly nodded. Suo Fei closed his eyes and emptied his mind of thoughts. When he opened his eyes again, he was able to genuinely sense his body’s existence. He was back, back to the real world. After Suo Fei got his bearings, he turned his head and saw Samael who had been watching over him. Suo Fei didn’t know how long he had slept, but the scene was no longer what it had been before. All the enemies were nowhere to be found. They should still be in the Dragon Valley, in the treehouse. Warm sunlight seeped through the window, gently enshrouding the whole room. It was warm and cozy. Samael had his eyes closed. He had faint dark circles under his eyes. Suo Fei felt distressed. He could imagine that Samael must have remained by his side after escaping from the battle. Suo Fei noiselessly sat up and he quietly stared at Samael. The more he stared at him, the more he felt that he liked him. In addition, the more he stared at him, the more disconcerted he felt. Suo Fei’s hand had just touched Samael’s cheeks when Samael’s eyes snapped open and his purple eyes met with Suo Fei’s. After a while, Suo Fei’s eyes bent into a smile as he looked at Samael. Samael was startled. Then, he leaned slightly forwards and dropped a kiss on Suo Fei’s palm. The smile on Suo Fei’s lips became brighter. His eyes were curved like crescent moons. His palm felt ticklish, and so did his heart. He and Samael were sitting, but he was slightly shorter. Thus, he knelt on the bed to make up the height difference. He placed both of his hands on his face, somewhat bold but extremely affectionate. He leaned over and kissed Samael. Such an obvious enticement caused the air around them to simmer with heat. Samael moved Suo Fei’s hands to wrap around his neck. Then, he embraced his waist and pressed Suo Fei closer to deepen their light kiss. The initiative had been taken away from him, but Suo Fei cared not a whit. He felt Samael’s demands. Samael strongly plundered and crazily sucked his lips. He was very impatient and somewhat rough thus he pulled Suo Fei tightly into his arms as if he wanted to make Suo Fei a part of him. It wasn’t as comfortable as their previous intimacy, but Suo Fei didn’t care. He vividly felt Samael’s impatience. His breathing became erratic and his cheeks flushed crimson. He panted heavily as his hands fumbled in their haste to take Samael’s clothes off. The more anxious he felt, the clumsier he became. Unable to unbutton them, he was left with no other option but to forcefully rip the clothes off. Suo Fei let out a sigh of comfort as he lay against Samael’s warm skin. He pressed his body tightly against Samael, as if he had come across a blazing fire in the cold winter. He leaned closer, desperately drawing Samael’s warmth into his own body. Samael felt the overwhelming sensation of Suo Fei rubbing against him. Somewhat caught between laughter and tears, he held back the elf by the waist and spoke in a low voice, “Don’t be impatient.” But Suo Fei was very impatient. Dissatisfied, he leaned close to Samael’s ears and whispered softly, “Samael, I want it.” His voice was as light as a feather, tickling Samael deep down inside. Then, the elf nibbled Samael’s earlobe, playfully flicking his tongue. Samael’s hands that were clasping Suo Fei’s waist suddenly exerted force as he distinctly felt that a certain place on his body had become painfully hard due to Suo Fei’s teasing. Suo Fei yelped due to the sudden pain so Samael hurriedly loosened his grip. However, as the two were very close to each other, Suo Fei clearly felt Samael’s reaction. The elf was startled at first then his eyes bent into a smile as he looked at Samael. He blinked before slowly bending down and pulling off the messy clothes that he had torn earlier and something jumped out. It was throbbing intensely and was as hard as iron. It stood fully erect. That shape and size...; Suo Fei slightly frowned and was somewhat surprised. Imperceptible fear flashed his eyes. But a while after, his hand grasped the thing. His slightly cold hand lightly touched it, but it was unable to extinguish the fire soaring within Samael. Instead, the heat became more intense. Samael released Suo Fei’s waist. He gently caressed Suo Fei’s body and teased his two sensitive spots in circles. He distinctly felt the elf trembling slightly. Suo Fei nearly became dazed from the trembling, but he finally realised what he wanted to do. So, with a resoluteness that was hard to come by, he held on to his consciousness, moved backward and kissed the erect thing. He initially wanted to suck the thing fully into his mouth but...; Cough cough, he changed his plans mid-way and instead used his tongue to lick around the swollen length. “Sofey, stop it.” Suo Fei ignored him. Although he wasn’t very skilled, he still remembered the standard principle that he must use his tongue and not use his teeth. He licked him even harder. It was just that the more he licked, the more Suo Fei miserably discovered that the lil’ brother was still getting bigger. Suo Fei was truly frightened seeing it with his own eyes. How did Laozi completely take this thing inside me at that time? Wouldn’t this thing stab me to death? He paused in contemplation for a while. During this time, Samael turned Suo Fei’s body until Suo Fei’s rear was facing him. At this time, Suo Fei finally made up his mind to go all the way based on the principle that the first time would be difficult but it would get easier from the second time onwards. He lowered his head and continued licking and sucking the thing, not realising that his position had changed and that his back was completely exposed to Samael. Thus, when a certain place of his body was attended to by Samael, Suo Fei trembled subconsciously and his mouth’s action became much slower. Compared with his clumsy movements, Samael’s hand was unreasonably nimble, rubbing Suo Fei’s thing up and down, sometimes fast and sometimes slow, reducing Suo Fei’s mind into a puddle of bliss. Although his mouth was still slathering along Samael’s girth, all of his attention had long been concentrated on the extremely pleasurable place. After a while, Suo Fei became unbearably impatient, wanting to release. He turned his head to look at Samael with a dazed expression, “I want...;” Samael halted his actions, “What do you want?” Suo Fei stared at him blankly, bit his lips and said, “Want...; want to cum...;” The desire in Samael’s eyes became even more intense and he hoarsely said, “Be good, don’t be impatient.” After that, he inserted a finger into Suo Fei’s hole and Suo Fei trembled. As he previously ‘attended’ Suo Fei’s front, the rear hole was already drenched with liquid. Hence, his finger went in extremely easily. Samael stared at him unblinkingly and whispered in a low voice, “Do you want it here?” Suo Fei was already muddle-headed. His front was still clamouring for relief, but Samael refused to touch it. Instead, he was filled with another numbing sensation as a finger entered him from behind. This stimulation left him incapable of ‘attending’ to Samael any longer, he simply threw his head back and let out irrepressible moans. Samael inserted another finger, sloshing in and out of his damp hole. Suo Fei was left unable to control himself even more as he delivered himself to Samael. Just when Suo Fei was about to climax, Samael suddenly pulled his finger out. Suo Fei was at a loss by the sudden emptiness and he grunted in dissatisfaction. Samael lightly smacked his butt and instructed, “Come on, sit up.” Before Suo Fei could even react, Samael had already raised him by the waist and helped him sit up. Then, aiming at a certain place, he slowly lowered him down. As Suo Fei realised what was happening, his eyes became wide-opened as he looked at Samael. He felt that as his body moved downwards, Samael’s thing was slowly penetrating him. When he recalled the size of that thing, fear flashed in Suo Fei’s eyes. The rationality that he had lost due to lust returned and he slightly resisted, “No, it won’t fit...;” Samael didn’t let go of him. He caressed his waist and gently placated him, “Don’t be afraid. It’ll be fine. It’ll feel extremely good.” He dragged the end of his sentence, his voice filled with enticement. Suo Fei was still stumped for words when Samael pulled him downwards. The pain from the sudden penetration made him scream out and he begged, “No, no.. Samael, it hurts...;” At this moment, Samael frowned. It was too tight. So tight that he nearly couldn’t control himself. However, when he saw Suo Fei’s expression, he suppressed his desire to rapidly pound his thing in and out of Suo Fei and continuously appeased him. Under his appeasement, Suo Fei finally adapted and secreted more slippery fluid, smoothly alleviating the pain. Suo Fei was stimulated by the heightened sensation brought by the moist liquid. Suo Fei gradually tasted the sweetness and began moving his hips up and down. His movement made Samael completely lose his restraint. He grabbed Suo Fei’s waist and helped him rapidly work his hips up and down Samael’s rod. The sloshing of the liquid and the slapping of skin against skin was accompanied by Suo Fei’s moans that he could not contain. He could not remember the words that slipped his mouth. He might have urged him or he might have begged him for mercy. In any case, his head was filled with thoughts of him, only him. Suo Fei climaxed and white fluid sprayed out. At the same time, he felt his insides being filled with a scorching hot liquid, hot enough to touch his soul. Their bout of passionate lovemaking ended. Suo Fei was tired and gasping for breath but Samael was filled with energy, his previous exhaustion having been swept away. Suo Fei was lying on his chest, panting. Samael gently caressed his body that was tense from the adrenaline. The atmosphere was sweet and warm. The two lovers hugged each other, their hearts close to one another. What could be better than this? Suo Fei quieted down as he listened to the sound of Samael’s heart beating. So lively, so powerful, so...; vivid. He listened quietly. After a while, he raised his head. His eyes were still slightly wet with tears. He sat up a little and rubbed a certain place against Samael as he softly spoke, “Samael, I still want it...;” The liquid leaking through that place made it exceptionally damp. Samael’s thing instantly hardened under his rubbing, but instead of penetrating that place, he stopped Suo Fei by the waist and lightly said, “You’re tired. Have a good rest first.” Suo Fei frowned, dissatisfied with what Samael had said, and poutingly murmured, “But it’s itchy...;” As soon as he said those words, he clearly felt the grip on his waist weaken and the thing that was against his entrance twitch slightly. Suo Fei smiled and deliberately lowered his voice as he said, “It’s really itchy. It really wants you to enter it.” Then, as he desired, he felt his body being slammed down. The rock hard thing penetrated his body once again. Samael turned him around and lay him facing the bed, slamming into his hole from behind. He ceased his movements and lightly kissed the elf’s fair and smooth back. The elf tried to restrain his voice but a moan escaped his lips. Samael told him, “Suo Fei, don’t cry out.” It was an extremely intense, very long yet short night. Suo Fei indeed cried out. It would be strange if he didn’t because of his actions that were courting death. The consequence of Suo Fei’s self-indulgence was that he slept for three days and three nights straight. When he tried to stand up after waking up, he gloomily gnashed his teeth. Can I even walk with these legs?!I can barely even stand! At this moment, Samael pushed the door open, holding a tray filled with exquisite side dishes and fragrant porridge. A smile could be clearly seen on Samael’s face. He put down the tray and gently massaged Suo Fei. His voice was doting as he rebuked, “You’re not allowed to be this wilful next time.” Suo Fei looked at him and thought that Samael was too good-looking. He had a relaxed expression and the smile in his eyes was unabashed. His low voice was so pleasant that no musical instrument in this world could ever compare. But...; Suo Fei felt unbearable pain in his heart which made him cry uncontrollably. Seeing this, panic flashed in Samael’s usually calm eyes. His voice was anxious as he asked, “What’s wrong? Where does it hurt?” Suo Fei stared blankly before quickly shaking his head. Then, he smiled and said, “Nothing, I’m probably too hungry. Haha.” Simply glossing it over, Suo Fei lowered his head and started eating. Suo Fei stuffed everything into his stomach and was fully satisfied. He leaned towards Samael and softly said, “Samael, I love you.” Compared with Samael’s forbearance, Suo Fei was the type of person who could not restrain himself. Since he couldn’t restrain himself, it was usual for him to declare his feelings. Samael’s mouth raised in a faint smile. He liked hearing these words no matter what. Then, Suo Fei suddenly sat upright and asked while staring at Samael, “Samael, do you trust me?” This abrupt question was somewhat strange but Samael didn’t think much about it. He stared back at Suo Fei and said, “I do.” As soon as Samael said these two words, a feeling that he couldn’t explain suddenly rose. When he finally noticed that something was wrong, it was already too late. Suo Fei motionlessly stared at Samael with unprecedented graveness. He had never imagined that the first time he would use this ability was at this time and that the person he would be casting it onto was Samael. Suo Fei struggled to ignore the surprise in Samael’s eyes. He controlled his own emotions with difficulty before he commanded, “Activate the Asura Blade.” There was a slight resistance from Samael so Suo Fei quickly strengthened his mental power and repeated the command. The Asura Blade was activated. Suo Fei’s gaze fell on the graceful, pure black blade. Suo Fei had previously heard that the bones of the dragons were extremely pure black. He had thought that he had never seen it before, but it appeared that he had seen it long ago. As he stared at the Asura Blade, those memories swept through him and he clearly felt the breath of life within the blade. He turned to look at Samael. Then, he pointed at his own heart as he gave the last command, “Kill me.” Suo Fei closed his eyes. He didn’t dare to dart another glance at Samael. Although he had controlled Samael’s consciousness, he knew that it was because he had caught Samael off-guard. Moreover, Samael was not the least cautious around him. Despite this, he didn’t dare to be careless. His heart would waver if he took another look so he must make it quick. At this moment, he remembered the illusion that he had seen, where his chest had been pierced by the Asura Blade. He had imagined many, many scenarios, and finally concluded that it was impossible to happen. He had not expected that it would actually come true and that in such a situation, he willingly made it happen. He knew that he should stop thinking too much so Suo Fei focused his mind and didn’t give Samael the opportunity to resist. He forcefully controlled Samael’s body, raising Samael’s arm and aiming the Asura Blade towards his chest. Suo Fei’s eyes weren’t opened but he could clearly feel it. He felt the cold tip of the Asura Blade pointing at his chest. He also felt the weak vitality that was enshrouding the pure black blade. These were the people Samael cared about, their vitalities. There was a sharp pain in his chest. Suo Fei knew that the Asura Blade had pierced him. However, it was still not enough. Suo Fei clenched his teeth and sent his body forward using his remaining strength. The pure black blade thoroughly pierced his chest. Suo Fei felt an intense coldness from the intense pain and the incessant flow of blood. The fear of death that he had buried deep within him rushed forth at this moment. He was afraid, extremely afraid. He didn’t want to die this way. He wanted to be with Samael, wanted to be with him forever. Because of his body’s weakness, he lost control of Samael’s body. Suo Fei felt his body fall into a warm embrace. He greedily hurled himself into the embrace and he heard a completely unfamiliar yet incomparably familiar voice. It was Samael’s voice, but he had never heard him speak in this tone. Samael’s voice had always been deep, steady and filled with confidence. It had never been this turbulent. Nevertheless, it filled his heart with bitterness. He keenly felt ice-cold tears dripping onto his face, causing his heart that had already been pierced to twitch in pain. In the end, he slowly opened his eyes and was greeted by his appearance that would be engraved in his soul forever. <i>Sorry, Samael. This is the best way I can think of.</i>  Samael had used his own godhood to cast a curse towards the whole Yalance. All lives in Yalance would eventually die. Every step they took was heading towards their own doom. The only way to lift this curse was to resurrect the Dragons and let the souls that were inside the Asura Blade come back to life. However, it was no longer possible to resurrect the Dragons using the resurrection artifact. The Dragons were too powerful and the resurrection artifact was unable to bear their vitality, let alone so many Dragons. But, Suo Fei was able to accomplish it. In the memory, he saw the memories of Sal, Hull and countless Dragons who had died. Finally, he saw Vixanne’s memories. He didn’t know why he saw Vixanne’s memories. Perhaps it was because Vixanne intentionally relaxed her consciousness to allow him to see it. In Vixanne’s memories, he saw Sofey Evans and found out why Grantlyn’s attitude towards him had always been so indifferent and uncaring. It was because he was not the son of Vixanne and Grantlyn. No, it should be said that he wasn’t their biological son. Vixanne was a descendant of a god. She had long been incapable of giving birth. It was impossible for Grantlyn and her to have children. Vixanne had brought him home and because of Sofey’s existence, Vixanne and Grantlyn quarreled several times. In the end, Grantlyn compromised and adopted him as a son. Ever since Sofey appeared, all of Vixanne’s attention had been focused on Sofey. She gave Sofey all of the maternal love she could give. She regarded his life as her own and gave all the beautiful things she could give to Sofey. Although it was not her real child, her feelings for Sofey were the most genuine feelings a mother could have for her son. However, her original intention was heart-wrenching. Sofey wasn’t an elf. He wasn’t clear what he really was up until now. Vixanne was the last god. She knew how cruel the curse that was cast onto Yalance was. Moreover, she also knew the exact conditions to come into contact with the curse. She devoted her efforts to find a way to come into contact with the curse and Sofey’s existence gave her immense hope. She found and raised Sofey because she knew Sofey’s power better than anyone else. The power of the gods came from Yalance. This was what attracted them to come to this place from their own homeland. Its formidable power incessantly exuded an alluring aura. They experienced a lot of trials and tribulations to reach Yalance but were unable to find this power. However, the abilities that the Dragons had bestowed them made them wild with joy. It truly was a miraculous place. Yalance had given them unparalleled power. Grantlyn and his group only believed that Yalance had swallowed their abilities, but in fact, it was the opposite. It was Yalance who gave them the ability to become gods. But as they became stronger, the more they were able to sense Yalance’s calling, that thing that was known as the Power of God that was incessantly luring them. With it, their abilities would continue to improve and reach the height of immortality. Their crazy desires were spurred so they did a lot of deranged things, completely angering the powerful Dragons. Everything came crashing down right when they were about to succeed and the gods disappeared in Yalance forever. As for the legendary Power of God, Vixanne was the only living person who knew. However, she had never thought of obtaining this power for herself. She merely wanted to untie the knot and lift the curse, even if it came with the cost of her own life, even if she couldn’t wash away all their sins. She just wanted to do the best she could do. Then, she truly found it. She found Sofey. Sofey was the only one who had the power to resurrect the Dragons. But after releasing all this power, Sofey might die. Suo Fei was not a selfless person. Instead, it could be said that he was extremely selfish. He really really sympathised with the Dragons, but Suo Fei was hesitant to use his own life to save the Dragons. All of his hesitations disappeared when he saw the ending. When the end of the curse neared, all living things in Yalance would disappear. Everything, every single thing. Even the Sylphs, even the remaining Dragons, even Samael...; This was what Suo Fei feared the most.  He didn’t have the heart of a saviour. He was just an ordinary person. He was selfish and average, but he had a weakness. This alone was enough to fearlessly sacrifice his life. The memories in his mind, his blood, and the lives of the Dragons that were within the Asura Blade were the conditions to resurrect the Dragons. He didn’t want Samael to kill him. It was too cruel for Samael. But there was no other way. In this world, except Samael, no one else could activate the Asura Blade. An Asura Blade that hadn’t been activated wouldn’t fulfill the condition. Therefore, he could only forcefully control Samael and command Samael to kill him. In fact, when he was about to control Samael, Suo Fei still had some wishful thinking. Perhaps he would only need power and blood and he wouldn’t die. Perhaps he would still have a breath of life remaining after all of this. Then, he would slowly recover and survive. However, at this moment, Suo Fei no longer had any wishful thinking. The power required to resurrect the Dragons was too strong. He clearly felt his blood being rapidly gobbled up. His vitality was incessantly dissipating at such a fast speed. He simply had no hope. Suo Fei was immersed in his thoughts, sighing as he looked on blankly. “Fey.” A gentle voice sounded in his head. Suo Fei was taken aback. It was Vixanne. <i>Vixanne...; How could she be in my mind?</i>  As he was perplexed over this, he felt a warmth that belonged to Vixanne. He couldn’t see her but he heard her voice once again, “Fey, mother loves you.” After a brief pause, Suo Fei saw her beautiful smile which had been deeply imprinted in his mind when Vixanne had once said goodbye to him. “Fey, live well.” She said the same words that she had said that time. Suo Fei was frightened. He opened his mouth to speak, but all his words seemed to have been blocked. He was unable to say anything. Right afterward, a formidable power rose which covered his ice-cold body. Something fused inside his body, flowing through his heart, turning into his blood and then flowing to the Asura Blade. Suo Fei felt that he had become a vessel, a channel. When he finally comprehended what was happening, it was too late. He was already unable to stop it. Vixanne actually merged her own vitality into his body and replaced him in supplying the vitality and blood that the Asura Blade needed. Vixanne...; had died. He could clearly sense Vixanne’s vitality being gobbled up completely. Not a single trace was left. Vixanne once again gave her own life to save him. An intense pain stabbed Suo Fei in the heart. His thinking was in disarray until he sensed his remaining vitality being frantically drained away. It wasn’t over yet. He had truly underestimated the vitality and blood that was needed by the Asura Blade. At this time, a powerful force suddenly wrapped around him, surrounding his entire being. The force was abundant and tyrannical, not allowing him to resist in the slightest. Then, a familiar voice that made him tear up rang out in his mind, “If you die, I will destroy the whole Yalance.” It’s Samael! Suo Fei didn’t pay attention to what Samael had said. He only knew that it was Samael. It was Samael’s voice. It was Samael’s breath. He could still sense Samael! However, when his excitement subsided, a chill ran through him. <i>Why...; why could I hear Samael in my mind?</i>  Moreover, Samael couldn’t have such abundant force, such toughness, such bloodthirstiness that had already deeply integrated into his own being, and such strong vitality that was beyond one could imagine. This...; This was Launay, the God of Destruction. <i>Samael...; had been awakened?!</i>  <i>Why? Isn’t the key to his awakening is being betrayed by his loved one? He didn’t betray Samael. How could he betray Samael!</i>  And then, Samael’s ice-cold voice sounded in his mind, “You promised me that you won’t die in my hands.” Suo Fei’s heart thumped as he instantly understood. A storm of conflicting emotions rushed forth in his heart. That was true. He had forgotten his promise and let Samael kill him, controlling Samael to stab him in the heart. He had betrayed him. As it turned out, this was also a betrayal. Suo Fei’s mouth twisted into a bitter smile, but he was filled with dread when he realised what Samael was doing. Samael surprisingly, just like Vixanne did, merged his vitality with Suo Fei’s, flowing through his heart and then to the Asura Blade. Thinking of Vixanne’s death, Suo Fei was immediately afraid, terribly afraid. Words failed to come out of his mouth, but deep down, he unceasingly shouted, <i>Stop! I’m begging you! Don’t die, please don’t die...;</i>  However, he couldn’t stop Samael. Suo Fei couldn’t stop the fear reeling inside him. He was scared, scared that Samael would die while he would live. It was too terrifying. He couldn’t imagine a world without Samael! “Don’t be afraid. I’m here.” Sensing his fear, Samael’s cold and harsh demeanour finally softened and he quietly appeased him, “I will never leave you alone.” His words were like a tranquiliser, immediately calming Suo Fei down. He had extreme trust in Samael. Samael wouldn’t leave him. He wouldn’t leave him as he did. At this moment, Suo Fei clearly perceived how cruel he had been. But, he wouldn’t be like that anymore. He wouldn’t leave Samael again. He would be with him until the end of time. Suo Fei finally pulled himself together with this conviction. He no longer resisted Samael but instead accepted Samael’s power, paying close attention to the transferring of his vitality. With Samael’s aid, the bottomless pit that was the resurrection artifact finally found its limit, stopping after being filled with two-thirds of the vitality it required. Suo Fei was utterly exhausted so he fell asleep immediately. When he woke up, he quickly looked around. Then, he felt warmth emanating from behind him. He turned his head and saw Samael. Samael, who had the appearance of a fully grown-up adult, was somewhat unfamiliar to him. He kept a straight face as he rigidly stared at Suo Fei. Suo Fei first eyed Samael up and down and after making sure that he didn’t have any discomfort, he loudly asked for forgiveness, “I was wrong, I was wrong. I was truly wrong. I know that I was wrong and I definitely won’t do it again. Ah, no, there definitely won’t be a next time.” Suo Fei kept on begging for forgiveness, incessantly making promises and buttering up to him but Samael remained silent. Suo Fei steeled his resolve. He was indeed at fault in this matter thus he resigned himself to whatever punishment Samael chose. After gibbering for a long time, Samael took Suo Fei’s hand and lightly bit Suo Fei’s finger. Suo Fei felt a stabbing pain and then he saw blood coming out of his fingertip. He looked at Samael in doubt. Samael took out a knife and lightly pierced his own chest. Bright red blood immediately flowed out of his fair skin. Samael held Suo Fei’s hand and pressed the finger that was dripping with blood onto his chest. Their blood mingled with each other and a wonderful feeling sprouted in Suo Fei’s heart. He heard Samael chanting and ancient spell in a low voice. After that, Suo Fei was astonished to see his blood flowing into Samael’s body and Samael’s blood flowing into his body through his finger. The feeling was too wonderful. It was as if...; as if...; they had merged into one. He looked at Samael with wide-opened eyes as he asked, “What’s happening?” Samael pulled him into his embrace and whispered into his ear, “Our lives are now connected. I promised you that I will never leave you alone.” This delivered a massive shock to Suo Fei’s heart. Emotions that couldn’t be described by words swirled in his heart. He was moved and at the same time, he felt remorse and a deep lingering fear. He leaned closer into Samael’s embrace and loudly wept. He had never cried this way before, crying as if he wanted to vent out all the pent-up emotions within him. Samael smilingly stroked his back and appeased him in a soft voice. *** Three days later, Samael, Suo Fei, Lil’ Nael, little cub, fireball fatty and Hull, who had already regained control of his body, went to the bottomless abyss once again. The Asura Blade had been filled and its entire body was emitting a dazzling radiance that nearly masked its pure black colour. The bottomless abyss was the final battlefield. It ended here, so here was also where it should begin. Samael thrust the Asura Blade into the center of the abyss. Intense light that was as searing as the midday sun emerged, gathering at one point before suddenly bursting out. The Asura Blade shattered into pieces, slowly sinking together with the rays of light into the ground, enshrouding the abyss of utter darkness with warm colours. Suo Fei took out the pink interspatial bag, which was the last thing that Vixanne had left him. He stroked the interspatial bag fondly before burying it. Although Yalance didn’t have this custom, Suo Fei wanted Vixanne to have a place of refuge, a place for him to remember her by. They stayed in the abyss for several days. Lil’ Nael spent this time digging for treasures among the glittering mountains. When he saw a round ball, he immediately found it to his liking. He called Suo Fei and Samael over to show off the treasures that he had found. Then, Suo Fei saw a gratifying scene. The ball that was in Nael’s mouth made clattering noises. A crack appeared at the top of the ball which turned into a hole. Eventually, a little head popped out. It was a little dragon. A dragon was born. They...; had been resurrected. They had come back to this world with a new life. <i>End of text.</i> Suo Fei had always wondered how Samael settled those people after he lost consciousness and what had happened. As he did something wrong previously, even though Samael didn’t say it out, Suo Fei could tell from some of Samael’s actions that he was still angry. Suo Fei was good at understanding others. Putting himself in Samael’s position, if Samael controlled him one day to kill Samael, he would definitely go out of his mind. Fortunately, at the last moment, Samael turned the tide and stopped the tragedy from happening. He couldn’t imagine the consequences if it did. Suo Fei could feel his heart wrenching just by imagining it. Thus, Suo Fei was extremely remorseful. No matter how honourable his reasons were and how it was for Samael’s sake, he went back on his promise with Samael and made Samael do exactly what he was most afraid of: hurting him. Suo Fei knew that Samael was actually a very soft-hearted person, especially towards him. He simply wouldn’t lose his temper. He was already that kind of person before he had recovered his memories. After being awakened, he cherished Suo Fei even more. Thus, even though he was angry and still had a lingering fear, he didn’t show it. He didn’t rebuke or confront him. But it was exactly because of this that Suo Fei felt even more upset. He felt that what he did was really too much. Because of this sense of guilt, Suo Fei busily spent these days being extremely attentive to Samael. He followed Samael around at all times, cooking a variety of delicacies for him and obeying everything that Samael said. Naturally, it was not only that. Suo Fei was even more obedient in the bedroom. He had never been so obedient in his whole life. Samael saw all of his actions and knew what Suo Fei was thinking, but in fact, he was not as great as Suo Fei thought. A long time had passed but the scene where the Asura Blade pierced Suo Fei’s chest would still appear in his dreams. He would never forget the shock that he received at that moment. He drowned in despair and pain that seemed to cut deep into his bones, seemingly swallowing him whole. Then, the powerlessness and hopelessness threw his mind into utter darkness. Every time, he could only helplessly watch people die, watch as he lost everything that he cherished, cared about and possessed. Like a turbulent river, he was unable to stop them from flowing away. From his helplessness rose an immense desire to control. At that moment, he wanted to kill Suo Fei, kill everyone, and kill himself. He wanted the whole world to disappear. He would not be afraid of losing people if he didn’t have them to begin with. Hell wouldn’t be so terrifying if beautiful days didn’t exist. This thought was like a ferocious viper, tempting and luring him. If he took that step, he would no longer have to be afraid of losing people, he would not have to worry about betrayals. What else could he be afraid of if everything disappeared? But...; he suppressed the urge welling up within him. At the final moment, he seemed to have returned to the Knuhl Forest. The place where he had first met Suo Fei. He saw the young and inexperienced elven youth. His slender body seemed extremely frail and his silver eyes were blank, but under his daze, there was a strength that did not conform with his appearance. Samael felt that he had seen himself, his ignorant, foolish and completely defenseless self. It was Sofey, his Sofey. Samael’s lips curled into a smile as he lifted Suo Fei’s chin and kissed him gently. Because of this inexperienced kiss, Samael returned to his senses in an instant and he managed to suppress all his frantic thoughts. Everything wasn’t over. He wanted this person. He wanted him to live and stay by his side for all of his life. Suo Fei badly wanted to know what had happened afterwards that day, but he didn’t dare to ask Samael. He figured that he would be reopening old wounds if he mentioned this matter. He finally made him happy with great difficulty through tremendous efforts so he couldn’t raise this old topic. However, he wanted to know what had happened to Linde’s group. He couldn’t ask Samael so he could only ask the only reliable person present, Hull. Because of the rebirth of the Dragons, Hull’s attention was now focused on the dragon eggs. He was even more fond of the baby dragon who had broken out of his shell. Suo Fei found the baby dragon interesting so he played with the lil’ thing several times. Who would have known that although the lil’ thing was small, his ability was not. He could actually spit fire through his mouth. He wasn’t able to control his ability yet. Regardless of whether he was happy or unhappy, as long as his emotions had been agitated, his nose would emit smoke and fire would come out of his mouth. After being burned by him several times, Suo Fei finally kept a distance from him. Hull, however, didn’t mind at all. He had such a beautiful appearance yet he wouldn’t get angry or irritated when he was burnt by the baby dragon until he was covered with filth. Instead, he was exceedingly patient. He looked like a well-rounded nanny. Suo Fei greatly admired him for this. Hull was extremely courteous towards him because he had resurrected the Dragons. Hull’s attitude towards him had simply flipped a hundred and eighty degrees. He even wanted to call him benefactor. Thus, Suo Fei went to ask him about what had happened, but unfortunately, Hull was being controlled by Sal at that time so he was completely unaware of what was happening and didn’t know the exact situation. Suo Fei was disappointed. Hull didn’t know so he could only rely on asking the remaining people who had been present. Thus, he went to ask the red dragon, Nael. Oh good lord. The red dragon was depressed because he was being neglected by Hull. Suo Fei was simply delivering himself to Nael’s door when he asked him. Nael began prattling away, venting out all the words he had been storing deep inside. It was just that...; This topic...; Suo Fei face-palmed. Bro, will you stop mentioning how you blew a row of people away, spitted out fire towards a column of people, brandished your wing to sweep a group of people who were in a slanted formation and finally flung your tail to crush a large group of people to death? Suo Fei heard it so many times that his ears were about to bleed, but he still had not heard any important information pertaining to what Samael had done. Suo Fei couldn’t bear it any longer so he asked him directly. Nael blinked his eyes and pondered for a while before saying, “Brother Samael...;. He, er...; He...; Um...;” After hemming and hawing for a long while, Nael’s face furrowed into a confused frown as he replied, “Brother Samael was too small at that time so I didn’t pay much attention to him.” Suo Fei: 囧rz. Suo Fei was unwilling to give up so he asked about Linde and Grantlyn. Nael blankly asked, “Linde? Who’s that? Grantlyn...; Is that a cake?” In the end, Suo Fei could only pat Nael in the head and let him continue playing. Nael was unreliable so Suo Fei pinned his hopes on the little cub. Despite the little cub being usually unreliable, he was still reliable in crucial situations. At the least, he was much more reliable than Nael. Unfortunately, Suo Fei was still too naive. He looked for the little cub and asked about that day. The little cub didn’t brag about his glorious achievements and he also knew about Linde and Grantlyn. It stood to reason that he would be able to recount some things. Suo Fei looked at him with eyes filled with expectations. The little cub was in a daze for a while. Then, scratching his head, he murmured, “This...; This...; I didn’t really pay attention.” Suo Fei fell to the ground, “Why...;? Why didn’t you pay attention to such an important matter?!” Suo Fei’s words were like a key that ignited the little cub’s mouth to start talking non-stop. He disclosed, “Suo Fei, you’ve no idea. At that time, I had the biggest transformation of my life, a breakthrough, an important evolution...;” Seeing the little cub’s starry eyes, Suo Fei had a bad feeling in his heart. He asked, “It wouldn’t be that someone caught your attention, right?” “Who would have caught my attention? Was there anyone worth looking at? Look at what?” Seeing the little cub’s foolish expression, Suo Fei was relieved that it wasn’t a puppy love.【Puppy love, my arse】 The little cub happily continued, “I found out that weapons are edible. Moreover, they’re extremely delicious. Different grades would have different tastes. The tastes of a magic staff, a bow, a longsword and a greatsword were also different from one another. You’ve no idea. It’s like eating a tonic. I feel an abundance of power in my body after eating them. You can try it too. It’s really delicious...;” Suo Fei: Wtf. I shouldn’t have had any expectations towards this chowhound. FAIL+2 Suo Fei pinned his last hope on fireball fatty. When he found fireball fatty, he was joyfully playing. He had split himself up into numerous cube-shaped tiny fireball fatties, bouncing around the place. Suo Fei looked closely. Oh my, such top-notch lego blocks. Their sizes can be changed as I wish and I can arrange them however I want. He was struck with a sudden desire to join him. Seeing the fireball fatty’s foolish appearance as he failed to arrange the blocks, Suo Fei hurriedly went up to help him. After building an enormous ship and a long train, Nael and the little cub also joined them and they built a castle together. The four energetically played with the blocks. As for what Suo Fei initially wanted to ask...; Please excuse Suo Fei as he had already completely forgotten about it. Suo Fei only remembered it when he returned home in the evening and was immediately upset. His probing couldn’t be concealed from Samael, but since he didn’t ask, Samael also didn’t raise the matter. Linde was dead. Grantlyn’s whereabouts were unknown. The ‘Heaven Defiers’ had thoroughly collapsed. In the end, Harris rushed over to deal with the aftermath. Samael had let go of his enmity, but the memories he had were real. He would not eradicate all of the invaders, but it would be impossible for him to let bygones be bygones and make peace with them. The Dragons had been reborn and had come into this world of Yalance with new lives. Samael had no regrets. This was what he had hoped for. The past had passed. If the Dragons were reborn with their previous memories, war would be inevitable in Yalance. With their new lives, they would not have their previous memories and they would not have to carry their previous lives’ burden, which was not necessarily a bad thing. <strong>T/N:</strong> If you’ve enjoyed this story, pls support the other works of the author, Long Qi. Read this guide to learn how~ Also, here’s an NU list of her already translated novels. If you’ve enjoyed my translation, pls support me by buying me a ko-fi♡ You can also check out my next translation, This Omega is Sweet and Wild here on CG. THANK YOU SO MUCH!